“Bhikkhus, suppose a cloth were defiled and stained, and a dyer dipped it in some dye or other, whether blue or yellow or red or carmine; it would look poorly dyed and impure in colour.
“Bhikkhus, suppose a gambler at the very first lucky throw won a great fortune, yet a lucky throw such as that is negligible; it is a far more lucky throw when a wise man who conducts himself well in body, speech, and mind, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
“Bhikkhus, suppose a gambler at the very first unlucky throw loses his child and his wife and all his property and furthermore goes into bondage himself, yet an unlucky throw such as that is negligible; it is a far more unlucky throw when a fool who misconducts himself in body, speech, and mind, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
“Bhikkhus, suppose a man came with a blazing grass-torch and said: ‘I shall heat up and burn away the river Ganges with this blazing grass-torch.’
“Bhikkhus, suppose a man came with a hoe and a basket and said: ‘I shall make this great earth to be without earth.’
“Bhikkhus, suppose a man came with crimson, turmeric, indigo, or carmine and said: ‘I shall draw pictures and make pictures appear on empty space.’
“Bhikkhus, suppose a man in the course of a journey saw a great expanse of water, whose near shore was dangerous and fearful and whose further shore was safe and free from fear, but there was no ferryboat or bridge for going to the far shore.
“Bhikkhus, suppose a man were to take a loan and undertake business and his business were to succeed so that he could repay all the money of the old loan and there would remain enough extra to maintain a wife; then on considering this, he would be glad and full of joy.
“Bhikkhus, suppose men caught a robber culprit and presented him to the king, saying: ‘Sire, here is a robber culprit.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that a Wheel-turning Monarch possessed the seven treasures and the four kinds of success, and because of that experienced pleasure and joy.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that in the last month of the hot season a māluva-creeper pod burst open and a māluva-creeper seed fell at the foot of a sāla tree.
“Bhikkhus, suppose there were a bitter gourd mixed with poison, and a man came who wanted to live, not to die, who wanted pleasure and recoiled from pain, and they told him: ‘Good man, this bitter gourd is mixed with poison.
“Bhikkhus, suppose there were a catskin bag that was rubbed, well rubbed, thoroughly well rubbed, soft, silky, rid of rustling, rid of crackling, and a man came with a stick or a potsherd and said: ‘There is this catskin bag that is rubbed…rid of rustling, rid of crackling.
“Bhikkhus, suppose there were two houses with doors and a man with good sight standing there between them saw people going in and coming out and passing to and fro.
“Bhikkhus, that any bhikkhu who has abandoned five wildernesses in the heart and severed five shackles in the heart should come to growth, increase, and fulfilment in this Dhamma and Discipline—that is possible.
“Bhikkhus, that any bhikkhu who has abandoned these five wildernesses in the heart and severed these five shackles in the heart should come to growth, increase, and fulfilment in this Dhamma and Discipline—that is possible.
“Bhikkhus, that any bhikkhu who has not abandoned five wildernesses in the heart and not severed five shackles in the heart should come to growth, increase, and fulfilment in this Dhamma and Discipline—that is impossible.
“Bhikkhus, that any bhikkhu who has not abandoned these five wildernesses in the heart and severed these five shackles in the heart should come to growth, increase, and fulfilment in this Dhamma and Discipline—that is impossible.
“Bhikkhus, that is how mindfulness of breathing is developed and cultivated, so that it is of great fruit and great benefit.
“Bhikkhus, that is how mindfulness of breathing, developed and cultivated, fulfils the four foundations of mindfulness.
“Bhikkhus, that is how the four foundations of mindfulness, developed and cultivated, fulfil the seven enlightenment factors.
“Bhikkhus, that is how the seven enlightenment factors, developed and cultivated, fulfil true knowledge and deliverance.” 
“Bhikkhus, that one can engage in sensual pleasures without sensual desires, without perceptions of sensual desire, without thoughts of sensual desire—that is impossible.
“Bhikkhus, the blind turtle would sooner put his neck into that yoke with a single hole in it than a fool, once gone to perdition, would take to regain the human state, I say.
“Bhikkhus, the brahmin Brahmāyu was wise, he entered into the way of the Dhamma, and he did not trouble me in the interpretation of the Dhamma.
“Bhikkhus, the clansman Pukkusāti was wise.
“Bhikkhus, the clansman Puṇṇa was wise.
“Bhikkhus, the descent of the embryo takes place through the union of three things.
“Bhikkhus, the Dhamma well proclaimed by me thus is clear, open, evident, and free of patchwork.
“Bhikkhus, the Dhamma well proclaimed by me thus is clear, open, evident, and free of patchwork.
“Bhikkhus, the Dhamma well proclaimed by me thus is clear…free of patchwork.
“Bhikkhus, the Dhamma well proclaimed by me thus is clear…free of patchwork.
“Bhikkhus, the Dhamma well proclaimed by me thus is clear…free of patchwork.
“Bhikkhus, the Dhamma well proclaimed by me thus is clear…free of patchwork.
“Bhikkhus, the matchless Wheel of the Dhamma set rolling by the Tathāgata is kept rolling rightly by Sāriputta.”
“Bhikkhus, the paccekabuddha Ariṭṭha dwelt long on this mountain Isigili.
“Bhikkhus, the Tathāgata, too, accomplished and fully enlightened, directly knows earth as earth.
“Bhikkhus, the Tathāgata, too, accomplished and fully enlightened, directly knows earth as earth.
“Bhikkhus, there are animals that feed on grass.
“Bhikkhus, there are four ways of undertaking things.
“Bhikkhus, there are four ways of undertaking things.
“Bhikkhus, there are seven kinds of persons to be found existing in the world.
“Bhikkhus, there are some recluses and brahmins who hold such a doctrine and view as this: ‘Whatever this person feels, whether pleasure or pain or neither-pain-nor-pleasure, all that is caused by what was done in the past.
“Bhikkhus, there are some recluses and brahmins who speculate about the future and hold views about the future, who assert various doctrinal propositions concerning the future.
“Bhikkhus, there are some recluses and brahmins who speculate about the past and hold views about the past, who assert various doctrinal propositions concerning the past.
“Bhikkhus, there are taints that should be abandoned by seeing.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five cords of sensual pleasure.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five cords of sensual pleasure.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five courses of speech that others may use when they address you: their speech may be timely or untimely, true or untrue, gentle or harsh, connected with good or with harm, spoken with a mind of loving-kindness or with inner hate.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of clinging.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of fears to be expected by those who go down to the water.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of nutriment for the maintenance of beings that already have come to be and for the support of those about to come to be.
“Bhikkhus, there are these six standpoints for views.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three characteristics of a fool, signs of a fool, attributes of a fool.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three characteristics of a wise man, signs of a wise man, attributes of a wise man.
“Bhikkhus, there are these two kinds of search: the noble search and the ignoble search.
“Bhikkhus, there are these two views: the view of being and the view of non-being.
“Bhikkhus, there being a self, would there be for me what belongs to a self?” —“Yes, venerable sir.”—“Or, there being what belongs to a self, would there be for me a self?”—“Yes, venerable sir.”—“Bhikkhus, since a self and what belongs to a self are not apprehended as true and established, then this standpoint for views, namely, ‘That which is the self is the world; after death I shall be permanent, everlasting, eternal, not subject to change; I shall endure as long as eternity’—would it not be an utterly and completely foolish teaching?”
“Bhikkhus, there is a four-phrased statement, and when it is recited a wise man would quickly understand it.
“Bhikkhus, there was once a foolish Magadhan cowherd who, in the last month of the rainy season, in the autumn, without examining the near shore or the further shore of the river Ganges, drove his cattle across to the other shore in the Videhan country at a place that had no ford.
“Bhikkhus, there was once a wise Magadhan cowherd who, in the last month of the rainy season, in the autumn, after examining the near shore and the further shore of the river Ganges, drove his cattle across to the other shore in the Videhan country at a place that had a ford.
“Bhikkhus, these are the four kinds of fears to be expected by certain persons who have gone forth from the home life into homelessness in this Dhamma and Discipline.”
“Bhikkhus, this assembly is free from prattle, this assembly is free from chatter.
“Bhikkhus, this bhikkhu is called one whose cross-bar has been lifted, whose trench has been filled in, whose pillar has been uprooted, one who has no bolt, a noble one whose banner is lowered, whose burden is lowered, who is unfettered.
“Bhikkhus, this is the direct path for the purification of beings, for the surmounting of sorrow and lamentation, for the disappearance of pain and grief, for the attainment of the true way, for the realisation of Nibbāna—namely, the four foundations of mindfulness.
“Bhikkhus, this supreme state of sublime peace has been discovered by the Tathāgata, that is, liberation through not clinging,  by understanding as they actually are the origination, the disappearance, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of the six bases of contact.
“Bhikkhus, wanderers of other sects who speak thus should be questioned thus: ‘But, friends, what is the gratification, what is the danger, and what is the escape in the case of sensual pleasures?
“Bhikkhus, what do you think: Is feeling…perception…formations…consciousness permanent or impermanent?”—“Impermanent, venerable sir.”— “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?”—“Suffering, venerable sir.”—“Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?”—“No, venerable sir.”
“Bhikkhus, what do you think?
“Bhikkhus, what do you think?
“Bhikkhus, what do you think?
“Bhikkhus, what do you think?
“Bhikkhus, what do you think?
“Bhikkhus, what is the character of an untrue man?
“Bhikkhus, what kind of person torments himself and pursues the practice of torturing himself?
“Bhikkhus, whatever a bhikkhu frequently thinks and ponders upon, that will become the inclination of his mind.
“Bhikkhus, whatever a bhikkhu frequently thinks and ponders upon, that will become the inclination of his mind.
“Bhikkhus, whatever fears arise, all arise because of the fool, not because of the wise man; whatever troubles arise, all arise because of the fool, not because of the wise man; whatever calamities arise, all arise because of the fool, not because of the wise man.
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is giving attention to some sign, and owing to that sign there arise in him evil unwholesome thoughts connected with desire, with hate, and with delusion, then when he gives attention to some other sign connected with what is wholesome, any such evil unwholesome thoughts are abandoned in him and subside, and with the abandoning of them his mind becomes steadied internally, quieted, brought to singleness, and concentrated.
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is one with taints destroyed, who has lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached the true goal, destroyed the fetters of being, and is completely liberated through final knowledge, this is the natural way for him to answer.
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is one with taints destroyed… and is completely liberated through final knowledge, this is the natural way for him to answer.
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is one with taints destroyed… and is completely liberated through final knowledge, this is the natural way for him to answer.
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is one with taints destroyed… and is completely liberated through final knowledge, this is the natural way for him to answer.
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is one with taints destroyed… and is completely liberated through final knowledge, this is the natural way for him to answer.
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is pursuing the higher mind, from time to time he should give attention to five signs.
“Bhikkhus, when a cowherd possesses eleven factors, he is capable of keeping and rearing a herd of cattle.
“Bhikkhus, when a cowherd possesses eleven factors, he is incapable of keeping and rearing a herd of cattle.
“Bhikkhus, when a Tathāgata, accomplished and fully enlightened, claims to propound the full understanding of all kinds of clinging, he completely describes the full understanding of all kinds of clinging: he describes the full understanding of clinging to sensual pleasures, clinging to views, clinging to rules and observances, and clinging to a doctrine of self.
“Bhikkhus, when anyone has developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body, Māra cannot find an opportunity or a support in him.
“Bhikkhus, when anyone has developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body, then when he inclines his mind towards realising any state that may be realised by direct knowledge, he attains the ability to witness any aspect therein, there being a suitable basis.
“Bhikkhus, when anyone has not developed and cultivated mindfulness of the body, Māra finds an opportunity and a support in him.
“Bhikkhus, when anyone’s faith has been planted, rooted, and established in the Tathāgata through these reasons, terms, and phrases, his faith is said to be supported by reasons, rooted in vision, firm; it is invincible by any recluse or brahmin or god or Māra or Brahmā or by anyone in the world.
“Bhikkhus, when for a bhikkhu the taints that should be abandoned by seeing have been abandoned by seeing, when the taints that should be abandoned by restraining have been abandoned by restraining, when the taints that should be abandoned by using have been abandoned by using, when the taints that should be abandoned by enduring have been abandoned by enduring, when the taints that should be abandoned by avoiding have been abandoned by avoiding, when the taints that should be abandoned by removing have been abandoned by removing, when the taints that should be abandoned by developing have been abandoned by developing—then he is called a bhikkhu who dwells restrained with the restraint of all the taints.
“Bhikkhus, when ignorance is abandoned and true knowledge has arisen in a bhikkhu, then with the fading away of ignorance and the arising of true knowledge he no longer clings to sensual pleasures, no longer clings to views, no longer clings to rules and observances, no longer clings to a doctrine of self.
“Bhikkhus, when mindfulness of breathing is developed and cultivated, it is of great fruit and great benefit.
“Bhikkhus, when mindfulness of the body has been repeatedly practised, developed, cultivated, used as a vehicle, used as a basis, established, consolidated, and well undertaken, these ten benefits may be expected.
“Bhikkhus, when mindfulness of the body has been repeatedly practised, developed, cultivated, used as a vehicle, used as a basis, established, consolidated, and well undertaken, these ten benefits may be expected.”
“Bhikkhus, when one does not know and see the eye as it actually is, when one does not know and see forms as they actually are, when one does not know and see eye-consciousness as it actually is, when one does not know and see eye-contact as it actually is, when one does not know and see as it actually is felt as pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant that arises with eye-contact as condition, then one is inflamed by lust for the eye, for forms, for eye-consciousness, for eye-contact, for felt as pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant that arises with eye-contact as condition.
“Bhikkhus, when one knows and sees the eye as it actually is, when one knows and sees forms as they actually are, when one knows and sees eye-consciousness as it actually is, when one knows and sees eye-contact as it actually is, when one knows and sees as it actually is felt as pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant that arises with eye-contact as condition, then one is not inflamed by lust for the eye, for forms, for eye-consciousness, for eye-contact, for felt as pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant that arises with eye-contact as condition.
“Bhikkhus, when the gods with Indra, with Brahmā and with Pajāpati seek a bhikkhu who is thus liberated in mind, they do not find: ‘The consciousness of one thus gone is supported by this.’
“Bhikkhus, when you know the Dhamma to be similar to a raft, you should abandon even the teachings, how much more so things contrary to the teachings.
“Bhikkhus, would a true man know of a true man: ‘This person is a true man’?” —“Yes, venerable sir.”—“Good, bhikkhus.
“Bhikkhus, would an untrue man know of an untrue man: ‘This person is an untrue man’?”—“No, venerable sir.”—“Good, bhikkhus.
“Bhikkhus, you may well acquire that possession that is permanent, everlasting, eternal, not subject to change, and that might endure as long as eternity.
“Bhikkhus, you may well cling to that doctrine of self that would not arouse sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair in one who clings to it.
“Bhikkhus, you may well take as a support that view that would not arouse sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair in one who takes it as a support.
“Bhūmija, if these four similes had occurred to you to Prince Jayasena, he would have spontaneously acquired confidence in you, and being confident, would have shown his confidence to you.”
“Birth has being as condition, venerable sir.
“Bodily action is one, Tapassī, verbal action is another, and mental action is still another.”
“Both pleasure and pain, venerable sir.”
“Both pleasure and pain, venerable sir.”
“Both pleasure and pain, venerable sir.”
“Both this world and the world beyond
“Brahmin, if you think any statement of mine is to be agreed with, then agree with it; if you think any statement of mine is to be argued against, then argue against it; and if you do not understand the meaning of any statement of mine, ask me to clarify it thus: ‘How is this, Master Udena?
“Brahmin, suppose an elephant woodsman were to enter an elephant wood and were to see in the elephant wood a big elephant’s footprint, long in extent and broad across.
“Brahmin, the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, has prescribed the course of training for bhikkhus and he has laid down the P̄timokkha.
“Brahmin, there are two kinds of assembly.
“Breathing in long, he understands: ‘I breathe in long’; or breathing out long, he understands: ‘I breathe out long.’
“Breathing in long, he understands: ‘I breathe in long’; or breathing out long, he understands: ‘I breathe out long.’
“Burnt offerings are the glory of fires, Sāvitrī the glory of Vedic hymns, Glory of human beings, a king, Glory of flowing rivers, the sea;
“But a true man considers thus: ‘It is not because of being a one-session eater that states of greed, hatred, or delusion are destroyed.
“But a true man considers thus: ‘It is not because of gain that states of greed, hatred, or delusion are destroyed.
“But a true man considers thus: ‘It is not because of one’s aristocratic family that states of greed, hatred, or delusion are destroyed.
“But a true man considers thus: ‘It is not because of one’s influential family that states of greed, hatred, or delusion are destroyed.
“But a true man considers thus: ‘It is not because of one’s renown that states of greed, hatred, or delusion are destroyed.
“But a true man considers thus: ‘Non-identification even with the attainment of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception has been declared by the Blessed One; for in whatever way they conceive, the fact is ever other than that.’
“But a true man considers thus: ‘Non-identification even with the attainment of the first jhāna has been declared by the Blessed One; for in whatever way they conceive, the fact is ever other than that.’  So, putting non-identification first, he neither lauds himself nor disparages others because of his attainment of the first jhāna.
“But are your bowl and robes complete, bhikkhu?”
“But because it is known by me, seen, found, realised, contacted by wisdom thus: ‘Here, when someone feels a certain kind of pleasant feeling, unwholesome states increase in him and wholesome states diminish,’ that I therefore say: ‘Abandon such a kind of pleasant feeling.’
“But because it is known by me, seen, found, realised, contacted by wisdom thus: ‘Here, when someone feels another kind of pleasant feeling, unwholesome states diminish in him and wholesome states increase,’ that I therefore say: ‘Enter upon and abide in such a kind of pleasant feeling.’
“But do they subsist on so little, Aggivessana?”
“But he resolves: ‘Such talk as deals with effacement, as favours the mind’s release, and which leads to complete disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, peace, direct knowledge, enlightenment, and Nibbāna, that is, talk on wanting little, on contentment, seclusion, aloofness from society, arousing energy, virtue, concentration, wisdom, deliverance, knowledge and vision of deliverance: such talk I shall utter.’
“But he resolves: ‘Such thoughts as are noble and emancipating, and lead the one who practises in accordance with them to the complete destruction of suffering, that is, thoughts of renunciation, thoughts of non-ill will, and thoughts of non-cruelty: such thoughts I shall think.’
“But here some bhikkhu is a chance offender without many offences.
“But here some bhikkhu is a constant offender with many offences.
“But here some person abstains from killing living beings… and he holds right view.
“But here some person kills living beings…and holds wrong view.
“But here, student, some man or woman gives food…and lamps to recluses or brahmins.
“But here, student, some man or woman is not envious, one who does not envy, resent, and begrudge the gains, honour, respect, reverence, salutations, and veneration received by others.
“But here, student, some man or woman is not given to injuring beings with the hand, with a clod, with a stick, or with a knife.
“But here, student, some man or woman is not obstinate and arrogant; he pays homage to one who should receive homage, rises up for one in whose presence he should rise up, offers a seat to one who deserves a seat, makes way for one for whom he should make way, and honours, respects, reveres, and venerates one who should be honoured, respected, revered, and venerated.
“But here, student, some man or woman is not of an angry and irritable character; even when criticised a lot, he is not offended, does not become angry, hostile, and resentful, and does not display anger, hate, and bitterness.
“But here, student, some man or woman visits a recluse or a brahmin and asks: ‘Venerable sir, what is wholesome?…What kind of action will lead to my welfare and happiness for a long time?’
“But here, student, some man or woman, abandoning the killing of living beings, abstains from killing living beings; with rod and weapon laid aside, gentle and kindly, he abides compassionate to all living beings.
“But here, Ānanda, by means of ardour…some recluse or brahmin attains such a concentration of mind that, when his mind is concentrated, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he sees that person here who abstains from killing living beings…and holds right view, and he sees that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
“But here, Ānanda, by means of ardour…some recluse or brahmin attains such a concentration of mind that, when his mind is concentrated, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he sees that person here who kills living beings…and holds wrong view, and he sees that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
“But how is this, Master Gotama, that when you are asked, ‘Are there gods?’ you say: ‘It is known to me to be the case, Bhāradvāja, that there are gods’?
“But how shall I find out, sir, whether the report spread about Master Gotama is true or not, and whether Master Gotama is one such as this or not?”
“But how, venerable sir, shall I refute his doctrine?”
“But if one intends it, householder?”
“But if you have no refuge, Master Ānanda, what is the cause for your concord?”
“But in the last month of the hot season when the grass and the water were used up, their bodies were reduced to extreme emaciation; with that they lost their strength and energy; when they had lost their strength and energy, they lost their deliverance of mind; with the loss of their deliverance of mind, they returned to that same bait that Māra had laid down and those material things of the world; they ate food unwarily by going right in amongst it; by so doing they became intoxicated; when they were intoxicated, they fell into negligence; when they were negligent, Māra did with them as he liked on account of that bait and those material things of the world.
“But in the same way, Udāyin, you say thus: ‘That splendour is the perfect splendour which is unsurpassed by any other splendour higher or more sublime,’ yet you do not indicate what that splendour is.”
“But is there, Master Ānanda, any single bhikkhu who has been chosen by the Sangha and appointed by a number of elder bhikkhus thus: ‘He will be our refuge after the Blessed One has gone,’ and whom you now have recourse to?”
“But only just now, brahmin, we understood you to say: ‘Worthy recluse, there is no wanderers’ life that accords with the Dhamma: so it seems to me here, and that may be because I have not seen such venerable ones as yourself or the Dhamma here.’”
“But then the deer-trapper and his following considered thus: ‘These deer of this fourth herd are as cunning and crafty as wizards and sorcerers.
“But then the deer-trapper and his following considered thus: ‘These deer of this third herd are as cunning and crafty as wizards and sorcerers.
“But then they came to hold views such as ‘the world is eternal’ and ‘the world is not eternal’ and ‘the world is finite’ and ‘the world is infinite’ and ‘the soul and the body are the same’ and ‘the soul is one thing and the body another’ and ‘after death a Tathāgata exists’ and ‘after death a Tathāgata does not exist’ and ‘after death a Tathāgata both exists and does not exist’ and ‘after death a Tathāgata neither exists nor does not exist’  That is how those recluses and brahmins of the third kind failed to get free from Māra’s power and control.
“But there are clansmen who have gone forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness, who are not fraudulent, deceitful, treacherous, haughty, hollow, personally vain, rough-tongued, and loose-spoken; who are guarded in their sense faculties, moderate in eating, devoted to wakefulness, concerned with recluseship, greatly respectful of training, not luxurious or careless, who are keen to avoid backsliding, leaders in seclusion, energetic, resolute, established in mindfulness, fully aware, concentrated, with unified minds, possessing wisdom, not drivellers.
“But there are clansmen who have gone forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness, who are not fraudulent, deceitful, treacherous, haughty, hollow, personally vain, rough-tongued, or loose-spoken; who are guarded in their sense faculties, moderate in eating, devoted to wakefulness, concerned with recluseship, greatly respectful of training, not luxurious or careless, who are keen to avoid backsliding, leaders in seclusion, energetic, resolute, established in mindfulness, fully aware, concentrated, with unified minds, possessing wisdom, not drivellers.
“But under which does the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta describe volition, householder?”
“But what, brahmin, are the states that are higher and more sublime than knowledge and vision?
“But what, Master Gotama, is most helpful for a reflective acceptance of the teachings?
“But what, Master Gotama, is most helpful for application of the will?
“But what, Master Gotama, is most helpful for examination of the meaning?
“But what, Master Gotama, is most helpful for giving ear?
“But what, Master Gotama, is most helpful for hearing the Dhamma?
“But what, Master Gotama, is most helpful for memorising the teachings?
“But what, Master Gotama, is most helpful for paying respect?
“But what, Master Gotama, is most helpful for scrutiny?
“But what, Master Gotama, is most helpful for striving?
“But what, Master Gotama, is most helpful for visiting?
“But what, Master Gotama, is most helpful for zeal?
“But when you were asked: ‘Is there, Master Ānanda, any single bhikkhu who was appointed by Master Gotama thus: “He will be your refuge when I am gone,” and whom you now have recourse to?’ you answered: ‘There is no such single bhikkhu… whom we now have recourse to.’
“But when you were asked: ‘Is there, Master Ānanda, any single bhikkhu who was appointed by Master Gotama…?’ you answered ‘There is no such single bhikkhu…’ When you were asked: ‘Is there, Master Ānanda, any single bhikkhu who has been chosen by the Sangha…?’ you answered: ‘There is no such single bhikkhu…’ When you were asked: ‘Is there, Master Ānanda, any single bhikkhu whom you honour, respect, revere, and venerate, and on whom you live in dependence honouring and respecting him?’ you answered: ‘There is such a single bhikkhu whom we now honour…and on whom we live in dependence honouring and respecting him.’
“But why didn’t Master Gotama answer me in the first way?”
“But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of formations; with the cessation of formations, cessation of consciousness; with the cessation of consciousness, cessation of mentality-materiality; with the cessation of mentality-materiality, cessation of the sixfold base; with the cessation of the sixfold base, cessation of contact; with the cessation of contact, cessation of feeling; with the cessation of feeling, cessation of craving; with the cessation of craving, cessation of clinging; with the cessation of clinging, cessation of being; with the cessation of being, cessation of birth; with the cessation of birth, ageing and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair cease.
“But, Aggivessana, what have you learned about development of body?”
“But, Anuruddha, how do you abide thus?”
“But, Anuruddha, how do you abide thus?”
“But, Anuruddha, how do you live thus?”
“But, Anuruddha, how do you live thus?”
“But, bhikkhu, have you ever seen that Blessed One before?
“But, bhikkhu, where is that Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened, now living?”
“But, friend Gotama, how many kinds of action do you describe for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action?”
“But, friend, in what way do you remember the stanza of ‘One Who Has Had a Single Excellent Night’?”
“But, friend, is purification of virtue final Nibbāna without clinging?”—“No, friend.”—“Then is purification of mind final Nibbāna without clinging?”—“No, friend.”—“Then is purification of view final Nibbāna without clinging?”—“No, friend.”—“Then is purification by overcoming doubt final Nibbāna without clinging?” —“No, friend.”—“Then is purification by knowledge and vision of what is the path and what is not the path final Nibbāna without clinging?”—“No, friend.”—“Then is purification by knowledge and vision of the way final Nibbāna without clinging?” —“No, friend.”—“Then is purification by knowledge and vision final Nibbāna without clinging?”—“No, friend.”—“But, friend, is final Nibbāna without clinging to be attained without these states?”—“No, friend.”
“But, great king, could the sisters Somā and Sakulā find no other messenger?”
“But, great king, what reason do you see for doing such supreme honour to this body and for showing such friendship?”
“But, householders, if wanderers of other sects ask you thus: ‘Householders, what kind of recluses and brahmins should be honoured, respected, revered, and venerated?’ you should answer them thus: ‘Those recluses and brahmins who are rid of lust, hate, and delusion regarding forms cognizable by the eye, whose minds are inwardly peaceful, and who conduct themselves righteously in body, speech, and mind—such recluses and brahmins should be honoured, respected, revered, and venerated.
“But, Kaccāna, what is that splendour that is unsurpassed by any other splendour higher or more sublime?”
“But, Kaccāna, why do you say: ‘This is the perfect splendour, this is the perfect splendour!’?
“But, lady, what is pleasant feeling?
“But, lady, what is the bodily formation?
“But, lady, why are in-breathing and out-breathing the bodily formation?
“But, Master Gotama, in what way is there the preservation of truth?
“But, Master Gotama, remote jungle-thicket resting places in the forest are hard to endure, seclusion is hard to practise, and it is hard to enjoy solitude.
“But, Master Udena, the kind of person who does not torment himself or pursue the practice of torturing himself and who does not torment others or pursue the practice of torturing others; who, since he torments neither himself nor others, is here and now hungerless, extinguished, and cooled, and abides experiencing bliss, having himself become holy—he does not torment and torture either himself or others, both of whom desire pleasure and recoil from pain.
“But, Master Ānanda, what are those four ways that negate the living of the holy life that have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein a wise man certainly would not live the holy life, or if he should live it, would not attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome?”
“But, Master Ānanda, when a bhikkhu is an arahant with taints destroyed, one who has lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached his own goal, destroyed the fetters of being, and is completely liberated through final knowledge, could he enjoy sensual pleasures?”
“But, Master Ānanda, when a bhikkhu is an arahant with taints destroyed…is his knowledge and vision that his taints are destroyed continuously and uninterruptedly present to him whether he is walking or standing or sleeping or awake?”
“But, Māgandiya, when you heard earlier wanderers who were teachers and teachers of teachers saying this, what is that health, what is that Nibbāna?”
“But, Mālunkyāputta, in what way do you remember the five lower fetters as taught by me?”
“But, Pessa, why don’t the first three kinds of persons satisfy your mind?”
“But, Puṇṇa, if the people of Sunāparanta do give you a blow with a clod, what will you think then?”
“But, Puṇṇa, if the people of Sunāparanta do give you a blow with a knife, what will you think then?”
“But, Puṇṇa, if the people of Sunāparanta do give you a blow with a stick, what will you think then?”
“But, Puṇṇa, if the people of Sunāparanta do give you a blow with the fist, what will you think then?”
“But, Puṇṇa, if the people of Sunāparanta do take your life with a sharp knife, what will you think then?”
“But, Udāyin, how many qualities do you see in me because of which my disciples honour, respect, revere, and venerate me, and live in dependence on me, honouring and respecting me?”
“But, Udāyin, since it is taught in your own teachers’ doctrine: ‘This is the perfect splendour, this is the perfect splendour!’—what is that perfect splendour?”
“But, Udāyin, what is that practical way to realise an exclusively pleasant world?”
“But, Udāyin, what is that splendour which is unsurpassed by any other splendour higher or more sublime?” 
“But, Udāyin, who was it that claimed to be omniscient and allseeing…yet when asked a question by you about the past, prevaricated, led the talk aside, and showed anger, hate, and bitterness?”
“But, Udāyin, why do you say that?”
“But, Udāyin, why do you say that?”
“But, Uttara, how does he teach his disciples the development of the faculties?”
“But, venerable sir, can there be diversity in the desire and lust regarding these five aggregates affected by clinging?”
“But, venerable sir, how does identity view not come to be?”
“But, venerable sir, how does the Blessed One assert and proclaim in such a way that he does not quarrel with anyone in the world with its gods, its Māras, and its Brahmās, in this generation with its recluses and brahmins, its princes and its people?
“But, venerable sir, in what are these five aggregates affected by clinging rooted?”
“But, venerable sir, in what way can a bhikkhu be called skilled in dependent origination?” 
“But, venerable sir, in what way can a bhikkhu be called skilled in the bases?”
“But, venerable sir, in what way can a bhikkhu be called skilled in the elements?”
“But, venerable sir, in what way can a bhikkhu be called skilled in what is possible and what is impossible?”
“But, venerable sir, in what way does the term ‘aggregates’ apply to the aggregates?”
“But, venerable sir, might there be another way in which a bhikkhu can be called skilled in the elements?”
“But, venerable sir, might there be another way in which a bhikkhu can be called skilled in the elements?”
“But, venerable sir, might there be another way in which a bhikkhu can be called skilled in the elements?”
“But, venerable sir, might there be another way in which a bhikkhu can be called skilled in the elements?”
“But, venerable sir, might there be another way in which a bhikkhu can be called skilled in the elements?”
“But, venerable sir, when that bhikkhu clings, what does he cling to?”
“By depending and relying on the six kinds of joy based on renunciation, abandon and surmount the six kinds of grief based on renunciation.
“By doing what would that man be doing what should be done with that raft?
“By encompassing mind with mind I understand a certain person thus: ‘This person so behaves, so conducts himself, has taken such a path that by realising for himself with direct knowledge, he here and now will enter upon and abide in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints.’
“By encompassing mind with mind I understand a certain person thus: ‘This person so behaves, so conducts himself, has taken such a path that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he will reappear among human beings.’
“By encompassing mind with mind I understand a certain person thus: ‘This person so behaves, so conducts himself, has taken such a path that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he will reappear in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.’
“By encompassing mind with mind I understand a certain person thus: ‘This person so behaves, so conducts himself, has taken such a path that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he will reappear in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.’
“By encompassing mind with mind I understand a certain person thus: ‘This person so behaves, so conducts himself, has taken such a path that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he will reappear in the animal realm.’
“By encompassing mind with mind I understand a certain person thus: ‘This person so behaves, so conducts himself, has taken such a path that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he will reappear in the realm of ghosts.’
“By giving a gift to one who has entered upon the way to the realisation of the fruit of stream-entry, the offering may be expected to repay incalculably, immeasurably.
“By realising for himself with direct knowledge, he here and now enters upon and abides in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints.
“By realising for oneself with direct knowledge, one here and now enters upon and abides in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints.
“By reason of the factor, friend Kaccāna, some are deities of Defiled Radiance, some deities of Pure Radiance.”
“By reason of the factor, friend Kaccāna, some are deities of Limited Radiance, some deities of Immeasurable Radiance.”
“Bāhukā and Adhikakkā, Gayā and Sundarikā too, Payāga and Sarassatī, And the stream Bahumatī— 
“Carpenter, when a man possesses four qualities, I describe him as accomplished in what is wholesome, perfected in what is wholesome, an ascetic invincible attained to the supreme attainment.
“Certainly, friend Kaccāna, your words are offensive and discourteous, but still I will answer you.
“Certainly, Master Udena, it was in order to learn that I spoke those words.
“Certainly, Ānanda, you heard that correctly, learned that correctly, attended to that correctly, remembered that correctly.
“Change and alteration in Kāsi and Kosala would mean an alteration in my life.
“Change and alteration in Princess Vajīrī would mean an alteration in my life.
“Clinging has craving as condition, venerable sir.
“Come, dear Raṭṭhapāla, let us go to the house.”
“Come, prince, go to the recluse Gotama and say: ‘Venerable sir, would the Tathāgata utter speech that would be unwelcome and disagreeable to others?’
“Come, prince, refute the recluse Gotama’s doctrine, and a good report of you will be spread to this effect: ‘Prince Abhaya has refuted the doctrine of the recluse Gotama, who is so powerful and mighty.’”
“Consciousness has formations as condition, venerable sir.
“Contact has the sixfold base as condition, venerable sir.
“Craving has feeling as condition, venerable sir.
“Cultivate the friendship of Sāriputta and Moggallāna, bhikkhus; associate with Sāriputta and Moggallāna.
“Cunda, as to those various views that arise in the world associated either with doctrines of a self or with doctrines about the world: if in relation to which those views arise, which they underlie, and which they are exercised upon is seen as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self,’ then the abandoning and relinquishing of those views comes about.
“Cunda, I say that even the inclination of mind towards wholesome states is of great benefit, so what should be said of bodily and verbal acts conforming?
“Cunda, just as all unwholesome states lead downwards and all wholesome states lead upwards, so too:
“Cunda, suppose there were an uneven path and another even path by which to avoid it; and suppose there were an uneven ford and another even ford by which to avoid it.
“Cunda, that one who is himself sinking in the mud should pull out another who is sinking in the mud is impossible; that one who is not himself sinking in the mud should pull out another who is sinking in the mud is possible.
“Deliverance is the counterpart of true knowledge.”
“Dependent on the ear and sounds…Dependent on the nose and odours…Dependent on the tongue and flavours…Dependent on the body and tangibles…Dependent on the mind and mind-objects, mind-consciousness arises.
“Dependent on the eye and forms, eye-consciousness arises.
“Dhānañjāni, there are other kinds of work, profitable and in accordance with the Dhamma, by means of which one can refresh and nourish this body and at the same time both avoid doing evil and practise merit.”
“Dhānañjāni, there are other kinds of work, profitable and in accordance with the Dhamma, by means of which one can support one’s parents and at the same time both avoid doing evil and practise merit.
“Did we not tell you, brahmin: ‘There is no single bhikkhu, brahmin, who possesses in each and every way all those qualities that were possessed by the Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“Did you have some conversation with the recluse Gotama, Tapassī?” 
“Did you say ‘Buddha,’ Keṇiya?”
“Did you say ‘Buddha,’ Keṇiya?”
“Do not go to me for refuge, brahmin.
“Do not go to me for refuge, great king.
“Do not say so, friend Potaliputta, do not say so.
“Do not say that, my dear Sañjikāputta, do not say that.
“Do you say mental action, friend Gotama?”
“Do you say mental action, friend Gotama?”
“Do you say mental action, friend Gotama?”
“Do you say the bodily rod, Tapassī?”
“Do you say the bodily rod, Tapassī?”
“Do you say the bodily rod, Tapassī?”
“Eat then, dear Raṭṭhapāla, the meal is ready.”
“Eight days have passed, All-Seeing One, Since we went to you for refuge.
“Enough, brahmin!
“Enough, brahmin, I have finished my meal for today.
“Enough, householder, my meal for today is finished.”
“Enough, Puṇṇa, let that be.
“Enough, Seniya, let that be.
“Even though a noble disciple has seen clearly as it actually is with proper wisdom that sensual pleasures provide little gratification, much suffering and despair, and that the danger in them is still more, as long as he still does not attain to the rapture and pleasure that are apart from sensual pleasures, apart from unwholesome states, or to something more peaceful than that, he may still be attracted to sensual pleasures.
“Exactly so, friends.
“Exactly so, friends.
“Exactly so, venerable sir.
“Exactly so, venerable sir.
“Examination of the meaning is most helpful for a reflective acceptance of the teachings, Bhāradvāja.
“Explain how it occurs to you, Aggivessana,” the Blessed One said.
“Explain how it occurs to you, Dummukha.”
“Explain it as you see it, householder.
“Faith is most helpful for visiting, Bhāradvāja.
“Feeling has contact as condition, venerable sir.
“Feeling, perception, and consciousness, friend—are these states conjoined or disjoined?
“Feeling, perception, and consciousness, friend—these states are conjoined, not disjoined, and it is impossible to separate each of these states from the others in order to describe the difference between them.
“First, Assalāyana, you took your stand on birth, and after that you took your stand on scriptural learning, and after that you have come to take your stand on the very ground that purification is for all four castes, as I describe it.”
“Five hundred kahāpaṇas, Master Udena.” 
“For eighty-four thousand years King Makhādeva played childish games; for eighty-four thousand years he acted as viceregent; for eighty-four thousand years he governed the kingdom; for eighty-four thousand years he led the holy life in this Makhādeva Mango Grove after shaving off his hair and beard, putting on the yellow robe, and going forth from the home life into homelessness.
“For eighty-four thousand years they played childish games; for eighty-four thousand years they acted as viceregents; for eighty-four thousand years they governed the kingdom; for eighty-four thousand years they led the holy life in this Makhādeva Mango Grove after shaving off their hair and beard, putting on the yellow robe, and going forth from the home life into homelessness.
“For here, brahmin, one from an aristocratic family may kill living beings, take what is not given, misconduct himself in sensual pleasures, speak falsely, speak maliciously, speak harshly, gossip, be covetous, have a mind of ill will, and hold wrong view.
“For in so far as I wish, I recollect my manifold past lives, that is, one birth, two births……Thus with their aspects and particulars I recollect my manifold past lives.
“For it is death in the Discipline of the Noble One, Sunakkhatta, when one abandons the training and reverts to the low life; and it is deadly suffering when one commits some defiled offence.
“For many a year, Evil One, for many a century, for many a millennium, I roasted in that Great Hell.
“For name and clan are assigned
“For the purpose of reflection, venerable sir.”
“For, Kandaraka, in this Sangha of bhikkhus there are bhikkhus who are arahants with taints destroyed, who have lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached the true goal, destroyed the fetters of being, and who are completely liberated through final knowledge.
“Formations cease with the cessation of ignorance, venerable sir.
“Formations have ignorance as condition, venerable sir.
“Formerly, bhikkhus, in this same Sāvatthī there was a housewife named Vedehikā.
“Formerly, when he was ignorant, he experienced covetousness, desire, and lust; now he has abandoned them, cut them off at the root, made them like a palm stump, done away with them so that they are no longer subject to future arising.
“Formerly, when he was ignorant, he undertook and accepted acquisitions; now he has abandoned them, cut them off at the root, made them like a palm stump, done away with them so that they are no longer subject to future arising.
“Friend Bakkula, how long is it since you went forth?”
“Friend Bakkula, in these eighty years how many times have perceptions of sensual desire arisen in you?”
“Friend Bakkula, in these eighty years how many times have you engaged in sexual intercourse?”
“Friend Channa, do you regard the eye, eye-consciousness, and things cognizable through eye-consciousness thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?
“Friend Channa, what have you seen and directly known in the eye, in eye-consciousness, and in things cognizable through eye-consciousness, that you regard them thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self’?
“Friend Gotama, the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta describes three kinds of rod for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action; that is, the bodily rod, the verbal rod, and the mental rod.” 
“Friend Gotama, the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta is not accustomed to use the description ‘action, action’; the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta is accustomed to use the description ‘rod, rod.’” 
“Friend Kassapa, in the eighty years since I went forth I do not recall any perception of sensual desire to have ever arisen in me.”
“Friend Kassapa, you should not ask me such a question as that.
“Friend Moggallāna, these things should be undertaken and practised even by a forest-dwelling bhikkhu, how much more then by one who dwells near a village.”
“Friend Samiddhi, I heard and learned this from the recluse Gotama’s own lips: ‘Bodily action is vain, verbal action is vain, only mental action is real.’
“Friend Sāriputta, I am not getting well, I am not comfortable.
“Friend Sāriputta, I regard the eye, eye-consciousness, and things cognizable through eye-consciousness thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Friend Sāriputta, it is not that I have no suitable food and medicine or no proper attendant.
“Friend Sāriputta, it is through seeing and directly knowing cessation in the eye, in eye-consciousness, and in things cognizable through eye-consciousness, that I regard them thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Friend Visākha, in-breathing and out-breathing are bodily, these are states bound up with the body; that is why in-breathing and out-breathing are the bodily formation.
“Friend Visākha, it is craving, which brings renewal of being, is accompanied by delight and lust, and delights in this and that; that is, craving for sensual pleasures, craving for being, and craving for non-being.
“Friend Visākha, it is just this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration.”
“Friend Visākha, it is just this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration.”
“Friend Visākha, it is the remainderless fading away and ceasing, the giving up, relinquishing, letting go, and rejecting of that same craving.
“Friend Visākha, painful feeling is the counterpart of pleasant feeling.”
“Friend Visākha, pleasant feeling is pleasant when it persists and painful when it changes.
“Friend Visākha, that clinging is neither the same as these five aggregates affected by clinging nor is clinging something apart from the five aggregates affected by clinging.
“Friend Visākha, the Noble Eightfold Path is conditioned.”
“Friend Visākha, the underlying tendency to lust does not underlie all pleasant feeling.
“Friend Visākha, the underlying tendency to lust should be abandoned in regard to pleasant feeling.
“Friend Visākha, the underlying tendency to lust underlies pleasant feeling.
“Friend Visākha, there are three kinds of feeling: pleasant feeling, painful feeling, and neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.”
“Friend Visākha, these five aggregates affected by clinging are called identity by the Blessed One; that is, the material form aggregate affected by clinging, the feeling aggregate affected by clinging, the perception aggregate affected by clinging, the formations aggregate affected by clinging, and the consciousness aggregate affected by clinging.
“Friend Visākha, whatever is felt bodily or mentally as pleasant and soothing is pleasant feeling.
“Friend Visākha, when a bhikkhu has emerged from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling, his mind inclines to seclusion, leans to seclusion, tends to seclusion.” 
“Friend Visākha, when a bhikkhu has emerged from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling, three kinds of contact touch him: voidness contact, signless contact, desireless contact.” 
“Friend Visākha, when a bhikkhu is attaining the cessation of perception and feeling, first the verbal formation ceases, then the bodily formation, then the mental formation.” 
“Friend Visākha, when a bhikkhu is attaining the cessation of perception and feeling, it does not occur to him: ‘I shall attain the cessation of perception and feeling,’ or ‘I am attaining the cessation of perception and feeling,’ or ‘I have attained the cessation of perception and feeling’; but rather his mind has previously been developed in such a way that it leads him to that state.” 
“Friend Visākha, when a bhikkhu is emerging from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling, first the mental formation arises, then the bodily formation, then the verbal formation.” 
“Friend Visākha, when a bhikkhu is emerging from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling, it does not occur to him: ‘I shall emerge from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling,’ or ‘I am emerging from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling,’ or ‘I have emerged from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling’; but rather his mind has previously been developed in such a way that it leads him to that state.” 
“Friend Visākha, you have pushed this line of questioning too far; you were not able to grasp the limit to questions.
“Friend, are vital formations things that can be felt or are vital formations one thing and things that can be felt another?” 
“Friend, as to these five faculties—that is, the eye faculty, the ear faculty, the nose faculty, the tongue faculty, and the body faculty—these five faculties stand in dependence on vitality.” 
“Friend, as to these five faculties—that is, the eye faculty, the ear faculty, the nose faculty, the tongue faculty, and the body faculty—what do these five faculties stand in dependence on?”
“Friend, by how many factors is right view assisted when it has deliverance of mind for its fruit, deliverance of mind for its fruit and benefit, when it has deliverance by wisdom for its fruit, deliverance by wisdom for its fruit and benefit?”
“Friend, by purified mind-consciousness released from the five faculties the base of infinite space can be known thus: ‘Space is infinite’; the base of infinite consciousness can be known thus: ‘Consciousness is infinite’; and the base of nothingness can be known thus: ‘There is nothing.′” 
“Friend, for seven days after going forth I ate the country’s almsfood as a debtor; on the eighth day final knowledge arose.” 
“Friend, how is renewal of being in the future generated?”
“Friend, how is renewal of being in the future not generated?”
“Friend, how many conditions are there for emergence from the signless deliverance of mind?”
“Friend, how many conditions are there for the arising of right view?”
“Friend, how many conditions are there for the attainment of the neither-painful-nor-pleasant deliverance of mind?”
“Friend, how many conditions are there for the attainment of the signless deliverance of mind?”
“Friend, how many conditions are there for the persistence of the signless deliverance of mind?”
“Friend, how many factors are abandoned in the first jhāna and how many factors are possessed?”
“Friend, how many factors does the first jhāna have?”
“Friend, how many kinds of being are there?”
“Friend, I assert and proclaim in such a way that one does not quarrel with anyone in the world with its gods, its Māras, and its Brahmās, in this generation with its recluses and brahmins, its princes and its people; in such a way that perceptions no more underlie that brahmin who abides detached from sensual pleasures, without perplexity, shorn of worry, free from craving for any kind of being.” 
“Friend, I do not remember the stanza of ‘One Who Has Had a Single Excellent Night.’
“Friend, I do not remember the stanzas of ‘One Who Has Had a Single Excellent Night.’
“Friend, I do not remember the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has Had a Single Excellent Night.’
“Friend, I do not remember the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has Had a Single Excellent Night.’
“Friend, if the Blessed One had described purification of virtue as final Nibbāna without clinging, he would have described what is still accompanied by clinging as final Nibbāna without clinging.
“Friend, in the case of one who is dead, who has completed his time, his bodily formations have ceased and subsided, his verbal formations have ceased and subsided, his mental formations have ceased and subsided, his vitality is exhausted, his heat has been dissipated, and his faculties are fully broken up.
“Friend, in the eighty years since I went forth I do not recall any thought of sensual desire to have ever arisen in me.”
“Friend, in the first jhāna five factors are abandoned and five factors are possessed.
“Friend, it is for the sake of final Nibbāna without clinging that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One.” 
“Friend, one understands a state that can be known with the eye of wisdom.” 
“Friend, renewal of being in the future is generated through the delighting in this and that on the part of beings who are hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving.” 
“Friend, right view is assisted by five factors when it has deliverance of mind for its fruit, deliverance of mind for its fruit and benefit, when it has deliverance by wisdom for its fruit, deliverance by wisdom for its fruit and benefit.
“Friend, the first jhāna has five factors.
“Friend, the immeasurable deliverance of mind, the deliverance of mind through nothingness, the deliverance of mind through voidness, and the signless deliverance of mind: are these states different in meaning and different in name, or are they one in meaning and different only in name?”
“Friend, the immeasurable deliverance of mind, the deliverance of mind through nothingness, the deliverance of mind through voidness, and the signless deliverance of mind: there is a way in which these states are different in meaning and different in name, and there is a way in which they are one in meaning and different only in name.
“Friend, there are four conditions for the attainment of the neither-painful-nor-pleasant deliverance of mind: here, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous disappearance of joy and grief, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the fourth jhāna, which has neither-pain-nor-pleasure and purity of mindfulness due to equanimity.
“Friend, there are three conditions for the persistence of the signless deliverance of mind: non-attention to all signs, attention to the signless element, and the prior determination.
“Friend, there are two conditions for emergence from the signless deliverance of mind: attention to all signs and non-attention to the signless element.
“Friend, there are two conditions for the arising of right view: the voice of another and wise attention.
“Friend, there are two conditions for the attainment of the signless deliverance of mind: non-attention to all signs and attention to the signless element.
“Friend, there is a brahmin named Dhānañjāni living at the Taṇḍulapāla Gate.
“Friend, there is the recluse Gotama, the son of the Sakyans who went forth from a Sakyan clan.
“Friend, these five faculties each have a separate field, a separate domain, and do not experience each other’s field and domain, that is, the eye faculty, the ear faculty, the nose faculty, the tongue faculty, and the body faculty.
“Friend, these five faculties each have a separate field, a separate domain, and do not experience each other’s field and domain, that is, the eye faculty, the ear faculty, the nose faculty, the tongue faculty, and the body faculty.
“Friend, what can be known by purified mind-consciousness released from the five faculties?”
“Friend, what does heat stand in dependence on?”
“Friend, what does vitality stand in dependence on?”
“Friend, what is the difference between one who is dead, who has completed his time, and a bhikkhu who has entered upon the cessation of perception and feeling?”
“Friend, what is the first jhāna?”
“Friend, what is the purpose of wisdom?”
“Friend, when asked: ‘But, friend, is it for the sake of purification of virtue that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One?’ you replied: ‘No, friend.’
“Friend, when this body is bereft of how many states is it then discarded and forsaken, left lying senseless like a log?” 
“Friend, when this body is bereft of three states—vitality, heat, and consciousness—it is then discarded and forsaken, left lying senseless like a log.”
“Friend, with the fading away of ignorance, with the arising of true knowledge, and with the cessation of craving, renewal of being in the future is not generated.”
“Friend, with what does one understand a state that can be known?”
“Friends, bhikkhus.”—“Friend,” they replied.
“Friends, in what way do disciples of the Teacher who lives secluded not train in seclusion?
“Friends, in what way do disciples of the Teacher who lives secluded not train in seclusion?
“Friends, it is as though a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, thought that heartwood should be sought for among the branches and leaves of a great tree standing possessed of heartwood, after he had passed over the root and the trunk.
“Friends, it is as though a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, thought that heartwood should be sought for among the branches and leaves of a great tree standing possessed of heartwood, after he had passed over the root and the trunk.
“Friends, just as the footprint of any living being that walks can be placed within an elephant’s footprint, and so the elephant’s footprint is declared the chief of them because of its great size; so too, all wholesome states can be included in the Four Noble Truths.
“Friends, just as when a space is enclosed by timber and creepers, grass, and clay, it comes to be termed just ‘house,’ so too, when a space is enclosed by bones and sinews, flesh and skin, it comes to be termed just ‘material form.’ 
“Friends, the evil herein is greed and hate.
“Friends, the recluse Gotama describes the full understanding of sensual pleasures, and we do so too; the recluse Gotama describes the full understanding of material form, and we do so too; the recluse Gotama describes the full understanding of feelings, and we do so too.
“Friends, the Sangha of bhikkhus has been dismissed by the Blessed One.”
“Friends, there are these four kinds of persons found existing in the world.
“Friends, these are called the qualities that make him difficult to admonish.
“Friends, these are called the qualities that make him easy to admonish.
“Friends, though a bhikkhu asks thus: ‘Let the venerable ones admonish me, I need to be admonished by the venerable ones,’ yet if he is difficult to admonish and possesses qualities that make him difficult to admonish, if he is impatient and does not take instruction rightly, then his companions in the holy life think that he should not be admonished or instructed, they think of him as a person not to be trusted.
“Friends, though a bhikkhu does not ask thus: ‘Let the venerable ones admonish me; I need to be admonished by the venerable ones,’ yet if he is easy to admonish and possesses qualities that make him easy to admonish, if he is patient and takes instruction rightly, then his companions in the holy life think that he should be admonished and instructed, and they think of him as a person to be trusted.
“Friends, when a bhikkhu reviews himself thus, if he sees that these evil unwholesome states are not all abandoned in himself, then he should make an effort to abandon them all.
“Friends, when a forest-dwelling bhikkhu comes to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha, he should be respectful and deferential towards his companions in the holy life.
“Friends, when the Blessed One rose from his seat and went into his dwelling after giving a summary in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, that is:
“Friends, when the Blessed One rose from his seat and went into his dwelling after giving a summary in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, that is:
“Friends, when the Blessed One rose from his seat and went into his dwelling after giving a summary in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, that is: ‘Bhikkhu, as to the source through which perceptions and notions mental proliferation beset a man: if nothing is found there to delight in, welcome, and hold to, this is the end of the underlying tendency to lust, of the underlying tendency to aversion, of the underlying tendency to views, of the underlying tendency to doubt, of the underlying tendency to conceit, of the underlying tendency to desire for being, of the underlying tendency to ignorance; this is the end of resorting to rods and weapons, of quarrels, brawls, disputes, recrimination, malicious words, and false speech; here these evil unwholesome states cease without remainder,’ I understand the detailed meaning of this summary to be thus.
“Friends, when the Blessed One rose from his seat and went into his dwelling after giving a summary in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, that is: ‘Bhikkhu, as to the source through which perceptions and notions mental proliferation beset a man: if nothing is found there to delight in, welcome, and hold to, this is the end of the underlying tendency to lust…this is the end of resorting to rods and weapons…here these evil unwholesome states cease without remainder,’ I understand the detailed meaning of it to be as follows:
“Friends, when the Blessed One rose from his seat and went into his dwelling after giving a summary in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, that is: ‘Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu should examine things in such a way that while he is examining them, his consciousness is not distracted and scattered externally nor stuck internally, and by not clinging he does not become agitated.
“Furthermore, bhikkhus, compassionate and seeking their welfare, the Teacher teaches the Dhamma to the disciples out of compassion: ‘This is for your welfare; this is for your happiness.’
“Furthermore, bhikkhus, compassionate and seeking their welfare, the Teacher teaches the Dhamma to the disciples out of compassion: ‘This is for your welfare; this is for your happiness.’
“General, what do you think?
“General, what do you think?
“Giving ear is most helpful for hearing the Dhamma, Bhāradvāja.
“Go, bhikkhus, I dismiss you.
“Go, householder, and refute the recluse Gotama’s doctrine on the basis of this statement.
“Go, Tapassī, and find out whether or not he has gone over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama.”
“Good doorkeeper, go to the householder Upāli and tell him: ‘Venerable sir, the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta is standing at the outer gate with a large assembly of Nigaṇṭhas; he wishes to see you.’”
“Good sir Moggallāna, I went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, I stood at one side and said: ‘Venerable sir,……of gods and humans?’
“Good sir Moggallāna, we are so busy, we have so much to do, not only with our own business, but also with the business of the gods of the Thirty-three.
“Good, bhikkhus.
“Good, bhikkhus.
“Good, bhikkhus.
“Good, bhikkhus.
“Good, bhikkhus.
“Good, bhikkhus.
“Good, good Anuruddha.
“Good, good Anuruddha.
“Good, good, Anuruddha!
“Good, good, Anuruddha!
“Good, good, Anuruddha.
“Good, good, Anuruddha.
“Good, good, Anuruddha.
“Good, good, Anuruddha.
“Good, good, Anuruddha.
“Good, good, Anuruddha.
“Good, good, Anuruddha.
“Good, good, great king!
“Good, good, great king!
“Good, good, great king!
“Good, good, great king!
“Good, good, Moggallāna!
“Good, good, Moggallāna.
“Good, good, Puṇṇa!
“Good, good, Sāriputta!
“Good, good, Sāriputta!
“Good, good, Sāriputta!
“Good, good, Sāriputta!
“Good, good, sisters!
“Good, good, sisters!
“Good, good, sisters!
“Good, good, sisters!
“Good, good, sisters!
“Good, good, Sāriputta.
“Good, good, Sāriputta.
“Good, good, Sāriputta.
“Good, good, Sāriputta.
“Good, good, Sāriputta.
“Good, good, Ānanda!
“Good, good, Ānanda!
“Good, Māgandiya.
“Good, venerable Anuruddha, yet I have something further to ask: Are all those radiant ones deities of Defiled Radiance, or are some of them deities of Pure Radiance?” 
“Gracious!
“Great king, any Brahmā who is still subject to ill will comes back to this state, any Brahmā who is no longer subject to ill will does not come back to this state.”
“Great king, it was on account of this that the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, said: ‘ any world has no shelter and no protector’; and when I knew and saw and heard this, I went forth from the home life into homelessness.”
“Great king, it was on account of this that the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, said: ‘ any world has nothing of its own; one has to leave all and pass on’; and when I knew and saw and heard this, I went forth from the home life into homelessness.”
“Great king, it was on account of this that the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, said: ‘ any world is incomplete, insatiate, the slave of craving’; and when I knew and saw and heard this, I went forth from the home life into homelessness.”
“Great king, it was on account of this that the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, said: ‘ any world is unstable, it is swept away’; and when I knew and saw and heard this, I went forth from the home life into homelessness.”
“Great king, suppose you were to see that Angulimāla had shaved off his hair and beard, put on the yellow robe, and gone forth from the home life into homelessness; that he was abstaining from killing living beings, from taking what is not given and from false speech; that he was eating only one meal a day, and was celibate, virtuous, of good character.
“Great king, the Blessed One would not behave with speech…behave with the mind in such a way that he could be censured by wise recluses and brahmins.”
“Great king, the Blessed One would not behave with the body in such a way that he could be censured by wise recluses and brahmins.” 
“Great king, there are four summaries of the Dhamma that have been taught by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“Great king, there are these five factors of striving.
“Great king, these are the four summaries of the Dhamma that have been taught by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“Great king, those gods who are still subject to ill will come back to this state, those gods who are no longer subject to ill will do not come back to this state.”
“Great King, those who speak thus do not say what has been said by me, but misrepresent me with what is untrue and contrary to fact.”
“Guided by the elephant tamer, bhikkhus, the elephant to be tamed goes in one direction—east, west, north, or south.
“Has there never arisen in Master Gotama a feeling so pleasant that it could invade his mind and remain?
“Have you been permitted by your parents, Raṭṭhapāla, to go forth from the home life into homelessness?”
“Having abandoned these five hindrances, imperfections of the mind that weaken wisdom, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, he enters upon and abides in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“Having done an intentional action by way of body, speech, or mind, one feels suffering, friend Potaliputta.”
“Having gone forth, bhikkhus, in search of what is wholesome, seeking the supreme state of sublime peace, I went to Āḷāra Kālāma and said to him: ‘Friend Kālāma, I want to lead the holy life in this Dhamma and Discipline.’ Āḷāra Kālāma replied: ‘The venerable one may stay here.
“Having thus abandoned these five hindrances, imperfections of the mind that weaken wisdom, he abides contemplating the body as a body, ardent, fully aware, and mindful, having put away covetousness and grief for the world.
“Having thus abandoned these five hindrances, imperfections of the mind that weaken wisdom, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhāna…This, Udāyin, is a higher and more sublime state for the sake of realising which bhikkhus lead the holy life under me.
“Having thus abandoned these five hindrances, imperfections of the mind that weaken wisdom, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, he enters upon and abides in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“Having thus abandoned these five hindrances, imperfections of the mind that weaken wisdom, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, he enters upon and abides in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“Having thus abandoned these five hindrances, imperfections of the mind that weaken wisdom, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, he enters upon and abides in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“Having thus abandoned these five hindrances, imperfections of the mind that weaken wisdom, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, he enters upon and abides in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“Having thus abandoned these five hindrances, imperfections of the mind that weaken wisdom, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, he enters upon and abides in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“Having thus abandoned these five hindrances, imperfections of the mind that weaken wisdom, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, he enters upon and abides in the first jhāna…With the stilling of applied and sustained thought, he enters upon and abides in the second jhāna…With the fading away as well of rapture…he enters upon and abides in the third jhāna…With the abandoning of pleasure and pain…he enters upon and abides in the fourth jhāna…which has neither-pain-nor-pleasure and purity of mindfulness due to equanimity.
“Having thus gone forth and possessing the bhikkhus’ training and way of life, abandoning the killing of living beings, he abstains from killing living beings; with rod and weapon laid aside, conscientious, merciful, he abides compassionate to all living beings.
“Having thus gone forth and possessing the bhikkhu’s training and way of life, abandoning the killing of living beings, he abstains from killing living beings; with rod and weapon laid aside, conscientious, merciful, he abides compassionate to all living beings.
“He abided pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with compassion…with a mind imbued with altruistic joy…with a mind imbued with equanimity, likewise the second, likewise the third, likewise the fourth; so above, below, around, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he abided pervading the all-encompassing world with a mind imbued with equanimity, abundant, exalted, immeasurable, without hostility and without ill will.
“He abided pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, likewise the second, likewise the third, likewise the fourth; so above, below, around, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he abided pervading the all-encompassing world with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, abundant, exalted, immeasurable, without hostility and without ill will.
“He abides pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with compassion…with a mind imbued with altruistic joy…with a mind imbued with equanimity…abundant, exalted, immeasurable, without hostility and without ill will.
“He abides pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, likewise the second, likewise the third, likewise the fourth; so above, below, around, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he abides pervading the all-encompassing world with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, abundant, exalted, immeasurable, without hostility and without ill will.
“He abides pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, likewise the second, likewise the third, likewise the fourth; so above, below, around, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he abides pervading the all-encompassing world with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, abundant, exalted, immeasurable, without hostility and without ill will.
“He abstains from injuring seeds and plants.
“He abstains from injuring seeds and plants.
“He acquires unwavering confidence in the Dhamma thus: ‘The Dhamma is well proclaimed by the Blessed One, visible here and now, immediately effective, inviting inspection, onward leading, to be experienced by the wise for themselves.’ onward leading, to be experienced by the wise for themselves.’
“He acquires unwavering confidence in the Sangha thus: ‘The Sangha of the Blessed One’s disciples is practising the good way, practising the straight way, practising the true way, practising the proper way, that is, the four pairs of persons, the eight types of individuals; this Sangha of the Blessed One’s disciples is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, the unsurpassed field of merit for the world.’
“He attends wisely: ‘This is suffering’; he attends wisely: ‘This is the origin of suffering’; he attends wisely: ‘This is the cessation of suffering’; he attends wisely: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
“He becomes content with robes to protect his body and with almsfood to maintain his stomach, and wherever he goes he sets out taking only these with him.
“He becomes content with robes to protect his body and with almsfood to maintain his stomach, and wherever he goes, he sets out taking only these with him.
“He becomes disenchanted with the ear…He becomes disenchanted with the nose…He becomes disenchanted with the tongue...Hebecomes disenchanted with the body...He becomes disenchanted with the mind, disenchanted with mind-objects, disenchanted with mind-consciousness, disenchanted with mind-contact, disenchanted with feeling, disenchanted with craving.
“He becomes disenchanted with the ear…He becomes disenchanted with the nose…He becomes disenchanted with the tongue…He becomes disenchanted with the body…He becomes disenchanted with the mind, disenchanted with mind-objects, disenchanted with mind-consciousness, disenchanted with mind-contact, and disenchanted with anything comprised within the feeling, perception, formations, and consciousness that arise with mind-contact as condition.
“He becomes one who acts in full awareness when going forward and returning; who acts in full awareness when looking ahead and looking away; who acts in full awareness when flexing and extending his limbs; who acts in full awareness when wearing his robes and carrying his outer robe and bowl; who acts in full awareness when eating, drinking, consuming food, and tasting; who acts in full awareness when defecating and urinating; who acts in full awareness when walking, standing, sitting, falling asleep, waking up, talking, and keeping silent.
“He becomes one who acts in full awareness when going forward and returning; who acts in full awareness when looking ahead and looking away; who acts in full awareness when flexing and extending his limbs; who acts in full awareness when wearing his robes and carrying his outer robe and bowl; who acts in full awareness when eating, drinking, consuming food, and tasting; who acts in full awareness when defecating and urinating; who acts in full awareness when walking, standing, sitting, falling asleep, waking up, talking, and keeping silent.
“He can do so, sir.”
“He cannot do so, sir.”
“He closely looks on with equanimity at the mind thus concentrated.
“He considers thus: ‘ have in part been given up, expelled, released, abandoned, and relinquished by me,’ and he gains inspiration in the meaning, gains inspiration in the Dhamma, gains gladness connected with the Dhamma.
“He considers thus: ‘I am possessed of unwavering confidence in the Dhamma,’ and he gains inspiration in the meaning, gains inspiration in the Dhamma, gains gladness connected with the Dhamma.
“He considers thus: ‘I am possessed of unwavering confidence in the Sangha,’ and he gains inspiration in the meaning, gains inspiration in the Dhamma, gains gladness connected with the Dhamma.
“He could be called both, Master Gotama.”
“He could be called both, Master Gotama.”
“He develops the basis for spiritual power consisting in concentration due to zeal and determined striving; he develops the basis for spiritual power consisting in concentration due to energy and determined striving; he develops the basis for spiritual power consisting in concentration due to mind and determined striving; he develops the basis for spiritual power consisting in concentration due to investigation and determined striving.
“He directly knows Nibbāna as Nibbāna.
“He directly knows water as water…He directly knows all as all…
“He does not regard feeling as self…He does not regard perception as self…He does not regard formations as self…He does not regard consciousness as self, or self as possessed of consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
“He does, Master Gotama.”
“He emerged mindful from that attainment.
“He emerged mindful from that attainment.
“He gives attention to voidness externally…He gives attention to voidness internally and externally…He gives attention to imperturbability.
“He gives attention to voidness externally…He gives attention to voidness internally and externally…He gives attention to imperturbability.
“He has fear of wrongdoing; he is afraid of misconduct in body, speech, and mind, afraid of engaging in evil unwholesome deeds.
“He has learned much, remembers what he has learned, and consolidates what he has learned.
“He has learned much, remembers what he has learned, and consolidates what he has learned.
“He has mindfulness; he possesses the highest mindfulness and skill; he recalls and recollects what was done long ago and spoken long ago.
“He has shame; he is ashamed of misconduct in body, speech, and mind, ashamed of engaging in evil unwholesome deeds.
“He is content with his robes, almsfood, resting place, and medicinal requisites.
“He is energetic in abandoning unwholesome states and in undertaking wholesome states; he is steadfast, firm in striving, not remiss in developing wholesome states.
“He is wise; he possesses wisdom regarding rise and disappearance that is noble and penetrative and leads to the complete destruction of suffering.
“He might, venerable sir, sometime or other at the end of a long period.”
“He obtains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhānas that constitute the higher mind and provide a pleasant abiding here and now.
“He perceives air as air.
“He perceives all as all.
“He perceives beings as beings.
“He perceives Brahmā as Brahmā.
“He perceives diversity as diversity.
“He perceives fire as fire.
“He perceives gods as gods.
“He perceives Nibbāna as Nibbāna.
“He perceives Pajāpati as Pajāpati.
“He perceives the base of infinite consciousness as the base of infinite consciousness.
“He perceives the base of infinite space as the base of infinite space.
“He perceives the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception as the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
“He perceives the base of nothingness as the base of nothingness.
“He perceives the cognized as the cognized.
“He perceives the gods of Great Fruit as the gods of Great Fruit.
“He perceives the gods of Refulgent Glory as the gods of Refulgent Glory.
“He perceives the gods of Streaming Radiance as the gods of Streaming Radiance.
“He perceives the heard as the heard.
“He perceives the Overlord as the Overlord.
“He perceives the seen as the seen.
“He perceives the sensed as the sensed.
“He perceives unity as unity.
“He perceives water as water.
“He recollects his manifold past lives, that is, one birth, two births…...Thus with their aspects and particulars he recollects his manifold past lives.
“He regards feeling as self...He regards perception as self...
“He resorts to a secluded resting place: the forest…a heap of straw.
“He resorts to a secluded resting place: the forest…a heap of straw.
“He sees himself purified of all these evil unwholesome states, he sees himself liberated from them.
“He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in contemplating impermanence’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out contemplating impermanence.’
“He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in contemplating impermanence’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out contemplating impermanence.’
“He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in experiencing rapture’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out experiencing rapture.’
“He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in experiencing rapture’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out experiencing rapture.’
“He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in experiencing the mind’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out experiencing the mind.’
“He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in experiencing the mind’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out experiencing the mind.’
“He understands the ear, he understands sounds…He understands the nose, he understands odours…He understands the tongue, he understands flavours…He understands the body, he understands tangibles…He understands the mind, he understands mind-objects, and he understands the fetter that arises dependent on both; and he also understands how there comes to be the arising of the unarisen fetter, and how there comes to be the abandoning of the arisen fetter, and how there comes to be the future non-arising of the abandoned fetter.
“He understands the minds of other beings, of other persons, having encompassed them with his own mind.
“He understands thus: ‘I possess the character of a person who possesses right view.’
“He understands thus: ‘I possess the character of a person who possesses right view.’
“He understands thus: ‘I possess the strength of a person who possesses right view.’
“He understands thus: ‘I possess the strength of a person who possesses right view.’
“He understands thus: ‘If I were to direct this equanimity, so purified and bright, to the base of infinite space and to develop my mind accordingly, then this equanimity of mine, supported by that base, clinging to it, would remain for a very long time.
“He understands thus: ‘If I were to direct this equanimity, so purified and bright, to the base of infinite space and to develop my mind accordingly, this would be conditioned.
“He understands thus: ‘There is no obsession unabandoned in myself that might so obsess my mind that I cannot know and see things as they actually are.
“He understands thus: ‘There is no other recluse or brahmin outside possessed of a view such as I possess.’
“He understands thus: ‘There is this, there is the inferior, there is the superior, and beyond there is an escape from this whole field of perception.’ 
“He understands thus: ‘Whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the taint of sensual desire, those are not present here; whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the taint of being, those are not present here; whatever disturbances there might be dependent on the taint of ignorance, those are not present here.
“He understands thus: ‘When I pursue, develop, and cultivate this view, I personally obtain serenity, I personally obtain quenching.’
“He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that a person engaging in bodily misconduct …engaging in verbal misconduct…engaging in mental misconduct could on that account, for that reason, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world—there is no such possibility.’
“He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that a person engaging in good bodily conduct…engaging in good verbal conduct…engaging in good mental conduct could on that account, for that reason, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell—there is no such possibility.’
“He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that a person possessing right view could deprive his mother of life—there is no such possibility.’
“He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that a woman could be an Accomplished One, a Fully Enlightened One—there is no such possibility.’
“He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that an unwished for, undesired, disagreeable result could be produced from good bodily conduct…from good verbal conduct…from good mental conduct—there is no such possibility.’
“He understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that two Accomplished Ones, Fully Enlightened Ones, could arise contemporaneously in one world-system—there is no such possibility.’
“He understands:’It is impossible, it cannot happen that a wished for, desired, agreeable result could be produced from bodily misconduct…from verbal misconduct…from mental misconduct—there is no such possibility.‘ And he understands:’It is possible that an unwished for, undesired, disagreeable result might be produced from bodily misconduct…from verbal misconduct…from mental misconduct—there is such a possibility.‘
“He walks neither too fast nor too slow, and he does not go as one who wants to get away.
“He wields the various kinds of supernormal power: having been one, he becomes many; having been many, he becomes one; he appears and vanishes; he goes unhindered through a wall, through an enclosure, through a mountain as though through space; he dives in and out of the earth as though it were water; he walks on water without sinking as though it were earth; seated cross-legged, he travels in space like a bird; with his hand he touches and strokes the moon and sun so powerful and mighty; he wields bodily mastery even as far as the Brahma-world.
“Hearing the Dhamma is most helpful for memorising the teachings, Bhāradvāja.
“Heat stands in dependence on vitality.”
“Here a bhikkhu considers thus: ‘When shall I enter upon and abide in that base that the noble ones now enter upon and abide in?’
“Here a bhikkhu hears thus: ‘The bhikkhu named so-and-so has died; the Blessed One has declared of him: “He was established in final knowledge.”’ And he has either seen that venerable one for himself or heard it said of him: ‘That venerable one’s virtue was thus, his state was thus, his wisdom was thus, his abiding was thus, his deliverance was thus.’
“Here a bhikkhu hears thus: ‘The bhikkhu named so-and-so has died; the Blessed One has declared of him: “With the destruction of the five lower fetters he has reappeared spontaneously and there will attain final Nibbāna without ever returning from that world.”’ And he has either seen that venerable one for himself…he directs his mind to such a state.
“Here a bhikkhu hears thus: ‘The bhikkhu named so-and-so has died; the Blessed One has declared of him: “With the destruction of three fetters and with the attenuation of lust, hate, and delusion, he has become a once-returner, returning once to this world to make an end of suffering.”’ And he has either seen that venerable one for himself… he directs his mind to such a state.
“Here a bhikkhu hears thus: ‘The bhikkhu named so-and-so has died; the Blessed One has declared of him: “With the destruction of three fetters he has become a stream-enterer, no longer subject to perdition, bound, headed for enlightenment.”’ And he has either seen that venerable one for himself…he directs his mind to such a state.
“Here a bhikkhu maintains bodily acts of loving-kindness both in public and in private towards his companions in the holy life.
“Here a bhikkhu maintains bodily acts of loving-kindness both in public and in private towards his companions in the holy life.
“Here a bhikkhu, gone to the forest or to the root of a tree or to an empty hut, considers thus: ‘Is there any obsession unabandoned in myself that might so obsess my mind that I cannot know or see things as they actually are?’
“Here a bhikkhu, gone to the forest or to the root of a tree or to an empty hut, sits down; having folded his legs crosswise, set his body erect, and established mindfulness in front of him, ever mindful he breathes in, mindful he breathes out.
“Here a bhikkhu, gone to the forest or to the root of a tree or to an empty hut, sits down; having folded his legs crosswise, set his body erect, and established mindfulness in front of him, ever mindful he breathes in, mindful he breathes out.
“Here a bhikkhunī hears thus: ‘The bhikkhunī named so-and-so has died; the Blessed One has declared of her: “She was established in final knowledge.”’ And she has either seen that sister for herself or heard it said of her: ‘That sister’s virtue was thus, her state was thus, her wisdom was thus, her abiding was thus, her deliverance was thus.’
“Here a bhikkhunī hears thus: ‘The bhikkhunī named so-and-so has died; the Blessed One has declared of her: “With the destruction of the five lower fetters she has reappeared spontaneously and will there attain final Nibbāna without ever returning from that world.”…
“Here a man lay follower hears thus: ‘The man lay follower named so-and-so has died; the Blessed One has declared of him: “With the destruction of the five lower fetters he has reappeared spontaneously and will there attain final Nibbāna without ever returning from that world.”…
“Here a woman lay follower hears thus: ‘The woman lay follower named so-and-so has died; the Blessed One has declared of her: “With the destruction of the five lower fetters she has reappeared spontaneously and will there attain final Nibbāna without ever returning from that world.” …
“Here some bhikkhu is a chance offender without many offences.
“Here some bhikkhu progresses by a measure of faith and love.
“Here some person abstains from killing living beings, from taking what is not given, from misconduct in sensual pleasures, from false speech, from malicious speech, from harsh speech, from gossip; he is not covetous, his mind is without ill will, and he holds right view.
“Here, Aggivessana, any kind of material form whatever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near—a bhikkhu has seen all material form as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self,’ and through not clinging he is liberated.
“Here, Aggivessana, any kind of material form whatever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near—a disciple of mine sees all material form as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Here, Bhaddāli, some bhikkhu does fulfil the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.
“Here, Bhaddāli, some bhikkhu does not fulfil the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.
“Here, Bhaddāli, some bhikkhu is a constant offender with many offences.
“Here, Bhāradvāja, a bhikkhu may be living in dependence on some village or town.
“Here, Bhāradvāja, before my enlightenment, while I was still only an unenlightened Bodhisatta, I considered thus: ‘Household life is crowded and dusty; life gone forth is wide open.
“Here, bhikkhu, a well-taught noble disciple, who has regard for noble ones and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, who has regard for true men and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, does not regard material form as self, or self as possessed of material form, or material form as in self, or self as in material form.
“Here, bhikkhu, an untaught ordinary person, who has no regard for noble ones and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, who has no regard for true men and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, regards material form as self, or self as possessed of material form, or material form as in self, or self as in material form.
“Here, bhikkhu, someone thinks thus: ‘May my material form be thus in the future; may my feeling be thus in the future; may my perception be thus in the future; may my formations be thus in the future; may my consciousness be thus in the future.’
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the mindfulness enlightenment factor, which is supported by seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, and ripens in relinquishment.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu lives in dependence upon a certain person...
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu lives in dependence upon a certain person......Having reflected thus, that bhikkhu should continue following that person; he should not depart from him.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu lives in dependence upon a certain person......Having reflected thus, that bhikkhu should depart from that person after taking leave; he should not continue following him.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu lives in dependence upon a certain person… …That bhikkhu should continue following that person as long as life lasts; he should not depart from him even if told to go away.”
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu lives in some jungle thicket.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu lives in some jungle thicket.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu lives in some jungle thicket.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu lives in some jungle thicket.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu makes a declaration of final knowledge thus: ‘I understand: Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.’
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu possesses faith, virtue, learning, generosity, and wisdom.
“Here, bhikkhus, a Tathāgata appears in the world, accomplished, fully enlightened, perfect in true knowledge and conduct, sublime, knower of worlds, incomparable leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of gods and humans, enlightened, blessed.
“Here, bhikkhus, a Tathāgata appears in the world, accomplished, fully enlightened… …he purifies his mind from doubt.
“Here, bhikkhus, an untaught ordinary person who has no regard for noble ones and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, who has no regard for true men and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, does not know what things should be cultivated and what things should not be cultivated, he does not know what things should be followed and what things should not be followed.
“Here, bhikkhus, an untaught ordinary person, who has no regard for noble ones and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, who has no regard for true men and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, perceives earth as earth.
“Here, bhikkhus, by depending and relying on equanimity that is unified, based on unity, abandon and surmount equanimity that is diversified, based on diversity.
“Here, bhikkhus, by depending and relying on the six kinds of joy based on renunciation, abandon and surmount the six kinds of joy based on the household life.
“Here, bhikkhus, compassionate and seeking their welfare, the Teacher teaches the Dhamma to the disciples out of compassion: ‘This is for your welfare; this is for your happiness.’
“Here, bhikkhus, covert speech that is true, correct, and beneficial is a state without suffering…Therefore this is a state without conflict.
“Here, bhikkhus, covert speech that is true, correct, and unbeneficial is a state beset by suffering…Therefore this is a state with conflict.
“Here, bhikkhus, covert speech that is untrue, incorrect, and unbeneficial is a state beset by suffering…Therefore this is a state with conflict.
“Here, bhikkhus, disengagement from the pursuit of self-mortification—painful, ignoble, and unbeneficial—is a state without suffering, vexation, despair, and fever, and it is the right way.
“Here, bhikkhus, disengagement from the pursuit of the enjoyment of one whose pleasure is linked to sensual desires—low…and unbeneficial—is a state without suffering, vexation, despair, and fever, and it is the right way.
“Here, bhikkhus, extolling and disparaging and failure to teach only the Dhamma is a state beset by suffering…and it is the wrong way.
“Here, bhikkhus, insistence on local language and overriding of normal usage is a state beset by suffering…Therefore this is a state with conflict.
“Here, bhikkhus, non-insistence on local language and non-overriding of normal usage is a state without suffering, vexation, despair, and fever, and it is the right way.
“Here, bhikkhus, not extolling and not disparaging and teaching only the Dhamma is a state without suffering…and it is the right way.
“Here, bhikkhus, overt sharp speech that is true, correct, and beneficial is a state without suffering…Therefore this is a state without conflict.
“Here, bhikkhus, overt sharp speech that is true, correct, and unbeneficial is a state beset by suffering…Therefore this is a state with conflict.
“Here, bhikkhus, overt sharp speech that is untrue, incorrect, and unbeneficial is a state beset by suffering…Therefore this is a state with conflict.
“Here, bhikkhus, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhāna…the second jhāna…the third jhāna… the fourth jhāna.
“Here, bhikkhus, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, Sāriputta entered upon and abided in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“Here, bhikkhus, sensual pleasure—a filthy pleasure, a coarse pleasure, an ignoble pleasure—is a state beset by suffering…and it is the wrong way.
“Here, bhikkhus, some clansman goes forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness, considering: ‘I am a victim of birth, ageing, and death, of sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair; I am a victim of suffering, a prey to suffering.
“Here, bhikkhus, some clansman goes forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness, considering: ‘I am a victim of birth, ageing, and death, of sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair; I am a victim of suffering, a prey to suffering.
“Here, bhikkhus, some clansman goes forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness, considering: ‘I am a victim of birth, ageing, and death, of sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair; I am a victim of suffering, a prey to suffering.
“Here, bhikkhus, some clansman goes forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness, considering: ‘I am a victim of birth, ageing, and death, of sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair; I am a victim of suffering, a prey to suffering.
“Here, bhikkhus, some clansmen learn the Dhamma—discourses…answers to questions—and having learned the Dhamma, they examine the meaning of those teachings with wisdom.
“Here, bhikkhus, some misguided men learn the Dhamma—discourses, stanzas, expositions, verses, exclamations, sayings, birth stories, marvels, and answers to questions—but having learned the Dhamma, they do not examine the meaning of those teachings with wisdom.
“Here, bhikkhus, some recluse or brahmin, with the relinquishing of views about the past and the future and through complete lack of resolve upon the fetters of sensual pleasure, enters upon and abides in the rapture of seclusion.
“Here, bhikkhus, some recluse or brahmin, with the relinquishing of views about the past and the future, through complete lack of resolve upon the fetters of sensual pleasure, and with the surmounting of the rapture of seclusion and unworldly pleasure, enters upon and abides in neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
“Here, bhikkhus, some recluse or brahmin, with the relinquishing of views about the past and the future, through complete lack of resolve upon the fetters of sensual pleasure, and with the surmounting of the rapture of seclusion, enters upon and abides in unworldly pleasure.
“Here, bhikkhus, some recluse or brahmin, with the relinquishing of views about the past and the future, through complete lack of resolve upon the fetters of sensual pleasure, and with the surmounting of the rapture of seclusion, unworldly pleasure, and neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, regards himself thus: ‘I am at peace, I have attained Nibbāna, I am without clinging.’ 
“Here, bhikkhus, the bliss of renunciation, the bliss of seclusion, the bliss of peace, the bliss of enlightenment, is a state without suffering…and it is the right way.
“Here, bhikkhus, the Middle Way discovered by the Tathāgata avoids both these extremes; giving vision, giving knowledge, it leads to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbāna.
“Here, bhikkhus, the pursuit of self-mortification—painful, ignoble, and unbeneficial—is a state beset by suffering, vexation, despair, and fever, and it is the wrong way.
“Here, bhikkhus, the pursuit of the enjoyment of one whose pleasure is linked to sensual desires—low…and unbeneficial—is a state beset by suffering, vexation, despair, and fever, and it is the wrong way.
“Here, bhikkhus, the speech of one who speaks hurriedly is a state beset by suffering, vexation, despair, and fever, and it is the wrong way.
“Here, bhikkhus, the speech of one who speaks unhurriedly is a state without suffering…Therefore this is a state without conflict.
“Here, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is giving attention to some sign, and owing to that sign there arise in him evil unwholesome thoughts connected with desire, with hate, and with delusion, then he should give attention to some other sign connected with what is wholesome.
“Here, bhikkhus, when one knows covert speech to be untrue, incorrect, and unbeneficial, one should on no account utter it.
“Here, bhikkhus, when one knows overt sharp speech to be untrue, incorrect, and unbeneficial, one should on no account utter it.
“Here, bhikkhus, when one speaks hurriedly, one’s body grows tired and one’s mind becomes excited, one’s voice is strained and one’s throat becomes hoarse, and the speech of one who speaks hurriedly is indistinct and hard to understand.
“Here, bhikkhus, when one speaks unhurriedly, one’s body does not grow tired nor does one’s mind become excited, one’s voice is not strained nor does one’s throat become hoarse, and the speech of one who speaks unhurriedly is distinct and easy to understand.
“Here, brahmin, a bhikkhu is virtuous, he dwells restrained with the restraint of the Pātimokkha, he is perfect in conduct and resort, and seeing fear in the slightest faults, he trains himself by undertaking the training precepts.
“Here, brahmin, one of great beauty…one of great wealth may kill living beings…and hold wrong view.
“Here, brahmin, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“Here, brahmin, some clansman goes forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness, considering: ‘I am a victim of birth, ageing, and death, of sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair; I am a victim of suffering, a prey to suffering.
“Here, brahmin, some clansman goes forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness, considering: ‘I am a victim of birth, ageing, and death, of sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair; I am a victim of suffering, a prey to suffering.
“Here, brahmin, some clansman goes forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness, considering: ‘I am a victim of birth, ageing, and death, of sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair; I am a victim of suffering, a prey to suffering.
“Here, brahmin, some clansman goes forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness, considering: ‘I am a victim of birth, ageing, and death, of sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair; I am a victim of suffering, a prey to suffering.
“Here, friend Moggallāna, a bhikkhu wields mastery over his mind, he does not let the mind wield mastery over him.
“Here, friend Sāriputta, a bhikkhu delights in solitary meditation and takes delight in solitary meditation; he is devoted to internal serenity of mind, does not neglect meditation, possesses insight, and dwells in empty huts.
“Here, friend Sāriputta, a bhikkhu has learned much, remembers what he has learned, and consolidates what he has learned.
“Here, friend Sāriputta, a bhikkhu is a forest dweller himself and speaks in praise of forest dwelling; he is an almsfood eater himself and speaks in praise of eating almsfood; he is a refuse-rag wearer himself and speaks in praise of wearing refuse-rag robes; he is a triple-robe wearer himself and speaks in praise of wearing the triple robe; he has few wishes himself and speaks in praise of fewness of wishes; he is content himself and speaks in praise of contentment; he is secluded himself and speaks in praise of seclusion; he is aloof from society himself and speaks in praise of aloofness from society; he is energetic himself and speaks in praise of arousing energy; he has attained to virtue himself and speaks in praise of the attainment of virtue; he has attained to concentration himself and speaks in praise of the attainment of concentration; he has attained to wisdom himself and speaks in praise of the attainment of wisdom; he has attained to deliverance himself and speaks in praise of the attainment of deliverance; he has attained to the knowledge and vision of deliverance himself and speaks in praise of the attainment of the knowledge and vision of deliverance.
“Here, friend Sāriputta, two bhikkhus engage in a talk on the higher Dhamma and they question each other, and each being questioned by the other answers without foundering, and their talk rolls on in accordance with the Dhamma.
“Here, friend Sāriputta, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, a bhikkhu surveys a thousand worlds.
“Here, friend Visākha, a well-taught noble disciple, who has regard for noble ones and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, who has regard for true men and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, does not regard material form as self, or self as possessed of material form, or material form as in self, or self as in material form.
“Here, friend Visākha, an untaught ordinary person, who has no regard for noble ones and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, who has no regard for true men and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, regards material form as self, or self as possessed of material form, or material form as in self, or self as in material form.
“Here, friend Visākha, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“Here, friend, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“Here, great king, I say that the difference among them would lie in the diversity of their striving.
“Here, great king, in this respect I say that among them there is no difference, that is, between the deliverance of one and the deliverance of the others.
“Here, householder, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“Here, householders, a Tathāgata appears in the world… …He understands: ‘Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.’
“Here, I see no ground on which any recluse or brahmin or god or Māra or Brahmā or anyone else at all in the world could, in accordance with the Dhamma, accuse me thus: ‘While you claim to be fully enlightened, you are not fully enlightened about these things.’
“Here, Jīvaka, a bhikkhu lives in dependence upon a certain village or town.
“Here, Jīvaka, some bhikkhu lives in dependence upon a certain village or town.
“Here, Master Gotama, one does not see forms with the eye, one does not hear sounds with the ear.
“Here, Puṇṇa, someone develops the dog-duty fully and uninterruptedly; he develops the dog-habit fully and uninterruptedly; he develops the dog-mind fully and uninterruptedly; he develops dog-behaviour fully and uninterruptedly.
“Here, Rāhula, a bhikkhu, gone to the forest or to the root of a tree or to an empty hut, sits down; having folded his legs crosswise, set his body erect, and established mindfulness in front of him, ever mindful he breathes in, mindful he breathes out.
“Here, ruler of gods, a bhikkhu has heard that nothing is worth adhering to.
“Here, Sandaka, some teacher claims to be omniscient and all-seeing, to have complete knowledge and vision thus: ‘Whether I am walking or standing or sleeping or awake, knowledge and vision are continuously and uninterruptedly present to me.’
“Here, Sandaka, some teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: ‘There is nothing given, nothing offered, nothing sacrificed; no fruit or result of good and bad actions; no this world, no other world; no mother, no father; no beings who are reborn spontaneously; no good and virtuous recluses and brahmins in the world who have themselves realised by direct knowledge and declare this world and the other world.
“Here, Seniya, someone develops the ox-duty fully and uninterruptedly; he develops the ox-habit fully and uninterruptedly; he develops the ox-mind fully and uninterruptedly; he develops ox-behaviour fully and uninterruptedly.
“Here, student, some man or woman does not give food, drink, clothing, carriages, garlands, scents, unguents, beds, dwelling, and lamps to recluses or brahmins.
“Here, student, some man or woman does not visit a recluse or a brahmin and ask: ‘Venerable sir, what is wholesome?
“Here, student, some man or woman is envious, one who envies, resents, and begrudges the gains, honour, respect, reverence, salutations, and veneration received by others.
“Here, student, some man or woman is given to injuring beings with the hand, with a clod, with a stick, or with a knife.
“Here, student, some man or woman is obstinate and arrogant; he does not pay homage to one who should receive homage, does not rise up for one in whose presence he should rise up, does not offer a seat to one who deserves a seat, does not make way for one for whom he should make way, and does not honour, respect, revere, and venerate one who should be honoured, respected, revered, and venerated.
“Here, student, some man or woman is of an angry and irritable character; even when criticised a little, he is offended, becomes angry, hostile, and resentful, and displays anger, hate, and bitterness.
“Here, student, some man or woman kills living beings and is murderous, bloody-handed, given to blows and violence, merciless to living beings.
“Here, the Tathāgata understands as it actually is the possible as possible and the impossible as impossible.
“Here, Udāyin, by completely surmounting the base of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing,’ a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of nothingness.
“Here, Udāyin, by completely surmounting the base of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite,’ a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of infinite consciousness.
“Here, Udāyin, by completely surmounting the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the cessation of perception and feeling.
“Here, Udāyin, by completely surmounting the base of nothingness, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
“Here, Udāyin, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhāna…Now this, I say, belongs to the perturbable.
“Here, Udāyin, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhāna…That, I say, is not enough.
“Here, Udāyin, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhāna…With the stilling of applied and sustained thought, he enters upon and abides in the second jhāna…in the third jhāna…This is the practical way to realise an exclusively pleasant world.”
“Here, Udāyin, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhāna…With the stilling of applied and sustained thought, he enters upon and abides in the second jhāna…With the fading away as well of rapture…he enters upon and abides in the third jhāna…With the abandoning of pleasure and pain…he enters upon and abides in the fourth jhāna…
“Here, Udāyin, some person practises the way to the abandoning of the acquisitions, to the relinquishing of the acquisitions.
“Here, Udāyin, some person practises the way to the abandoning of the acquisitions, to the relinquishing of the acquisitions.
“Here, Udāyin, some person practises the way to the abandoning of the acquisitions, to the relinquishing of the acquisitions.
“Here, Udāyin, some person, having understood that acquisition is the root of suffering, divests himself of the acquisitions and is liberated in the destruction of the acquisitions.
“Here, Udāyin, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous disappearance of joy and grief, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the fourth jhāna, which has neither-pain-nor-pleasure and purity of mindfulness due to equanimity.
“Here, Udāyin, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain…a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the fourth jhāna… Now this, I say, belongs to the imperturbable.
“Here, Udāyin, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain…a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the fourth jhāna… That surmounts it.
“Here, Udāyin, with the complete surmounting of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of sensory impact, with non-attention to perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite,’ a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of infinite space.
“Here, Udāyin, with the fading away as well of rapture…a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the third jhāna…Now this, I say, also belongs to the perturbable.
“Here, Udāyin, with the fading away as well of rapture…a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the third jhāna…That surmounts it.
“Here, Udāyin, with the stilling of applied and sustained thought, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the second jhāna…Now this, I say, also belongs to the perturbable.
“Here, Udāyin, with the stilling of applied and sustained thought, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the second jhāna…That surmounts it.
“Here, Udāyin, my disciples esteem me for the higher virtue thus: ‘The recluse Gotama is virtuous, he possesses the supreme aggregate of virtue.’
“Here, venerable sir, abandoning the killing of living beings, someone abstains from killing living beings; abandoning the taking of what is not given, he abstains from taking what is not given; abandoning misconduct in sensual pleasures, he abstains from misconduct in sensual pleasures; abandoning false speech, he abstains from false speech; or else he undertakes and practises some kind of asceticism.
“Here, venerable sir, elder bhikkhus have come to me and said: ‘Householder, develop the immeasurable deliverance of mind’; and some elders have said: ‘Householder, develop the exalted deliverance of mind.’
“Here, venerable sir, we were sitting in the assembly hall, where we had met together on returning from our almsround, after our meal, when this discussion arose among us: ‘It is wonderful, friends, it is marvellous, how it has been said by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, that mindfulness of the body, when developed and cultivated, is of great fruit and great benefit.’
“Here, venerable sir, we were sitting in the assembly hall, where we had met together on returning from our almsround, after our meal, when this discussion arose among us: ‘It is wonderful, friends, it is marvellous…their deliverance was thus.’
“Here, venerable sir, while I was alone in meditation, the following thought arose in my mind: ‘How many painful states has the Blessed One rid us of!…How many wholesome states has the Blessed One brought us!’ Venerable sir, formerly we used to eat in the evening, in the morning, and during the day outside the proper time.
“Here, venerable sir, while I was alone in meditation, the following thought arose in my mind: ‘These speculative views have been left undeclared by the Blessed One…If he does not declare these to me, then I will abandon the training and return to the low life.’
“Here, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous disappearance of joy and grief, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the fourth jhāna, which has neither-pain-nor-pleasure and purity of mindfulness due to equanimity.
“Here, Ānanda, a bhikkhu is practising thus: ‘It might not be, and it might not be mine; it will not be, and it will not be mine.
“Here, Ānanda, a bhikkhu is practising thus: ‘It might not be, and it might not be mine; it will not be, and it will not be mine.
“Here, Ānanda, a bhikkhu knows thus: ‘When this exists, that comes to be; with the arising of this, that arises.
“Here, Ānanda, a bhikkhu understands: ‘It is impossible, it cannot happen that a person possessing right view could treat any formation as permanent—there is no such possibility.’
“Here, Ānanda, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘Sensual pleasures here and now and sensual pleasures in lives to come, sensual perceptions here and now and sensual perceptions in lives to come, material forms here and now and material forms in lives to come, perceptions of forms here and now and perceptions of forms in lives to come, perceptions of the imperturbable, perceptions of the base of nothingness, and perceptions of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception—this is identity as far as identity extends.
“Here, Ānanda, an untaught ordinary person who has no regard for noble ones and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, who has no regard for true men and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, abides with a mind obsessed and enslaved by identity view, and he does not understand as it actually is the escape from the arisen identity view; and when that identity view has become habitual and is uneradicated in him, it is a lower fetter.
“Here, Ānanda, by means of ardour, endeavour, devotion, diligence, and right attention, some recluse or brahmin attains such concentration of mind that, when his mind is concentrated, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he sees that person here who kills living beings…and holds wrong view, and he sees that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
“Here, Ānanda, by means of ardour…some recluse or brahmin attains such a concentration of mind that, when his mind is concentrated, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he sees that person here who abstains from killing living beings…and holds right view, and he sees that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
“Here, Ānanda, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhāna…the second jhāna…the third jhāna…the fourth jhāna, which has neither-pain-nor-pleasure and purity of mindfulness due to equanimity.
“Herein a bhikkhu should constantly review his own mind thus: ‘Does any mental excitement concerning any base among these five cords of sensual pleasure ever arise in me?’
“Herein, friend, when a person with a blemish does not understand it as it actually is thus: ‘I have a blemish in myself,’ it can be expected that he will not arouse zeal, make effort, or instigate energy to abandon that blemish, and that he will die with lust, hate, and delusion, with a blemish, with mind defiled.
“Herein, the person with a blemish who does not understand it as it actually is thus: ‘I have a blemish in myself’ is called the inferior of these two persons with a blemish.
“Herein, the person with no blemish who does not understand it as it actually is thus: ‘I have no blemish’ is called the inferior of these two persons with no blemish.
“Herein, what are the six kinds of equanimity based on renunciation?
“Herein, what are the six kinds of equanimity based on the household life?
“Herein, what are the six kinds of grief based on renunciation?
“Herein, what are the six kinds of grief based on the household life?
“Herein, what are the six kinds of joy based on renunciation?
“Herein, what are the six kinds of joy based on the household life?
“Herein, when a person with a blemish understands it as it actually is thus: ‘I have a blemish in myself,’ it can be expected that he will arouse zeal, make effort, and instigate energy to abandon that blemish, and that he will die without lust, hate, and delusion, without blemish, with mind undefiled.
“Herein, when a person with no blemish does not understand it as it actually is thus: ‘I have no blemish in myself,’ it can be expected that he will give attention to the sign of the beautiful,  that by his doing so lust will infect his mind, and that he will die with lust, hate, and delusion, with a blemish, with mind defiled.
“Herein, when a person with no blemish understands it as it actually is thus: ‘I have no blemish in myself, ‘ it can be expected that he will not give attention to the sign of the beautiful, that by his not doing so lust will not infect his mind, and that he will die without lust, hate, and delusion, without blemish, with mind undefiled.
“Herein, Ānanda, by giving a gift to an animal, the offering may be expected to repay a hundredfold.
“Him I call deluded, Aggivessana, who has not abandoned the taints that defile, bring renewal of being, give trouble, ripen in suffering, and lead to future birth, ageing, and death; for it is with the non-abandoning of the taints that one is deluded.
“His deliverance, being founded upon truth, is unshakeable.
“His name is Ānanda, great king.”
“His robe is worn neither too high nor too low on his body, nor too tight against his body, nor too loose on his body, nor does the wind blow his robe away from his body.
“Householder, householder, pay attention how you reply!
“Householder, householder, pay attention how you reply!
“Householder, householder, pay attention how you reply!
“Householder, householder, pay attention how you reply!
“Householder, if you will debate on the basis of truth, we might have some conversation about this.”
“Householder, if you would follow my advice, then have this pile of gold coins and bullion loaded on carts and carried away to be dumped midstream in the river Ganges.
“Householder, suppose a dog, overcome by hunger and weakness, was waiting by a butcher’s shop.
“Householder, suppose a man borrowed goods on loan —a fancy carriage and fine-jewelled earrings—and preceded and surrounded by those borrowed goods he went to the marketplace.
“Householder, suppose a man dreamt about lovely parks, lovely groves, lovely meadows, and lovely lakes, and on waking he saw nothing of it.
“Householder, suppose a man took a blazing grass torch and went against the wind.
“Householder, suppose a vulture, a heron, or a hawk seized a piece of meat and flew away, and then vultures, herons, and hawks pursued it and pecked and clawed it.
“Householder, suppose there were a charcoal pit deeper than a man’s height full of glowing coals without flame or smoke.
“Householder, suppose there were a dense grove not far from some village or town, within which there was a tree laden with fruit but none of its fruit had fallen to the ground.
“Householder, the assembly and the king know you thus: ‘The householder Upāli is a disciple of the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta.’
“Householder, the cutting off of affairs as you describe it is one thing, but in the Noble One’s Discipline the cutting off of affairs is different.”
“Householder, the immeasurable deliverance of mind and the exalted deliverance of mind—these states are different in meaning and different in name.
“Householder, there are these eight things in the Noble One’s Discipline that lead to the cutting off of affairs.
“Householder, you have the aspects, marks, and signs of a householder.”
“Householder, you should train thus: ‘I will not cling to eye-consciousness…I will not cling to ear-consciousness…I will not cling to nose-consciousness…I will not cling to tongueconsciousness…I will not cling to body-consciousness…I will not cling to mind-consciousness, and my consciousness will not be dependent on mind-consciousness.’
“Householder, you should train thus: ‘I will not cling to eye-contact……I will not cling to ear-contact…I will not cling to nose-contact…I will not cling to tongue-contact…I will not cling to body-contact…I will not cling to mind-contact, and my consciousness will not be dependent on mind-contact.’
“Householder, you should train thus: ‘I will not cling to feeling born of eye-contact…I will not cling to feeling born of ear-contact…I will not cling to feeling born of nose-contact…I will not cling to feeling born of tongue-contact…I will not cling to feeling born of body-contact…I will not cling to feeling born of mind-contact, and my consciousness will not be dependent on feeling born of mind-contact.’
“Householder, you should train thus: ‘I will not cling to forms…I will not cling to sounds…I will not cling to odours…I will not cling to flavours…I will not cling to tangibles…I will not cling to mind-objects, and my consciousness will not be dependent on mind-objects.’
“Householder, you should train thus: ‘I will not cling to material form…I will not cling to feeling…I will not cling to perception…I will not cling to formations…I will not cling to consciousness, and my consciousness will not be dependent on consciousness.’
“Householder, you should train thus: ‘I will not cling to the base of infinite space…I will not cling to the base of infinite consciousness…I will not cling to the base of nothingness …I will not cling to the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, and my consciousness will not be dependent on the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.’
“Householder, you should train thus: ‘I will not cling to the earth element…I will not cling to the water element…I will not cling to the fire element…I will not cling to the air element…I will not cling to the space element…I will not cling to the consciousness element, and my consciousness will not be dependent on the consciousness element.’
“Householder, you should train thus: ‘I will not cling to this world, and my consciousness will not be dependent on this world.
“Householder, you should train thus: ‘I will not cling to what is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, encountered, sought after, and examined by the mind, and my consciousness will not be dependent on that.’
“Householder, your family has long supported the Nigaṇṭhas and you should consider that alms should be given to them when they come.”
“Householders, if wanderers of other sects ask you thus: ‘But what are your reasons and what is your evidence regarding those venerable ones whereby you say about them: “Surely these venerable ones are either rid of lust or are practising for the removal of lust; they are either rid of hate or are practising for the removal of hate; they are either rid of delusion or are practising for the removal of delusion”?’—being asked thus, you should answer those wanderers of other sects thus: ‘It is because those venerable ones resort to remote jungle-thicket resting places in the forest.
“Householders, if wanderers of other sects ask you thus: ‘Householders, what kind of recluses and brahmins should not be honoured, respected, revered, and venerated?’ you should answer them thus: ‘Those recluses and brahmins who are not rid of lust, hate, and delusion regarding forms cognizable by the eye, whose minds are not inwardly peaceful, and who conduct themselves now righteously, now unrighteously in body, speech, and mind—such recluses and brahmins should not be honoured, respected, revered, and venerated.
“Householders, it is by reason of conduct not in accordance with the Dhamma, by reason of unrighteous conduct that some beings here, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
“Householders, there are four kinds of persons to be found existing in the world.
“Householders, there are some recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘There are definitely no immaterial realms.’ 
“Householders, there are some recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘There is definitely no cessation of being.’ 
“Householders, there are some recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘There is no cause or condition for the defilement of beings; beings are defiled without cause or condition.
“Householders, there are some recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘There is nothing given, nothing offered, nothing sacrificed; no fruit or result of good and bad actions; no this world, no other world; no mother, no father; no beings who are reborn spontaneously; no good and virtuous recluses and brahmins in the world who have themselves realised by direct knowledge and declare this world and the other world.’ 
“Householders, there are some recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘When one acts or makes others act, when one mutilates or makes others mutilate, when one tortures or makes others inflict torture, when one inflicts sorrow or makes others inflict sorrow, when one oppresses or makes others inflict oppression, when one intimidates or makes others inflict intimidation, when one kills living beings, takes what is not given, breaks into houses, plunders wealth, commits burglary, ambushes highways, seduces another’s wife, utters falsehood—no evil is done by the doer.
“Householders, there are three kinds of bodily conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, righteous conduct.
“Householders, there are three kinds of bodily conduct not in accordance with the Dhamma, unrighteous conduct.
“How can we be diligent, Master Sāriputta, when we have to support our parents, our wife and children, and our slaves, servants, and workers; when we have to do our duty towards our friends and companions, towards our kinsmen and relatives, towards our guests, towards our departed ancestors, towards the deities, and towards the king; and when this body must also be refreshed and nourished?”
“How could he be diligent, friend?
“How could he, venerable sir?
“How could he, venerable sir?
“How could I not, Master Gotama?
“How could my faculties not be deranged, venerable sir?
“How could one, Master Gotama?
“How could we have a house, householder, when we have gone forth from the home life into homelessness?
“How does a bhikkhu dress wounds?
“How does a bhikkhu fail to dress wounds?
“How does a bhikkhu fail to pick out flies’ eggs?
“How does a bhikkhu fail to smoke out the sheds?
“How does a bhikkhu have knowledge of form?
“How does a bhikkhu know the ford?
“How does a bhikkhu know the road?
“How does a bhikkhu know what it is to have drunk?
“How does a bhikkhu milk dry?
“How does a bhikkhu not know the ford?
“How does a bhikkhu not know the road?
“How does a bhikkhu not know what it is to have drunk?
“How does a bhikkhu not milk dry?
“How does a bhikkhu pick out flies’ eggs?
“How does a bhikkhu show extra veneration to those elder bhikkhus of long-standing who have long gone forth, the fathers and leaders of the Sangha?
“How does a bhikkhu show no extra veneration to those elder bhikkhus of long-standing who have long gone forth, the fathers and leaders of the Sangha?
“How does a bhikkhu smoke out the sheds?
“How does Master Gotama discipline his disciples?
“How does one become a brahmin?
“How does one not revive the past?
“How far is it from Nagaraka to Medaḷumpa?”
“How has a bhikkhu no knowledge of form?
“How is a bhikkhu skilled in characteristics?
“How is a bhikkhu skilled in pastures?
“How is a bhikkhu unskilled in characteristics?
“How is a bhikkhu unskilled in pastures?
“How is it then, Master Gotama?
“How is it, Master Gotama, does Master Gotama hold the view: ‘After death a Tathāgata both exists and does not exist: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’?” 
“How is it, Master Gotama, does Master Gotama hold the view: ‘After death a Tathāgata exists: only this is true, anything else is wrong’?” 
“How is it, Master Gotama, does Master Gotama hold the view: ‘The soul and the body are the same: only this is true, anything else is wrong’?” 
“How is it, Master Gotama, does Master Gotama hold the view: ‘The world is eternal: only this is true, anything else is wrong’?”
“How is it, Master Gotama, does Master Gotama hold the view: ‘The world is finite: only this is true, anything else is wrong’?”
“How is it, Udāyin, is there an exclusively pleasant world?
“How is one invincible in regard to presently arisen states?
“How is one vanquished in regard to presently arisen states?
“How long is it since you went forth, friend Samiddhi?”
“How many emancipators are there in this Dhamma and Discipline, Master Ānanda?”
“How then, Anuruddha, do you all think of me in this way: ‘The Tathāgata has not abandoned the taints that defile, bring renewal of being, give trouble, ripen in suffering, and lead to future birth, ageing, and death.
“How then, Bhāradvāja, among the brahmins is there even a single brahmin who says thus: ‘I know this, I see this: only this is true, anything else is wrong’?”—“No, Master Gotama.”
“How then, Bhāradvāja, among the brahmins is there even a single teacher or a single teacher’s teacher back to the seventh generation of teachers who says thus: ‘I know this, I see this: only this is true, anything else is wrong’?”—“No, Master Gotama.”
“How then, Bhāradvāja, the ancient brahmin seers, the creators of the hymns, the composers of the hymns, whose ancient hymns that were formerly chanted, uttered, and compiled, the brahmins nowadays still chant and repeat, repeating what was spoken and reciting what was recited—that is, Ạ̣haka, Vāmaka, Vāmadeva, Vessāmitta, Yamataggi, Angirasa, Bhāradvāja, Vāseṭṭha, Kassapa, and Bhagu —did even these ancient brahmin seers say thus: ‘We know this, we see this: only this is true, anything else is wrong’?”— “No, Master Gotama.”
“How then, does Master Gotama hold the view: ‘After death a Tathāgata does not exist: only this is true, anything else is wrong’?”
“How then, does Master Gotama hold the view: ‘After death a Tathāgata neither exists nor does not exist: only this is true, anything else is wrong’?”
“How then, does Master Gotama hold the view: ‘The soul is one thing and the body another: only this is true, anything else is wrong’?”
“How then, does Master Gotama hold the view: ‘The world is infinite: only this is true, anything else is wrong’?” “Vaccha, I do not hold the view: ‘The world is infinite: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’”
“How then, does Master Gotama hold the view: ‘The world is not eternal: only this is true, anything else is wrong’?” “Vaccha, I do not hold the view: ‘The world is not eternal: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’”
“How then, friend Gotama, is bodily action one, verbal action another, and mental action still another?”
“How then, Mālunkyāputta, did I ever say to you: ‘Come, Mālunkyāputta, lead the holy life under me and I will declare to you “the world is eternal”…or “after death a Tathāgata neither exists nor does not exist”’?”—“No, venerable sir.”—“Did you ever tell me: ‘I will lead the holy life under the Blessed One, and the Blessed One will declare to me “the world is eternal”…or “after death a Tathāgata neither exists nor does not exist”’?”—“No, venerable sir.”—“That being so, misguided man, who are you and what are you abandoning?
“How then, student, among the brahmins is there even a single brahmin who says thus: ‘I declare the result of these five things having realised it myself with direct knowledge’?”—“No, Master Gotama.”
“How then, student, among the brahmins is there even a single teacher or teacher’s teacher back to the seventh generation of teachers who says thus: ‘I declare the result of these five things having realised it myself with direct know ledge’?”—“No, Master Gotama.” 
“How then, student, does the brahmin Pokkharas̄ti understand the minds of all recluses and brahmins, having encompassed them with his own mind?”
“How then, student, the ancient brahmin seers, the creators of the hymns, the composers of the hymns, whose ancient hymns that were formerly chanted, uttered, and compiled the brahmins nowadays still chant and repeat, repeating what was spoken, reciting what was recited—that is, Aṭṭhaka, Vāmaka, Vāmadeva, Vess̄mitta, Yamataggi, Angirasa, Bh̄radv̄ja, V̄sẹ̣ha, Kassapa, and Bhagu—did even these ancient brahmin seers say thus: ‘We declare the result of these five things having realised it ourselves with direct knowledge’?”—“No, Master Gotama.”
“How then, Tapassī, is the bodily rod one, the verbal rod another, and the mental rod still another?”
“How, Aggivessana, is one undeveloped in body and undeveloped in mind?
“How, bhikkhu, does one not neglect wisdom?
“How, bhikkhus, does a bhikkhu not practise the way proper to the recluse?
“How, bhikkhus, does a bhikkhu practise the way proper to the recluse?
“How, bhikkhus, does one revive the past?
“How, bhikkhus, does there come to be extolling and disparaging and failure to teach only the Dhamma?
“How, bhikkhus, does there come to be insistence on local language and overriding of normal usage?
“How, friends, does one build up hope upon the future?
“How, friends, does one not build up hope upon the future?
“How, friends, does one revive the past?
“How, friends, is consciousness called ‘distracted and scattered externally’?
“How, friends, is there agitation due to clinging?
“However, Udāyin, there are five other qualities because of which my disciples honour, respect, revere, and venerate me, and live in dependence on me, honouring and respecting me.
“However, Ānanda, there is this abiding discovered by the Tathāgata: to enter and abide in voidness internally by giving no attention to all signs.
“I am already a king, O Sela,” the Blessed One replied.
“I am coming from the presence of the recluse Gotama, venerable sir.”
“I am keeping well, Blessed One, I am comfortable, and I am not having any trouble getting almsfood.”
“I am not foundering, venerable Ānanda, I am not sinking.
“I am one who thought of posing
“I am one who, by liberation, Has touched the peak of Mount Sineru, Visited the Pubbavidehans’ grove
“I am one who, in that palace, Posed to Sakka this question:
“I am one who, when exhorted
“I am one who, wielding firmly
“I am still more satisfied and pleased that Master Udena suggests that I give a gift to the Sangha.
“I am supreme king of the Dhamma;
“I assert thus, Master Gotama: ‘Material form is my self, feeling is my self, perception is my self, formations are my self, consciousness is my self.’
“I call him not a brahmin
“I can teach you the wholesome and the unwholesome in brief, Vaccha, and I can teach you the wholesome and the unwholesome at length.
“I cannot command my friends and companions, my kinsmen and relatives thus, Master Raṭṭhapāla.
“I cannot have it thus of the life to come, Master Raṭṭhapāla.
“I cannot teach you the Dhamma, prince, as I have heard it and mastered it.
“I considered thus: ‘There are the specially auspicious nights of the fourteenth, the fifteenth, and the eighth of the fortnight.
“I considered thus: ‘To whom should I first teach the Dhamma?
“I considered thus: ‘To whom should I first teach the Dhamma?
“I considered thus: ‘To whom should I first teach the Dhamma?
“I considered thus: ‘Whenever recluses or brahmins unpurified in bodily conduct resort to remote jungle-thicket resting places in the forest, then owing to the defect of their unpurified bodily conduct these good recluses and brahmins evoke unwholesome fear and dread.
“I considered thus: ‘Whenever recluses or brahmins who are covetous and full of lust…I am uncovetous…’ 
“I considered: ‘I recall that when my father the Sakyan was occupied, while I was sitting in the cool shade of a rose-apple tree, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, I entered upon and abided in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“I considered: ‘It is not easy to attain that pleasure with a body so excessively emaciated.
“I considered: ‘It is not through mere faith alone that Āḷāra Kālāma declares: “By realising for myself with direct knowledge, I enter upon and abide in this Dhamma.”
“I considered: ‘It was not through mere faith alone that Rāma declared: “By realising for myself with direct knowledge, I enter upon and abide in this Dhamma.”
“I considered: ‘Not only Rāma had faith, energy, mindfulness, concentration, and wisdom.
“I considered: ‘Not only Āḷāra Kālāma has faith, energy, mindfulness, concentration, and wisdom.
“I considered: ‘This Dhamma that I have attained is profound, hard to see and hard to understand, peaceful and sublime, unattainable by mere reasoning, subtle, to be experienced by the wise.
“I do not need alms, friend,” he said, and he turned back and went to the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta and told him: “Venerable sir, it is only too true that the householder Upāli has gone over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama.
“I do not say of those bhikkhus who are arahants with taints destroyed, who have lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached the true goal, destroyed the fetters of being, and are completely liberated through final knowledge, that they still have work to do with diligence.
“I do not say that the recluse’s status comes about in a patchwork-cloak wearer through the mere wearing of the patchwork cloak, nor in a naked ascetic through mere nakedness, nor in one caked with dust and dirt through being caked with dust and dirt, nor in a ritualistic bather through mere ritualistic bathing, nor in a tree-root dweller through mere dwelling at the root of a tree, nor in an open-air dweller through mere dwelling in the open air, nor in a practitioner of continuous standing through mere continuous standing, nor in a taker of food at stated intervals through mere taking of food at stated intervals, nor in a reciter of incantations through mere recitation of incantations; nor do I say that the recluse’s status comes about in a matted-hair ascetic through mere wearing of the hair matted.
“I do not say, brahmin, that all are to be served, nor do I say that none are to be served.
“I do not say, brahmin, that all are to be served, nor do I say that none are to be served.
“I do not say, brahmin, that one is better because one is from an aristocratic family, nor do I say that one is worse because one is from an aristocratic family.
“I do not see even a single kind of form, Ānanda, from the change and alteration of which there would not arise sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair in one who lusts for it and takes delight in it.
“I do not understand in detail the meaning of Master Gotama’s statement, which he spoke in brief without expounding the meaning in detail.
“I do recall doing so, Moggallāna.
“I go to the Nigaṇṭhas who speak thus and I say: ‘Friend Nigaṇṭhas, is it true that you hold such a doctrine and view as this: “Whatever this person feels…all suffering will be exhausted”?’
“I had some conversation with him, householder.”
“I had some conversation with the recluse Gotama, venerable sir.”
“I have a chronic wind ailment, Master Raṭṭhapāla.
“I have confidence in Master Gotama thus: ‘Master Gotama is capable of teaching me the Dhamma in such a way that I can come to know health and to see Nibbāna.’”
“I have confidence in Master Gotama thus: ‘Master Gotama is capable of teaching me the Dhamma in such a way that I can come to know health and to see Nibbāna.’”
“I have confidence in Master Gotama thus: ‘Master Gotama is capable of teaching me the Dhamma in such a way that I might rise up from this seat cured of my blindness.’”
“I have had conversations with Master Gotama for a long time.
“I have heard, venerable sir, that a number of bhikkhus have declared final knowledge in the presence of the Blessed One.
“I have not heard and learned that from the Blessed One’s own lips, prince.
“I have stopped, Angulimāla, you stop too.”
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘As soon as the Bodhisatta was born, he stood firmly with his feet on the ground; then he took seven steps facing north, and with a white parasol held over him, he surveyed each quarter and uttered the words of the Leader of the Herd: “I am the highest in the world; I am the best in the world; I am the foremost in the world.
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘For the whole of his life-span the Bodhisatta remained in the Tusita heaven.’
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘Mindful and fully aware the Bodhisatta passed away from the Tusita heaven and descended into his mother’s womb.’
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘Mindful and fully aware the Bodhisatta remained in the Tusita heaven.’
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘Other women give birth after carrying the child in the womb for nine or ten months, but not so the Bodhisatta’s mother.
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘Other women give birth seated or lying down, but not so the Bodhisatta’s mother.
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘Seven days after the birth of the Bodhisatta, his mother died and reappeared in the Tusita heaven.’
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘When the Bodhisatta came forth from his mother’s womb, first gods received him, then human beings.’
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘When the Bodhisatta came forth from his mother’s womb, he came forth unsullied, unsmeared by water or humours or blood or any kind of impurity, clean, and unsullied.
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘When the Bodhisatta came forth from his mother’s womb, he did not touch the earth.
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘When the Bodhisatta came forth from his mother’s womb, then a great immeasurable light surpassing the splendour of the gods appeared in the world with its gods, its Māras, and its Brahmās, in this generation with its recluses and brahmins, with its princes and its people.
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘When the Bodhisatta came forth from his mother’s womb, two jets of water appeared to pour from the sky, one cool and one warm, for bathing the Bodhisatta and his mother.’
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘When the Bodhisatta had descended into his mother’s womb, four young deities came to guard him at the four quarters so that no humans or non-humans or anyone at all could harm the Bodhisatta or his mother.’
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘When the Bodhisatta had descended into his mother’s womb, no kind of affliction arose in her; she was blissful and free from bodily fatigue.
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘When the Bodhisatta had descended into his mother’s womb, no sensual thought arose in her concerning men, and she was inaccessible to any man having a lustful mind.’
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘When the Bodhisatta had descended into his mother’s womb, she became intrinsically virtuous, refraining from killing living beings, from taking what is not given, from misconduct in sensual pleasures, from false speech, and from wines, liquors, and intoxicants, which are the basis of negligence.’
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘When the Bodhisatta had descended into his mother’s womb, she obtained the five cords of sensual pleasure, and furnished and endowed with them, she enjoyed herself with them.’
“I heard and learned this from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘When the Bodhisatta passed away from the Tusita heaven and descended into his mother’s womb, then a great immeasurable light surpassing the splendour of the gods appeared in the world with its gods, its Māras, and its Brahmās, in this generation with its recluses and brahmins, with its princes and its people.
“I heard and learned this, venerable sir, from the Blessed One’s own lips: ‘Mindful and fully aware, Ānanda, the Bodhisatta appeared in the Tusita heaven.’
“I hope, Anuruddha, that you are all living in concord, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, blending like milk and water, viewing each other with kindly eyes.”
“I hope, Anuruddha, that you are all living in concord, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, blending like milk and water, viewing each other with kindly eyes.”
“I hope, Master Ānanda, that the Bamboo Grove is pleasant, quiet and undisturbed by voices, with an atmosphere of seclusion, remote from people, favourable for retreat.”
“I knew with my mind the thought in the mind of Baka the Brahmā, so just as quickly as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm, I vanished from the root of the royal sāla tree in the Subhaga Grove at Ukkaṭṭhā and appeared in that Brahma-world.
“I recall having actually made the utterance in this way, great king: ‘There is no recluse or brahmin who knows all, who sees all, simultaneously; that is not possible.’” 
“I recall having approached many hundred assemblies of nobles…many hundred assemblies of brahmins…many hundred assemblies of householders…many hundred assemblies of recluses…many hundred assemblies of gods of the heaven of the Four Great Kings…many hundred assemblies of gods of the heaven of the Thirty-three…many hundred assemblies of Māra’s retinue…many hundred assemblies of Brahmās.
“I recall, Aggivessana, in the last month of the hot season, on returning from my almsround, after my meal I lay out my outer robe folded in four, and lying down on my right side, I fall asleep mindful and fully aware.”
“I said ‘Buddha,’ Sela.”
“I said ‘Buddha,’ Sela.”
“I say mental action, Tapassī.”
“I say mental action, Tapassī.”
“I say mental action, Tapassī.”
“I say of such bhikkhus who are in higher training, whose minds have not yet reached the goal, and who are still aspiring to the supreme security from bondage, that they still have work to do with diligence.
“I say that this person, brahmin, is like a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, who came to a great tree standing possessed of heartwood, and cutting off its heartwood, took it away knowing it was heartwood; and so whatever it was he had to make with heartwood, his purpose will have been served.
“I say the bodily rod, friend Gotama.”
“I say the bodily rod, friend Gotama.”
“I say the bodily rod, friend Gotama.”
“I see men wealthy in the world, who yet
“I see no ground on which any recluse…or anyone at all could accuse me thus: ‘Those things called obstructions by you are not able to obstruct one who engages in them.’
“I see no ground on which any recluse…or anyone at all could accuse me thus: ‘When you teach the Dhamma to someone, it does not lead him when he practises it to the complete destruction of suffering.’
“I see no ground on which any recluse…or anyone at all could accuse me thus: ‘While you claim to be one who has destroyed the taints, you have not destroyed these taints.’
“I shall not treat you as the potter treats the raw damp clay.
“I shall teach you the Dhamma, prince, as I have heard it and mastered it.
“I soon quickly entered upon and abided in that Dhamma by realising for myself with direct knowledge.
“I soon quickly entered upon and abided in that Dhamma by realising for myself with direct knowledge.
“I teach you in order as they really are, Vāseṭṭha,” said the Blessed One, “The generic divisions of living beings;
“I thought: ‘Suppose I practise entirely cutting off food.’
“I thought: ‘Suppose I practise further the breathingless meditation.’
“I thought: ‘Suppose I practise further the breathingless meditation.’
“I thought: ‘Suppose I practise further the breathingless meditation.’
“I thought: ‘Suppose I practise further the breathingless meditation.’
“I thought: ‘Suppose I practise the breathingless meditation.’
“I thought: ‘Suppose I take very little food, a handful each time, whether of bean soup or lentil soup or vetch soup or pea soup.’
“I thought: ‘Suppose, with my teeth clenched and my tongue pressed against the roof of my mouth, I beat down, constrain, and crush mind with mind.’
“I thought: ‘Whatever recluses or brahmins in the past have experienced painful, racking, piercing feelings due to exertion, this is the utmost, there is none beyond this.
“I thought: ‘Why am I afraid of that pleasure that has nothing to do with sensual pleasures and unwholesome states?’
“I understand hell, and the path and way leading to hell.
“I understand human beings, and the path and way leading to the human world.
“I understand Nibbāna, and the path and way leading to Nibbāna.
“I understand the animal realm, and the path and way leading to the animal realm.
“I understand the gods, and the path and way leading to the world of the gods.
“I understand the realm of ghosts, and the path and way leading to the realm of ghosts.
“I usually see this kind of person, Master Udena, in the assembly that does not lust after jewels and earrings, but having abandoned wives and children…has gone forth from the home life into homelessness.”
“I was able to convince the bhikkhus of the group of five.
“I was instructing, urging, rousing, and gladdening the bhikkhus with talk on the Dhamma thus, and reciting the summary and exposition of ‘One Who Has Had a Single Excellent Night’ thus.”
“I will debate on the basis of truth, venerable sir, so let us have some conversation about this.”
“I will not be holding a marriage or a giving in marriage, Master Sela, nor has King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha been invited with a large retinue for tomorrow’s meal, but I am planning a great sacrifice.
“I would go on all fours to the cow-pens when the cattle had gone out and the cowherd had left them, and I would feed on the dung of the young suckling calves.
“I would make my bed in a charnel ground with the bones of the dead for a pillow.
“I would plunge into some awe-inspiring grove and dwell there—a grove so awe-inspiring that it would make most of a man’s hairs stand up if he were not freed from lust.
“I would receive the going forth in this Dhamma and Discipline, I would receive the full admission.”
“I would, Master Gotama.”
“I would, Master Gotama.”
“I, Bhāradvāja, am one of those recluses and brahmins who, having directly known the Dhamma for themselves among things not heard before, claim the fundamentals of the holy life after having reached the consummation and perfection of direct knowledge here and now.
“I, brahmin, declare the noble supramundane Dhamma as a person’s own wealth.
“If a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I be dear and agreeable to my companions in the holy life, respected and esteemed by them,’ let him fulfil the precepts, be devoted to internal serenity of mind, not neglect meditation, be possessed of insight, and dwell in empty huts.
“If a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I be one to obtain robes, almsfood, resting place, and medicinal requisites,’ let him fulfil the precepts…
“If a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I become a conqueror of discontent and delight, and may discontent not conquer me; may I abide transcending discontent whenever it arises,’ let him fulfil the precepts…
“If a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I become a conqueror of fear and dread, and may fear and dread not conquer me; may I abide transcending fear and dread whenever they arise,’ let him fulfil the precepts…
“If a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I become one to obtain at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhānas that constitute the higher mind and provide a pleasant abiding here and now,’ let him fulfil the precepts…
“If a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I contact with the body and abide in those liberations that are peaceful and immaterial, transcending forms,’ let him fulfil the precepts… 
“If a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I recollect my manifold past lives, that is, one birth, two births......Thus with their aspects and their particulars may I recollect my manifold past lives,’ let him fulfil the precepts…
“If a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I understand the minds of other beings, of other persons, having encompassed them with my own mind.
“If a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I wield the various kinds of supernormal power: having been one, may I become many; having been many, may I become one; may I appear and vanish; may I go unhindered through a wall, through an enclosure, through a mountain as though through space; may I dive in and out of the earth as though it were water; may I walk on water without sinking as though it were earth; seated cross-legged, may I travel in space like a bird; with my hand may I touch and stroke the moon and sun so powerful and mighty; may I wield bodily mastery, even as far as the Brahma-world,’ let him fulfil the precepts…
“If a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I, by realising for myself with direct knowledge, here and now enter upon and abide in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints,’  let him fulfil the precepts, be devoted to internal serenity of mind, not neglect meditation, be possessed of insight, and dwell in empty huts.
“If a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I, with the destruction of the five lower fetters, become due to reappear spontaneously and there attain final Nibbāna, without ever returning from that world,’ let him fulfil the precepts… 
“If a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I, with the destruction of three fetters and with the attenuation of lust, hate, and delusion, become a once-returner, returning once to this world to make an end of suffering,’ let him fulfil the precepts…
“If a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I, with the destruction of three fetters, become a stream-enterer, no longer subject to perdition, bound, headed for enlightenment,’ let him fulfil the precepts...
“If a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I, with the divine ear element, which is purified and surpasses the human, hear both kinds of sounds, the divine and the human, those that are far as well as near,’ let him fulfil the precepts…
“If a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, see beings passing away and reappearing, inferior and superior, fair and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate; may I understand how beings pass on according to their actions thus:’......let him fulfil the precepts…
“If a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May the services of those whose robes, almsfood, resting place, and medicinal requisites I use bring them great fruit and benefit,’ let him fulfil the precepts…
“If a bhikkhu should wish: ‘When my kinsmen and relatives who have passed away and died remember me with confidence in their minds, may that bring them great fruit and great benefit,’ let him fulfil the precepts...
“If a brahmin…a merchant…a worker were such, Master Kaccāna, he would reappear in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
“If a brahmin…a merchant…a worker were such, Master Kaccāna, he would reappear in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
“If a noble were such, Master Kaccāna, he would reappear in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
“If a noble were such, Master Kaccāna, he would reappear in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
“If a person approves of something…if he receives an oral tradition…if he reasoned cogitation…if he gains a reflective acceptance of a view, he preserves truth when he says: ‘My reflective acceptance of a view is thus’; but he does not yet come to the definite conclusion: ‘Only this is true, anything else is wrong.’
“If a person has faith, Bhāradvāja, he preserves truth when he says: ‘My faith is thus’; but he does not yet come to the definite conclusion: ‘Only this is true, anything else is wrong.’
“If any recluses and brahmins, without knowing the past and without seeing the future, yet claim: ‘Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being,’ they can be reasonably confuted.
“If anyone gives those bhikkhunīs a blow with his hand, with a clod, with a stick, or with a knife in your presence, you should abandon any desires and any thoughts based on the household life.
“If anyone says, ‘Craving is self’…That is why it is not tenable for anyone to say, ‘Craving is self.’
“If anyone says, ‘Eye-consciousness is self’…That is why it is not tenable for anyone to say, ‘Eye-consciousness is self.’
“If anyone says, ‘Eye-contact is self’…That is why it is not tenable for anyone to say, ‘Eye-contact is self.’
“If anyone says, ‘Feeling is self’ …That is why it is not tenable for anyone to say, ‘Feeling is self.’
“If anyone says, ‘Flavours are self,’…‘Tongue-consciousness is self,’…‘Tongue-contact is self,’…‘Feeling is self,’…‘Craving is self’…That is why it is not tenable for anyone to say, ‘Craving is self.’
“If anyone says, ‘Forms are self’...That is why it is not tenable for anyone to say, ‘Forms are self.’
“If anyone says, ‘Mind-objects are self,’…‘Mind-consciousness is self,’…‘Mind-contact is self,’…‘Feeling is self,’…… ‘Craving is self’…That is why it is not tenable for anyone to say, ‘Craving is self.’
“If anyone says, ‘Odours are self,’…‘Nose-consciousness is self,’ …‘Nose-contact is self,’…‘Feeling is self,’…‘Craving is self’…That is why it is not tenable for anyone to say, ‘Craving is self.’
“If anyone says, ‘Sounds are self,’…‘Ear-consciousness is self,’…‘Ear-contact is self,’…‘Feeling is self,’…‘Craving is self’… That is why it is not tenable for anyone to say, ‘Craving is self.’
“If anyone says, ‘Tangibles are self,’…‘Body-consciousness is self,’…‘Body-contact is self,’…‘Feeling is self,’…‘Craving is self’…That is why it is not tenable for anyone to say, ‘Craving is self.’
“If anyone says, ‘The body is self,’ that is not tenable.
“If anyone says, ‘The ear is self,’ that is not tenable.
“If anyone says, ‘The eye is self,’ that is not tenable.
“If anyone says, ‘The mind is self,’ that is not tenable.
“If anyone says, ‘The nose is self,’ that is not tenable.
“If anyone says, ‘The tongue is self,’ that is not tenable.
“If anyone should say thus: ‘I will not lead the holy life under the Blessed One until the Blessed One declares to me “the world is eternal”…or “after death a Tathāgata neither exists nor does not exist,”’ that would still remain undeclared by the Tathāgata and meanwhile that person would die.
“If anyone slaughters a living being for the Tathāgata or his disciple, he lays up much demerit in five instances.
“If asked, ‘Are there found in the Tathāgata or not any mixed states cognizable through the eye or through the ear?’ the Tathāgata would answer thus: ‘No mixed states cognizable through the eye or through the ear are found in the Tathāgata.’
“If he feels a pleasant feeling, he feels it detached; if he feels a painful feeling, he feels it detached; if he feels a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he feels it detached.
“If he feels a pleasant feeling, he understands: ‘It is impermanent; there is no holding to it; there is no delight in it.’
“If it is not allowable for Master Udena, I will have a monastery built for Master Udena.”
“If it is not inconvenient for you, Bhaggava, I will stay one night in your workshop.”
“If it is not troublesome for you, student, please state in this assembly the five things that the brahmins prescribe for the performance of merit, for accomplishing the wholesome.”
“If it were possible, Master Gotama, for a fire to burn independent of fuel such as grass and wood, that fire would have a flame, colour, and radiance.”
“If it were unknown by me, unseen, unfound, unrealised, uncontacted by wisdom thus: ‘Here, when someone feels another kind of pleasant feeling, unwholesome states diminish in him and wholesome states increase,’ would it be fitting for me, not knowing that, to say: ‘Enter upon and abide in such a kind of pleasant feeling’?”—“No, venerable sir.”
“If it were unknown by me…But because it is known by me…contacted by wisdom thus: ‘Here, when someone feels a certain kind of neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, unwholesome states increase in him and wholesome states diminish,’ that I therefore say: ‘Abandon such a kind of neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.’
“If it were unknown by me…But because it is known by me…contacted by wisdom thus: ‘Here, when someone feels a certain kind of painful feeling, unwholesome states increase in him and wholesome states diminish,’ that I therefore say: ‘Abandon such a kind of painful feeling.’
“If it were unknown by me…But because it is known by me…contacted by wisdom thus: ‘Here, when someone feels another kind of neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, unwholesome states diminish in him and wholesome states increase,’ that I therefore say: ‘Enter upon and abide in such a kind of neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.’
“If it were unknown by me…But because it is known by me…contacted by wisdom thus: ‘Here, when someone feels another kind of painful feeling, unwholesome states diminish in him and wholesome states increase,’ that I therefore say: ‘Enter upon and abide in such a kind of painful feeling.’
“If Master Bhūmija’s teacher speaks thus, if he declares thus, then it certainly seems that the venerable Bh̄mija’ s teacher stands ahead of all the ordinary recluses and brahmins.”
“If Master Māgandiya has no objection, may I tell this to Master Gotama?”
“If no property comes to the clansman while he works and strives and makes an effort thus, he sorrows, grieves, and laments, he weeps beating his breast and becomes distraught, crying: ‘My work is in vain, my effort is fruitless!’ Now this too is a danger in the case of sensual pleasures, a mass of suffering visible here and now…the cause being simply sensual pleasures.
“If others should ask that bhikkhu thus: ‘Was it the venerable one who made those bhikkhus emerge from the unwholesome and established them in the wholesome?’ answering rightly, the bhikkhu would answer thus: ‘Here, friends, I went to the Blessed One.
“If property comes to the clansman while he works and strives and makes an effort thus, he experiences pain and grief in protecting it: ‘How shall neither kings nor thieves make off with my property, nor fire burn it, nor water sweep it away, nor hateful heirs make off with it?’
“If someone were to ask you, Vaccha: ‘What does this fire burning before you burn in dependence on?’—being asked thus, what would you answer?”
“If someone were to ask you, Vaccha: ‘When that fire before you was extinguished, to which direction did it go: to the east, the west, the north, or the south?’—being asked thus, what would you answer?”
“If that fire before you were to be extinguished, would you know: ‘This fire before me has been extinguished’?”
“If that has been said by the Blessed One, sire, then it is so.”
“If that is so, Uttara, then a blind man and a deaf man will have developed faculties, according to what the brahmin Pārāsariya says.
“If that were so, carpenter, then a young tender infant lying prone is accomplished in what is wholesome, perfected in what is wholesome, an ascetic invincible attained to the supreme attainment, according to the wanderer Uggāhamāna’s statement.
“If the Blessed One knows ‘the world is finite,’…‘the world is infinite,’…‘the soul is the same as the body,’…‘the soul is one thing and the body another,’…‘after death a Tathāgata exists,’ …’after death a Tathāgata does not exist,’…If the Blessed One knows ‘after death a Tathāgata both exists and does not exist,’ let the Blessed One declare that to me; if the Blessed One knows ‘after death a Tathāgata neither exists nor does not exist,’ let the Blessed One declare that to me.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by chance, then the Nigaṇṭhas are to be censured; if not, they are still to be censured.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by chance, then the Tathāgata is to be praised; if not, then the Tathāgata is still to be praised.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by circumstance and nature, then the Nigaṇṭhas surely must have bad luck, since they now feel such painful, racking, piercing feelings.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by circumstance and nature, then the Tathāgata surely must have good luck, since he now feels such taintless pleasant feelings.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by class, then the Nigaṇṭhas are to be censured; if not, they are still to be censured.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by class, then the Nigaṇṭhas surely must belong to a bad class, since they now feel such painful, racking, piercing feelings.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by class, then the Tathāgata is to be praised; if not, then the Tathāgata is still to be praised.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by class, then the Tathāgata surely must belong to a good class, since he now feels such taintless pleasant feelings.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by exertion here and now, then the Nigaṇṭhas are to be censured; if not, they are still to be censured.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by exertion here and now, then the Nigaṇṭhas surely must strive badly here and now, since they now feel such painful, racking, piercing feelings.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by exertion here and now, then the Tathāgata is to be praised; if not, then the Tathāgata is still to be praised.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by exertion here and now, then the Tathāgata surely must strive well here and now, since he now feels such taintless pleasant feelings.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by the creative act of a Supreme God, then the Nigaṇṭhas are to be censured; if not, they are still to be censured.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by the creative act of a Supreme God, then the Nigaṇṭhas surely must have been created by an evil Supreme God, since they now feel such painful, racking, piercing feelings.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by the creative act of a Supreme God, then the Tathāgata is to be praised; if not, then the Tathāgata is still to be praised.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by the creative act of a Supreme God, then the Tathāgata surely must have been created by a good Supreme God, since he now feels such taintless pleasant feelings.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by what was done in the past, then the Nigaṇṭhas are to be censured; if not, then the Nigaṇṭhas are still to be censured.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by what was done in the past, then the Nigaṇṭhas surely must have done bad deeds in the past, since they now feel such painful, racking, piercing feelings.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by what was done in the past, then the Tathāgata is to be praised; if not, then the Tathāgata is still to be praised.
“If the pleasure and pain that beings feel are caused by what was done in the past, then the Tathāgata surely must have done good deeds in the past, since he now feels such taintless pleasant feelings.
“If the spheres of these evil unwholesome wishes are seen and heard to be abandoned in any bhikkhu, then for all he may be a village dweller, an acceptor of invitations, a wearer of robes given him by householders, yet his fellows in the holy life honour, respect, revere, and venerate him.
“If the spheres of these evil unwholesome wishes are seen and heard to be unabandoned in any bhikkhu, then for all he may be a forest dweller, a frequenter of remote abodes, an almsfood eater, a house-to-house seeker, a refuse-rag wearer, a wearer of rough robes, still his fellows in the holy life do not honour, respect, revere, and venerate him.
“If there is the view ‘the world is finite,’…‘the world is infinite,’…‘the soul is the same as the body,’…‘the soul is one thing and the body another,’…‘after death a Tathāgata exists,’…‘after death a Tathāgata does not exist,’ the holy life cannot be lived… If there is the view ‘after death a Tathāgata both exists and does not exist,’ the holy life cannot be lived; and if there is the view ‘after death a Tathāgata neither exists nor does not exist,’ the holy life cannot be lived.
“If they were to ask a brahmin…to ask a merchant…to ask a worker…answering rightly, a worker would answer thus: ‘I should not serve the one in whose service I become worse and not better when serving him; I should serve the one in whose service I become better and not worse when serving him.’
“If they were to ask a noble thus: ‘Which of these should you serve—one in whose service you become worse and not better when serving him, or one in whose service you become better and not worse when serving him: answering rightly, a noble would answer thus: ‘I should not serve the one in whose service I become worse and not better when serving him; I should serve the one in whose service I become better and not worse when serving him.’
“If this view of mine were acceptable to me, Master Gotama, it too would be the same, it too would be the same.” 
“If through mere nakedness a naked ascetic who was covetous abandoned covetousness…If through mere dust and dirt…If through mere ritualistic bathing…If through mere dwelling at the root of a tree…If through mere dwelling in the open air…If through mere continuous standing…If through mere taking of food at stated intervals…If through mere recitation of incantations…If through mere wearing of the hair matted……and that is why I do not say that the recluse’s status comes about in a matted-hair ascetic through the mere wearing of the hair matted.
“If we have heard what the recluse Gotama asserts, we have indeed heard what is disagreeable.
“If we heard that Master Gotama was within ten leagues, we would go ten leagues in order to see that Master Gotama, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“If we heard that that Blessed One was within ten leagues, we would go ten leagues in order to see that Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“If you answer thus: ‘The recluse Gotama has the threefold true knowledge,’ you will be saying what has been said by me and will not misrepresent me with what is contrary to fact.
“If you are my heirs in Dhamma, not my heirs in material things, you will not be reproached: ‘The Teacher’s disciples live as his heirs in Dhamma, not as his heirs in material things’; and I will not be reproached: ‘The Teacher’s disciples live as his heirs in Dhamma, not as his heirs in material things.’
“If you desire to have a monastery built for me, brahmin, have an assembly hall built for the Sangha at Pāṭaliputta.” 
“If, Aggivessana, the king’s elephant dies in old age untamed and undisciplined, then he is considered an old elephant that has died an untamed death.
“If, Aggivessana, the king’s elephant dies in old age well tamed and well disciplined, then he is considered an old elephant that has died a tamed death.
“If, brahmin, anyone from a clan of brahmins goes forth…If anyone from a clan of merchants goes forth…If anyone from a clan of workers goes forth from the home life into homelessness, and after encountering the Dhamma and Discipline proclaimed by the Tathāgata, he abstains from killing living beings…and holds right view, he is one who is accomplishing the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.
“If, brahmin, anyone from a clan of nobles goes forth from the home life into homelessness, and after encountering the Dhamma and Discipline proclaimed by the Tath̄gata, he abstains from killing living beings, from taking what is not given, from incelibacy, from false speech, from malicious speech, from harsh speech, and from gossip, and is uncovetous, has a mind without ill will, and holds right view, he is one who is accomplishing the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.
“If, friends, internally the body is intact but no external tangibles come into its range…At that point too, friends, much has been done by that bhikkhu.
“If, friends, internally the ear is intact but no external sounds come into its range……At that point too, friends, much has been done by that bhikkhu.
“If, friends, internally the eye is intact but no external forms come into its range, and there is no corresponding engagement, then there is no manifestation of the corresponding section of consciousness.
“If, friends, internally the mind is intact but no external mind-objects come into its range, and there is no corresponding engagement, then there is no manifestation of the corresponding section of consciousness.
“If, friends, internally the nose is intact but no external smells come into its range…At that point too, friends, much has been done by that bhikkhu.
“If, friends, internally the tongue is intact but no external flavours come into its range…At that point too, friends, much has been done by that bhikkhu.
“If, householders, one who observes conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, righteous conduct, should wish: ‘Oh, that by realising for myself with direct knowledge I might here and now enter upon and abide in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints!’ it is possible that, by realising for himself with direct knowledge, he will here and now enter upon and abide in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints.
“If, householders, one who observes conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, righteous conduct, should wish: ‘Oh, that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of the gods of the heaven of the Four Great Kings!…in the company of the gods of the heaven of the Thirty-three…the Yāma gods…the gods of the Tusita heaven…the gods who delight in creating…the gods who wield power over others′ creations…the gods of Brahmā′ s retinue…the gods of Radiance  …the gods of Limited Radiance…the gods of Immeasurable Radiance...the gods of Streaming Radiance...the gods of Glory…the gods of Limited Glory…the gods of Immeasurable Glory...the gods of Refulgent Glory...the gods of Great Fruit…the Aviha gods…the Atappa gods…the Sudassa gods…the Sudassī gods…the Akaniṭṭha gods…the gods of the base of infinite space…the gods of the base of infinite consciousness…the gods of the base of nothingness…the gods of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception!’ it is possible that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he will reappear in the company of the gods of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
“If, householders, one who observes conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, righteous conduct, should wish: ‘Oh, that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of well-to-do brahmins!…in the company of well-to-do householders!’ it is possible that, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he will reappear in the company of well-to-do householders.
“If, householders, one who observes conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, righteous conduct, should wish: ‘Oh, that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of well-to-do nobles!’ it is possible that, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he will reappear in the company of well-to-do nobles.
“If, O sir, you now approve
“If, some time or other, at the end of a long period, the wise man comes back to the human state, it is into a high family that he is reborn—into a family of well-to-do nobles, or well-to-do brahmins, or well-to-do householders—one that is rich, of great wealth, of great possessions, with abundant gold and silver, with abundant assets and means, and with abundant money and grain.
“If, sometime or other, at the end of a long period, that fool comes back to the human state, it is into a low family that he is reborn—into a family of outcasts or hunters or bamboo-workers or cartwrights or scavengers—one that is poor with little to eat and drink, surviving with difficulty, where he scarcely finds food and clothing; and he is ugly, unsightly, and misshapen, sickly, blind, cripple-handed, lame, or paralysed; he gets no food, drink, clothes, vehicles, garlands, scents and unguents, bed, lodging, and light; he misconducts himself in body, speech, and mind, and having done that, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
“If, while he is examining the danger in those thoughts, there still arise in him evil unwholesome thoughts connected with desire, with hate, and with delusion, then he should try to forget those thoughts and should not give attention to them.
“If, while he is giving attention to some other sign connected with what is wholesome, there still arise in him evil unwholesome thoughts connected with desire, with hate, and with delusion, then he should examine the danger in those thoughts thus: ‘These thoughts are unwholesome, they are reprehensible, they result in suffering.′ When he examines the danger in those thoughts, then any evil unwholesome thoughts connected with desire, with hate, and with delusion are abandoned in him and subside.
“If, while he is giving attention to stilling the thought-formation of those thoughts, there still arise in him evil unwholesome thoughts connected with desire, with hate, and with delusion, then, with his teeth clenched and his tongue pressed against the roof of his mouth, he should beat down, constrain, and crush mind with mind.
“If, while he is trying to forget those thoughts and is not giving attention to them, there still arise in him evil unwholesome thoughts connected with desire, with hate, and with delusion, then he should give attention to stilling the thought-formation of those thoughts.
“If, Ānanda, you undertake and maintain these six principles of cordiality, do you see any course of speech, trivial or gross, that you could not endure?” —“No, venerable sir.”—“Therefore, Ānanda, undertake and maintain these six principles of cordiality.
“Ignorance is the counterpart of neither-painful-nor pleasant feeling.” 
“Ihave confidence in Master Gotama thus: ‘Master Gotama is developed in body and developed in mind.’”
“Immediately next to the Great Hell is the vast Hell of Excrement.
“Immediately next to the Hell of Excrement is the vast Hell of Hot Embers.
“Immediately next to the Hell of Hot Embers is the vast Wood of Simbali Trees, a league high, bristling with thorns sixteen finger-breadths long, burning, blazing, and glowing.
“Immediately next to the Wood of Simbali Trees is a vast Wood of Sword-leaf Trees.
“Immediately next to the Wood of Sword-leaf Trees is a great river of caustic water.
“In future times, Ānanda, there will be members of the clan who are ‘yellow-necks,’ immoral, of evil character.
“In one of right intention, wrong intention is abolished, and the many evil unwholesome states that originate with wrong intention as condition are also abolished, and the many wholesome states that originate with right intention as condition come to fulfilment by development.
“In one of right speech, wrong speech is abolished…In one of right action, wrong action is abolished…In one of right livelihood, wrong livelihood is abolished …In one of right effort, wrong effort is abolished…In one of right mindfulness, wrong mindfulness is abolished…In one of right concentration, wrong concentration is abolished…In one of right knowledge, wrong knowledge is abolished…In one of right deliverance, wrong deliverance is abolished, and the many evil unwholesome states that originate with wrong deliverance as condition are also abolished, and the many wholesome states that originate with right deliverance as condition come to fulfilment by development.
“In one who has aroused energy, unworldly rapture arises.
“In one who investigates and examines that state with wisdom and embarks upon a full inquiry into it, tireless energy is aroused.
“In one who is rapturous, the body and the mind become tranquil.
“In one whose body is tranquil and who feels pleasure, the mind becomes concentrated.
“In order to answer correctly, friend, he should answer thus: ‘Here, while living at Sāvatthī I had some urgent business to settle at Sāketa, and between Sāvatthī and Sāketa seven relay chariots were kept ready for me.
“In regard to the ear and sounds that are presently arisen… the nose and odours…the tongue and flavours…the body and tangibles…the mind and mind-objects that are presently arisen, one’s consciousness is not bound up with desire and lust for that which is presently arisen.
“In regard to the ear and sounds that are presently arisen…the nose and odours…the tongue and flavours…the body and tangibles…the mind and mind-objects that are presently arisen, one’s consciousness is bound up with desire and lust for that which is presently arisen.
“In that case, Aggivessana, I shall ask you a question in return.
“In that case, Angulimāla, go into Sāvatthī and say to that woman: ‘Sister, since I was born, I do not recall that I have ever intentionally deprived a living being of life.
“In that case, friend, I shall give you a simile, for some wise men here understand the meaning of a statement by means of a simile.
“In that case, good doorkeeper, make seats ready in the hall of the central door.”
“In that case, may the venerable ones pay homage in my name with their heads at the Blessed One’s feet, saying: ‘Venerable sir, the bhikkhu Vacchagotta pays homage with his head at the Blessed One’s feet.’
“In that case, Vaccha, develop further two things: serenity and insight.
“In that case, venerable sir, hear whose disciple I am:
“In that way, Master Gotama, there is the discovery of truth; in that way one discovers truth; in that way we recognise the discovery of truth.
“In that way, Master Gotama, there is the final arrival at truth; in that way one finally arrives at truth; in that way we recognise the final arrival at truth.
“In that way, Master Gotama, there is the preservation of truth; in that way one preserves truth; in that way we recognise the preservation of truth.
“In the middle of the ocean
“In this Sangha of bhikkhus there are bhikkhus who abide devoted to the development of loving-kindness …of compassion…of altruistic joy…of equanimity…of the meditation on foulness…of the perception of impermanence—such bhikkhus are there in this Sangha of bhikkhus.
“In this Sangha of bhikkhus there are bhikkhus who abide devoted to the development of the four foundations of mindfulness—such bhikkhus are there in this Sangha of bhikkhus.
“In this Sangha of bhikkhus there are bhikkhus who are arahants with taints destroyed, who have lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached their own goal, destroyed the fetters of being, and are completely liberated through final knowledge—such bhikkhus are there in this Sangha of bhikkhus.
“In this Sangha of bhikkhus there are bhikkhus who, with the destruction of the five lower fetters, are due to reappear spontaneously and there attain final Nibb̄na, without ever returning from that world—such bhikkhus are there in this Sangha of bhikkhus.
“In this Sangha of bhikkhus there are bhikkhus who, with the destruction of the three fetters, are stream-enterers, no longer subject to perdition, bound, headed for enlightenment—such bhikkhus are there in this Sangha of bhikkhus.
“In this Sangha of bhikkhus there are bhikkhus who, with the destruction of three fetters and with the attenuation of lust, hate, and delusion, are once-returners, returning once to this world to make an end of suffering—such bhikkhus are there in this Sangha of bhikkhus.
“In this the elder bhikkhus are to be blamed for three reasons.
“In this the elder bhikkhus are to be commended for three reasons.
“In this the middle bhikkhus are to be blamed for three reasons.
“In this the middle bhikkhus are to be commended for three reasons.
“In this the new bhikkhus are to be blamed for three reasons.
“In this the new bhikkhus are to be commended for three reasons.
“In this way he abides contemplating feelings as feelings internally, or he abides contemplating feelings as feelings externally, or he abides contemplating feelings as feelings both internally and externally.
“In this way he abides contemplating mind as mind internally, or he abides contemplating mind as mind externally, or he abides contemplating mind as mind both internally and externally.
“In this way he abides contemplating mind-objects as mind-objects internally, externally, and both internally and externally…And he abides independent, not clinging to anything in the world.
“In this way he abides contemplating mind-objects as mind-objects internally, externally, and both internally and externally…And he abides independent, not clinging to anything in the world.
“In this way he abides contemplating mind-objects as mind-objects internally, externally, and both internally and externally…And he abides independent, not clinging to anything in the world.
“In this way he abides contemplating mind-objects as mind-objects internally, or he abides contemplating mind-objects as mind-objects externally, or he abides contemplating mind-objects as mind-objects both internally and externally.
“In this way he abides contemplating mind-objects as mind-objects internally, or he abides contemplating mind-objects as mind-objects externally, or he abides contemplating mind-objects as mind-objects both internally and externally.
“In this way he abides contemplating the body as a body internally, externally, and both internally and externally… And he abides independent, not clinging to anything in the world.
“In this way he abides contemplating the body as a body internally, externally, and both internally and externally… And he abides independent, not clinging to anything in the world.
“In this way he abides contemplating the body as a body internally, externally, and both internally and externally…And he abides independent, not clinging to anything in the world.
“In this way he abides contemplating the body as a body internally, externally, and both internally and externally…And he abides independent, not clinging to anything in the world.
“In this way he abides contemplating the body as a body internally, externally, and both internally and externally…And he abides independent, not clinging to anything in the world.
“In this way he abides contemplating the body as a body internally, or he abides contemplating the body as a body externally, or he abides contemplating the body as a body both internally and externally.
“In this way he abides contemplating the body as a body internally, or he abides contemplating the body as a body externally, or he abides contemplating the body as a body both internally and externally.
“In this way, Ānanda, a bhikkhu can be called skilled in what is possible and what is impossible.”
“In Vebhalinga the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, had as a supporter, as his chief supporter, a potter named Ghaṭīkāra.
“In what way, friends, do disciples of the Teacher who lives secluded train in seclusion?
“In what way, householder, have you given up all your works and cut off all your affairs?”
“In-breathing and out-breathing, friend Visākha, are the bodily formation; applied thought and sustained thought are the verbal formation; perception and feeling are the mental formation.” 
“Indeed, brahmin, that the Bamboo Grove is pleasant...
“Indeed, friend, we did not know that we were talking with the venerable Sāriputta, the disciple who is like the Teacher himself.
“Indeed, friend, we would come from far away to learn from the venerable Sāriputta the meaning of this statement.
“Indeed, friend, we would come from far away to learn from the venerable Sāriputta the meaning of this statement.
“Indeed, it is because Master Gotama is an Accomplished One, a Fully Enlightened One, that he has compassion for future generations.
“Indeed, Master Bhāradvāja, it is an ill sight we see when we see the bed of that destroyer of growth, Master Gotama.”
“Indeed, Master Ānanda, that the Bamboo Grove is pleasant…favourable for retreat is because of the worthy ones who are meditators and cultivate meditation.
“Indeed, Sāriputta, the bhikkhu Channa had friendly families, intimate families, approachable families; but I do not say that to this extent he was blameworthy.
“Indeed, Ānanda, it is not possible that a bhikkhu who delights in company, takes delight in company, and devotes himself to delight in company, who delights in society, takes delight in society, and rejoices in society, will ever enter upon and abide in either the deliverance of mind that is temporary and delectable or in that is perpetual and unshakeable.
“Investigate thoroughly, householder.
“Is he diligent, friend?”
“Is the holy life lived under our Blessed One, friend?”—“Yes, friend.”—“But, friend, is it for the sake of purification of virtue that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One?”—“No, friend.”—“Then is it for the sake of purification of mind that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One?”—“No, friend.”—“Then is it for the sake of purification of view that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One?”—“No, friend.”—“Then is it for the sake of purification by overcoming doubt that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One?”—“No, friend.”—“Then is it for the sake of purification by knowledge and vision of what is the path and what is not the path that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One?”—“No, friend.”—“Then is it for the sake of purification by knowledge and vision of the way that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One?”—“No, friend.”—“Then is it for the sake of purification by knowledge and vision that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One?”—“No, friend.”
“Is the Sangha of bhikkhus well and strong, friend?”
“Is there, Master Ānanda, any single bhikkhu who was appointed by Master Gotama thus: ‘He will be your refuge when I am gone,’ and whom you now have recourse to?”
“Is there, Master Ānanda, any single bhikkhu whom you now honour, respect, revere, and venerate, and on whom you live in dependence honouring and respecting him?”
“It can be understood from this, brahmin, how sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair are born from those who are dear, arise from those who are dear.
“It can, bhikkhu,” the Blessed One said.
“It can, bhikkhu,” the Blessed One said.
“It does not occur to those deities: ‘This of ours is permanent, everlasting, and eternal,’ yet wherever those deities settle down, there they find delight.
“It does the venerable Kosiya credit as one who has formerly made merit; and whenever human beings see anything lovely, they say: ‘Sirs, it does credit to the gods of the Thirty-three!’ It does the venerable Kosiya credit as one who has formerly made merit.”
“It happened once, Evil One, that I was a Māra named Dūsī, and I had a sister named Kālī.
“It happened once, Evil One, that the venerable Sañjīva had seated himself at the root of a certain tree and entered upon the cessation of perception and feeling.
“It has happened that King Yama thought: ‘Those in the world who do evil unwholesome actions indeed have all these many kinds of tortures inflicted on them.
“It has happened, venerable sir, that bhikkhus wandering for alms in the thick darkness of the night have walked into a cesspool, fallen into a sewer, walked into a thornbush, and walked into a sleeping cow; they have met hoodlums who had already committed a crime and those planning one, and they have been sexually enticed by women.
“It is a mule, Master Gotama, since it does not belong to either kind.
“It is as though a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, were to take a sharp axe and enter the wood, and there he would see a large plantain trunk, straight, young, with no fruit-bud core.
“It is eighty years since I went forth, friend.”
“It is enough to cause you bewilderment, Vaccha, enough to cause you confusion.
“It is impossible, student, it cannot happen that a fire could burn independent of fuel such as grass or wood except through supernormal power.
“It is impossible, Tapassī, it cannot happen that the householder Upāli should go over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama; but it is possible, it can happen that the recluse Gotama might come over to discipleship under the householder Upāli.
“It is impossible, Tapassī, it cannot happen that the householder Upāli should go over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama; but it is possible, it can happen that the recluse Gotama might come over to discipleship under the householder Upāli.
“It is impossible, Tapassī, it cannot happen that the householder Upāli should go over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama; but it is possible, it can happen that the recluse Gotama might come over to discipleship under the householder Upāli.”
“It is impossible, Tapassī, it cannot happen that the householder Upāli should go over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama; but it is possible, it can happen that the recluse Gotama might come over to discipleship under the householder Upāli.” 
“It is impossible, Tapassī, it cannot happen…it can happen that the recluse Gotama might come over to discipleship under the householder Upāli.
“It is impossible, Tapassī, it cannot happen…”
“It is in this way that disciples of the Teacher who lives secluded do not train in seclusion.
“It is in this way that disciples of the Teacher who lives secluded train in seclusion.
“It is just a saying in the world, great king, that ‘Brahmins are the highest caste…heirs of Brahmā.’
“It is known to me to be the case, Bhāradvāja, that there are gods.”
“It is not allowable for us to accept gold and silver, brahmin.”
“It is not far, sire, three leagues.
“It is not for the sake of realising that exclusively pleasant world that bhikkhus lead the holy life under me.
“It is not in such a way that one is deluded or undeluded, Aggivessana.
“It is not inconvenient for me, venerable sir, but there is a homeless one already staying there.
“It is not necessary, great king.
“It is not troublesome for me, Master Gotama, when such venerable ones as yourself and others are sitting.”
“It is possible here that by completely surmounting the base of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing,’ some bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of nothingness.
“It is possible here that by completely surmounting the base of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite,’ some bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of infinite consciousness.
“It is possible here that by completely surmounting the base of nothingness, some bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
“It is possible here that with the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous disappearance of joy and grief, some bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the fourth jhāna, which has neither-pain-nor-pleasure and purity of mindfulness due to equanimity.
“It is possible here that with the complete surmounting of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of sensory impact, with non-attention to perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite,’ some bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of infinite space.
“It is possible here that with the fading away as well of rapture, some bhikkhu abides in equanimity, and mindful and fully aware, still feeling pleasure with the body, he enters upon and abides in the third jhāna, on account of which noble ones announce: ‘He has a pleasant abiding who has equanimity and is mindful.’
“It is possible here that with the stilling of applied and sustained thought, some bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the second jhāna, which has self-confidence and singleness of mind without applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of concentration.
“It is possible here, Cunda, that quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, some bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“It is possible that a bhikkhu here might wish: ‘If I commit an offence, let a person who is my equal admonish me, not a person who is not my equal.’
“It is possible that a bhikkhu here might wish: ‘If I commit an offence, let the bhikkhus admonish me in private, not in the midst of the Sangha.’
“It is possible that a bhikkhu here might wish: ‘If I commit an offence, let the bhikkhus not know that I have committed an offence.’
“It is possible that a bhikkhu here might wish: ‘Oh that I might get the best seat, the best water, the best almsfood in the refectory, not some other bhikkhu!’ And it is possible that some other bhikkhu gets the best seat…
“It is possible that a bhikkhu here might wish: ‘Oh that I might give the blessing in the refectory after the meal, not some other bhikkhu!’ And it is possible that some other bhikkhu gives the blessing…
“It is possible that a bhikkhu here might wish: ‘Oh that the bhikkhus might enter the village for alms putting me in the forefront, not some other bhikkhu!’ And it is possible that the bhikkhus enter the village for alms putting some other bhikkhu in the forefront, not that bhikkhu.
“It is possible that a bhikkhu here might wish: ‘Oh that the Teacher might teach the Dhamma to the bhikkhus by asking a series of questions of me, not of some other bhikkhu!’ And it is possible that the Teacher teaches the Dhamma to the bhikkhus by asking a series of questions of some other bhikkhu, not of that bhikkhu.
“It is possible, bhikkhus, that wanderers of other sects might ask: ‘But on the strength of what or with the support of what do the venerable ones say thus?’
“It is possible, bhikkhus, that wanderers of other sects might say thus: ‘Friends, we too have confidence in the Teacher, that is, in our Teacher; we too have confidence in the Dhamma, that is, in our Dhamma; we too have fulfilled the precepts, that is, our precepts; and our companions in the Dhamma are dear and agreeable to us too whether they are laymen or those gone forth.
“It is possible, brahmin, to describe gradual training, gradual practice, and gradual progress in this Dhamma and Discipline.
“It is possible, Sunakkhatta, that some bhikkhu here might think thus: ‘Craving has been called an arrow by the Recluse; the poisonous humour of ignorance is spread about by desire, lust, and ill will.
“It is possible, Sunakkhatta, that some bhikkhu here might think thus: ‘Craving has been called an arrow by the Recluse; the poisonous humour of ignorance is spread about by desire, lust, and ill will.
“It is possible, Sunakkhatta, that some person here may be completely intent on Nibbāna.
“It is possible, Sunakkhatta, that some person here may be intent on the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
“It is possible, Sunakkhatta, that some person here may be intent on the base of nothingness.
“It is possible, Sunakkhatta, that some person here may be intent on the imperturbable.
“It is possible, Sunakkhatta, that some person here may be intent on worldly material things.
“It is possible, Ānanda, that wanderers of other sects might speak thus: ‘The recluse Gotama speaks of the cessation of perception and feeling and he describes that as pleasure.
“It is widely accepted in the world, Bhāradvāja, that there are gods.”
“It is wonderful, friend, it is marvellous!
“It is wonderful, Mallikā, it is marvellous how far the Blessed One penetrates with wisdom and sees with wisdom!
“It is wonderful, Master Gotama, it is marvellous how the Sangha of bhikkhus has been led to practise the right way by Master Gotama.
“It is wonderful, Master Raṭṭhapāla, it is marvellous how well that has been expressed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened: ‘ any world has no shelter and no protector.’
“It is wonderful, Master Raṭṭhapāla, it is marvellous how well that has been expressed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened: ‘ any world has nothing of its own; one has to leave all and pass on.’
“It is wonderful, Master Raṭṭhapāla, it is marvellous how well that has been expressed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened: ‘ any world is incomplete, insatiate, the slave of craving.’
“It is wonderful, Master Raṭṭhapāla, it is marvellous how well that has been expressed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened: ‘ any world is unstable, it is swept away.’
“It is wonderful, Master Ānanda, it is marvellous, how the four kinds of holy life without consolation have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened…But, Master Ānanda, what does that teacher assert, what does he declare, wherein a wise man certainly would live the holy life, and while living it would attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome?’”
“It is wonderful, Master Ānanda, it is marvellous, how the four ways that negate the living of the holy life have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened…But, Master Ānanda, what are those four kinds of holy life without consolation that have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein a wise man certainly would not live the holy life, or if he should live it, would not attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome?”
“It is wonderful, venerable sir, it is marvellous how well that has been expressed by the venerable Ānanda!
“It is wonderful, venerable sir, it is marvellous!
“It is wonderful, venerable sir, it is marvellous!
“It seems, Master Ānanda, that Master Gotama censured that kind of meditation that should be censured and praised that kind of meditation that should be praised.
“It was the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta, venerable sir.”
“It was the venerable Ānanda, venerable sir.”
“It was with reference to this, Master Gotama, that I said: ‘The recluse Gotama is a destroyer of growth.’
“It was with reference to this, Master Gotama, that I said: ‘The recluse Gotama is a destroyer of growth.’
“It was with reference to this, sire, that the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, said: ‘Sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair are born from those who are dear, arise from those who are dear.’
“It was with reference to this, sire, that the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, said: ‘Sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair are born from those who are dear, arise from those who are dear.’”
“It would be good if Master Aggivessana would teach me the Dhamma as he has heard it and mastered it.”
“Just as a palm tree with its top cut off is incapable of growing again, so too, Sunakkhatta, when a person is completely intent on Nibbāna, his fetter of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception has been cut off—cut off at the root, made like a palm stump, done away with so that it is no longer subject to future arising.
“Just as a thick stone that has split in two cannot be joined together again, so too, Sunakkhatta, when a person is intent on the base of nothingness his fetter of the imperturbable has been split.
“Just as a woman—or a man—young, youthful, fond of adornments, with head bathed, having received a garland of lotuses, jasmine, or roses, would take it with both hands and place it on the head, so too there are clansmen who have gone forth out of faith…not drivellers.
“Just as a yellow leaf that has fallen from its stalk is incapable of becoming green again, so too, Sunakkhatta, when a person is intent on the imperturbable he has shed the fetter of worldly material things.
“Just as agriculture, student, is work that involves a great deal of activity…but is of small fruit when it fails, so the work of the household life involves a great deal of activity, great functions, great engagements, and great undertakings, but is of small fruit when it fails.
“Just as black orris root is reckoned as the best of root perfumes and red sandalwood is reckoned as the best of wood perfumes and jasmine is reckoned as the best of flower perfumes, so too, Master Gotama’s advice is supreme among the teachings of today.
“Just as if there were a lake in a mountain recess, clear, limpid, and undisturbed, so that a man with good sight standing on the bank could see shells, gravel, and pebbles, and also shoals of fish swimming about and resting, he might think: ‘There is this lake, clear, limpid, and undisturbed, and there are these shells, gravel, and pebbles, and also these shoals of fish swimming about and resting.’
“Just as in the last month of the hot season, when all the crops have been brought inside the villages, a cowherd would guard his cows while staying at the root of a tree or out in the open, since he needs only to be mindful that the cows are there; so too, there was need for me only to be mindful that those states were there.
“Just as in the last month of the rainy season, in the autumn, when the crops thicken, a cowherd would guard his cows by constantly tapping and poking them on this side and that with a stick to check and curb them.
“Just as that tender calf just born, being urged on by its mother’s lowing, also breasted the stream of the Ganges and got safely across to the further shore, so too, those bhikkhus who are Dhamma-followers and faith-followers—by breasting Māra’s stream they too will get safely across to the further shore.
“Just as the calves and the feeble cattle breasted the stream of the Ganges and got safely across to the further shore, so too, those bhikkhus who, with the destruction of three fetters, are stream-enterers, no longer subject to perdition, bound, headed for enlightenment—by breasting Māra’s stream they too will get safely across to the further shore.
“Just as the heifers and young oxen breasted the stream of the Ganges and got safely across to the further shore, so too, those bhikkhus who, with the destruction of three fetters and with the attenuation of lust, hate, and delusion, are once-returners, returning once to this world to make an end of suffering—by breasting Māra’s stream they too will get safely across to the further shore.
“Just as the river Ganges inclines towards the sea, slopes towards the sea, flows towards the sea, and reaches the sea, so too Master Gotama’s assembly with its homeless ones and its householders inclines towards Nibbāna, slopes towards Nibbāna, flows towards Nibbāna, and reaches Nibbāna.towards
“Just as the strong cattle and the cattle to be tamed breasted the stream of the Ganges and got safely across to the further shore, so too, those bhikkhus who, with the destruction of the five lower fetters, will reappear spontaneously and there attain final Nibbāna without ever returning from that world—by breasting Māra’s stream they will get safely across to the further shore.
“Just as when a woman—or a man—young, youthful, fond of ornaments, on viewing the image of her own face in a clear bright mirror or in a basin of clear water, sees a smudge or a blemish on it, she makes an effort to remove it, but if she sees no smudge or blemish on it, she becomes glad thus: ‘It is a gain for me that it is clean’; so too when a bhikkhu reviews himself thus…then he can abide happy and glad, training day and night in wholesome states.”
“Just as when seeds and plants, whatever their kind, reach growth, increase, and maturation, all do so in dependence upon the earth, based upon the earth; and just as when strenuous works, whatever their kind, are done, all are done in dependence upon the earth, based upon the earth—so too, Master Gotama, a person has material form as self, and based upon material form he produces merit or demerit.
“Just as, Aggivessana, the elephant tamer plants a large post in the earth and binds the forest elephant to it by the neck in order to subdue his forest habits…and to inculcate in him habits congenial to human beings, so these four foundations of mindfulness are the bindings for the mind of the noble disciple in order to subdue his habits based on the household life, to subdue his memories and intentions based on the household life, to subdue his distress, fatigue, and fever based on the household life, and in order that he may attain the true way and realise Nibbāna.
“Just as, in autumn, in the last month of the rainy season, when the sky is clear and cloudless, the sun rises above the earth dispelling all darkness from space with its shining and beaming and radiance, so too, the way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure dispels with its shining and beaming and radiance any other doctrines whatsoever of ordinary recluses and brahmins.”
“Just now, friend, we understood the venerable Sāriputta to have said: ‘Vitality stands in dependence on heat’; and now we understand him to say: ‘Heat stands in dependence on vitality.’
“Jīvaka, any lust, any hate, any delusion whereby cruelty or discontent or aversion might arise have been abandoned by the Tathāgata, cut off at the root, made like a palm stump, done away with so that they are no longer subject to future arising.
“Jīvaka, any lust, any hate, any delusion whereby ill will might arise have been abandoned by the Tathāgata, cut off at the root, made like a palm stump, done away with so that they are no longer subject to future arising.
“Jīvaka, I say that there are three instances in which meat should not be eaten: when it is seen, heard, or suspected.
“Jīvaka, those who speak thus do not say what has been said by me, but misrepresent me with what is untrue and contrary to fact.
“Kaccāna, for you who are of another view, who accept another teaching, who approve of another teaching, who pursue a different training, who follow a different teacher, it is hard to know what sensuality is, or what sensual pleasure is, or what the pleasure at the peak of the sensual is.
“Kaccāna, there are these five cords of sensual pleasure.
“Killing living beings is unwholesome, abstention from killing living beings is wholesome; taking what is not given is unwholesome, abstention from taking what is not given is wholesome; misconduct in sensual pleasures is unwholesome, abstention from misconduct in sensual pleasures is wholesome; false speech is unwholesome, abstention from false speech is wholesome; malicious speech is unwholesome, abstention from malicious speech is wholesome; harsh speech is unwholesome, abstention from harsh speech is wholesome; gossip is unwholesome, abstention from gossip is wholesome; covetousness is unwholesome, uncovetousness is wholesome; ill will is unwholesome, non-ill will is wholesome; wrong view is unwholesome, right view is wholesome.
“King Nimi consented in silence.
“Knowing that covetousness and unrighteous greed is an imperfection that defiles the mind, a bhikkhu abandons it.
“Kosiya, how did the Blessed One state to you in brief deliverance in the destruction of craving?
“Lady, are the three aggregates included by the Noble Eightfold Path, or is the Noble Eightfold Path included by the three aggregates?” 
“Lady, does the underlying tendency to lust have to be abandoned in regard to all pleasant feeling?
“Lady, does the underlying tendency to lust underlie all pleasant feeling?
“Lady, how does emergence from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling come to be?”
“Lady, how does identity view come to be?”
“Lady, how does identity view not come to be?”
“Lady, how does the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling come to be?”
“Lady, how many formations are there?”
“Lady, how many kinds of feeling are there?”
“Lady, is that clinging the same as these five aggregates affected by clinging, or is the clinging something apart from the five aggregates affected by clinging?”
“Lady, is the Noble Eightfold Path conditioned or unconditioned?”
“Lady, what is concentration?
“Lady, what is pleasant and what is painful in regard to pleasant feeling?
“Lady, what is the counterpart of Nibbāna?”
“Lady, what is the counterpart of pleasant feeling?” 
“Lady, what is the Noble Eightfold Path?”
“Lady, what should be abandoned in regard to pleasant feeling?
“Lady, what underlying tendency underlies pleasant feeling?
“Lady, when a bhikkhu has emerged from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling, how many kinds of contact touch him?”
“Lady, when a bhikkhu has emerged from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling, to what does his mind incline, to what does it lean, to what does it tend?”
“Lady, when a bhikkhu is attaining the cessation of perception and feeling, which states cease first in him: the bodily formation, the verbal formation, or the mental formation?”
“Lady, when a bhikkhu is emerging from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling, which states arise first in him: the bodily formation, the verbal formation, or the mental formation?”
“Lady, ‘cessation of identity, cessation of identity’ is said.
“Lady, ‘identity, identity’ is said.
“Lady, ‘origin of identity, origin of identity’ is said.
“Lady, ‘the way leading to the cessation of identity, the way leading to the cessation of identity’ is said.
“Later, while still young, a black-haired young man endowed with the blessing of youth, in the prime of life……And I sat down there thinking: ‘This will serve for striving.’
“Let alone half a month, bhikkhus.
“Let alone one day and night, prince.
“Let alone one year, bhikkhus.
“Let alone seven years, bhikkhus.
“Let alone seven years, prince.
“Let Master Aggivessana teach me the Dhamma as he has heard it and mastered it.
“Let Master Aggivessana teach me the Dhamma as he has heard it and mastered it.
“Let Master Bhāradvāja be at ease.
“Let not a person revive the past
“Let not a person revive the past
“Let not a person revive the past…
“Let not a person revive the past…
“Let not a person revive the past…
“Let the Blessed One together with the Sangha of bhikkhus consent to accept tomorrow’s meal from me.”
“Let the noble lord Gagga Mantāṇiputta rest content.
“Let the venerable Channa not use the knife.
“Lust is a maker of signs, hate is a maker of signs, delusion is a maker of signs.
“Lust is a something, hate is a something, delusion is a something.
“Magnificent, Master Gotama!
“Magnificent, Master Gotama!
“Magnificent, Master Gotama!
“Magnificent, Master Gotama!
“Magnificent, Master Gotama!
“Mahā Kaccāna is wise, bhikkhus, Mahā Kaccāna has great wisdom.
“Mahā Kaccāna is wise, bhikkhus, Mahā Kaccāna has great wisdom.
“Mahānāma, here a noble disciple is possessed of virtue, guards the doors of his sense faculties, is moderate in eating, and devoted to wakefulness; he possesses seven good qualities; and he is one who obtains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhānas that constitute the higher mind and provide a pleasant abiding here and now.
“Mahā Kaccāna is wise, bhikkhus, Mahā Kaccāna has great wisdom.
“Mahānāma, there is still a state unabandoned by you internally, owing to which at times states of greed, hate, and delusion invade your mind and remain; for were that state already abandoned by you internally you would not be living the home life, you would not be enjoying sensual pleasures.
“Master Assaji, how does the recluse Gotama discipline his disciples?
“Master Bhāradvāja praises the recluse Gotama with high praise indeed.”
“Master Bhāradvāja, even if we saw that Master Gotama face to face, we would tell him to his face: ‘The recluse Gotama is a destroyer of growth.’
“Master Gotama, a head-anointed noble king—for example, King Pasenadi of Kosala or King Ajātasattu Vedehiputta of Magadha—would exercise the power in his own realm to execute those who should be executed, to fine those who should be fined, and to banish those who should be banished.
“Master Gotama, brahmins do not give gifts in such a way, thinking: ‘Let the others become angry and displeased because of this.’
“Master Gotama, I have given all my wealth, grain, silver, and gold to my children as their inheritance.
“Master Gotama, I have heard that the recluse Gotama teaches the path to the company of Brahmā.
“Master Gotama, if only Master Gotama were accomplished in this Dhamma, but no bhikkhus were accomplished, then this holy life would be deficient in that respect; but because Master Gotama and bhikkhus are accomplished in this Dhamma, this holy life is thus complete in that respect.
“Master Gotama, in this Palace of Migāra’s Mother there can be seen gradual training, gradual practice, and gradual progress, that is, down to the last step of the staircase.
“Master Gotama, in what way is a bhikkhu an arahant with taints destroyed, one who has lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached his own goal, destroyed the fetters of being, and is completely liberated through final knowledge?”
“Master Gotama, is there any householder who, without abandoning the fetter of householdership, on the dissolution of the body has gone to heaven?”
“Master Gotama, is there any Ājīvaka who, on the dissolution of the body, has gone to heaven?”
“Master Gotama, is there any Ājīvaka who, on the dissolution of the body, has made an end of suffering?” “Vaccha, there is no Ājīvaka who, on the dissolution of the body, has made an end of suffering.”
“Master Gotama, since Nibbāna exists and the path leading to Nibbāna exists and Master Gotama is present as the guide, what is the cause and reason why, when Master Gotama’s disciples are thus advised and instructed by him, some of them attain Nibbāna, the ultimate goal, and some do not attain it?”
“Master Gotama, that fire is now painful to touch, hot, and scorching, and previously too that fire was painful to touch, hot, and scorching.
“Master Gotama, that splendour is the perfect splendour that is unsurpassed by any other splendour higher or more sublime.”
“Master Gotama, that splendour is the perfect splendour which is unsurpassed by any other splendour higher or more sublime.”
“Master Gotama, the brahmin Pokkharasāti does not even understand the mind of his slavewoman Pụ̣ik̄, having encompassed it with his own mind, so how could he understand thus the minds of all recluses and brahmins?”
“Master Gotama, the brahmins prescribe five things for the performance of merit, for accomplishing the wholesome.”
“Master Gotama, the brahmins prescribe four levels of service.
“Master Gotama, the brahmins say this: ‘Since the work of the household life involves a great deal of activity, great functions, great engagements, and great undertakings, it is of great fruit.
“Master Gotama, the brahmins say this: ‘The householder is accomplishing the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.
“Master Gotama, the Bāhukā River is held by many to give liberation, it is held by many to give merit, and many wash away their evil actions in the Bāhukā River.”
“Master Gotama, there are some recluses and brahmins who abide pursuing development of body, but not development of mind.
“Master Gotama, there are some recluses and brahmins who claim the fundamentals of the holy life after having reached the consummation and perfection of direct knowledge here and now.
“Master Gotama, there are these recluses and brahmins, each the head of an order, the head of a group, the teacher of a group, a well-known and famous founder of a sect regarded by many as a saint—that is, Pūraṇa Kassapa, Makkhali Gosāla, Ajita Kesakambalin, Pakudha Kaccāyana, Sañjaya Belaṭṭhiputta, and the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta.
“Master Gotama, truth is the first thing that the brahmins prescribe for the performance of merit, for accomplishing the wholesome.
“Master Gotama, what is the cause and condition why human beings are seen to be inferior and superior?
“Master Kaccāna, the brahmins say thus: ‘Brahmins are the highest caste, those of any other caste are inferior; brahmins are the fairest caste, those of any other caste are dark; only brahmins are purified, not non-brahmins; brahmins alone are the sons of Brahmā, the offspring of Brahmā, born of his mouth, born of Brahmā, created by Brahmā, heirs of Brahmā.’
“Master Māgandiya, there is the recluse Gotama, the son of the Sakyans, who went forth from a Sakyan clan.
“Master Raṭṭhapāla said: ‘ any world is unstable, it is swept away.’
“Master Raṭṭhapāla, there are four kinds of loss.
“Master Raṭṭhapāla, there exist in this court abundant gold coins and bullion stored away in vaults and lofts.
“Master Raṭṭhapāla, there exist in this court elephant troops and cavalry and chariot troops and infantry, which will serve to subdue any threats to us.
“Master Raṭṭhapāla, these are the four kinds of loss.
“Master Sāriputta, I am not getting well, I am not comfortable.
“Master Sāriputta, the one who for the sake of his parents behaves contrary to the Dhamma, behaves unrighteously, is not the better; the one who for the sake of his parents behaves according to the Dhamma, behaves righteously, is the better.
“Master Sāriputta, the one who for the sake of refreshing and nourishing this body behaves contrary to the Dhamma, behaves unrighteously, is not the better; the one who for the sake of refreshing and nourishing this body behaves according to the Dhamma, behaves righteously, is the better.
“Master Udena, if I think any statement of Master Udena’s is to be agreed with, I shall agree with it; if I think any statement of his is to be argued against, I shall argue against it; and if I do not understand the meaning of any statement of Master Udena’s, then I shall ask Master Udena to clarify it thus: ‘How is this Master Udena?
“Master Vacchāyana praises the recluse Gotama with high praise indeed.”
“Master Ānanda, is there any single bhikkhu who possesses in each and every way all those qualities that were possessed by Master Gotama, accomplished and fully enlightened?”
“Master Ānanda, let be the discussion for which we are now sitting together here.
“Material form, Rāhula, and feeling, perception, formations, and consciousness.”
“May the sisters Somā and Sakulā be happy, great king.”
“Māgandiya, formerly when I lived the home life, I enjoyed myself, provided and endowed with the five cords of sensual pleasure: with forms cognizable by the eye…with sounds cognizable by the ear…with odours cognizable by the nose…with flavours cognizable by the tongue…with tangibles cognizable by the body that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and likeable, connected with sensual desire and provocative of lust.
“Māgandiya, one who formerly belonged to another sect and desires the going forth and the full admission in this Dhamma and Discipline lives on probation for four months.
“Māgandiya, suppose there was a man born blind who could not see dark and light forms, who could not see blue, yellow, red, or pink forms, who could not see what was even and uneven, who could not see the stars or the sun and moon.
“Māgandiya, suppose there was a man born blind who could not see dark and light forms…or the sun and moon.
“Māgandiya, suppose there was a man born blind who could not see dark and light forms…or the sun and moon.
“Māgandiya, the eye delights in forms, takes delight in forms, rejoices in forms; that has been tamed by the Tathāgata, guarded, protected, and restrained, and he teaches the Dhamma for its restraint.
“Mālunkyāputta, if there is the view ‘the world is eternal,’ the holy life cannot be lived; and if there is the view ‘the world is not eternal,’ the holy life cannot be lived.
“Mālunkyāputta, to whom do you remember my having taught these five lower fetters in that way?
“Mātali brought King Nimi to the Sudhamma Assembly.
“Memorising the teachings is most helpful for examining the meaning, Bhāradvāja.
“Mentality-materiality has consciousness as condition, venerable sir.
“Misguided man, to whom have you ever known me to teach the Dhamma in that way?
“Misguided man, to whom have you ever known me to teach the Dhamma in that way?
“Moreover, an untrue man who gains robes, almsfood, resting places, and requisites of medicine considers thus: ‘I gain robes, almsfood, resting places, and requisites of medicine; but these other bhikkhus do not gain these things.’
“Moreover, an untrue man who is well known and famous considers thus: ‘I am well known and famous; but these other bhikkhus are unknown and of no account.’
“Moreover, by completely surmounting the base of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing,’ an untrue man enters upon and abides in the base of nothingness…
“Moreover, by completely surmounting the base of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite,’ an untrue man enters upon and abides in the base of infinite consciousness……
“Moreover, by completely surmounting the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, a true man enters upon and abides in the cessation of perception and feeling.
“Moreover, by completely surmounting the base of nothingness, an untrue man enters upon and abides in the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
“Moreover, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, an untrue man enters upon and abides in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“Moreover, with the complete surmounting of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of sensory impact, with non-attention to perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite,’ an untrue man enters upon and abides in the base of infinite space…
“My dear sir, you do not know the virtue and wisdom of the Blessed One.
“My dear Uttara, the thirty-two marks of a Great Man have been handed down in our hymns, and the Great Man who is endowed with them has only two possible destinies, no other.
“My father is a Gagga, great king; my mother is a Mantāṇi.”
“My name is Puṇṇa, friend, and my companions in the holy life know me as Mantāṇiputta.”
“My name is Upatissa, friend, and my companions in the holy life know me as Sāriputta.ʺ
“Nevertheless, Master Gotama, I have given up all my works and cut off all my affairs.”
“Next the wardens of hell ask him: ‘Good man, what do you want?’
“Next the wardens of hell harness him to a chariot and drive him back and forth across ground that is burning, blazing, and glowing.
“Next the wardens of hell harness him to a chariot and drive him back and forth across ground that is burning, blazing, and glowing.
“Next the wardens of hell make him climb up and down a great mound of coals that are burning, blazing, and glowing.
“Next the wardens of hell make him climb up and down a great mound of coals that are burning, blazing, and glowing.
“Next the wardens of hell pull him out with a hook, and setting him on the ground, they ask him: ‘Good man, what do you want?’
“Next the wardens of hell set him with his feet up and his head down and pare him with adzes.
“Next the wardens of hell set him with his feet up and his head down and pare him with adzes.
“Next the wardens of hell take him feet up and head down and plunge him into a red-hot metal cauldron that is burning, blazing, and glowing.
“Next the wardens of hell take him feet up and head down and plunge him into a red-hot metal cauldron that is burning, blazing, and glowing.
“Next the wardens of hell throw him down and pare him with axes.
“Next the wardens of hell throw him down and pare him with axes.
“Next the wardens of hell throw him into the Great Hell.
“Next the wardens of hell throw him into the Great Hell.
“Nibbāna is the counterpart of deliverance.”
“Nimi was the last of those kings.
“No matter what the recluse Gotama says, Mallikā applauds it thus: ‘If that has been said by the Blessed One, sire, then it is so.’
“No, friend, I have never seen that Blessed One before, nor would I recognise him if I saw him.”
“No, Master Gotama, sometimes they consume excellent hard food, eat excellent soft food, taste excellent delicacies, drink excellent drinks.
“No, Master Gotama.
“No, Master Gotama.
“No, Master Gotama.
“No, Master Gotama.
“No, Master Gotama.
“No, Master Gotama.
“No, Master Gotama.
“No, Master Gotama.
“No, Master Gotama.
“No, Master Gotama.
“No, Master Gotama.
“No, Master Gotama.
“No, Master Gotama.
“No, Master Raṭṭhapāla.
“No, Master Sāriputta.
“No, Master Sāriputta.
“No, venerable sir, I do not see even two bhikkhus who make differing assertions about these things.
“No, venerable sir, I have not been permitted by my parents.”
“No, venerable sir, there is no teacher agreeable to us in whom we have acquired faith supported by reasons.”
“No, venerable sir, we do not think of the Blessed One in that way.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“Not long, friend: three years.”
“Not three kinds of feeling have been stated by the Blessed One, venerable Udāyin; two kinds of feeling have been stated by the Blessed One: pleasant feeling and painful feeling.
“Now at the end of many years, many hundred years, many thousand years, King Makhādeva addressed his barber thus: ‘Good barber, when you see any grey hairs growing on my head, then tell me.’—‘Yes, sire,’ he replied.
“Now I am living in the Bamboo Grove, brahmin.”
“Now if others should ask that bhikkhu thus: ‘What are the venerable one’s reasons and what is his evidence whereby he says, “The Blessed One is fully enlightened, the Dhamma is well proclaimed by the Blessed One, the Sangha is practising the good way”?’—answering rightly, that bhikkhu would answer thus: ‘Here, friends, I approached the Blessed One in order to hear the Dhamma.
“Now if you should think thus: ‘These venerable ones agree about both the meaning and the phrasing,’ then whichever bhikkhu you think is the more reasonable should be approached and addressed thus: ‘The venerable ones agree about both the meaning and the phrasing.
“Now if you should think thus: ‘These venerable ones differ about both the meaning and the phrasing,’ then whichever bhikkhu you think is the more reasonable should be approached and addressed thus: ‘The venerable ones differ about both the meaning and the phrasing.
“Now if you should think thus: ‘These venerable ones differ about the meaning but agree about the phrasing,’ then whichever bhikkhu you think is the more reasonable should be approached and addressed thus: ‘The venerable ones differ about the meaning but agree about the phrasing.
“Now if you think thus: ‘These venerable ones agree about the meaning but differ about the phrasing,’ then whichever bhikkhu you think is the more reasonable should be approached and addressed thus: ‘The venerable ones agree about the meaning but differ about the phrasing.
“Now is the time, Blessed One, now is the time, Sublime One, for the Blessed One to teach the supreme development of the faculties in the Noble One’s Discipline.
“Now King Kikī of Kāsi heard: ‘It seems that the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, has reached Benares and is living in the Deer Park at Isipatana.’
“Now King Nimi had a son named Kaḷārajanaka.
“Now Master Raṭṭhapāla said: ‘ any world is incomplete, insatiate, the slave of craving.’
“Now on that occasion the Blessed One Kakusandha, accomplished and fully enlightened, had appeared in the world.
“Now on that occasion, it being the Uposatha day of the fifteenth, King Nimi had washed his head and ascended to the upper palace chamber, where he was seated for the Uposatha observance.
“Now recluses and brahmins of the first kind ate food unwarily by going right in amongst the bait and the material things of the world that Māra had laid down; by so doing they became intoxicated; when they were intoxicated, they fell into negligence; when they were negligent, Māra did with them as he liked on account of that bait and those material things of the world.
“Now recluses and brahmins of the fourth kind reckoned thus: ‘Those recluses and brahmins of the first kind, by acting as they did without precaution, failed to get free from Māra’s power and control.
“Now recluses and brahmins of the second kind reckoned thus: ‘Those recluses and brahmins of the first kind, by acting as they did without precaution, failed to get free from Māra’s power and control.
“Now recluses and brahmins of the third kind reckoned thus: ‘Those recluses and brahmins of the first kind, by acting as they did without precaution, failed to get free from Māra’s power and control.
“Now that I have given you this brief advice, Puṇṇa, in which country will you dwell?”
“Now that stanza was well sung by the Brahmā Sanankumāra, not ill sung; it was well spoken, not ill spoken; it has a meaning, and is not meaningless; and it was approved by the Blessed One.” 
“Now the deer of a fourth herd reckoned thus: ‘The deer of that first herd, by acting as they did without precaution, failed to get free from the deer-trapper’s power and control.
“Now the deer of a second herd reckoned thus: ‘The deer of that first herd, by acting as they did without precaution, failed to get free from the deer-trapper’s power and control.
“Now the deer of a third herd reckoned thus: ‘The deer of that first herd, by acting as they did without precaution, failed to get free from the deer-trapper’s power and control.
“Now the deer of the first herd ate food unwarily by going right in amongst the bait that the deer-trapper had laid down; by so doing they became intoxicated; when they were intoxicated, they fell into negligence; when they were negligent, the deer-trapper did with them as he liked on account of that bait.
“Now the flames that surge out from the Great Hell’s eastern wall dash against its western wall.
“Now the wardens of hell seize such a being by the arms and present him to King Yama, saying: ‘Sire, this man has ill-treated his mother, ill-treated his father, ill-treated recluses, ill-treated brahmins; he has had no respect for the elders of his clan.
“Now the wardens of hell torture him with the fivefold transfixing.
“Now the wardens of hell torture him with the fivefold transfixing.
“Now there are some recluses and brahmins whose doctrine is directly opposed to that of those recluses and brahmins, and they say thus: ‘There definitely are immaterial realms.’
“Now there are some recluses and brahmins whose doctrine is directly opposed to that of those recluses and brahmins, and they say thus: ‘There definitely is a cessation of being.’
“Now there are some recluses and brahmins whose doctrine is directly opposed to that of those recluses and brahmins, and they say thus: ‘There is a cause and condition for the defilement of beings; beings are defiled owing to a cause and condition.
“Now there are some recluses and brahmins whose doctrine is directly opposed to that of those recluses and brahmins, and they say thus: ‘There is what is given and what is offered and what is sacrificed; there is fruit and result of good and bad actions; there is this world and the other world; there is mother and father; there are beings who are reborn spontaneously; there are good and virtuous recluses and brahmins in the world who have themselves realised by direct knowledge and declare this world and the other world.’
“Now there are some recluses and brahmins whose doctrine is directly opposed to that of those recluses and brahmins, and they say thus: ‘When one acts or makes others act, when one mutilates or makes others mutilate…utters falsehood—evil is done by the doer.
“Now there are these five cords of sensual pleasure, student.
“Now there are these five hindrances, student.
“Now there comes a time when the external air element is disturbed.
“Now there comes a time when the external fire element is disturbed.
“Now there comes a time when the external water element is disturbed.
“Now there comes a time when the water element is disturbed and then the external earth element vanishes.
“Now these four kinds of clinging have what as their source, what as their origin, from what are they born and produced?
“Now these three similes occurred to me spontaneously, never heard before.
“Now when deities saw me, some said: ‘The recluse Gotama is dead.’
“Now when I had eaten solid food and regained my strength, then quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, I entered upon and abided in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“Now when people saw me, some said: ‘The recluse Gotama is black.’
“Now when the wheel-treasure has triumphed over the earth to the ocean’s edge, it returns to the royal capital and remains as if fixed on its axle at the gate of the Wheel-turning Monarch’s inner palace, as an adornment to the gate of his inner palace.
“Now, Aggivessana, a wise man among those recluses and brahmins who hold the doctrine and view ‘Everything is acceptable to me’ considers thus: ‘If I obstinately adhere to my view “Everything is acceptable to me” and declare: “Only this is true, anything else is wrong,” then I may clash with the two others: with a recluse or brahmin who holds the doctrine and view “Nothing is acceptable to me” and with a recluse or brahmin who holds the doctrine and view “Something is acceptable to me, something is not acceptable to me.”
“Now, Aggivessana, this body made of material form, consisting of the four great elements, procreated by a mother and father, and built up out of boiled rice and porridge, is subject to impermanence, to being worn and rubbed away, to dissolution and disintegration.
“Now, Assalāyana, even those seven brahmin seers, on being pressed and questioned and cross-questioned by the seer Devala the Dark on their own assertion about birth, were unable to support it.
“Now, Assalāyana, the brahmin women are seen having their periods, becoming pregnant, giving birth, and giving suck.
“Now, bhikkhus, if others should ask that bhikkhu thus: ‘What are the venerable one’s reasons and what is his evidence whereby he says: “That venerable one is restrained without fear, not restrained by fear, and he avoids indulging in sensual pleasures because he is without lust through the destruction of lust”?’—answering rightly, that bhikkhu would answer thus: ‘Whether that venerable one dwells in the Sangha or alone, while some there are well behaved and some are ill behaved and some there teach a group, while some here are seen concerned about material things and some are unsullied by material things, still that venerable one does not despise anyone because of that.
“Now, bhikkhus, one who is ignorant, not knowing the way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure, does not understand it as it actually is thus: ‘This way of undertaking things is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure.’
“Now, bhikkhus, one who is ignorant, not knowing this way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pain, does not understand it as it actually is thus: ‘This way of undertaking things is painful now and ripens in the future as pain.’
“Now, bhikkhus, one who is ignorant, not knowing this way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pleasure, does not understand it as it actually is thus: ‘This way of undertaking things is painful now and ripens in the future as pleasure.’
“Now, bhikkhus, one who is ignorant, not knowing this way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pain, does not understand it as it actually is thus: ‘This way of undertaking things is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pain.’
“Now, bhikkhus, one who is wise, knowing this way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pain, understands it as it actually is thus: ‘This way of undertaking things is painful now and ripens in the future as pain.’
“Now, bhikkhus, one who is wise, knowing this way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pleasure, understands it as it actually is thus: ‘This way of undertaking things is painful now and ripens in the future as pleasure.’
“Now, bhikkhus, one who is wise, knowing this way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pain, understands it as it actually is thus: ‘This way of undertaking things is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pain.’
“Now, bhikkhus, one who is wise, knowing this way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure, understands it as it actually is thus: ‘This way of undertaking things is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure.’
“Now, bhikkhus, suppose that I had eaten, refused more food, had my fill, finished, had enough, had what I needed, and some almsfood was left over to be thrown away.
“Now, bhikkhus, these four kinds of nutriment have what as their source, what as their origin, from what are they born and produced?
“Now, bhikkhus, this is the way leading to the cessation of identity.
“Now, bhikkhus, this is the way leading to the origination of identity.
“Now, bhikkhus, you should not hurry to reprove him; rather, the person should be examined thus: ‘I shall not be troubled and the other person will not be hurt; for the other person is not given to anger and resentment, he is not firmly attached to his view and he relinquishes easily, and I can make that person emerge from the unwholesome and establish him in the wholesome.’
“Now, brahmin, it might be that you think: ‘Perhaps the recluse Gotama is not free from lust, hate, and delusion even today, which is why he still resorts to remote jungle-thicket resting places in the forest.’
“Now, carpenter, when a man possesses what ten qualities do I describe him as accomplished in what is wholesome, perfected in what is wholesome, an ascetic invincible attained to the supreme attainment?
“Now, Cunda, here effacement should be practised by you: The forty-four “modes of effacement” to be expounded fall, by and large, into several fixed sets of doctrinal categories as follows.
“Now, Evil One, there are three names for the Great Hell: the hell of the six bases for contact, the hell of the impalement with stakes, and the hell to be felt for oneself.
“Now, Evil One, when the night had ended, the venerable Sañjīva emerged from the attainment.
“Now, friends, a bhikkhu ought to infer about himself in the following way: 
“Now, friends, a bhikkhu should review himself thus:
“Now, householders, of those recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘There is a cause and condition for the defilement of beings…they experience pleasure and pain in the six classes,’ it is to be expected that they will avoid these three unwholesome states, namely, bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, and mental misconduct, and that they will undertake and practise these three wholesome states, namely, good bodily conduct, good verbal conduct, and good mental conduct.
“Now, householders, of those recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘There is no cause or condition for the defilement of beings…they experience pleasure and pain in the six classes,’ it is to be expected that they will avoid these three wholesome states, namely, good bodily conduct, good verbal conduct, and good mental conduct, and that they will undertake and practise these three unwholesome states, namely, bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, and mental misconduct.
“Now, householders, of those recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘There is nothing given…no good and virtuous recluses and brahmins in the world who have themselves realised by direct knowledge and declare this world and the other world,’ it is to be expected that they will avoid these three wholesome states, namely, good bodily conduct, good verbal conduct, and good mental conduct, and that they will undertake and practise these three unwholesome states, namely, bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, and mental misconduct.
“Now, householders, of those recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘There is what is given…there are good and virtuous recluses and brahmins in the world who have themselves realised by direct knowledge and declare this world and the other world,’ it is to be expected that they will avoid these three unwholesome states, namely, bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, and mental misconduct, and that they will undertake and practise these three wholesome states, namely, good bodily conduct, good verbal conduct, and good mental conduct.
“Now, householders, of those recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘When one acts or makes others act…there is merit and outcome of merit,’ it is to be expected that they will avoid these three unwholesome states, namely, bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, and mental misconduct, and that they will undertake and practise these three wholesome states, namely, good bodily conduct, good verbal conduct, and good mental conduct.
“Now, householders, of those recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘When one acts or makes others act…there is no merit and no outcome of merit,’ it is to be expected that they will avoid these three wholesome states, namely, good bodily conduct, good verbal conduct and good mental conduct, and that they will undertake and practise these three unwholesome states, namely, bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, and mental misconduct.
“Now, if others attack that bhikkhu in ways that are unwished for, undesired, and disagreeable, by contact with fists, clods, sticks, or knives, he understands thus: ‘This body is of such a nature that contact with fists, clods, sticks, and knives assail it.
“Now, Kaccāna, the pleasure and joy that arise dependent on these five cords of sensual pleasure are called sensual pleasure.
“Now, Mahānāma, on one occasion I was living at Rājagaha on the mountain Vulture Peak.
“Now, Master Udena, the king of Anga gives me a daily donation.
“Now, Udāyin, the pleasure and joy that arise dependent on these five cords of sensual pleasure are called sensual pleasure—a filthy pleasure, a coarse pleasure, an ignoble pleasure.
“Now, venerable sir, I often abide in voidness.” 
“Now, venerable Ānanda, does the Blessed One praise only the abandoning of all unwholesome states?” “The Tathāgata, great king, has abandoned all unwholesome states and he possesses wholesome states.” 
“Now, venerable Ānanda, does the Blessed One praise only the undertaking of all wholesome states?”
“Now, venerable Ānanda, what kind of bodily behaviour brings affliction?”
“Now, venerable Ānanda, what kind of bodily behaviour does not bring affliction?”
“Now, venerable Ānanda, what kind of bodily behaviour has painful results?”
“Now, venerable Ānanda, what kind of bodily behaviour has pleasant results?”
“Now, venerable Ānanda, what kind of bodily behaviour is blameless?”
“Now, venerable Ānanda, what kind of bodily behaviour is blameworthy?”
“Now, venerable Ānanda, what kind of bodily behaviour is censured by wise recluses and brahmins?”
“Now, venerable Ānanda, what kind of bodily behaviour is uncensured by wise recluses and brahmins?”
“Now, venerable Ānanda, what kind of bodily behaviour is unwholesome?”
“Now, venerable Ānanda, what kind of bodily behaviour is wholesome?”
“Now, venerable Ānanda, what kind of mental behaviour is censured by wise recluses and brahmins?”
“Now, venerable Ānanda, what kind of mental behaviour is uncensured by wise recluses and brahmins?” “Any mental behaviour that is wholesome...
“Now, venerable Ānanda, what kind of verbal behaviour is censured by wise recluses and brahmins?” “Any verbal behaviour that is unwholesome...…”
“Now, venerable Ānanda, what kind of verbal behaviour is uncensured by wise recluses and brahmins?”
“Now, Ānanda, how is there the supreme development of the faculties in the Noble One’s Discipline?
“Now, Ānanda, it may be that you think thus: ‘Certainly, on that occasion someone else was King Makhādeva, who instituted that good practice.’
“Now, Ānanda, you may think thus: ‘Certainly, someone else was the brahmin student Jotipāla on that occasion.’
“O perfect in body, well favoured, Well fashioned and lovely to behold;
“O sirs, hear this, hear what he says, The man of vision, the physician, The mighty hero who roars
“Of these six principles of cordiality, the chief, the most cohesive, the most unifying is this view that is noble and emancipating, and which leads the one who practises in accordance with it to the complete destruction of suffering.
“Of these three kinds of action, friend Gotama, thus analysed and distinguished, which kind of action do you describe as the most reprehensible for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action: bodily action or verbal action or mental action?”
“Of these three kinds of action, Tapassī, thus analysed and distinguished, I describe mental action as the most reprehensible for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action, and not so much bodily action and verbal action.” 
“Of these three kinds of rod, friend Gotama, thus analysed and distinguished, the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta describes the bodily rod as the most reprehensible for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action, and not so much the verbal rod and the mental rod.”
“Of these three kinds of rod, Tapassī, thus analysed and distinguished, which kind of rod does the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta describe as the most reprehensible for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action: the bodily rod or the verbal rod or the mental rod?”
“Of those five things, Master Gotama, that the brahmins prescribe for the performance of merit, for accomplishing the wholesome, they prescribe generosity as the most fruitful for the performance of merit, for accomplishing the wholesome.”
“Of those five things, student, that the brahmins prescribe for the performance of merit, for accomplishing the wholesome, which of the five do they prescribe as the most fruitful for the performance of merit, for accomplishing the wholesome?”
“Oh blessed is this Jeta’s Grove, Dwelt in by the sagely Sangha, Wherein resides the King of Dhamma, The fount of all my happiness.
“Oh, at long last this recluse, a venerated sage, Has come to this great forest for my sake.
“On a later occasion, having understood as they actually are the origin, the disappearance, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of sensual pleasures, I abandoned craving for sensual pleasures, I removed fever for sensual pleasures, and I abide without thirst, with a mind inwardly at peace.
“On hearing a sound with the ear…On smelling an odour with the nose…On tasting a flavour with the tongue…On touching a tangible with the body…On cognizing a mind-object with the mind, equanimity arises in a foolish infatuated ordinary person, in an untaught ordinary person who has not conquered his limitations or conquered the results and who is blind to danger.
“On hearing a sound with the ear…On smelling an odour with the nose…On tasting a flavour with the tongue…On touching a tangible with the body…On cognizing a mind-object with the mind, he does not lust after it if it is pleasing; he does not dislike it if it is unpleasing…With the cessation of his delight comes cessation of clinging; with the cessation of clinging, cessation of being; with the cessation of being, cessation of birth; with the cessation of birth, ageing and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair cease.
“On hearing a sound with the ear…On smelling an odour with the nose…On tasting a flavour with the tongue…On touching a tangible with the body…On cognizing a mind-object with the mind, he lusts after it if it is pleasing; he dislikes it if it is unpleasing…Now delight in feelings is clinging.
“On returning from his almsround, after his meal he sits down, folding his legs crosswise, setting his body erect and establishing mindfulness before him.
“On returning from his almsround, after his meal he sits down, folding his legs crosswise, setting his body erect, and establishing mindfulness before him.
“On returning from his almsround, after his meal he sits down, folding his legs crosswise, setting his body erect, and establishing mindfulness before him.
“On seeing a form with the eye, he does not grasp at its signs and features.
“On seeing a form with the eye, he does not grasp at its signs and features.
“On seeing a form with the eye, he does not lust after it if it is pleasing; he does not dislike it if it is unpleasing.
“On seeing a form with the eye, he lusts after it if it is pleasing; he dislikes it if it is unpleasing.
“On seeing a form with the eye, one explores a form productive of joy, one explores a form productive of grief, one explores a form productive of equanimity.
“On such occasions, brahmins would feed first the one who was neither studious nor acute, but virtuous and of good character, Master Gotama; for how could what is given to one who is immoral and of bad character bring great fruit?”
“On such occasions, brahmins would feed first the one who was studious and acute, Master Gotama; for how could what is given to one who is neither studious nor acute bring great fruit?”
“Once, Assalāyana, when seven brahmin seers were consulting together in leaf huts in the forest, this pernicious view arose in them: ‘Brahmins are the highest caste……heirs of Brahmā.’
“Once, Ānanda, in this place there was a prosperous and busy market town called Vebhalinga, with many inhabitants and crowded with people.
“Once, Ānanda, in this place there was a prosperous and busy market town called Vebhalinga, with many inhabitants and crowded with people.
“Once, Ānanda, in this same Mithilā there was a king named Makhādeva.
“Once, Ānanda, when the gods of the Thirty-three had met together and were seated in the Sudhamma Assembly, this discussion arose among them: ‘It is a gain, sirs, for the people of Videha, it is a great gain for the people of Videha that their King Nimi is a righteous king who rules by the Dhamma, a great king who is established in the Dhamma.
“One bears cold and heat, hunger and thirst, and contact with gadflies, mosquitoes, wind, the sun, and creeping things; one endures ill-spoken, unwelcome words and arisen bodily feelings that are painful, racking, sharp, piercing, disagreeable, distressing, and menacing to life.
“One becomes a conqueror of discontent and delight, and discontent does not conquer oneself; one abides overcoming discontent whenever it arises.
“One becomes a conqueror of fear and dread, and fear and dread do not conquer oneself; one abides overcoming fear and dread whenever they arise.
“One bhikkhu here, Ānanda, might attain Nibbāna, another bhikkhu here might not attain Nibbāna.”
“One day the potter Ghaṭīkāra addressed the brahmin student Jotipāla thus: ‘My dear Jotipāla, let us go and see the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“One does not set one’s heart on obtaining what has not yet been obtained, thinking, ‘May my ear be thus in the future and sounds be thus!…May my nose and odours…May my tongue and flavours…May my body and tangibles…May my mind be thus in the future and mind-objects be thus!’ Because one does not set one’s heart thus, one does not delight in that.
“One makes an effort to abandon wrong action and to enter upon right action: this is one’s right effort.
“One makes an effort to abandon wrong intention and to enter upon right intention: this is one’s right effort.
“One makes an effort to abandon wrong livelihood and to enter upon right livelihood: this is one’s right effort.
“One makes an effort to abandon wrong speech and to enter upon right speech: this is one’s right effort.
“One makes an effort to abandon wrong view and to enter upon right view: this is one’s right effort.
“One obtains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhānas that constitute the higher mind and provide a pleasant abiding here and now.
“One recollects one’s manifold past lives, that is, one birth, two births......Thus with their aspects and particulars one recollects one’s manifold past lives.
“One regards the ear thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self.’…One regards the nose thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self.’…One regards the tongue thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self.’…One regards the body thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self.’…One regards the mind thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self.’
“One regards the ear thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’…One regards the nose thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’…One regards the tongue thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’…One regards the body thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’…One regards the mind thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“One sets one’s heart on obtaining what has not yet been obtained, thinking, ‘May my ear be thus in the future and sounds be thus!…May my nose and odours…May my tongue and flavours…May my body and tangibles…May my mind be thus in the future and mind-objects be thus!’ Because one sets one’s heart thus, one delights in that.
“One should not pursue sensual pleasure, which is low, vulgar, coarse, ignoble, and unbeneficial; and one should not pursue self-mortification, which is painful, ignoble, and unbeneficial.
“One understands the minds of other beings, of other persons, having encompassed them with one’s own mind.
“One wields the various kinds of supernormal power…...one wields bodily mastery even as far as the Brahma-world.
“One’s consciousness becomes bound up with desire and lust there thinking, ‘My ear was thus in the past and sounds were thus…My nose and odours…My tongue and flavours…My body and tangibles…My mind was thus in the past and mind-objects were thus.’
“One’s consciousness does not become bound up with desire and lust there thinking, ‘My ear was thus in the past and sounds were thus…My nose and odours…My tongue and flavours…My body and tangibles…My mind was thus in the past and mind-objects were thus.’
“Only material form, Blessed One?
“Our lord’s son Raṭṭhapāla calls us ‘sisters,’” they cried and right there they fainted.
“Pay attention, Aggivessana, pay attention how you reply!
“Pay attention, Aggivessana, pay attention how you reply!
“Pay attention, Aggivessana, pay attention how you reply!
“Pay attention, Aggivessana, pay attention how you reply!
“Pay attention, Aggivessana, pay attention how you reply!
“Paying respect is most helpful for giving ear, Bhāradvāja.
“Phagguna, is it true that you are associating overmuch with bhikkhunīs, that you are associating so much with bhikkhunīs that if any bhikkhu speaks dispraise of those bhikkhunīs in your presence, you become angry and displeased and make a case of it; and if any bhikkhu speaks dispraise of you in those bhikkhunīs’ presence, they become angry and displeased and make a case of it?
“Phagguna, it is not proper for you, a clansman gone forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness, to associate overmuch with bhikkhunīs.
“Pleasant feeling is the counterpart of painful feeling.”
“Pleasant feeling, Aggivessana, is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen, subject to destruction, vanishing, fading away, and ceasing.
“Possessed of material form, he sees forms: this is the first direction.
“Possessing this aggregate of noble virtue, and this noble restraint of the faculties, and possessing this noble mindfulness and full awareness, he resorts to a secluded resting place: the forest, the root of a tree, a mountain, a ravine, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a jungle thicket, an open space, a heap of straw.
“Possessing this aggregate of noble virtue, and this noble restraint of the faculties, and possessing this noble mindfulness and full awareness, he resorts to a secluded resting place: the forest, the root of a tree, a mountain, a ravine, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a jungle thicket, an open space, a heap of straw.
“Prince, before my enlightenment, while I was still only an unenlightened Bodhisatta, I too thought thus: ‘Pleasure is not to be gained through pleasure; pleasure is to be gained through pain.’
“Prince, when a bhikkhu who possesses these five factors of striving finds a Tathāgata to discipline him, he might dwell seven years until by realising for himself with direct knowledge, he here and now enters upon and abides in that supreme goal of the holy life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the home life into homelessness.
“Purification by knowledge and vision of the way” comprises the ascending series of insight knowledges up to the supramundane paths.
“Purification by knowledge and vision of what is the maggāmaggañāṇadassanavisuddhi path and what is not the path” is the correct discrimination between the false path of the ecstatic, exhilarating experiences and the true path of insight into impermanence, suffering, and not self.
“Purification by overcoming doubt” is the understanding of conditionality.
“Purification of view” is the understanding that defines the nature of the five aggregates constituting a living being.
“Puṇṇa, the people of Sunāparanta are fierce and rough.
“Puṇṇa, there are forms cognizable by the eye that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and likeable, connected with sensual desire and provocative of lust.
“Puṇṇa, there are forms cognizable by the eye...sounds cognizable by the ear…odours cognizable by the nose…flavours cognizable by the tongue…tangibles cognizable by the body… mind-objects cognizable by the mind that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and likeable, connected with sensual desire and provocative of lust.
“Puṇṇa, there are four kinds of action proclaimed by me after realising them for myself with direct knowledge.
“Quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, he enters upon and abides in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“Quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, I entered upon and abided in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“Quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, I entered upon and abided in the first jhāna……I directly knew: ‘Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.’
“Rāhula, develop meditation on altruistic joy; for when you develop meditation on altruistic joy, any discontent will be abandoned.
“Rāhula, develop meditation on compassion; for when you develop meditation on compassion, any cruelty will be abandoned.
“Rāhula, develop meditation on equanimity; for when you develop meditation on equanimity, any aversion will be abandoned.
“Rāhula, develop meditation on foulness; for when you develop meditation on foulness, any lust will be abandoned.
“Rāhula, develop meditation on loving-kindness; for when you develop meditation on loving-kindness, any ill will will be abandoned.
“Rāhula, develop meditation on mindfulness of breathing.
“Rāhula, develop meditation on the perception of impermanence; for when you develop meditation on the perception of impermanence, the conceit ‘I am’ will be abandoned.
“Rāhula, develop meditation that is like air; for when you develop meditation that is like air, arisen agreeable and disagreeable contacts will not invade your mind and remain.
“Rāhula, develop meditation that is like fire; for when you develop meditation that is like fire, arisen agreeable and disagreeable contacts will not invade your mind and remain.
“Rāhula, develop meditation that is like space; for when you develop meditation that is like space, arisen agreeable and disagreeable contacts will not invade your mind and remain.
“Rāhula, develop meditation that is like the earth; for when you develop meditation that is like the earth, arisen agreeable and disagreeable contacts will not invade your mind and remain.
“Rāhula, develop meditation that is like water; for when you develop meditation that is like water, arisen agreeable and disagreeable contacts will not invade your mind and remain.
“Rāhula, that is how mindfulness of breathing is developed and cultivated, so that it is of great fruit and great benefit.
“Rāhula, what do you think?
“Rāhula, what do you think?
“Rāhula, whatever internally, belonging to oneself, is solid, solidified, and clung-to, that is, head-hairs, body-hairs, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, sinews, bones, bone-marrow, kidneys, heart, liver, diaphragm, spleen, lungs, large intestines, small intestines, contents of the stomach, feces, or whatever else internally, belonging to oneself, is solid, solidified, and clung-to: this is called the internal earth element.
“Rāhula, whatever recluses and brahmins in the past purified their bodily action, their verbal action, and their mental action, all did so by repeatedly reflecting thus.
“Rāhula, when you wish to do an action by mind… …you may do such an action by mind.
“Rāhula, when you wish to do an action by speech……you may do such an action by speech.
“Rāhula, when you wish to do an action with the body, you should reflect upon that same bodily action thus: ‘Would this action that I wish to do with the body lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both?
“Raṭṭhapāla, Tathāgatas do not give the going forth to anyone who does not have his parents’ permission.”
“Reflecting wisely, he uses almsfood neither for amusement nor for intoxication nor for the sake of physical beauty and attractiveness, but only for the endurance and continuance of this body, for ending discomfort, and for assisting the holy life, considering: ‘Thus I shall terminate old feelings without arousing new feelings and I shall be healthy and blameless and shall live in comfort.’
“Reflecting wisely, he uses the medicinal requisites only for protection from arisen afflicting feelings and for the benefit of good health.
“Reflecting wisely, he uses the resting place only for protection from cold, for protection from heat, for protection from contact with gadflies, mosquitoes, wind, the sun, and creeping things, and only for the purpose of warding off the perils of climate and for enjoying retreat.
“Rightly speaking, were it to be said of anyone: ‘A being not subject to delusion has appeared in the world for the welfare and happiness of many, out of compassion for the world, for the good, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans,’ it is of me indeed that rightly speaking this should be said.”
“Sandaka, these four ways that negate the living of the holy life have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, and also these four kinds of holy life without consolation have been declared, wherein a wise man certainly would not live the holy life, or if he should live it, would not attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.” 
“Sandaka, when a bhikkhu is an arahant with taints destroyed …and is completely liberated through final knowledge, he is incapable of transgression in five cases.
“Saying ‘good,’ bhikkhus, one may delight and rejoice in that bhikkhu’s words.
“Saying ‘good,’ one may delight and rejoice in that bhikkhu’s words.
“Saying ‘good,’ one may delight and rejoice in that bhikkhu’s words.
“Saying ‘good,’ one may delight and rejoice in that bhikkhu’s words.
“Saying ‘good,’ one may delight and rejoice in that bhikkhu’s words.
“Sāriputta, didn’t the bhikkhu Channa declare to you his blamelessness?”
“Sāriputta, forms cognizable by the eye are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.
“Sāriputta, having established the brahmin Dhānañjāni in the inferior Brahma-world, why did you rise from your seat and leave while there was still more to be done?”
“Sāriputta, if all nobles understood thus the detailed meaning of my utterance, which I spoke in brief, it would lead to their welfare and happiness for a long time.
“Sāriputta, robes are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.
“Sāriputta, the brahmin Dhānañjāni has died and has reappeared in the Brahma-world.” 
“Sāriputta, the detailed meaning of my utterance, which I spoke in brief, should be regarded thus.
“Sāriputta, the detailed meaning of my utterance, which I spoke in brief, should be regarded thus.
“Sāriputta, the detailed meaning of my utterance, which I spoke in brief, should be regarded thus.
“Sāriputta, whatever recluses and brahmins in the past have purified their almsfood have all done so by repeatedly reviewing thus.
“Sāriputta, your faculties are clear.
“Scrutiny is most helpful for striving, Bhāradvāja.
“Seeing thus, a well-taught noble disciple becomes disenchanted with material form, disenchanted with feeling, disenchanted with perception, disenchanted with formations, disenchanted with consciousness.
“Seeing thus, a well-taught noble disciple becomes disenchanted with pleasant feeling, disenchanted with painful feeling, disenchanted with neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, a well-taught noble disciple becomes disenchanted with material form, disenchanted with feeling, disenchanted with perception, disenchanted with formations, disenchanted with consciousness.
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, a well-taught noble disciple becomes disenchanted with the eye, disenchanted with forms, disenchanted with eye-consciousness, disenchanted with eye-contact, disenchanted with feeling, disenchanted with craving.
“Seeing thus, Rāhula, a well-taught noble disciple becomes disenchanted with the eye, disenchanted with forms, disenchanted with eye-consciousness, disenchanted with eye-contact, and disenchanted with anything comprised within the feeling, perception, formations, and consciousness that arise with eye-contact as condition.
“Seniya, one who formerly belonged to another sect and desires the going forth and the full admission in this Dhamma and Discipline lives on probation for four months.
“Should anyone say: ‘That is the utmost pleasure and joy that beings experience,’ I would not concede that to him.
“Should anyone say: ‘That is the utmost pleasure and joy that beings experience,’ I would not concede that to him.
“Should anyone say: ‘That is the utmost pleasure and joy that beings experience,’ I would not concede that to him.
“Should anyone say…And what is that other kind of pleasure?
“Should anyone say…And what is that other kind of pleasure?
“Should anyone say…And what is that other kind of pleasure?
“Should anyone say…And what is that other kind of pleasure?
“Should anyone say…And what is that other kind of pleasure?
“Should anyone say…And what is that other kind of pleasure?
“Since he regards them thus, he is not agitated about what is non-existent.ʺ 
“Since there actually is another world, one who holds the view ‘there is another world’ has right view.
“Since there actually is another world, one who holds the view ‘there is no other world’ has wrong view.
“Since there actually is causality, one who holds the view ‘there is causality’ has right view.
“Since there actually is causality, one who holds the view ‘there is no causality’ has wrong view.
“Since there actually is doing, one who holds the view ‘there is doing’ has right view.
“Since there actually is doing, one who holds the view ‘there is no doing’ has wrong view.
“Since this is so, Ānanda, a teacher’s undoing may come about, a pupil’s undoing may come about, and the undoing of one who lives the holy life may come about.
“Since, householders, you have not found an agreeable teacher, you may undertake and practise this incontrovertible teaching; for when the incontrovertible teaching is accepted and undertaken, it will lead to your welfare and happiness for a long time.
“Sir, do not go to see the recluse Gotama.
“Sir, I am coming from the presence of the recluse Gotama.”
“Sir, I am coming from the presence of the recluse Gotama.”
“Sir, I have seen here certain learned nobles who were clever, knowledgeable about the doctrines of others, as sharp as hairsplitting marksmen; they wander about, as it were, demolishing the views of others with their sharp wits.
“Sir, King Pasenadi of Kosala cannot even see the gods of the Thirty-three, so how could he topple them or banish them from that place?”
“Sir, suppose a wise elephant woodsman were to enter an elephant wood and were to see in the elephant wood a big elephant’s footprint, long in extent and broad across.
“Sir, there is the recluse Gotama, the son of the Sakyans who went forth from a Sakyan clan, who has been wandering in the Kosalan country......They are going to see that Master Gotama.”
“Sir, who am I to know the recluse Gotama’s lucidity of wisdom?
“Sir, who am I to know the recluse Gotama’s lucidity of wisdom?
“Sir, who am I to praise the recluse Gotama?
“Sir, who am I to praise the recluse Gotama?
“Sire, it was General Viḍūḍabha.”
“Sirs, this much is the praise of Master Gotama that I have learned, but the praise of Master Gotama is not limited to that, for the praise of Master Gotama is immeasurable.
“Sisters, I have given this simile in order to convey a meaning.
“Sisters, suppose a great tree is standing possessed of heartwood: its root is impermanent and subject to change, its trunk is impermanent and subject to change, its branches and foliage are impermanent and subject to change, and its shadow is impermanent and subject to change.
“Sisters, suppose a skilled butcher or his apprentice were to kill a cow and carve it up with a sharp butcher’s knife.
“Sisters, suppose an oil-lamp is burning: its oil is impermanent and subject to change, its wick is impermanent and subject to change, its flame is impermanent and subject to change, and its radiance is impermanent and subject to change.
“Sisters, there are these seven enlightenment factors through the development and cultivation of which a bhikkhu, by realising for himself with direct knowledge, here and now enters upon and abides in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints.
“Sisters, this talk will be in the form of questions.
“Sisters, what do you think?
“Sisters, what do you think?
“Sisters, what do you think?
“Sisters, what do you think?
“So Ghaṭīkāra the potter and Jotipāla the brahmin student went to the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“So Ghaṭīkāra the potter and Jotipāla the brahmin student went to the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“So I have heard, sir.”
“So it is, brahmin, so it is!
“So it is, Dīgha, so it is!
“So it is, householder, so it is!
“So it is, householder, so it is!
“So it is, Kandaraka, so it is!
“So it is, Pessa, so it is!
“So it is, sirs.
“So it was in reference to this that it was said: ‘Therein, by depending on this, abandon that.’
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Bhikkhus, bodily conduct is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Bhikkhus, inclination of mind is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Bhikkhus, mental conduct is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Bhikkhus, the acquisition of individuality is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Bhikkhus, the acquisition of perception is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Bhikkhus, the acquisition of view is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Bhikkhus, verbal conduct is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Mind-objects cognizable by the mind are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.’
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Persons are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.’
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Sāriputta, forms cognizable by the eye are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.’
“So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: ‘Sāriputta, robes are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.’
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘Among the teachers of training it is he that is called the incomparable leader of persons to be tamed.’”
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘Bhikkhus, dwell possessed of virtue, possessed of the Pātimokkha, restrained with the restraint of the Pātimokkha, perfect in conduct and resort, and seeing fear in the slightest fault, train by undertaking the training precepts.’”
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘Bhikkhus, I shall teach you the summary and exposition of “One Who Has Had a Single Excellent Night.”’”
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘Bhikkhus, this is the direct path for the purification of beings, for the surmounting of sorrow and lamentation, for the disappearance of pain and grief, for the attainment of the true way, for the realisation of Nibbāna—namely, the four foundations of mindfulness.’”
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘One should know how to define pleasure, and knowing that, one should pursue pleasure within oneself.’
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘One should know what it is to extol and what it is to disparage, and knowing both, one should neither extol nor disparage but should teach only the Dhamma.’
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘One should not insist on local language, and one should not override normal usage.’
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘One should not neglect wisdom, should preserve truth, should cultivate relinquishment, and should train for peace.’
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘One should not pursue sensual pleasure, which is low, vulgar, coarse, ignoble, and unbeneficial; and one should not pursue self-mortification, which is painful, ignoble, and unbeneficial.’
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘One should not utter covert speech, and one should not utter overt sharp speech.’
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘One should speak unhurriedly, not hurriedly.’
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘The thirty-six positions of beings should be understood.’ 
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘The tides of conceiving do not sweep over one who stands upon these, and when the tides of conceiving no longer sweep over him he is called a sage at peace.’
“So it was with reference to this that it was said: ‘There are three foundations of mindfulness that the Noble One cultivates, cultivating which the Noble One is a teacher fit to instruct a group.’
“So saying, bhikkhus, so proclaiming, I have been baselessly, vainly, falsely, and wrongly misrepresented by some recluses and brahmins thus: ‘The recluse Gotama is one who leads astray; he teaches the annihilation, the destruction, the extermination of an existing being.’
“So speak the Nigaṇṭhas, bhikkhus.
“So speak the Nigaṇṭhas, bhikkhus.
“So that is how the truly wise
“So the maid Kālī got up late.
“So the maid Kālī got up later in the day.
“So the maid Kālī got up still later in the day.
“So the potter Ghaṭīkāra and the brahmin student Jotipāla took a loofah and bath powder and went to the river to bathe.
“So the Tathāgata speaks, bhikkhus.
“So the Tathāgata speaks, bhikkhus.
“So then, if others abuse, revile, scold, and harass a bhikkhu, he understands thus: ‘This painful feeling born of ear-contact has arisen in me.
“So then, if others abuse, revile, scold, and harass a bhikkhu, he understands thus:… …At that point too, friends, much has been done by that bhikkhu.
“So then, if others abuse, revile, scold, and harass a bhikkhu, he understands thus:……At that point too, friends, much has been done by that bhikkhu.
“So then, if others abuse, revile, scold, and harass a bhikkhu, he understands thus:……At that point too, friends, much has been done by that bhikkhu.
“So this holy life, bhikkhus, does not have gain, honour, and renown for its benefit, or the attainment of virtue for its benefit, or the attainment of concentration for its benefit, or knowledge and vision for its benefit.
“So this holy life, brahmin, does not have gain, honour, and renown for its benefit, or the attainment of virtue for its benefit, or the attainment of concentration for its benefit, or knowledge and vision for its benefit.
“So too, a bhikkhu considers thus...
“So too, Aggivessana, as to those recluses and brahmins who live bodily withdrawn from sensual pleasures, and whose sensual desire, affection, infatuation, thirst, and fever for sensual pleasures has been fully abandoned and suppressed internally, even if those good recluses and brahmins feel painful, racking, piercing feelings due to exertion, they are capable of knowledge and vision and supreme enlightenment; and even if those good recluses and brahmins do not feel painful, racking, piercing feelings due to exertion, they are capable of knowledge and vision and supreme nlightenment.
“So too, Aggivessana, as to those recluses and brahmins who live bodily withdrawn from sensual pleasures, but whose sensual desire, affection, infatuation, thirst, and fever for sensual pleasures has not been fully abandoned and suppressed internally, even if those good recluses and brahmins feel painful, racking, piercing feelings due to exertion, they are incapable of knowledge and vision and supreme enlightenment; and even if those good recluses and brahmins do not feel painful, racking, piercing feelings due to exertion, they are incapable of knowledge and vision and supreme enlightenment.
“So too, Aggivessana, as to those recluses and brahmins who still do not live bodily withdrawn from sensual pleasures, and whose sensual desire, affection, infatuation, thirst, and fever for sensual pleasures has not been fully abandoned and suppressed internally, even if those good recluses and brahmins feel painful, racking, piercing feelings due to exertion, they are incapable of knowledge and vision and supreme enlightenment; and even if those good recluses and brahmins do not feel painful, racking, piercing feelings due to exertion, they are incapable of knowledge and vision and supreme enlightenment.
“So too, Aggivessana, Prince Jayasena is obstructed, hindered, blocked, and enveloped by a still greater mass than this—the mass of ignorance.
“So too, Bhaddāli, when a bhikkhu possesses ten qualities, he is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.
“So too, bhikkhus, as to those recluses and brahmins who are skilled in this world and the other world, skilled in Māra’s realm and what is outside Māra’s realm, skilled in the realm of Death and what is outside the realm of Death—it will lead to the welfare and happiness for a long time of those who think they should listen to them and place faith in them.
“So too, bhikkhus, as to those recluses and brahmins who are unskilled in this world and the other world, unskilled in Māra’s realm and what is outside Māra’s realm, unskilled in the realm of Death and what is outside the realm of Death—it will lead to the harm and suffering for a long time of those who think they should listen to them and place faith in them.
“So too, bhikkhus, some bhikkhu is extremely gentle, extremely meek, extremely peaceful, so long as disagreeable courses of speech do not touch him.
“So too, bhikkhus, the pain and grief that the man would experience because of being struck with the three hundred spears does not count beside the suffering of hell; it is not even a fraction, there is no comparison.
“So too, bhikkhus, the pleasure and joy that a Wheel-turning Monarch would experience because of possessing the seven treasures and the four kinds of success does not count beside the happiness of heaven; it is not even a fraction, there is no comparison.
“So too, bhikkhus, there are certain recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘There is no harm in sensual pleasures.’…They say thus: ‘This is the future fear those good recluses and brahmins saw in sensual pleasures…that we are now feeling painful, racking, piercing feelings.’
“So too, bhikkhus, there are four kinds of fears to be expected by certain persons who have gone forth from the home life into homelessness in this Dhamma and Discipline.
“So too, bhikkhus, there are these five courses of speech that others may use when they address you: their speech may be timely or untimely, true or untrue, gentle or harsh, connected with good or with harm, spoken with a mind of loving-kindness or with inner hate.
“So too, bhikkhus, there are these five courses of speech… …Herein, bhikkhus, you should train thus: ‘Our minds will remain unaffected…and starting with him, we shall abide pervading the all-encompassing world with a mind similar to the earth, abundant, exalted, immeasurable, without hostility and without ill will.’
“So too, bhikkhus, there are these five courses of speech…Herein, bhikkhus, you should train thus: ‘Our minds will remain unaffected…and starting with him, we shall abide pervading the all-encompassing world with a mind similar to empty space, abundant, exalted, immeasurable, without hostility and without ill will.’
“So too, bhikkhus, there are these five courses of speech…Herein, bhikkhus, you should train thus: ‘Our minds will remain unaffected…and starting with him, we shall abide pervading the all-encompassing world with a mind similar to the river Ganges, abundant, exalted, immeasurable, without hostility and without ill will.′ That is how you should train, bhikkhus.
“So too, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu possesses eleven qualities, he is incapable of growth, increase, and fulfilment in this Dhamma and Discipline.
“So too, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu possesses these eleven qualities, he is capable of growth, increase, and fulfilment in this Dhamma and Discipline.
“So too, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu who is not overwhelmed with suffering does not overwhelm himself with suffering… …thus that suffering is exhausted in him.
“So too, brahmin, here a Tathāgata appears in the world, accomplished, fully enlightened, perfect in true knowledge and conduct, sublime, knower of worlds, incomparable leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of gods and humans, enlightened, blessed.
“So too, brahmin, here some clansman goes forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness, considering: ‘I am a victim of birth, ageing, and death, of sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair; I am a victim of suffering, a prey to suffering.
“So too, brahmin, if anyone from a clan of nobles goes forth......he is one who is accomplishing the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.
“So too, brahmin, if anyone from a clan of nobles goes forth......he is one who is accomplishing the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.
“So too, brahmin, if anyone from a clan of nobles goes forth......he is one who is accomplishing the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.”
“So too, brahmin, Nibbāna exists and the path leading to Nibbāna exists and I am present as the guide.
“So too, friend, if the spheres of these evil unwholesome wishes are seen and heard to be abandoned in any bhikkhu, then for all he may be a village dweller…abandoned in that venerable one.”
“So too, friend, purification of virtue is for the sake of reaching purification of mind; purification of mind is for the sake of reaching purification of view; purification of view is for the sake of reaching purification by overcoming doubt; purification by overcoming doubt is for the sake of reaching purification by knowledge and vision of what is the path and what is not the path; purification by knowledge and vision of what is the path and what is not the path is for the sake of reaching purification by knowledge and vision of the way; purification by knowledge and vision of the way is for the sake of reaching purification by knowledge and vision; purification by knowledge and vision is for the sake of reaching final Nibbāna without clinging.
“So too, friend, there are persons who are faithless and have gone forth from the home life into homelessness not out of faith but seeking a livelihood, who are fraudulent, deceitful, treacherous, haughty, hollow, personally vain, rough-tongued, loose-spoken, unguarded in their sense faculties, immoderate in eating, undevoted to wakefulness, unconcerned with recluseship, not greatly respectful of training, luxurious, careless, leaders in backsliding, neglectful of seclusion, lazy, wanting in energy, unmindful, not fully aware, unconcentrated, with straying minds, devoid of wisdom, drivellers.
“So too, general, those gods who are still subject to ill will and who come back to this state cannot even see those gods who are no longer subject to ill will and who do not come back to this state; so how could they topple them or banish them from that place?”
“So too, great king, it is not possible that what can be achieved by one who has faith, who is free from illness, who is honest and sincere, who is energetic, and who is wise, can be achieved by one who has no faith, who has much illness, who is fraudulent and deceitful, who is lazy, and who is not wise.”
“So too, great king, when fire is kindled by energy, lit by striving, there is, I say, no difference, that is, between the deliverance of one and the deliverance of the others.”
“So too, householder, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘Sensual pleasures have been compared to a charcoal pit by the Blessed One; they provide much suffering and much despair, while the danger in them is great.’
“So too, householder, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘Sensual pleasures have been compared to a grass torch by the Blessed One; they provide much suffering and much despair, while the danger in them is great.’
“So too, householder, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘Sensual pleasures have been compared to a piece of meat by the Blessed One; they provide much suffering and much despair, while the danger in them is great.’
“So too, householder, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘Sensual pleasures have been compared to a skeleton by the Blessed One; they provide much suffering and much despair, while the danger in them is great.’
“So too, householder, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘Sensual pleasures have been compared to borrowed goods by the Blessed One; they provide much suffering and much despair, while the danger in them is great.’
“So too, householder, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘Sensual pleasures have been compared to fruits on a tree by the Blessed One; they provide much suffering and much despair, while the danger in them is great.’
“So too, if the spheres of these evil unwholesome wishes are seen and heard to be unabandoned in any bhikkhu, then for all he may be a forest dweller……unabandoned in that venerable one.
“So too, Māgandiya, formerly when I lived the home life, I enjoyed myself, provided and endowed with the five cords of sensual pleasure: with forms cognizable by the eye…with tangibles cognizable by the body that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and likeable, connected with sensual desire and provocative of lust.
“So too, Māgandiya, formerly when I lived the home life……Since I take delight in that, I do not envy what is inferior, nor do I delight therein.
“So too, Māgandiya, if I were to teach you the Dhamma thus: ‘This is that health, this is that Nibbāna,’ you might know health and see Nibbāna.
“So too, Māgandiya, in the past sensual pleasures were painful to touch, hot, and scorching; in the future sensual pleasures will be painful to touch, hot, and scorching; and now at present sensual pleasures are painful to touch, hot, and scorching.
“So too, Māgandiya, the wanderers of other sects are blind and visionless.
“So too, prince, such speech as the Tathāgata knows to be untrue, incorrect, and unbeneficial, and which is also unwelcome and disagreeable to others: such speech the Tathāgata does not utter.
“So too, prince, there are these five factors of striving.
“So too, prince, when learned nobles, learned brahmins, learned householders, and learned recluses, after formulating a question, then come to the Tathāgata and pose it, the answer occurs to the Tathāgata on the spot.
“So too, Rāhula, an action with the body should be done after repeated reflection; an action by speech should be done after repeated reflection; an action by mind should be done after repeated reflection.
“So too, sisters, would anyone be speaking rightly who spoke thus: ‘These six external bases are impermanent and subject to change, but the pleasant, painful, or neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling that one experiences in dependence upon the six external bases is permanent, everlasting, eternal, not subject to change’?”
“So too, sisters, would anyone be speaking rightly who spoke thus: ‘These six internal bases are impermanent and subject to change, but the pleasant, painful, or neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling that one experiences in dependence upon the six internal bases is permanent, everlasting, eternal, not subject to change’?”
“So too, student, the brahmin Pokkharasāti is blind and visionless.
“So too, Sunakkhatta, it is possible that some bhikkhu here might think thus: ‘Craving has been called an arrow by the Recluse; the poisonous humour of ignorance is spread about by desire, lust, and ill will.
“So too, Sunakkhatta, it is possible that some bhikkhu here might think thus: ‘Craving has been called an arrow by the Recluse; the poisonous humour of ignorance is spread about by desire, lust, and ill will.
“So too, Sunakkhatta, when a person is intent on the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, his fetter of the base of nothingness has been rejected.
“So too, Udāyin there are certain misguided men here who, when told by me ‘Abandon this’…do not abandon that and they show discourtesy towards me as well as towards those bhikkhus desirous of training.
“So too, Udāyin, there are certain clansmen here who, when told by me ‘Abandon this’…abandon that and do not show discourtesy towards me or towards those bhikkhus desirous of training.
“So too, Udāyin, there are certain clansmen here who, when told by me ‘Abandon this’…abandon that and do not show discourtesy towards me or towards those bhikkhus desirous of training.
“So too, Udāyin, there are certain misguided men here who, when told by me ‘Abandon this,’ say: ‘What, such a mere trifle, such a little thing as this?
“So too, Udāyin, there are certain misguided men here who, when told by me ‘Abandon this’…do not abandon that and they show discourtesy towards me as well as towards those bhikkhus desirous of training.
“So too, Vaccha, the Tathāgata has abandoned that material form by which one describing the Tathāgata might describe him; he has cut it off at the root, made it like a palm stump, done away with it so that it is no longer subject to future arising.
“So, Anuruddha, it is not for the purpose of scheming to deceive people or for the purpose of flattering people or for the purpose of gain, honour, and renown, or with the thought, ‘Let people know me to be thus,’ that when a disciple has died, the Tathāgata declares his reappearance thus: ‘So-and-so has reappeared in such-and-such a place; so-and-so has reappeared in such-and-such a place.’
“So, Bhāradvāja, it seems that among the brahmins there is not even a single brahmin who says thus: ‘I know this, I see this: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’
“So, bhikkhus, the safe and good path to be traveled joyfully has been reopened by me, the wrong path has been closed off, the decoy removed, the dummy destroyed.
“So, bhikkhus, these things that I have taught you after directly knowing them—that is, the four foundations of mindfulness, the four right kinds of striving, the four bases for spiritual power, the five faculties, the five powers, the seven enlightenment factors, the Noble Eightfold Path—in these things you should all train in concord, with mutual appreciation, without disputing.
“So, bhikkhus, when you take to quarrelling and brawling and are deep in disputes, stabbing each other with verbal dangers, on that occasion you do not maintain acts of loving-kindness by body, speech, and mind in public and in private towards your companions in the holy life.
“So, bhikkhus, with ignorance as condition, formations; with formations as condition, consciousness; with consciousness as condition, mentality-materiality; with mentality-materiality as condition, the sixfold base; with the sixfold base as condition, contact; with contact as condition, feeling; with feeling as condition, craving; with craving as condition, clinging; with clinging as condition, being; with being as condition, birth; with birth as condition, ageing and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair come to be.
“So, bhikkhus, you do not think thus about me: ‘The recluse Gotama teaches the Dhamma for the sake of robes…or for the sake of some better state of being.’
“So, bhikkhus, you think thus about me: ‘The Blessed One is compassionate and seeks our welfare; he teaches the Dhamma out of compassion.’
“So, Cunda, the way of effacement has been taught by me, the way of inclining the mind has been taught by me, the way of avoidance has been taught by me, the way leading upwards has been taught by me, and the way of extinguishing has been taught by me.
“So, Evil One, when those bhikkhus had been thus advised and instructed by the Blessed One Kakusandha, accomplished and fully enlightened, then, gone to the forest or to the root of a tree or to an empty hut, they abided contemplating foulness in the body, perceiving repulsiveness in nutriment, perceiving disenchantment with all the world, contemplating impermanence in all formations.
“So, Evil One, when those bhikkhus had been thus advised and instructed by the Blessed One Kakusandha, accomplished and fully enlightened, then, gone to the forest or to the root of a tree or to an empty hut, they abided pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with loving-kindness…with a mind imbued with compassion…with a mind imbued with appreciative joy…with a mind imbued with equanimity…without hostility and without ill will.
“So, Sāriputta, if a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I now often abide in voidness,’ he should consider thus: ‘On the path by which I went to the village for alms, or in the place where I wandered for alms, or on the path by which I returned from the almsround, was there any desire, lust, hate, delusion, or aversion in my mind regarding forms cognizable by the eye?’
“So, student, it seems that among the brahmins there is not even a single brahmin who says thus: ‘I declare the result of these five things having realised it myself with direct knowledge.’
“So, Ānanda, the supreme development of the faculties in the Noble One’s Discipline has been taught by me, the disciple in higher training who has entered upon the way has been taught by me, and the noble one with developed faculties has been taught by me.
“Some recluses and brahmins call that abiding in delusion, Master Gotama.” 
“Some time or other, at the end of a long period, there comes an occasion when the Great Hell’s western door is opened… when its northern door is opened…when its southern door is opened.
“Some time or other, bhikkhus, at the end of a long period, there comes an occasion when the Great Hell’s eastern door is opened.
“Some time or other, bhikkhus, at the end of a long period, there comes an occasion when the Great Hell’s eastern door is opened.
“Still in search, bhikkhus, of what is wholesome, seeking the supreme state of sublime peace, I wandered by stages through the Magadhan country until eventually I arrived at Uruvelā, at Senānigama.
“Still in search, bhikkhus, of what is wholesome, seeking the supreme state of sublime peace, I went to Uddaka Rāmaputta and said to him: ‘Friend, I want to lead the holy life in this Dhamma and Discipline.ʹ Uddaka Rāmaputta replied: ‘The venerable one may stay here.
“Still, a man born and raised in the village of Naḷakāra might be slow or hesitant in answering when asked about the path to the village, but a Tathāgata, when asked about the Brahma-world or the way leading to the Brahma-world, would never be slow or hesitant in answering.
“Stop, Sāriputta, stop!
“Student, beings are owners of their actions, heirs of their actions; they originate from their actions, are bound to their actions, have their actions as their refuge.
“Student, I speak about this after making an analysis; I do not speak about this one-sidedly.
“Student, let the brahmin Brahmāyu come at his own convenience.”
“Student, suppose there were a man born blind who could not see dark and light forms, who could not see blue, yellow, red, or carmine forms, who could not see what was even and uneven, who could not see the stars or the sun and moon.
“Such talk on the Dhamma, householder, is not given to lay people clothed in white.
“Such was my asceticism, Sāriputta, that I went naked, rejecting conventions, licking my hands, not coming when asked, not stopping when asked; I did not accept food brought or food specially made or an invitation to a meal; I received nothing from a pot, from a bowl, across a threshold, across a stick, across a pestle, from two eating together, from a pregnant woman, from a woman giving suck, from a woman in the midst of men, from where food was advertised to be distributed, from where a dog was waiting, from where flies were buzzing; I accepted no fish or meat, I drank no liquor, wine, or fermented brew.
“Such was my coarseness, Sāriputta, that just as the bole of a tindukā tree, accumulating over the years, cakes and flakes off, so too, dust and dirt, accumulating over the years, caked off my body and flaked off.
“Such was my scrupulousness, Sāriputta, that I was always mindful in stepping forwards and stepping backwards.
“Such was my seclusion, Sāriputta, that I would plunge into some forest and dwell there.
“Sumbha, Subha, Methula, and Aṭṭhama, 
“Sunakkhatta, I have given this simile in order to convey a meaning.
“Suppose a bronze dish were brought from a shop or a smithy clean and bright; and the owners put clean boiled rice and various soups and sauces into it, and, covering it with another dish, went back to the market; then people seeing it said: ‘What is that you are carrying about like a treasure?’
“Suppose a bronze dish were brought from a shop or a smithy clean and bright; and the owners put the carcass of a snake or a dog or a human being in it and, covering it with another dish, went back to the market; then people seeing it said: ‘What is that you are carrying about like a treasure?’
“Suppose a forest deer is wandering in the forest wilds: he walks confidently, stands confidently, sits confidently, lies down confidently.
“Suppose a man needing a snake, seeking a snake, wandering in search of a snake, saw a large snake and caught it rightly with a cleft stick, and having done so, grasped it rightly by the neck.
“Suppose a man needing a snake, seeking a snake, wandering in search of a snake, saw a large snake and grasped its coils or its tail.
“Suppose a man needing butter, seeking butter, wandering in search of butter, were to pour curd into a churn and churn it with a churning-stick.
“Suppose a man needing butter, seeking butter, wandering in search of butter, were to pour water into a churn and churn it with a churning-stick.
“Suppose a man needing fire, seeking fire, wandering in search of fire, were to take an upper fire-stick and rub a dry sapless piece of wood with it.
“Suppose a man needing fire, seeking fire, wandering in search of fire, were to take an upper fire-stick and rub a wet sappy piece of wood with it.
“Suppose a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, came to a great tree standing possessed of heartwood, and cutting off only its heartwood, he would take it away knowing it was heartwood.
“Suppose a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, came to a great tree standing possessed of heartwood, and cutting off only its heartwood, he would take it away knowing it was heartwood.
“Suppose a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, came to a great tree standing possessed of heartwood.
“Suppose a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, came to a great tree standing possessed of heartwood.
“Suppose a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, came to a great tree standing possessed of heartwood.
“Suppose a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, came to a great tree standing possessed of heartwood.
“Suppose a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, came to a great tree standing possessed of heartwood.
“Suppose a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, came to a great tree standing possessed of heartwood.
“Suppose a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, came to a great tree standing possessed of heartwood.
“Suppose a man needing milk, seeking milk, wandering in search of milk, were to pull a recently-calved cow by her horn.
“Suppose a man needing milk, seeking milk, wandering in search of milk, were to pull a recently-calved cow by her udder.
“Suppose a man needing oil, seeking oil, wandering in search of oil, were to heap up gravel in a tub, sprinkle it all over with water, and press it.
“Suppose a man needing oil, seeking oil, wandering in search of oil, were to heap up sesamum flour in a tub, sprinkle it all over with water, and press it.
“Suppose a man threw into the sea a yoke with one hole in it, and the east wind carried it to the west, and the west wind carried it to the east, and the north wind carried it to the south, and the south wind carried it to the north.
“Suppose a person has eaten some delicious food and thrown it up.
“Suppose an oil-lamp is burning with pure oil and a pure wick; because of the purity of its oil and its wick it does not burn dimly.
“Suppose the weapon called a mataja, well whetted on both edges, were enclosed and encased in a patchwork sheath.
“Suppose there were a bronze cup of beverage possessing a good colour, smell, and taste, but it was mixed with poison, and a man came who wanted to live, not to die, who wanted pleasure and recoiled from pain, and they told him: ‘Good man, this bronze cup of beverage possesses a good colour, smell, and taste, but it is mixed with poison.
“Suppose there were a chariot on even ground at the crossroads, harnessed to thoroughbreds, waiting with goad lying ready, so that a skilled trainer, a charioteer of horses to be tamed, might mount it, and taking the reins in his left hand and the goad in his right hand, might drive out and back by any road whenever he likes.
“Suppose there were a dry sapless piece of wood, and a man came with an upper fire-stick, thinking: ‘I shall light a fire, I shall produce heat.’
“Suppose there were a hen with eight or ten or twelve eggs, which she had covered, incubated, and nurtured properly.
“Suppose there were a hen with eight, ten, or twelve eggs, which she had covered, incubated, and nurtured properly.
“Suppose there were a hollow empty water jug set out on a stand, and a man came with a supply of water.
“Suppose there were a pond with clear, agreeable cool water, transparent, with smooth banks, delightful.
“Suppose there were a square pond on level ground, surrounded by an embankment, full of water right up to the brim so that crows could drink from it.
“Suppose there were a wet sappy piece of wood, and a man came with an upper fire-stick, thinking: ‘I shall light a fire, I shall produce heat.’
“Suppose there were curd, honey, ghee, and molasses mixed together, and a man with dysentery came, and they told him: ‘Good man, this is curd, honey, ghee, and molasses mixed together.
“Suppose there were fermented urine mixed with various medicines, and a man came sick with jaundice, and they told him: ‘Good man, this fermented urine is mixed with various medicines.
“Suppose, Aggivessana, a head-anointed noble king addresses his elephant woodsman thus: ‘Good elephant woodsman, mount the king’s elephant, enter the elephant wood, and when you see a forest elephant, bind him by the neck to the king’s elephant.’
“Suppose, Aggivessana, there were a high mountain not far from a village or town, and two friends would leave the village or town and approach the mountain hand in hand.
“Suppose, Aggivessana, there were two tamable elephants, horses, or oxen that were well tamed and well disciplined, and two tamable elephants, horses, or oxen that were untamed and undisciplined.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a man loved a woman with his mind bound to her by intense desire and passion.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, an arrowsmith were warming and heating an arrow shaft between two flames, making it straight and workable.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, that in a wooded range there was a great low-lying marsh near which a large herd of deer lived.
“Suppose, brahmin, a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, came to a great tree standing possessed of heartwood.
“Suppose, Māgandiya, a householder or a householder’s son was rich, with great wealth and property, and being provided and endowed with the five cords of sensual pleasure, he might enjoy himself with forms cognizable by the eye…with sounds cognizable by the ear…with odours cognizable by the nose…with flavours cognizable by the tongue…with tangibles cognizable by the body that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and likeable, connected with sensual desire and provocative of lust.
“Suppose, Māgandiya, there was a leper with sores and blisters on his limbs, being devoured by worms, scratching the scabs off the openings of his wounds with his nails, cauterising his body over a burning charcoal pit.
“Suppose, Māgandiya, there was a leper with sores and blisters on his limbs, being devoured by worms, scratching the scabs off the openings of his wounds with his nails, cauterising his body over a burning charcoal pit.
“Suppose, Māgandiya, there was a leper with sores and blisters on his limbs, being devoured by worms, scratching the scabs off the openings of his wounds with his nails, cauterising his body over a burning charcoal pit; the more he scratches the scabs and cauterises his body, the fouler, more evil-smelling and more infected the openings of his wounds would become, yet he would find a certain measure of satisfaction and enjoyment in scratching the openings of his wounds.
“Suppose, Rāhula, there were a royal tusker elephant with tusks as long as chariot poles, full-grown in stature, high-bred, and accustomed to battle.
“Suppose, set out on a stand, there were a water jug full of water right up to the brim so that crows could drink from it, and a man came with a supply of water.
“Suppose, Sunakkhatta, a man had left his own village or town a long time ago, and he were to see another man who had only recently left that village or town.
“Suppose, Sunakkhatta, a man were wounded by an arrow thickly smeared with poison, and his friends and companions, his kinsmen and relatives, brought a surgeon.
“Suppose, Sunakkhatta, a man were wounded by an arrow thickly smeared with poison, and his friends and companions, his kinsmen and relatives, brought a surgeon.
“Suppose, Sunakkhatta, there were a bronze cup of beverage possessing a good colour, smell, and taste, but it was mixed with poison, and a man came who wanted to live, not to die, who wanted pleasure and recoiled from pain.
“Suppose, Sunakkhatta, there were a deadly poisonous snake, and a man came who wanted to live, not to die, who wanted pleasure and recoiled from pain.
“Suppose, Udāyin, a quail were tethered by a rotting creeper and would thereby expect injury, captivity, or death.
“Suppose, Udāyin, a royal tusker elephant with tusks as long as chariot-poles, full-grown in stature, high-bred and accustomed to battle, were tethered by stout leather thongs, but by simply twisting his body a little he could break and burst the thongs and then go where he likes.
“Suppose, Udāyin, my disciples honoured, respected, revered, and venerated me, and lived in dependence on me, honouring and respecting me, with the thought: ‘The recluse Gotama is content with any kind of robe and commends contentment with any kind of robe.’
“Suppose, Udāyin, there were a poor, penniless, destitute man, and he had one dilapidated hovel open to the crows, not the best kind, and one dilapidated wicker bedstead, not the best kind, and some grain and pumpkin seeds in a pot, not the best kind, and one hag of a wife, not the best kind.
“Suppose, Udāyin, there were a rich householder or a householder’s son, with great wealth and property, with a vast number of gold ingots, a vast number of granaries, a vast number of fields, a vast amount of land, a vast number of wives, and a vast number of men and women slaves.
“Suppose, Udāyin, my disciples honoured, respected, revered, and venerated me, and lived in dependence on me, honouring and respecting me, with the thought: ‘The recluse Gotama eats little and commends eating little.’
“Suppose, Udāyin, my disciples honoured, respected, revered, and venerated me, and lived in dependence on me, honouring and respecting me, with the thought: ‘The recluse Gotama is content with any kind of almsfood and commends contentment with any kind of almsfood.’
“Suppose, Udāyin, my disciples honoured, respected, revered, and venerated me, and lived in dependence on me, honouring and respecting me, with the thought: ‘The recluse Gotama is content with any kind of resting place and commends contentment with any kind of resting place.’
“Suppose, Udāyin, my disciples honoured, respected, revered, and venerated me, and lived in dependence on me, honouring and respecting me, with the thought: ‘The recluse Gotama is secluded and commends seclusion.’
“Suppose, venerable sir, not far from a village or town there was a pond with a crab in it.
“Suppose, Ānanda, the river Ganges were full of water right up to the brim so that crows could drink from it, and then a feeble man came thinking: ‘By swimming across the stream with my arms, I shall get safely across to the further shore of this river Ganges’; yet he would not be able to get safely across.
“Suppose, Ānanda, the river Ganges were full of water right up to the brim so that crows could drink from it, and then a strong man came thinking: ‘By swimming across the stream with my arms, I shall get safely across to the further shore of this river Ganges’; and he would be able to get safely across.
“Surely if that is so, Master Kaccāna, then these four castes are all the same: there is no difference between them at all that I see.”
“Surely if that is so, Master Kaccāna, then these four castes are all the same: there is no difference between them at all that I see.”
“Surely if that is so, Master Kaccāna, then these four castes are all the same: there is no difference between them at all that I see.”
“Surely if that is so, Master Kaccāna, then these four castes are all the same; there is no difference between them at all that I see.”
“Surely if that is so, Master Kaccāna, then these four castes are all the same; there is no difference between them at all that I see.”
“Surely, Aggivessana, your words are offensive and discourteous, but still I will answer you.
“Surely, Bhaddāli, a transgression overcame you, in that like a fool, confused and blundering, when a training precept was being made known by me, when the Sangha of bhikkhus was undertaking the training, you declared your refusal to comply.
“Surely, Bhaddāli, a transgression overcame you, in that like a fool, confused and blundering, when a training precept was being made known by me, when the Sangha of bhikkhus was undertaking the training, you declared your refusal to comply.
“Surely, Bhaddāli, a transgression overcame you, in that like a fool, confused and blundering, when a training precept was being made known by me, when the Sangha of bhikkhus was undertaking the training, you declared your refusal.
“Surely, bhikkhu, a transgression overcame you, in that like a fool, confused and blundering, you presumed to address me as ‘friend.’
“Surely, Bhūmija, when you were asked such a question and answered thus, you said what has been said by me and did not misrepresent me with what is contrary to fact.
“Surely, friend Kaccāna, knowing, the Blessed One knows; seeing, he sees; he is vision…the Tathāgata.
“Surely, friend Kaccāna, knowing, the Blessed One knows; seeing, he sees; he is vision…the Tathāgata.
“Surely, venerable sir, that being so, that man’s talk would amount to nonsense.”
“Surely, venerable sir, we abide diligent, ardent, and resolute.”
“Surely, venerable sir, we abide diligent, ardent, and resolute.”
“Surely, venerable sir, we are living in concord, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, blending like milk and water, viewing each other with kindly eyes.”
“Surely, venerable sir, we are living in concord, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, blending like milk and water, viewing each other with kindly eyes.”
“Surely, venerable sir, we delight in the holy life.”
“Sāriputta, I recall having lived a holy life possessing four factors.
“Sāriputta, the misguided man Sunakkhatta is angry and his words are spoken out of anger.
“Sāriputta, the Tathāgata has these four kinds of intrepidity, possessing which he claims the herd-leader’s place, roars his lion’s roar in the assemblies, and sets rolling the Wheel of Brahmā.
“Sāriputta, the Tathāgata has these ten Tathāgata’s powers, possessing which he claims the herd-leader’s place, roars his lion’s roar in the assemblies, and sets rolling the Wheel of Brahmā.
“Sāriputta, there are certain recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘As long as this good man is still young, a black-haired young man endowed with the blessing of youth, in the prime of life, so long is he perfect in his lucid wisdom.
“Sāriputta, there are certain recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘Purification comes about through food.’
“Sāriputta, there are certain recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘Purification comes about through the round of rebirths.’
“Sāriputta, there are these eight assemblies.
“Sāriputta, there are these five destinations.
“Sāriputta, there are these four kinds of generation.
“Sāriputta, this misguided man Sunakkhatta will never infer of me according to Dhamma: ‘That Blessed One is accomplished, fully enlightened, perfect in true knowledge and conduct, sublime, knower of worlds, incomparable leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of gods and humans, enlightened, blessed.’ 
“Sāriputta, when I know and see thus, should anyone say of me: ‘The recluse Gotama does not have any superhuman states, any distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.
“Sāriputta, when I know and see thus, should anyone say of me: ‘The recluse Gotama does not have any superhuman states, any distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.
“Sāriputta, when I know and see thus, should anyone say of me…he will wind up in hell.
“Sāriputta, when I know and see thus, should anyone say of me…he will wind up in hell.
“Sāriputta, when I know and see thus, should anyone say of me…he will wind up in hell.
“Take your sitting cloth with you, Rāhula; let us go to the Blind Men’s Grove to pass the day.”
“Tapassī, I describe three kinds of action for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action: that is, bodily action, verbal action, and mental action.”
“Tapassī, the Tathāgata is not accustomed to use the description ‘rod, rod’; the Tathāgata is accustomed to use the description ‘action, action.’”
“That being so, Master Gotama, that sectarian fold is empty even of one who goes to heaven.” “That being so, Vaccha, that sectarian fold is empty even of one who goes to heaven.”
“That being so, Master Gotama, this is the brahmins’ sixth basis for the performance of merit, that is, the motive of compassion.”
“That being so, student, isn’t this the brahmins’ sixth basis for the performance of merit, that is, the motive of compassion?” 
“That being so, Ānanda, remember this too as a wonderful and marvellous quality of the Tathāgata: Here, Ānanda, for the Tathāgata feelings are known as they arise, as they are present, as they disappear; perceptions are known as they arise, as they are present, as they disappear; thoughts are known as they arise, as they are present, as they disappear.
“That bhikkhu is able to endure cold and heat, hunger and thirst, and contact with gadflies, mosquitoes, wind, the sun, and creeping things; he is able to endure ill-spoken, unwelcome words and arisen bodily feelings that are painful, racking, sharp, piercing, disagreeable, distressing, and menacing to life.
“That bhikkhu, Sunakkhatta, is one who practises restraint in the six bases of contact.
“That bhikkhu’s words should neither be approved nor disapproved.
“That Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened, has attained final Nibbāna, brahmin.”
“That Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened, has attained to final Nibbāna, great king.”
“That brahmin Dhānañjāni too is well and strong, friend.”
“That does not apply, Master Gotama.
“That is a way, great king, whereby it can be understood how that statement of the brahmins is just a saying in the world.
“That is also a way, great king, whereby it can be understood how that statement of the brahmins is just a saying in the world.
“That is also a way, great king, whereby it can be understood how that statement of the brahmins is just a saying in the world.
“That is also a way, great king, whereby it can be understood how that statement of the brahmins is just a saying in the world.
“That is also a way, great king, whereby it can be understood how that statement of the brahmins is just a saying in the world.” 
“That is his dwelling, great king, with the closed door.
“That is how it is, Bhaddāli.
“That is how there is the supreme development of the faculties in the Noble One’s Discipline.
“That is not the only cause or the only reason.
“That is so, brahmin, that is so.
“That is so, brahmin, that is so.
“That is so, prince, that is so.
“That is so, Ānanda, that is so!
“That those recluses and brahmins who do not understand as it actually is the gratification as gratification, the danger as danger, and the escape as escape in the case of feelings, can either themselves fully understand feelings or instruct another so that he can fully understand feelings—that is impossible.
“That those recluses and brahmins who do not understand as it actually is the gratification as gratification, the danger as danger, and the escape as escape in the case of material form, can either themselves fully understand material form or instruct another so that he can fully understand material form—that is impossible.
“That those recluses and brahmins who do not understand as it actually is the gratification as gratification, the danger as danger, and the escape as escape in the case of sensual pleasures, can either themselves fully understand sensual pleasures or instruct another so that he can fully understand sensual pleasures—that is impossible.
“That true man—thus possessed of good qualities, who thus associates as a true man, wills as a true man, counsels as a true man, speaks as a true man, acts as a true man, holds views as a true man, and gives gifts as a true man—on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in the destination of true men.
“That untrue man—thus possessed of bad qualities, who thus associates as an untrue man, wills as an untrue man, counsels as an untrue man, speaks as an untrue man, acts as an untrue man, holds views as an untrue man, and gives gifts as an untrue man—on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in the destination of untrue men.
“The actions one undertakes during the day by body, speech, and mind after thinking and pondering by night is the ‘flaming by day.’
“The announcing, teaching, describing, establishing, revealing, expounding, and exhibiting of the noble truth of suffering.
“The announcing…and exhibiting of the noble truth of suffering…of the noble truth of the origin of suffering…of the noble truth of the cessation of suffering…of the noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering.
“The bar is a symbol for ignorance.
“The bhikkhunī Dhammadinnā is wise, Visākha, the bhikkhunī Dhammadinnā has great wisdom.
“The Blessed One has entered the Great Wood, Aggivessana, and is sitting at the root of a tree for the day’s abiding.”
“The Blessed One has terminated the discussion; the Sublime One has terminated the discussion.”
“The Blessed One has terminated the discussion; the Sublime One has terminated the discussion.”
“The Blessed One is well and strong, friend.”
“The Blessed One, brahmin, did not praise every type of meditation, nor did he condemn every type of meditation.
“The bodily rod is one, friend Gotama, the verbal rod is another, and the mental rod is still another.”
“The brahmin is a symbol for the Tathāgata, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“The brahmins honour this not only out of faith, Master Gotama.
“The butcher’s knife and block is a symbol for the five cords of sensual pleasure —forms cognizable by the eye that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and likeable, connected with sensual desire, and provocative of lust; sounds cognizable by the ear…odours cognizable by the nose…flavours cognizable by the tongue…tangibles cognizable by the body that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and likeable, connected with sensual desire, and provocative of lust.
“The descendants of King Makhādeva’s son to the number of eighty-four thousand kings in succession, after shaving off their hair and beard and putting on the yellow robe, went forth from the home life into homelessness in this Makhādeva Mango Grove.
“The difference here, Ānanda, is in their faculties, I say.” 
“The difference, friend, between wisdom and consciousness, these states that are conjoined, not disjoined, is this: wisdom is to be developed, consciousness is to be fully understood.” 
“The ear delights in sounds…The nose delights in odours…The tongue delights in flavours…The body delights in tangibles… The mind delights in mind-objects, takes delight in mind-objects, rejoices in mind-objects; that has been tamed by the Tathāgata, guarded, protected, and restrained, and he teaches the Dhamma for its restraint.
“The first three do not satisfy my mind, venerable sir, but the last one satisfies my mind.”
“The fork is a symbol for doubt.
“The four great elements, bhikkhu, are the cause and condition for the manifestation of the material form aggregate.
“The greatest of all gains is health, Nibbāna is the greatest bliss, The eightfold path is the best of paths
“The holy life is well proclaimed, O Sela,” said the Blessed One, “To be seen here and not delayed;
“The king thought: ‘The Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, does not accept from me a residence for the Rains in Benares,’ and he was very disappointed and sad.
“The man would think: ‘The arrow has been pulled out from me; the poisonous humour has been expelled with no trace left behind, and it is incapable of harming me.’
“The man would think: ‘The arrow has been pulled out from me; the poisonous humour has been expelled with no trace left behind, and it is incapable of harming me.’
“The material form in what has thus come to be is included in the material form aggregate affected by clinging.
“The material form in what has thus come to be is included in the material form aggregate affected by clinging.
“The mother then carries the embryo in her womb for nine or ten months with much anxiety, as a heavy burden.
“The Nigaṇṭha Dīgha Tapassī came here, householder.”
“The Nāga serpent is a symbol for a bhikkhu who has destroyed the taints.
“The piece of meat is a symbol for delight and lust.
“The pleasure and joy that arise in dependence on feeling…in dependence on perception…in dependence on formations…in dependence on consciousness—this is the gratification in the case of consciousness.
“The pleasure and joy, bhikkhu, that arise in dependence on material form—this is the gratification in the case of material form.
“The potter’s workshop is large enough, friend.
“The purpose of wisdom, friend, is direct knowledge, its purpose is full understanding, its purpose is abandoning.” 
“The pursuit of self-mortification—painful, ignoble, and unbeneficial—is a state beset by suffering, vexation, despair, and fever, and it is the wrong way.
“The pursuit of the enjoyment of one whose pleasure is linked to sensual desires —low, vulgar, coarse, ignoble, and unbeneficial—is a state beset by suffering, vexation, despair, and fever, and it is the wrong way.
“The report that has been spread about Master Gotama is true, sir, and not otherwise; and Master Gotama is one such as this and not otherwise.
“The Sangha of bhikkhus too is well and strong, friend.”
“The sieve is a symbol for the five hindrances, namely, the hindrance of sensual desire, the hindrance of ill will, the hindrance of sloth and torpor, the hindrance of restlessness and remorse, and the hindrance of doubt.
“The six internal bases should be understood.
“The six internal bases should be understood.
“The sixfold base has mentality-materiality as condition, venerable sir.
“The speculative view that the world is not eternal…that the world is finite…that the world is infinite…that the soul and the body are the same…that the soul is one thing and the body another…that after death a Tathāgata exists …that after death a Tathāgata does not exist…that after death a Tathāgata both exists and does not exist…that after death a Tathāgata neither exists nor does not exist is a thicket of views, a wilderness of views, a contortion of views, a vacillation of views, a fetter of views.
“The Tathāgata, bhikkhus, should be questioned further about that thus: ‘Are there found in the Tathāgata or not any defiled states cognizable through the eye or through the ear?’
“The Tathāgata, bhikkhus, understands this thus: ‘This good recluse or brahmin, with the relinquishing of views about the past and the future......and with the cessation of unworldly pleasure, neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling arises.
“The Tathāgata, bhikkhus, understands this thus: ‘This good recluse or brahmin, with the relinquishing of views about the past and the future…and with the cessation of grief, the rapture of seclusion arises.
“The Tathāgata, bhikkhus, understands this thus: ‘This good recluse or brahmin, with the relinquishing of views about the past and the future…and with the cessation of the rapture of seclusion, unworldly pleasure arises.
“The Tathāgata, bhikkhus, understands this thus: ‘This good recluse or brahmin, with the relinquishing of views about the past and the future…regards himself thus: “I am at peace, I have attained Nibbāna, I am without clinging.”
“The Tathāgata, bhikkhus, understands this thus: ‘Those good recluses and brahmins who describe the annihilation, destruction, and extermination of an existing being, through fear of identity and disgust with identity, keep running and circling around that same identity.
“The Tathāgata, bhikkhus, understands this thus: ‘Those good recluses and brahmins who describe the self as neither percipient nor non-percipient and unimpaired after death describe such a self, neither percipient nor non-percipient and unimpaired after death, to be either material…or neither material nor immaterial.
“The Tathāgata, bhikkhus, understands this thus: ‘Those good recluses and brahmins who describe the self as non-percipient and unimpaired after death describe such a self, non-percipient and unimpaired after death, to be either material…or neither material nor immaterial.
“The Tathāgata, bhikkhus, understands this thus: ‘Those good recluses and brahmins who describe the self as percipient and unimpaired after death describe such a self to be either material… or they describe it to be percipient of the immeasurable.
“The Tathāgata, great king, has abandoned all unwholesome states and possesses wholesome states.”
“The Tathāgata has these ten Tathāgata’s powers, possessing which he claims the herd-leader’s place, roars his lion’s roar in the assemblies, and sets rolling the Wheel of Brahmā.
“The term ‘both reappears and does not reappear’ does not apply, Vaccha.”
“The term ‘does not reappear’ does not apply, Vaccha.”
“The term ‘neither reappears nor does not reappear’ does not apply, Vaccha.”
“The term ‘reappears’ does not apply, Vaccha.” 
“The three aggregates are not included by the Noble Eightfold Path, friend Visākha, but the Noble Eightfold Path is included by the three aggregates.
“The toad is a symbol for anger and irritation.
“The tortoise is a symbol for the five aggregates affected by clinging’ namely, the material form aggregate affected by clinging, the feeling aggregate affected by clinging, the perception aggregate affected by clinging, the formations aggregate affected by clinging, and the consciousness aggregate affected by clinging.
“The two-and-thirty marks I learned
“The two-and-thirty marks you learned
“The venerable ones have never reported to me that they have obtained those abidings and attainments.
“The view of a person such as this is right view.
“The well-taught noble disciple who has regard for noble ones and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, who has regard for true men and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, knows what things should be cultivated and what things should not be cultivated, he knows what things should be followed and what things should not be followed.
“The wheel set in motion by me,” the Blessed One replied, “That same supreme Wheel of Dhamma, Sāriputta the Tathāgata’s son
“Then a wise bhikkhu among the bhikkhus who side together on the other part should rise from his seat, and after arranging his robe on one shoulder, he should raise his hands, palms together, and call for an enactment of the Sangha thus: ‘Let the venerable Sangha hear me.
“Then Baka the Brahmā, saying: ‘I shall vanish from the recluse Gotama, I shall vanish from the recluse Gotama,’ was unable to vanish.
“Then does Master Gotama hold any speculative view at all?”
“Then he both reappears and does not reappear, Master Gotama?”
“Then he does not reappear, Master Gotama?”
“Then he gives attention to voidness internally.
“Then he is energetic in abandoning unwholesome states and in undertaking wholesome states, steadfast, launching his effort with firmness and persevering in cultivating wholesome states.
“Then he is free from illness and affliction, possessing a good digestion that is neither too cool nor too warm but medium and able to bear the strain of striving.
“Then he is honest and sincere, and shows himself as he actually is to the Teacher and his companions in the holy life.
“Then he is wise; he possesses wisdom regarding rise and disappearance that is noble and penetrative and leads to the complete destruction of suffering.
“Then he neither reappears nor does not reappear, Master Gotama?”
“Then he said: ‘Venerable sir, have you a better supporter than I am?’—‘I have, great king.
“Then he thinks: ‘Formerly, when we were in the home life, we consumed what we liked and did not consume what we did not like; we ate what we liked and did not eat what we did not like; we tasted what we liked and did not taste what we did not like; we drank what we liked and did not drink what we did not like.
“Then I listened to the Brahmā’s pleading, and out of compassion for beings I surveyed the world with the eye of a Buddha.
“Then I performed such a feat of supernormal power that the Brahmā and the Brahmā’s Assembly and the members of the Brahmā’s Assembly could hear my voice but could not see me.
“Then it is greatly reprehensible, venerable sir.”
“Then it may occur to you, bhikkhus: ‘I shall be troubled and the other person will be hurt; for the other person is given to anger and resentment, and he is firmly attached to his view and he relinquishes with difficulty; and I cannot make that person emerge from the unwholesome and establish him in the wholesome.’
“Then it may occur to you, bhikkhus: ‘I shall be troubled and the other person will be hurt; for the other person is given to anger and resentment, and he is firmly attached to his view and he relinquishes with difficulty; yet I can make that person emerge from the unwholesome and establish him in the wholesome.
“Then it may occur to you, bhikkhus: ‘I shall be troubled, but the other person will not be hurt; for the other person is not given to anger and resentment, though he is firmly attached to his view and he relinquishes with difficulty; yet I can make that person emerge from the unwholesome and establish him in the wholesome.
“Then it may occur to you, bhikkhus: ‘I shall not be troubled, but the other person will be hurt, for the other person is given to anger and resentment.
“Then Jotipāla asked Ghaṭīkāra: ‘Now that you have heard this Dhamma, my dear Ghaṭīkāra, why don’t you go forth from the home life into homelessness?’—‘My dear Jotipāla, don’t you know that I support my blind and aged parents?’—‘Then, my dear Ghaṭīkāra, I shall go forth from the home life into homelessness.’
“Then King Kikī of Kāsi dispatched to the potter Ghaṭīkāra five hundred cartloads of red rice stored in the sheaf, and also sauce materials to go with it.
“Then King Makhādeva gave the boon of a village to his barber, and calling the prince, his eldest son, he said: ‘Dear prince, the divine messengers have appeared; grey hairs are seen growing on my head.
“Then King Yama presses and questions and cross-questions him about the first divine messenger: ‘Good man, did you not see the first divine messenger to appear in the world?’
“Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, did it never occur to you—an intelligent and mature man—“I too am subject to ageing, I am not exempt from ageing: surely I had better do good by body, speech, and mind”?’
“Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, did it never occur to you—an intelligent and mature man—“I too am subject to birth, I am not exempt from birth: surely I had better do good by body, speech, and mind”?’
“Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, did it never occur to you—an intelligent and mature man—“I too am subject to death, I am not exempt from death: surely I had better do good by body, speech, and mind”?’
“Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, did it never occur to you—an intelligent and mature man—“I too am subject to sickness, I am not exempt from sickness: surely I had better do good by body, speech, and mind”?’
“Then King Yama says: ‘Good man, did it never occur to you—an intelligent and mature man—“Those who do evil actions have such tortures of various kinds inflicted on them here and now; so what in the hereafter?
“Then let the venerable ones be seated awhile.
“Then listen, bhikkhus, and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then listen, bhikkhus, and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then listen, friends, and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then listen, friends, and attend closely to what I shall say.”—“Yes, friend,” the bhikkhus replied.
“Then listen, friends, and attend closely to what I shall say.”—“Yes, friend,” the bhikkhus replied.
“Then listen, householder, and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then listen, householder, and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then listen, householder, and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then listen, Sunakkhatta, and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then listen, Ānanda, and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then listen, Ānanda, and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then listen, Ānanda, and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then Māra the Evil One took possession of a member of the Brahmā’s Assembly, and he said to me: ‘Good sir, if that is what you know, if that is what you have discovered, do not guide your disciples or those gone forth, do not teach the Dhamma to your disciples or to those gone forth, have no yearning for disciples or for those gone forth.
“Then Māra the Evil One took possession of a member of the Brahmā’s Assembly, and he told me: ‘Bhikkhu, bhikkhu, do not disparage him, do not disparage him; for this Brahmā is the Great Brahmā, the Overlord, the Untranscended, of Infallible Vision, Wielder of Mastery, Lord Maker and Creator, Most High Providence, Master and Father of those that are and ever can be.
“Then not long after Jotipāla the brahmin student had received the full admission, a half-month after he had received the full admission, the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, having stayed at Vebhalinga as long as he chose, set out to wander towards Benares.
“Then on the strength of what or with the support of what do the brahmins in this case say thus: ‘Brahmins are the highest caste…heirs of Brahmā’?”
“Then on the strength of what or with the support of what do the brahmins in this case say thus: ‘Brahmins are the highest caste…heirs of Brahmā’?”
“Then on the strength of what or with the support of what do the brahmins in this case say thus: ‘Brahmins are the highest caste…heirs of Brahmā’?”
“Then on the strength of what or with the support of what do the brahmins in this case say thus: ‘Brahmins are the highest caste…heirs of Brahmā’?”
“Then on the strength of what or with the support of what do the brahmins in this case say thus: ‘Brahmins are the highest caste…heirs of Brahmā’?”
“Then on the strength of what or with the support of what do the brahmins in this case say thus: ‘Brahmins are the highest caste…heirs of Brahmā’?”
“Then Sakka, ruler of gods, addressed the charioteer Mātali thus: ‘Come, good Mātali, prepare a chariot harnessed to a thousand thoroughbreds, and go to King Nimi and say: “Great king, this chariot harnessed to a thousand thoroughbreds has been sent for you by Sakka, ruler of gods.
“Then Sakka, ruler of gods, addressed the gods of the Thirty-three: ‘Good sirs, do you want to see King Nimi?’—‘Good sir, we want to see King Nimi.’
“Then Sakka, ruler of gods, told the charioteer Mātali: ‘Come, good Mātali, prepare the chariot harnessed to a thousand thoroughbreds and drive King Nimi back to Mithilā.’
“Then state them, student.”
“Then that bhikkhu should steady his mind internally, quiet it, bring it to singleness, and concentrate it on that same sign of concentration as before.
“Then the bhikkhus of the group of five, not long after being thus taught and instructed by me, by realising for themselves with direct knowledge, here and now entered upon and abided in that supreme goal of the holy life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the home life into homelessness.”
“Then the bhikkhus of the group of five, thus taught and instructed by me, being themselves subject to birth, having understood the danger in what is subject to birth, seeking the unborn supreme security from bondage, Nibbāna, attained the unborn supreme security from bondage, Nibbāna; being themselves subject to ageing, sickness, death, sorrow, and defilement, having understood the danger in what is subject to ageing, sickness, death, sorrow, and defilement, seeking the unageing, unailing, deathless, sorrowless, and undefiled supreme security from bondage, Nibbāna, they attained the unageing, unailing, deathless, sorrowless, and undefiled supreme security from bondage, Nibbāna.
“Then the Blessed One Kakusandha, accomplished and fully enlightened, addressed the bhikkhus thus: ‘Bhikkhus, the Māra Dūsī has taken possession of the brahmin householders, telling them: “Come now, abuse, revile, scold, and harass the virtuous bhikkhus of good character; then perhaps, when they are abused, reviled, scolded, and harassed by you, some change will come about in their mind whereby the Māra Dūsī may find an opportunity.”
“Then the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, instructed, urged, roused, and gladdened Ghaṭīkāra the potter and Jotipāla the brahmin student with an exposition of the Dhamma.
“Then the brahmin student Jotipāla thought: ‘It is wonderful, it is marvellous that this potter Ghaṭīkāra, who is of an inferior birth, should presume to seize me by the hair when we have washed our heads!
“Then the elephant tamer addresses the elephant with words that are gentle, pleasing to the ear, and loveable, as go to the heart, are courteous, desired by many, and agreeable to many.
“Then the elephant tamer trains him further thus: ‘Take up, put down!’ When the king’s elephant obeys his tamer’s orders to take up and put down and carries out his instructions, the elephant tamer trains him further thus: ‘Go forward, go back!’ When the king’s elephant obeys his tamer’s orders to go forward and go back and carries out his instructions, the elephant tamer trains him further thus: ‘Get up, sit down!’ When the king’s elephant obeys his tamer’s orders to get up and sit down and carries out his instructions, the elephant tamer trains him further in the task called imperturbability.
“Then the elephant woodsman informs the head-anointed noble king: ‘Sire, the forest elephant has come out into the open.’
“Then the head-anointed noble king rises from his seat, and taking a water vessel in his left hand, he sprinkles the wheel-treasure with his right hand, saying: ‘Turn forward, good wheel-treasure; triumph, good wheel-treasure!’ Then the wheel-treasure turns forward rolling in the eastern direction and the Wheel-turning Monarch follows it with his four-constituent army.
“Then the maid Kālī, with blood running from her cut head, denounced her mistress to the neighbours: ‘See, ladies, the gentle lady’s work!
“Then the Māra Dūsī took possession of a certain boy, and picking up a stone, he struck the venerable Vidhura on the head with it and cut his head.
“Then the other friend would come down to the foot of the mountain, take his friend by the arm, and make him climb to the top of the mountain.
“Then the potter Ghaṭīkāra seized the brahmin student Jotipāla by the belt and said: ‘My dear Jotipāla, there is the monastery of the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, quite nearby.
“Then the seven brahmin seers went to the seer Devala the Dark and paid homage to him.
“Then the Tathāgata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, abide contemplating the body as a body, but do not think thoughts of sensual desire.
“Then the Tathāgata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, be virtuous, restrained with the restraint of the Pātimokkha, be perfect in conduct and resort, and seeing fear in the slightest fault, train by undertaking the training precepts.’
“Then the wardens of hell throw him back again into the Great Hell.
“Then the wheel-treasure plunges into the eastern ocean and emerges again.
“Then there remains only consciousness, purified and bright.
“Then there remains only equanimity, purified and bright, malleable, wieldy, and radiant.
“Then we ate only in the evening and in the morning.
“Then whichever bhikkhu you think is the most reasonable of those who side together on the opposite part should be approached and addressed thus: ‘While we were training in concord, friend, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, there arose mutual verbal friction, insolence in views, mental annoyance, bitterness, and dejection.
“Then, after giving the boon of a village to his barber and after carefully instructing the prince, his eldest son, in kingship, in the Makhādeva Mango Grove he shaved off his hair and beard, put on the yellow robe, and went forth from the home life into homelessness.
“Then, after pressing and questioning and cross-questioning him about the fifth divine messenger, King Yama is silent.
“Then, after pressing and questioning and cross-questioning him about the first divine messenger, King Yama presses and questions and cross-questions him about the second divine messenger: ‘Good man, did you not see the second divine messenger to appear in the world?’
“Then, after pressing and questioning and cross-questioning him about the fourth divine messenger, King Yama presses and questions and cross-questions him about the fifth divine messenger: ‘Good man, did you not see the fifth divine messenger to appear in the world?’
“Then, after pressing and questioning and cross-questioning him about the second divine messenger, King Yama presses and questions and cross-questions him about the third divine messenger: ‘Good man, did you not see the third divine messenger to appear in the world?’
“Then, after pressing and questioning and cross-questioning him about the third divine messenger, King Yama presses and questions and cross-questions him about the fourth divine messenger: ‘Good man, did you not see the fourth divine messenger to appear in the world?’
“Then, Angulimāla, go into Sāvatthī and say to that woman: ‘Sister, since I was born with the noble birth, I do not recall that I have ever intentionally deprived a living being of life.
“Then, Bhaddāli, eat one part there where you are invited and bring away one part to eat.
“Then, bhikkhu, listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”—“Yes, venerable sir,” the venerable Samiddhi replied.
“Then, bhikkhus, being myself subject to birth, having understood the danger in what is subject to birth, seeking the unborn supreme security from bondage, Nibbāna, I attained the unborn supreme security from bondage, Nibbāna; being myself subject to ageing, having understood the danger in what is subject to ageing, seeking the unageing supreme security from bondage, Nibbāna, I attained the unageing supreme security from bondage, Nibbāna; being myself subject to sickness, having understood the danger in what is subject to sickness, seeking the unailing supreme security from bondage, Nibbāna, I attained the unailing supreme security from bondage, Nibbāna; being myself subject to death, having understood the danger in what is subject to death, seeking the deathless supreme security from bondage, Nibbāna, I attained the deathless supreme security from bondage, Nibbāna; being myself subject to sorrow, having understood the danger in what is subject to sorrow, seeking the sorrowless supreme security from bondage, Nibbāna, I attained the sorrowless supreme security from bondage, Nibbāna; being myself subject to defilement, having understood the danger in what is subject to defilement, seeking the undefiled supreme security from bondage, Nibbāna, I attained the undefiled supreme security from bondage, Nibbāna.
“Then, bhikkhus, listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then, bhikkhus, the Brahmā Sahampati knew with his mind the thought in my mind and he considered: ‘The world will be lost, the world will perish, since the mind of the Tathāgata, accomplished and fully enlightened, inclines to inaction rather than to teaching the Dhamma.’
“Then, bhikkhus, the man might think: ‘I love this woman with my mind bound to her by intense desire and passion; thus sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair arise in me when I see her standing with another man, chatting, joking, and laughing.
“Then, bhikkhus, wandering by stages, I eventually came to Benares, to the Deer Park at Isipatana, and I approached the bhikkhus of the group of five.
“Then, bhikkhus, when I had stayed at Uruvelā as long as I chose, I set out to wander by stages to Benares.
“Then, brahmin, listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”—“Yes, sir,” the brahmin Ghoṭamukha replied.
“Then, dear Kārāyaṇa, have the state carriages prepared.
“Then, dear Raṭṭhapāla, consent to accept tomorrow’s meal.”
“Then, dears, we give the clansman Raṭṭhapāla permission to go forth from the home life into homelessness.
“Then, Evil One, the Blessed One Kakusandha, accomplished and fully enlightened, addressed the bhikkhus thus: ‘Bhikkhus, the Māra Dūsī has taken possession of those brahmin householders, telling them: “Come now, honour, respect, revere, and venerate the virtuous bhikkhus of good character; then perhaps, when they are honoured, respected, revered, and venerated by you, some change will come about in their minds whereby the Māra Dūsī may find an opportunity.”
“Then, Evil One, the Māra Dūsī considered thus: ‘There are these virtuous bhikkhus of good character, but I do not know their coming or their going.
“Then, Evil One, the Māra Dūsī considered thus: ‘Though I do as I am doing, still I do not know the coming or the going of these virtuous bhikkhus of good character.
“Then, Evil One, the Māra Dūsī took possession of those brahmin householders, telling them: ‘Come now, abuse, revile, scold, and harass the virtuous bhikkhus of good character; then perhaps, when they are abused, reviled, scolded, and harassed by you, some change will come about in their minds whereby the Māra Dūsī may find an opportunity.’
“Then, Evil One, the Māra Dūsī took possession of those brahmin householders, telling them: ‘Come now, honour, respect, revere, and venerate the virtuous bhikkhus of good character; then perhaps, when they are honoured, respected, revered, and venerated by you, some change will come about in their minds whereby the Māra Dūsī may find an opportunity.’
“Then, friends, listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then, friends, listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then, good gamekeeper, enough of the pleasure garden for today.
“Then, good minister, go to the brahmin householders of Opasāda and tell them: ‘Sirs, the brahmin Cankī says this: “Please wait, sirs.
“Then, householder, you should train thus: ‘I will not cling to the eye, and my consciousness will not be dependent on the eye.’
“Then, householders, listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then, it being morning, the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, he went with the Sangha of bhikkhus to the dwelling of King Kikī of Kāsi and sat down on the seat made ready.
“Then, madam, inform me when the recluse Gotama comes to Caṇḍalakappa.”
“Then, Master Gotama, I assert thus: ‘Material form is my self, feeling is my self, perception is my self, formations are my self, consciousness is my self.’”
“Then, Master Sāriputta, pay homage in my name with your head at the Blessed One’s feet, and say: ‘Venerable sir, the brahmin Dhānañjāni is afflicted, suffering, and gravely ill; he pays homage with his head at the Blessed One’s feet.’”
“Then, Māgandiya, associate with true men.
“Then, Puṇṇa, listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”—“Yes, venerable sir,” he replied.
“Then, Sandaka, listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then, student, listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then, student, listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then, Tapassī, how many kinds of rod does the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta describe for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action?”
“Then, Udāyin, suggest something that I should speak about.”
“Then, venerable sir, on another occasion that brahmin took a pair of new garments to Rattapāṇi the dyer’s son and told him: ‘Good Rattapāṇi, I want this pair of new garments dyed the colour called yellow-unguent, pounded and re-pounded, and smoothened out on both sides.’
“Then, venerable sir, the Nigaṇṭhas have lost in this.”
“Then, when it was evening, I rose from meditation and went to the Nigaṇṭhas there.
“Then, when it was morning, the Blessed One Kakusandha, accomplished and fully enlightened, dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, he went into the village for alms with the venerable Vidhura as his attendant.
“Then, when the brahmin student Jotipāla had washed his head, the potter Ghaṭīkāra seized him by the hair and said: ‘My dear Jotipāla, there is the monastery of the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, quite nearby.
“Then, when the night had ended, King Kikī of Kāsi had good food of various kinds prepared in his own dwelling—red rice stored in the sheaf with the dark grains picked out, along with many sauces and curries—and he had the time announced to the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, thus: ‘It is time, venerable sir, the meal is ready.’
“Then, Ānanda, tell those bhikkhus in my name that the Teacher calls the venerable ones.”
“There are animals that are born, age, and die in darkness.
“There are animals that are born, age, and die in filth.
“There are animals that are born, age, and die in water.
“There are animals that feed on dung.
“There are certain recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘Purification comes about through abode.’
“There are certain recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘Purification comes about through rebirth.’
“There are certain recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘Purification comes about through sacrifice.’
“There are certain recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘Purification comes through fire-worship.’
“There are fourteen kinds of personal offerings, Ānanda.
“There are not only one hundred, Sandaka, or two hundred, three hundred, four hundred or five hundred, but far more emancipators than that in this Dhamma and Discipline.” “It is wonderful, Master Ānanda, it is marvellous!
“There are not only one hundred, Vaccha, or two or three or four or five hundred, but far more bhikkhus, my disciples, who by realising for themselves with direct knowledge here and now enter upon and abide in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints.”
“There are not only one hundred…or five hundred, but far more bhikkhunīs, my disciples, who by realising for themselves with direct knowledge here and now enter upon and abide in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints.”
“There are not only one hundred…or five hundred, but far more men lay followers, my disciples, clothed in white enjoying sensual pleasures, who carry out my instruction, respond to my advice, have gone beyond doubt, become free from perplexity, gained intrepidity, and become independent of others in the Teacher’s Dispensation.”
“There are not only one hundred…or five hundred, but far more men lay followers, my disciples, clothed in white leading lives of celibacy who, with the destruction of the five lower fetters, will reappear spontaneously and there attain final Nibbāna without ever returning from that world.”
“There are not only one hundred…or five hundred, but far more women lay followers, my disciples, clothed in white enjoying sensual pleasures, who carry out my instruction, respond to my advice, have gone beyond doubt, become free of perplexity, gained intrepidity, and become independent of others in the Teacher’s Dispensation.”
“There are not only one hundred…or five hundred, but far more women lay followers, my disciples, clothed in white leading lives of celibacy who, with the destruction of the five lower fetters, will reappear spontaneously and there attain final Nibbāna without ever returning from that world.”
“There are seven kinds of offerings made to the Sangha, Ānanda.
“There are these four castes, great king: the nobles, the brahmins, the merchants, and the workers.
“There are these four castes, great king: the nobles, the brahmins, the merchants, and the workers.
“There are these four castes, venerable sir: the nobles, the brahmins, the merchants, and the workers.
“There are these four castes, venerable sir: the nobles, the brahmins, the merchants, and the workers.
“There are these three formations, friend Visākha: the bodily formation, the verbal formation, and the mental formation.”
“There are these three kinds of being, friend: sense-sphere being, fine-material being, and immaterial being.”
“There are three hundred brahmins here
“There are, Aggivessana, three kinds of feeling: pleasant feeling, painful feeling, and neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
“There are, brahmin, some recluses and brahmins who perceive day when it is night and night when it is day.
“There are, brahmin, ten qualities inspiring confidence that have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“There are, householder, these four kinds of reappearance being.
“There are, Sunakkhatta, these five cords of sensual pleasure.
“There are, Udāyin, five cords of sensual pleasure.
“There are, Ānanda, four kinds of purification of offering.
“There are, Ānanda, these eighteen elements: the eye element, the form element, the eye-consciousness element; the ear element, the sound element, the ear-consciousness element; the nose element, the odour element, the nose-consciousness element; the tongue element, the flavour element, the tongue-consciousness element; the body element, the tangible element, the body-consciousness element; the mind element, the mind-object element, the mind-consciousness element.
“There are, Ānanda, these six internal and external bases: the eye and forms, the ear and sounds, the nose and odours, the tongue and flavours, the body and tangibles, the mind and mind-objects.
“There are, Ānanda, these six roots of disputes.
“There being ill will in him…There being sloth and torpor in him…There being restlessness and remorse in him…There being doubt in him, a bhikkhu understands: ‘There is doubt in me’; or there being no doubt in him, he understands: ‘There is no doubt in me’; and he understands how there comes to be the arising of unarisen doubt, and how there comes to be the abandoning of arisen doubt, and how there comes to be the future non-arising of abandoned doubt.
“There being the investigation-of-states enlightenment factor in him...There being the energy enlightenment factor in him…There being the rapture enlightenment factor in him…There being the tranquillity enlightenment factor in him…There being the concentration enlightenment factor in him…There being the equanimity enlightenment factor in him, a bhikkhu understands: ‘There is the equanimity enlightenment factor in me’; or there being no equanimity enlightenment factor in him, he understands: ‘There is no equanimity enlightenment factor in me’; and he also understands how there comes to be the arising of the unarisen equanimity enlightenment factor, and how the arisen equanimity enlightenment factor comes to fulfilment by development.
“There can be, bhikkhu,” the Blessed One said.
“There can be, bhikkhu,” the Blessed One said.
“There can be, bhikkhu,”the Blessed One said.
“There has never been found a fire
“There has not been that faith, bhikkhus, and there has not been that visiting, and there has not been that paying of respect, and there has not been that giving ear, and there has not been that hearing of the Dhamma, and there has not been that memorising of the Dhamma, and there has not been that examination of the meaning, and there has not been that reflective acceptance of the teachings, and there has not been that zeal, and there has not been that application of will, and there has not been that scrutiny, and there has not been that striving.
“There is a path, Ānanda, a way to the abandoning of the five lower fetters; that anyone, without relying on that path, on that way, shall know or see or abandon the five lower fetters—this is not possible.
“There is a path, Ānanda, a way to the abandoning of the five lower fetters; that someone, by relying on that path, on that way, shall know and see and abandon the five lower fetters—this is possible.
“There is a single bhikkhu, brahmin, whom we now honour, respect, revere, and venerate, and on whom we live in dependence honouring and respecting him.”
“There is an exclusively pleasant world, Udāyin; there is a practical way to realise an exclusively pleasant world.”
“There is an occasion, householder, when those deities assemble in one place.
“There is an occasion, householder, when those deities disperse from there.
“There is no need, great king.
“There is no need, great king.
“There is no one-sided answer to that, prince.”
“There is no single bhikkhu, brahmin, who has been chosen by the Sangha and appointed by a number of elder bhikkhus thus: ‘He will be our refuge after the Blessed One has gone,’ and whom we now have recourse to.”
“There is no single bhikkhu, brahmin, who possesses in each and every way all those qualities that were possessed by the Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“There is no single bhikkhu, brahmin, who was appointed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, thus: ‘He will be your refuge when I am gone,’ and whom we now have recourse to.”
“There is, bhikkhus, equanimity that is diversified, based on diversity; and there is equanimity that is unified, based on unity.
“There is, friend, a city in the northern country named Sāvatthī.
“There is, householder, indeed one such thing proclaimed by the Blessed One.” 
“There is, sire, a town of the Sakyans named Medaḷumpa.
“There might be, Ānanda.
“There might be, Ānanda.
“There might be, Ānanda.
“There might be, Ānanda.
“There might be, Ānanda.
“There now, what shall we say to the elder bhikkhus when a young bhikkhu thinks the Teacher is to be defended thus?
“There used to be another name, another designation, for that mountain Gijjhakuṭa—the Vulture Peak.
“There used to be another name, another designation, for that mountain Paṇḍava.
“There used to be another name, another designation, for that mountain Vebhāra.
“There used to be another name, another designation, for that mountain Vepulla.
“There used to be this same name, this same designation, for this mountain Isigili—the Gullet of the Seers.
“There were few of you, Bhaddāli, when I taught an exposition of the Dhamma through the simile of the young thoroughbred colt.
“There will be, Master Kaccāna.”
“There will be, Master Kaccāna.”
“There will be, Master Kaccāna.”
“Therefore a bhikkhu possessing possesses the supreme foundation of wisdom.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, abandon what is unwholesome and devote yourselves to wholesome states, for that is how you will come to growth, increase, and fulfilment in this Dhamma and Discipline.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, any kind of material form whatever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near, all material form should be seen as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, any kind of material form whatever, whether past, future, or present…all material form should be seen as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, if others abuse, revile, scold, and harass you, on that account you should not entertain any annoyance, bitterness, or dejection of the heart.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, whatever is not yours, abandon it; when you have abandoned it, that will lead to your welfare and happiness for a long time.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, when you understand the meaning of my statements, remember it accordingly; and when you do not understand the meaning of my statements, then ask either me about it or those bhikkhus who are wise.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We shall know the state with conflict and we shall know the state without conflict, and knowing these, we shall enter upon the way without conflict.’
“Therefore, Mālunkyāputta, remember what I have left undeclared as undeclared, and remember what I have declared as declared.
“Therefore, Mālunkyāputta, remember what I have left undeclared as undeclared, and remember what I have declared as declared.”
“Therefore, Ānanda, behave towards me with friendliness, not with hostility.
“Therefore, Ānanda, if a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I enter upon and abide in voidness internally,’ he should steady his mind internally, quiet it, bring it to singleness, and concentrate it.
“Therein, bhikkhus, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘Sensual pleasures here and now and sensual pleasures in lives to come…constitute an obstruction to a noble disciple in training here.
“Therein, bhikkhus, as to those recluses and brahmins who hold such a doctrine and view as this: ‘The self and the world are eternal: only this is true, anything else is wrong,’ that apart from faith, apart from approval, apart from oral tradition, apart from reasoned cogitation, apart from reflective acceptance of a view, they will have any pure and clear personal knowledge of this—that is impossible.
“Therein, bhikkhus, as to those recluses and brahmins who hold such a doctrine and view as this: ‘The self and the world are not eternal…both eternal and not eternal…neither eternal nor not eternal…finite…infinite…both finite and infinite…neither finite nor infinite…percipient of unity…percipient of diversity...percipient of the limited...percipient of the immeasurable… exclusively pleasure… exclusively pain...
“Therein, bhikkhus, right view comes first.
“Therein, bhikkhus, right view comes first.
“Therein, bhikkhus, right view comes first.
“Therein, bhikkhus, right view comes first.
“Therein, bhikkhus, right view comes first.
“Therein, bhikkhus, right view comes first.
“Therein, bhikkhus, right view comes first.
“Therein, bhikkhus, these criticise those good recluses and brahmins who describe the self as percipient and unimpaired after death, and they criticise those good recluses and brahmins who describe the self as non-percipient and unimpaired after death.
“Therein, bhikkhus, these criticise those recluses and brahmins who describe the self as percipient and unimpaired after death.
“Therein, bhikkhus, those recluses and brahmins who describe the annihilation, destruction, and extermination of an existing being  criticise those good recluses and brahmins who describe the self as percipient and unimpaired after death, and they criticise those good recluses and brahmins who describe the self as non-percipient and unimpaired after death, and they criticise those good recluses and brahmins who describe the self as neither percipient nor non-percipient and unimpaired after death.
“Therein, bhikkhus, those recluses and brahmins who describe the self as neither percipient nor non-percipient and unimpaired after death describe such a self, neither percipient nor non-percipient and unimpaired after death, to be either: material; or immaterial; or both material and immaterial; or neither material nor immaterial.
“Therein, bhikkhus, those recluses and brahmins who describe the self as non-percipient and unimpaired after death describe such a self, non-percipient and unimpaired after death, to be either: material; or immaterial; or both material and immaterial; or neither material nor immaterial.
“Therein, bhikkhus, those recluses and brahmins who describe the self as percipient and unimpaired after death describe such a self, percipient and unimpaired after death, to be either: material; or immaterial; or both material and immaterial; or neither material nor immaterial; or percipient of unity; or percipient of diversity; or percipient of the limited; or percipient of the immeasurable.
“Therein, Master Gotama, the brahmins prescribe this as the wealth of a brahmin—wandering for alms; a brahmin who spurns his own wealth, wandering for alms, abuses his duty like a guard who takes what has not been given.
“Therein, Ānanda, as to the person here who abstains from killing living beings…and holds right view, and on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world: either earlier he did a good action to be felt as pleasant, or later he did a good action to be felt as pleasant, or at the time of death he acquired and undertook right view.
“Therein, Ānanda, as to the person here who abstains from killing living beings…and holds right view, and on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in a state of deprivation…even in hell: either earlier he did an evil action to be felt as painful, or later he did an evil action to be felt as painful, or at the time of death he acquired and undertook wrong view.
“Therein, Ānanda, as to the person here who kills living beings…and holds wrong view, and on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world: either earlier he did a good action to be felt as pleasant, or later he did a good action to be felt as pleasant, or at the time of death he acquired and undertook right view.
“Therein, Ānanda, as to the person here who kills living beings…and holds wrong view, and on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in a state of deprivation…even in hell: either earlier he did an evil action to be felt as painful, or later he did an evil action to be felt as painful, or at the time of death he acquired and undertook wrong view.
“Therein, Ānanda, when a recluse or brahmin says: ‘Indeed, there are evil actions, there is result of misconduct,’ I grant him this.
“Therein, Ānanda, when a recluse or brahmin says: ‘Indeed, there are good actions, there is result of good conduct,’ I grant him this.
“Therein, Ānanda, when a recluse or brahmin says: ‘Indeed, there are no evil actions, there is no result of misconduct,’ I do not grant him this.
“Therein, Ānanda, when a recluse or brahmin says: ‘Indeed, there are no good actions, there is no result of good conduct,’ I do not grant him this.
“Thereupon I told them: ‘Bhikkhus, do not address the Tathāgata by name and as “friend.”
“Thereupon some said this: ‘This Pūraṇa Kassapa is the head of an order…regarded by many as a saint, yet he is not honoured, respected, revered, and venerated by his disciples, nor do his disciples live in dependence on him, honouring and respecting him.
“Thereupon, Anuruddha, I developed concentration with applied thought and sustained thought; I developed concentration without applied thought but with sustained thought only; I developed concentration without applied thought and without sustained thought; I developed concentration with rapture; I developed concentration without rapture; I developed concentration accompanied by enjoyment; I developed concentration accompanied by equanimity.
“These and also other great and mighty
“These are the five shackles in the heart that he has not severed.
“These are the five shackles in the heart that he has severed.
“These are the five wildernesses in the heart that he has abandoned.
“These are the five wildernesses in the heart that he has not abandoned.
“These are the four kinds of success that a Wheel-turning Monarch possesses.
“These are the seven treasures that a Wheel-turning Monarch possesses.
“These are the six principles of cordiality that create love and respect, and conduce to cohesion, to non-dispute, to concord, and to unity.
“These are the six principles of cordiality that create love and respect, and conduce to cohesion, to non-dispute, to concord, and to unity.
“These eight things that lead to the cutting off of affairs in the Noble One’s Discipline have now been expounded in detail.
“These five aggregates affected by clinging are rooted in desire, bhikkhu.”
“These saintly beings, desireless, rid of suffering, Who each achieved awakening by himself—
“These speculative views have been left undeclared by the Blessed One, set aside and rejected by him, namely: ‘the world is eternal’ and ‘the world is not eternal’; ‘the world is finite’ and ‘the world is infinite’; ‘the soul is the same as the body’ and ‘the soul is one thing and the body another’; and ‘after death a Tathāgata exists’ and ‘after death a Tathāgata does not exist’ and ‘after death a Tathāgata both exists and does not exist’ and ‘after death a Tathāgata neither exists nor does not exist.’
“These states are entirely wholesome and have a wholesome outcome; they are noble, supramundane, and inaccessible to the Evil One.
“These, bhikkhus, are the five aggregates affected by clinging; that is, the material form aggregate affected by clinging…and the consciousness aggregate affected by clinging.”
“These, brahmin, are the ten qualities inspiring confidence that have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“These, Sandaka, are the four kinds of holy life without consolation that have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein a wise man certainly would not live the holy life, or if he should live it, would not attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.”
“These, Sandaka, are the four ways that negate the living of the holy life that have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein a wise man certainly would not live the holy life, or if he should live it, would not attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.”
“These, Udāyin, are the five qualities because of which my disciples honour, respect, revere, and venerate me, and live in dependence on me, honouring and respecting me.”
“These, Udāyin, are those higher and more sublime states for the sake of realising which bhikkhus lead the holy life under me.”
“They hear: ‘The recluse Gotama has come to visit such and such a village or town.’
“This is a matter about which Master Gotama can be trusted, as an accomplished and fully enlightened one should be.
“This is bad news that we hear, friend.
“This is called the bliss of renunciation, the bliss of seclusion, the bliss of peace, the bliss of enlightenment.
“This is called the noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering.
“This is how he attends unwisely: ‘Was I in the past?
“This is how I discipline my disciples, Aggivessana, and this is how my instruction is usually presented to my disciples: ‘Bhikkhus, material form is impermanent, feeling is impermanent, perception is impermanent, formations are impermanent, consciousness is impermanent.
“This is how the Blessed One disciplines his disciples, Aggivessana, and this is how the Blessed One’s instruction is usually presented to his disciples: ‘Bhikkhus, material form is impermanent, feeling is impermanent, perception is impermanent, formations are impermanent, consciousness is impermanent.
“This is my instruction, brahmin, to those bhikkhus who are in the higher training, whose minds have not yet attained the goal, who abide aspiring to the supreme security from bondage.
“This is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute, his unliberated mind comes to be liberated, his undestroyed taints come to be destroyed, and he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“This is the cause and reason why, of these two persons with a blemish, one is called the inferior man and one is called the superior man.
“This is the cause and reason, friend Kaccāna, why among those deities that have reappeared in a single order of gods, some are deities of Limited Radiance, some deities of Immeasurable Radiance.”
“This is the cause and reason, friend Kaccāna, why among those deities that have reappeared in the same order of gods, some are deities of Defiled Radiance, some deities of Pure Radiance.”
“This is the cause, this is the reason, why they take action against some bhikkhu here by repeatedly admonishing him; this is the cause, this is the reason, why they do not take such action against some bhikkhu here by repeatedly admonishing him.”
“This is the first kind of holy life without consolation that has been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein a wise man certainly would not live the holy life, or if he should live it, would not attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.
“This is the first way that negates the living of the holy life that has been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein a wise man certainly would not live the holy life, or if he should live it, would not attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.
“This is the fourth kind of holy life without consolation that has been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened…
“This is the fourth way that negates the living of the holy life that has been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened…
“This is the perfect splendour, this is the perfect splendour!”
“This is the second kind of holy life without consolation that has been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened…
“This is the second way that negates the living of the holy life that has been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened…
“This is the third kind of holy life without consolation that has been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened…
“This is the third way that negates the living of the holy life that has been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened…
“This is the time, Blessed One, this is the time, Sublime One, for the Blessed One to expound in detail these four kinds of persons.
“This is the time, Blessed One, this is the time, Sublime One, for the Blessed One to expound the great exposition of action.
“This is the time, Blessed One, this is the time, Sublime One, for the Blessed One to teach the Dhamma.
“This noble disciple is thus said to be perfect in true knowledge, perfect in conduct, perfect in true knowledge and conduct.
“This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute, his unliberated mind comes to be liberated, his undestroyed taints come to be destroyed, and he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.” 
“This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One … wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute…he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One … wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute…he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One… wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute…he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One… wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute…he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One… wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute…he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One… wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute…he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One… wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute…he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One… wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute…he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One… wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute…he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“This too, brahmin, is called a footprint of the Tathāgata, something scraped by the Tathāgata, something marked by the Tathāgata, but a noble disciple still has not yet come to the conclusion: ‘The Blessed One is fully enlightened, the Dhamma is well proclaimed by the Blessed One, the Sangha is practising the good way.’
“This too, brahmin, is called a footprint of the Tathāgata, something scraped by the Tathāgata, something marked by the Tathāgata.
“This view of yours, Aggivessana, ‘Nothing is acceptable to me’—is not at least that view acceptable to you?”
“This was the first true knowledge attained by me in the first watch of the night.
“This was the first true knowledge attained by me in the first watch of the night.
“This was the second true knowledge attained by me in the middle watch of the night.
“This was the second true knowledge attained by me in the middle watch of the night.
“This was the third true knowledge attained by me in the last watch of the night.
“This was the third true knowledge attained by me in the last watch of the night.
“This was the third true knowledge attained by me in the last watch of the night.
“This, bhikkhus, is called the kind of person who does not torment himself or pursue the practice of torturing himself and who does not torment others or pursue the practice of torturing others —the one who, since he torments neither himself nor others, is here and now hungerless, extinguished, and cooled, and abides experiencing bliss, having himself become holy.”
“This, householders, is called the kind of person who does not torment himself or pursue the practice of torturing himself and who does not torment others or pursue the practice of torturing others—the one who, since he torments neither himself nor others, is here and now hungerless, extinguished, and cooled, and abides experiencing bliss, having himself become holy.”
“This, Udāyin, is the fifth quality because of which my disciples honour, respect, revere, and venerate me, and live in dependence on me, honouring and respecting me.
“Those five things, Master Gotama, that the brahmins prescribe for the performance of merit, for accomplishing the wholesome, I often see among those gone forth, seldom among householders.
“Those five things, student, that the brahmins prescribe for the performance of merit, for accomplishing the wholesome, I call equipment of the mind, that is, for developing a mind that is without hostility and without ill will.
“Those five things, student, that the brahmins prescribe for the performance of merit, for accomplishing the wholesome—where do you often see those five things, among householders or among those gone forth?”
“Those things that are the basis for taints do not become manifest here in the Sangha until the Sangha has reached greatness; but when the Sangha has reached greatness, then those things that are the basis for taints become manifest here in the Sangha, and then the Teacher makes known the training rule for disciples in order to ward off those things that are the basis for taints.
“Though certain recluses and brahmins claim to propound the full understanding of all kinds of clinging, they do not completely describe the full understanding of all kinds of clinging.
“Though certain recluses and brahmins claim to propound the full understanding of all kinds of clinging…they describe the full understanding of clinging to sensual pleasures and clinging to views without describing the full understanding of clinging to rules and observances and clinging to a doctrine of self.
“Though certain recluses and brahmins claim to propound the full understanding of all kinds of clinging…they describe the full understanding of clinging to sensual pleasures, clinging to views, and clinging to rules and observances without describing the full understanding of clinging to a doctrine of self.
“Though warned by the divine messengers, Full many are the negligent, And people may sorrow long indeed
“Three kinds of feeling have been stated by the Blessed One, householder: pleasant feeling, painful feeling, and neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
“Thus spoke the brahmin: ‘Delve with the knife, thou wise one.’
“Thus spoke the brahmin: ‘Leave the Nāga serpent; do not harm the Nāga serpent; honour the Nāga serpent.’
“Thus spoke the brahmin: ‘Throw out the bar; delve with the knife, thou wise one.’
“Thus spoke the brahmin: ‘Throw out the butcher’s knife and block; delve with the knife, thou wise one.’
“Thus spoke the brahmin: ‘Throw out the fork; delve with the knife, thou wise one.’
“Thus spoke the brahmin: ‘Throw out the piece of meat; delve with the knife, thou wise one.’
“Thus spoke the brahmin: ‘Throw out the sieve; delve with the knife, thou wise one.’
“Thus spoke the brahmin: ‘Throw out the toad; delve with the knife, thou wise one.’
“Thus spoke the brahmin: ‘Throw out the tortoise; delve with the knife, thou wise one.’
“Thus they either describe an existing self that is unimpaired after death; or they describe the annihilation, destruction, and extermination of an existing being; or they assert Nibbāna here and now.
“Thus Uddaka Rāmaputta, my companion in the holy life, placed me in the position of a teacher and accorded me the highest honour.
“Thus Āḷāra Kālāma, my teacher, placed me, his pupil, on an equal footing with himself and awarded me the highest honour.
“Thus, bhikkhus, there are twenty factors on the side of the wholesome, and twenty factors on the side of the unwholesome.
“Thus, student, the way that leads to short life makes people short-lived, the way that leads to long life makes people long-lived; the way that leads to sickliness makes people sickly, the way that leads to health makes people healthy; the way that leads to ugliness makes people ugly, the way that leads to beauty makes people beautiful; the way that leads to being uninfluential makes people uninfluential, the way that leads to being influential makes people influential; the way that leads to poverty makes people poor, the way that leads to wealth makes people wealthy; the way that leads to low birth makes people low-born, the way that leads to high birth makes people high-born; the way that leads to stupidity makes people stupid, the way that leads to wisdom makes people wise.
“Thus, Ānanda, I have taught the way directed to the imperturbable, I have taught the way directed to the base of nothingness, I have taught the way directed to the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, I have taught the crossing of the flood in dependence upon one support or another, I have taught noble liberation.
“Thus, Ānanda, there is action that is incapable and appears incapable; there is action that is incapable and appears capable; there is action that is capable and appears capable; and there is action that is capable and appears incapable.” 
“Tireless energy was aroused in me and unremitting mindfulness was established, my body was tranquil and untroubled, my mind concentrated and unified.
“Tireless energy was aroused in me and unremitting mindfulness was established, my body was tranquil and untroubled, my mind concentrated and unified.
“To the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, Ānanda.”
“To the extent that you may wish: ‘May I recollect my manifold past lives, that is, one birth, two births……Thus with their aspects and particulars may I recollect my manifold past lives’—you will attain the ability to witness any aspect therein, there being a suitable basis.
“To the extent that you may wish: ‘May I understand the minds of other beings, of other persons, having encompassed them with my own mind.
“To the extent that you may wish: ‘May I wield the various kinds of supernormal power: having been one, may I become many; having been many, may I become one; may I appear and vanish; may I go unhindered through a wall, through an enclosure, through a mountain, as though through space; may I dive in and out of the earth as though it were water; may I walk on water without sinking as though it were earth; seated cross-legged, may I travel in space like a bird; with my hand may I touch and stroke the moon and sun so powerful and mighty; may I wield bodily mastery even as far as the Brahma-world’—you will attain the ability to witness any aspect therein, there being a suitable basis.
“To the extent that you may wish: ‘May I, by realising for myself with direct knowledge, here and now enter upon and abide in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints’—you will attain the ability to witness any aspect therein, there being a suitable basis.”
“To the extent that you may wish: ‘May I, with the divine ear element, which is purified and surpasses the human, hear both kinds of sounds, the divine and the human, those that are far as well as near’—you will attain the ability to witness any aspect therein, there being a suitable basis.
“To the extent that you may wish: ‘May I, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, see beings passing away and reappearing, inferior and superior, fair and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate……and may I understand how beings pass on according to their actions’—you will attain the ability to witness any aspect therein, there being a suitable basis.
“To what reason do you attribute that?”
“True knowledge is the counterpart of ignorance.”
“Udāyin, at that point an exclusively pleasant world has not yet been realised; that is only the practical way to realise an exclusively pleasant world.”.
“Udāyin, if someone should recollect his manifold past lives, that is, one birth, two births…thus, with their aspects and particulars, should he recollect his manifold past lives, then either he might ask me a question about the past or I might ask him a question about the past, and he might satisfy my mind with his answer to my question or I might satisfy his mind with my answer to his question.
“Udāyin, there are certain clansmen here who, when told by me ‘Abandon this,’ say: ‘What, such a mere trifle, such a little thing to be abandoned as this, the Blessed One tells us to abandon, the Sublime One tells us to relinquish.’
“Udāyin, there are four kinds of persons to be found existing in the world.
“Udāyin, you might continue for a long time in this way.
“Under the mental rod, venerable sir.” 
“Under whom have you gone forth, bhikkhu?
“Unification of mind, friend Visākha, is concentration; the four foundations of mindfulness are the basis of concentration; the four right kinds of striving are the equipment of concentration; the repetition, development, and cultivation of these same states is the development of concentration therein.” 
“Vaccha, greed is unwholesome, non-greed is wholesome; hate is unwholesome, non-hate is wholesome; delusion is unwholesome, non-delusion is wholesome.
“Vaccha, I do not hold the view: ‘After death a Tathāgata both exists and does not exist: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’”
“Vaccha, I do not hold the view: ‘After death a Tathāgata does not exist: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’”
“Vaccha, I do not hold the view: ‘After death a Tathāgata exists: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’”
“Vaccha, I do not hold the view: ‘After death a Tathāgata neither exists nor does not exist: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’”
“Vaccha, I do not hold the view: ‘The soul and the body are the same: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’”
“Vaccha, I do not hold the view: ‘The soul is one thing and the body another: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’”
“Vaccha, I do not hold the view: ‘The world is eternal: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’”
“Vaccha, I do not hold the view: ‘The world is finite: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’”
“Vaccha, if you answer thus: ‘The recluse Gotama has the threefold true knowledge,’ you will be saying what has been said by me and will not misrepresent me with what is contrary to fact.
“Vaccha, one who formerly belonged to another sect and desires the going forth and the full admission in this Dhamma and Discipline lives on probation for four months.
“Vaccha, the speculative view that the world is eternal is a thicket of views, a wilderness of views, a contortion of views, a vacillation of views, a fetter of views.
“Vaccha, there are not only one hundred or two or three or four or five hundred, but far more householders who, without abandoning the fetter of householdership, on the dissolution of the body have gone to heaven.”
“Vaccha, there is no householder who, without abandoning the fetter of householdership, on the dissolution of the body has made an end of suffering.”
“Vaccha, ‘speculative view’ is something that the Tathāgata has put away.
“Venerable Anuruddha, what is the cause and reason why among those deities that have reappeared in a single order of gods, some are deities of Defiled Radiance, some deities of Pure Radiance?”
“Venerable Anuruddha, what is the cause and reason why among those deities that have reappeared in a single order of gods, some are deities of Limited Radiance, some deities of Immeasurable Radiance?”
“Venerable Sāriputta, I am not getting well, I am not comfortable.
“Venerable sir, a new assembly hall has recently been built here for the Sakyans of Kapilavatthu and it has not yet been inhabited by any recluse or brahmin or human being at all.
“Venerable sir, a transgression overcame me, in that like a fool, confused and blundering, when a training precept was being made known by the Blessed One, when the Sangha of bhikkhus was undertaking the training, I declared my refusal.
“Venerable sir, a Wheel-turning Monarch would experience pleasure and joy because of possessing even one treasure, let alone seven treasures and four kinds of success.”
“Venerable sir, although the Blessed One has spoken thus, yet the bodily rod is the most reprehensible for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action, and not so much the verbal rod and the mental rod.”
“Venerable sir, although the Blessed One has spoken thus, yet the bodily rod is the most reprehensible for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action, and not so much the verbal rod and the mental rod.”
“Venerable sir, although the Blessed One has spoken thus, yet the bodily rod is the most reprehensible for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action, and not so much the verbal rod and the mental rod.” 
“Venerable sir, as to that, I think thus: ‘It is a gain for me, it is a great gain for me that I am living with such companions in the holy life.’
“Venerable sir, as to that, I think thus: ‘It is a gain for me, it is a great gain for me, that I am living with such companions in the holy life.’
“Venerable sir, as to that, whichever of us returns first from the village with almsfood prepares the seats, sets out the water for drinking and for washing, and puts the refuse bucket in its place.
“Venerable sir, as to that, whichever of us returns first from the village with almsfood prepares the seats, sets out the water for drinking and for washing, and puts the refuse bucket in its place.
“Venerable sir, as we abide here diligent, ardent, and resolute, we perceive both light and a vision of forms.
“Venerable sir, at what point is an exclusively pleasant world realised?”
“Venerable sir, can there be agitation about what is non-existent internally?”
“Venerable sir, can there be no agitation about what is non-existent externally?”
“Venerable sir, can there be no agitation about what is non-existent internally?”
“Venerable sir, did you have some conversation with him?”
“Venerable sir, even if he had one of those deficiencies, he could not train under me, so what of the five?”
“Venerable sir, even if he had one of those qualities he could train under me, so what of the five?”
“Venerable sir, he would have done so unknowing and unseeing, out of faith in the man with good eyesight.”
“Venerable sir, how could these four similes have occurred to me to Prince Jayasena as they occur to the Blessed One, since they are spontaneous and have never been heard before?”
“Venerable sir, how could these two similes have occurred to me to Prince Jayasena as they occur to the Blessed One, since they are spontaneous and have never been heard before?”
“Venerable sir, how does identity view come to be?” 
“Venerable sir, how does one know, how does one see, so that in regard to this body with its consciousness and all external signs, there is no I-making, mine-making, and underlying tendency to conceit?”
“Venerable sir, how is mindfulness of breathing developed and cultivated, so that it is of great fruit and great benefit?”
“Venerable sir, how is the cutting off of affairs in the Noble One’s Discipline achieved entirely and in all ways?
“Venerable sir, how many kinds of feeling have been stated by the Blessed One?”
“Venerable sir, how should I answer that I may say what has been said by the Blessed One and not misrepresent him with what is contrary to fact?
“Venerable sir, I am even more satisfied and pleased with the Blessed One for telling me that.
“Venerable sir, I am even more satisfied and pleased with the Blessed One for telling me that.
“Venerable sir, I am not crying because the Blessed One has said this about me, but because I have long taken up and practised this ox-duty.
“Venerable sir, I am not willing to eat in that way either; for if I were to do so, I might also have worry and anxiety about it.” 
“Venerable sir, I am well known as a charioteer skilled in the parts of a chariot.
“Venerable sir, I cannot even recollect with their aspects and particulars all that I have experienced within this present existence, so how should I recollect my manifold past lives, that is, one birth, two births…with their aspects and particulars, as the Blessed One does?
“Venerable sir, I have heard this: ‘The recluse Gotama claims to be omniscient and all-seeing, to have complete knowledge and vision thus: “Whether I am walking or standing or sleeping or awake, knowledge and vision are continuously and uninterruptedly present to me.”’ Venerable sir, do those who speak thus say what has been said by the Blessed One, and not misrepresent him with what is contrary to fact?
“Venerable sir, I have heard this: ‘They slaughter living beings for the recluse Gotama; the recluse Gotama knowingly eats meat prepared for him from animals killed for his sake.’
“Venerable sir, I have long been one who did not fulfil the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.”
“Venerable sir, I infer according to Dhamma about the Blessed One: ‘The Blessed One is fully enlightened, the Dhamma is well proclaimed by the Blessed One, the Sangha of the Blessed One’s disciples is practising the good way.’
“Venerable sir, I remember identity view as a lower fetter taught by the Blessed One.
“Venerable sir, I see five qualities in the Blessed One because of which his disciples honour, respect, revere, and venerate him, and live in dependence on him, honouring and respecting him.
“Venerable sir, I shall see to it that my parents permit me to go forth from the home life into homelessness.”
“Venerable sir, I think thus: the immeasurable deliverance of mind and the exalted deliverance of mind—these states are one in meaning and different only in name.”
“Venerable sir, I thought thus: ‘The Sangha of bhikkhus has been dismissed by the Blessed One.
“Venerable sir, I thought thus: ‘The Sangha of bhikkhus has been dismissed by the Blessed One.
“Venerable sir, I thought thus: ‘These brahmins are devoted to the Brahma-world.
“Venerable sir, I understand the detailed meaning of the Blessed One’s utterance, which he has spoken in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, to be thus.”
“Venerable sir, I understand the detailed meaning of the Blessed One’s utterance, which he has spoken in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, to be thus.”
“Venerable sir, I understand the detailed meaning of the Blessed One’s utterance, which he has spoken in brief without expounding the detailed meaning, to be thus.”
“Venerable sir, I was asking whether that Brahmā comes back to this state or whether he does not.”
“Venerable sir, I was asking whether those gods come back to this state or whether they do not.”
“Venerable sir, I was not asking about this present life; I was asking about the life to come.
“Venerable sir, I was satisfied and pleased by the Blessed One’s very first simile.
“Venerable sir, I would receive the full admission under the Blessed One.”
“Venerable sir, I would take it out.
“Venerable sir, if the people of Sunāparanta do give me a blow with a clod, then I shall think: ‘These people of Sunāparanta are excellent, truly excellent, in that they did not give me a blow with a stick.’
“Venerable sir, if the people of Sunāparanta do give me a blow with a knife, then I shall think: ‘These people of Sunāparanta are excellent, truly excellent, in that they have not taken my life with a sharp knife.’
“Venerable sir, if the people of Sunāparanta do give me a blow with a stick, then I shall think: ‘These people of Sunāparanta are excellent, truly excellent, in that they did not give me a blow with a knife.’
“Venerable sir, if the people of Sunāparanta do give me a blow with the fist, then I shall think: ‘These people of Sunāparanta are excellent, truly excellent, in that they did not give me a blow with a clod.’
“Venerable sir, if the people of Sunāparanta do take my life with a sharp knife, then I shall think thus: ‘There have been disciples of the Blessed One who, being repelled, humiliated, and disgusted by the body and by life, have sought an assailant.
“Venerable sir, if the people of Sun̄paranta abuse and threaten me, then I shall think: ‘These people of Sunāparanta are excellent, truly excellent, in that they did not give me a blow with the fist.’
“Venerable sir, if this is the path, the way to the abandoning of the five lower fetters, then how is it that some bhikkhus here gain deliverance of mind and some gain deliverance by wisdom?”
“Venerable sir, if those who formerly belonged to another sect and desire the going forth and the full admission in this Dhamma and Discipline live on probation for four months, and if at the end of the four months the bhikkhus being satisfied with them give them the going forth and the full admission to the bhikkhus’ state, then I will live on probation for four years.
“Venerable sir, if those who formerly belonged to another sect and desire the going forth and the full admission in this Dhamma and Discipline live on probation for four months, and if at the end of the four months the bhikkhus being satisfied with them give them the going forth and the full admission to the bhikkhus’ state, then I will live on probation for four years.
“Venerable sir, if those who formerly belonged to another sect and desire the going forth and the full admission in this Dhamma and Discipline live on probation for four months, and if at the end of the four months the bhikkhus being satisfied with them give them the going forth and the full admission to the bhikkhus’ state, then I will live on probation for four years.
“Venerable sir, in recent days there was one claiming to be omniscient and all-seeing, to have complete knowledge and vision thus: ‘Whether I am walking or standing or sleeping or awake, knowledge and vision are continuously and uninterruptedly present to me.’
“Venerable sir, is that clinging the same as these five aggregates affected by clinging, or is the clinging something apart from the five aggregates affected by clinging?” 
“Venerable sir, it is taught in our own teachers’ doctrine: ‘There is an exclusively pleasant world; there is a practical way to realise an exclusively pleasant world.’
“Venerable sir, it is taught in our own teachers’ doctrine: ‘There is an exclusively pleasant world; there is a practical way to realise an exclusively pleasant world.’”
“Venerable sir, it is taught in our own teachers’ doctrine: ‘This is the perfect splendour, this is the perfect splendour.’
“Venerable sir, it is taught that in our own teachers’ doctrine: ‘This is the perfect splendour, this is the perfect splendour!’”
“Venerable sir, it is that which speaks and feels and experiences here and there the result of good and bad actions.” 
“Venerable sir, it is the venerable Nandaka’s turn to advise the bhikkhunīs, but he does not want to advise them even though it is his turn.”
“Venerable sir, it would be good if the Blessed One would give me brief advice.
“Venerable sir, it would be good if, out of compassion, the Blessed One would expound to me in detail these eight things that lead to the cutting off of affairs in the Noble One’s Discipline, which have been stated in brief by the Blessed One without being expounded in detail.”
“Venerable sir, just as a beautiful beryl gem of purest water, eight-faceted, well cut, lying on red brocade, glows, radiates, and shines, of such splendour is the self unimpaired after death.” 
“Venerable sir, King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha is not attacking me, nor are the Licchavis of Vesālī, nor are other hostile kings.
“Venerable sir, let be the discussion for which we are now sitting together here.
“Venerable sir, let be the discussion for which we are now sitting together here.
“Venerable sir, let the Blessed One delight in the Sangha of bhikkhus; venerable sir, let the Blessed One welcome the Sangha of bhikkhus; venerable sir, let the Blessed One help the Sangha of bhikkhus now as he used to help it in the past.
“Venerable sir, let the Blessed One delight in the Sangha of bhikkhus; venerable sir, let the Blessed One welcome the Sangha of bhikkhus;…… now as he used to help it in the past.”
“Venerable sir, many resting places have been prepared in Kāḷakhemaka the Sakyan’s dwelling.
“Venerable sir, my bowl and robes are not complete.”
“Venerable sir, now that the Blessed One has given me this brief advice, I am going to dwell in the Sunāparanta country.”
“Venerable sir, of what family is the noble lord’s father?
“Venerable sir, on one occasion the Blessed One was living in the Sakyan country where there is a town of the Sakyans named Nagaraka.
“Venerable sir, our discussion on the Dhamma that was interrupted was about the Blessed One himself.
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guided by the Blessed One, have the Blessed One as their resort.
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guided by the Blessed One, have the Blessed One as their resort.
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guided by the Blessed One, have the Blessed One as their resort.
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guided by the Blessed One, have the Blessed One as their resort.
“Venerable sir, shall I go and find out whether or not the householder Upāli has gone over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama?”
“Venerable sir, since for the Blessed One feelings are known as they arise, as they are present, as they disappear; perceptions are known as they arise, as they are present, as they disappear; thoughts are known as they arise, as they are present, as they disappear—this too I remember as a wonderful and marvellous quality of the Blessed One.”
“Venerable sir, such a recluse or brahmin possessed of supernormal power and attained to mastery of mind would be able to reduce ten, twenty, thirty, forty, or even fifty Nāḷandās to ashes with one mental act of hate, so what does a single trivial Nāḷandā count for?”
“Venerable sir, such acquisition of individuality as causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it should not be cultivated.
“Venerable sir, such acquisition of perception as causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it should not be cultivated.
“Venerable sir, such acquisition of view as causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it should not be cultivated.
“Venerable sir, such bodily conduct as causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it should not be cultivated.
“Venerable sir, such forms cognizable by the eye as cause unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates them should not be cultivated.
“Venerable sir, such inclination of mind as causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it should not be cultivated.
“Venerable sir, such mental conduct as causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it should not be cultivated.
“Venerable sir, such mind-objects cognizable by the mind as cause unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates them should not be cultivated.
“Venerable sir, such persons as causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it should not be cultivated.
“Venerable sir, such robes as cause unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates them should not be cultivated.
“Venerable sir, such verbal conduct as causes unwholesome states to increase and wholesome states to diminish in one who cultivates it should not be cultivated.
“Venerable sir, suppose there were a great heap of many kinds of flowers, and then a clever garland-maker or garland-maker’s apprentice were to knot them into a multicoloured garland; so too, venerable sir, the Blessed One has many praiseworthy qualities, many hundreds of praiseworthy qualities.
“Venerable sir, surely it is for the sake of realising that exclusively pleasant world that bhikkhus lead the holy life under the Blessed One.”
“Venerable sir, ten, twenty, thirty, forty, or even fifty men would not be able to make all the living beings in this town of Nāḷandā into one mass of flesh, into one heap of flesh in one moment or instant, so what does a single trivial man count for?”
“Venerable sir, that is not the practical way to realise an exclusively pleasant world; at that point an exclusively pleasant world has already been realised.”
“Venerable sir, that man would experience pain and grief because of being struck with even one spear, let alone three hundred.”
“Venerable sir, that splendour is the perfect splendour which is unsurpassed by any other splendour higher or more sublime.”
“Venerable sir, that splendour is the perfect splendour which is unsurpassed by any other splendour higher or more sublime.”
“Venerable sir, the assembly hall has been covered completely with coverings and seats have been prepared, a large water jug has been put out and an oil-lamp hung up.
“Venerable sir, the kind of person who torments himself and pursues the practice of torturing himself, torments and tortures himself though he desires pleasure and recoils from pain; that is why this kind of person does not satisfy my mind.
“Venerable sir, the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta does not describe what is unintended as greatly reprehensible.”
“Venerable sir, the sisters Somā and Sakulā heard: ‘Today King Pasenadi of Kosala will go to see the Blessed One after he has had his breakfast.’
“Venerable sir, the small stone that the Blessed One has taken, the size of his hand, does not count beside Himalaya, the king of mountains; it is not even a fraction, there is no comparison.”
“Venerable sir, the small stone that the Blessed One has taken, the size of his hand, does not count beside Himalaya, the king of mountains; it is not even a fraction, there is no comparison.”
“Venerable sir, the venerable Puṇṇa Mantāṇiputta is so esteemed in the native land by the bhikkhus there, by his companions in the holy life.ʺ 
“Venerable sir, the venerable Revata and the venerable Ānanda came to me to listen to the Dhamma.
“Venerable sir, there are gods called ‘mind-bound’; he would be reborn there.
“Venerable sir, there are these four castes: the nobles, the brahmins, the merchants, and the workers.
“Venerable sir, there is a Vajjian village called Pubbajira.
“Venerable sir, there was once a brahmin who was old, aged, and burdened with years, and he had as a wife a young brahmin girl who was pregnant and near her confinement.
“Venerable sir, they are five hundred bhikkhus headed by Sāriputta and Moggallāna who have come to Cātumā to see the Blessed One.
“Venerable sir, this Blessed One is living at Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s Park.
“Venerable sir, this river Aciravatī has been seen both by the venerable Ānanda and by ourselves when a great cloud has rained heavily on the mountains; then this river Aciravatī overflows both its banks.
“Venerable sir, various views arise in the world associated either with doctrines of a self or with doctrines about the world.
“Venerable sir, we are five hundred bhikkhus headed by Sāriputta and Moggallāna who have come to Cātumā to see the Blessed One.
“Venerable sir, we think thus about the Blessed One: ‘The Blessed One is compassionate and seeks our welfare; he teaches the Dhamma out of compassion.’”
“Venerable sir, we would pay homage to him, or rise up for him, or invite him to be seated; or we would invite him to accept robes, almsfood, a resting place, or medicinal requisites; or we would arrange for him lawful guarding, defence, and protection.
“Venerable sir, what I said referred to precisely that.”
“Venerable sir, what I said referred to precisely that.”
“Venerable sir, what is that practical way to realise an exclusively pleasant world?”
“Venerable sir, what is the cause, what is the reason, why there were previously fewer training rules and more bhikkhus became established in final knowledge?
“Venerable sir, when learned nobles, learned brahmins, learned householders, and learned recluses, after formulating a question, then go to the Blessed One and pose it, has there already been in the Blessed One’s mind the thought: ‘If they come to me and ask me thus, I shall answer thus’?
“Venerable sir, who am I that I should possess any cutting off of affairs entirely and in all ways like that in the Noble One’s Discipline?
“Venerable sir, who are we that we should understand the Dhamma?”
“Venerable sir, who would ever think that sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair are born from those who are dear, arise from those who are dear?
“Venerable sir, would a Tathāgata utter such speech as would be unwelcome and disagreeable to others?”
“Venerable sir, wouldn’t I be telling a deliberate lie, for I have intentionally deprived many living beings of life?”
“Venerable Ānanda, has any one thing been proclaimed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute, his unliberated mind comes to be liberated, his undestroyed taints come to be destroyed, and he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before?” 
“Visiting is most helpful for paying respect, Bhāradvāja.
“Vital formations, friend, are not things that can be felt.
“Vitality stands in dependence on heat.” 
“Wanderers of other sects who ask thus may be answered in this way: ‘How then, friends, is the goal one or many?’
“We are both acknowledged to possess
“We are keeping well, Blessed One, we are comfortable, and we are not having any trouble getting almsfood.”
“We are keeping well, Blessed One, we are comfortable, and we are not having any trouble getting almsfood.”
“We are not without a refuge, brahmin.
“We asked Master Gotama about the preservation of truth, and Master Gotama answered about the preservation of truth; we approve of and accept that answer, and so we are satisfied.
“We did not sit down because we were waiting for Master Udena.
“We do not lead the holy life for the sake of nymphs, sisters.”
“We do not think thus about the Blessed One: ‘The recluse Gotama teaches the Dhamma for the sake of robes, or for the sake of almsfood, or for the sake of a resting place, or for the sake of some better state of being.’”
“We do not understand the detailed meaning of Master Gotama’s utterance, which he has spoken in brief without expounding the detailed meaning.
“We have seen Master Gotama walking, sir, we have seen him standing, we have seen him entering indoors, we have seen him indoors seated in silence, we have seen him eating indoors, we have seen him seated in silence after eating, we have seen him giving the blessing after eating, we have seen him going to the monastery, we have seen him in the monastery seated in silence, we have seen him in the monastery teaching the Dhamma to an audience.
“We would ask the venerable Channa certain questions, if the venerable Channa finds it opportune to reply.” “Ask, friend Sāriputta.
“We would conquer it and reign over it, Master Raṭṭhapāla.”
“We would conquer it too and reign over it, Master Raṭṭhapāla.”
“We would have him executed, Master Kaccāna, or we would have him fined, or we would have him exiled, or we would do with him as he deserved.
“We would have him executed, Master Kaccāna, or we would have him fined, or we would have him exiled, or we would do with him as he deserved.
“We would pay homage to him, Master Kaccāna, or rise up for him, or invite him to be seated; or we would invite him to accept robes, almsfood, resting place, and medicinal requisites; or we would arrange for him lawful guarding, defence, and protection.
“We would pay homage to him, Master Kaccāna, or we would rise up for him, or invite him to be seated; or we would invite him to accept robes, almsfood, resting place, and medicinal requisites; or we would arrange for him lawful guarding, defence, and protection.
“Well then, Puṇṇa, listen and attend carefully to what I shall say.”
“Well then, venerable Sāriputta, let such talk on the Dhamma be given to lay people clothed in white.
“Well, Aggivessana, there are plenty in the world who say: ‘It too would be the same, it too would be the same,’ yet they do not abandon that view and they take up still some other view.
“Well, brahmin, has all the world authorised the brahmins to prescribe these four levels of service?”—“No, Master Gotama.”—“Suppose, brahmin, they were to force a cut of meat upon a poor, penniless, destitute man and tell him: ‘Good man, you must eat this meat and pay for it’; so too, without the consent of those recluses and brahmins, the brahmins nevertheless prescribe those four levels of service.
“Well, brahmin, has all the world authorised the brahmins to prescribe these four types of wealth?”— “No, Master Gotama.”—“Suppose, brahmin, they were to force a cut of meat upon a poor, penniless, destitute man and tell him: ‘Good man, you must eat this meat and pay for it’; so too, without the consent of those recluses and brahmins, the brahmins nevertheless prescribe these four types of wealth.
“Well, Puṇṇa, since I certainly cannot persuade you when I say: ‘Enough, Puṇṇa, let that be.
“Well, Seniya, since I certainly cannot persuade you when I say: ‘Enough, Seniya, let that be.
“Well, there are, for example, Nanda Vaccha, Kisa Sankicca, Makkhali Gosāla.
“Well, Udāyin, what is taught in your own teachers’ doctrine?”
“Were it rightly speaking to be said of anything: ‘That is utterly unwished for, utterly undesired, utterly disagreeable,’ it is of hell that, rightly speaking, this should be said, so much so that it is hard to find a simile for the suffering in hell.”
“Were it rightly speaking to be said of anything: ‘That is utterly wished for, utterly desired, utterly agreeable,’ it is of heaven that, rightly speaking, this should be said, so much so that it is hard to finish describing the happiness of heaven.”
“What are the four kinds of success?
“What are the four?
“What are the seven treasures?
“What are the things unfit for attention that he attends to?
“What are the things unfit for attention that he does not attend to?
“What are those higher and more sublime states, venerable sir, for the sake of realising which bhikkhus lead the holy life under the Blessed One?”
“What are unwholesome habits?
“What are unwholesome intentions?
“What are wholesome habits?
“What are wholesome intentions?
“What can hell be well compared to
“What can I do about that, Master Gotama?
“What do you think about me, bhikkhus?
“What do you think, Aggivessana?
“What do you think, Aggivessana?
“What do you think, Aggivessana?
“What do you think, Aggivessana?
“What do you think, Anuruddha?
“What do you think, Assalāyana?
“What do you think, Assalāyana?
“What do you think, Assalāyana?
“What do you think, Assalāyana?
“What do you think, Assalāyana?
“What do you think, Assalāyana?
“What do you think, Assalāyana?
“What do you think, Assalāyana?
“What do you think, Assalāyana?
“What do you think, Assalāyana?
“What do you think, Assalāyana?
“What do you think, Assalāyana?
“What do you think, Bhaddāli?
“What do you think, Bhaddāli?
“What do you think, Bhaddāli?
“What do you think, bhikkhus?
“What do you think, brahmin?
“What do you think, brahmin?
“What do you think, brahmin?
“What do you think, brahmin?
“What do you think, Dhānañjāni?
“What do you think, Dhānañjāni?
“What do you think, Dhānañjāni?
“What do you think, Dhānañjāni?
“What do you think, friend Kaccāna?
“What do you think, general?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, householder?
“What do you think, householder?
“What do you think, householder?
“What do you think, householder?
“What do you think, householder?
“What do you think, householder?
“What do you think, Māgandiya?
“What do you think, Māgandiya?
“What do you think, Māgandiya?
“What do you think, Māgandiya?
“What do you think, prince?
“What do you think, prince?
“What do you think, prince?
“What do you think, Rāhula?
“What do you think, sire?
“What do you think, sire?
“What do you think, student?
“What do you think, student?
“What do you think, student?
“What do you think, student?
“What do you think, student?
“What do you think, Udāyin?
“What do you think, Udāyin?
“What do you think, Udāyin?
“What do you think, Udāyin?
“What do you think, Udāyin?
“What do you think, Udāyin?
“What do you think, Udāyin?
“What do you think, Udāyin?
“What do you think, Udāyin?
“What do you think, Udāyin?
“What do you think, Vaccha?
“What do you think, Ānanda?
“What do you think, Ānanda?
“What does Master Bhāradvāja think of the recluse Gotama’s lucidity of wisdom?
“What does Master Vacchāyana think of the recluse Gotama’s lucidity of wisdom?
“What else could it be, venerable sir, but an utterly and completely foolish teaching?”
“What has this great multitude to do with you, Aggivessana?
“What is better for them, that the statements they make be thoughtful or thoughtless?”—“Thoughtful, Master Gotama.”—“What is better for them, that they make their statements after reflecting or without reflecting?”—“After reflecting, Master Gotama.”—“What is better for them, that the statements they make be beneficial or unbeneficial?”—“Beneficial, Master Gotama.”
“What is egg-born generation?
“What is that consciousness, Sāti?”
“What is that one thing, venerable Ānanda?”
“What is the cause and condition, venerable sir, for the manifestation of the material form aggregate?
“What is the cause and reason, venerable sir, why one bhikkhu here might attain Nibbāna, while another bhikkhu here might not attain Nibbāna?”
“What is the counterpart of deliverance?”
“What is the counterpart of ignorance?”
“What is the counterpart of neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling?”
“What is the counterpart of painful feeling?”
“What is the counterpart of true knowledge?”
“What is the cutting off of affairs like in the Noble One’s Discipline, venerable sir?
“What is the difference, friend, between wisdom and consciousness, these states that are conjoined, not disjoined?”
“What is the path to the company of Brahmā?
“What kind of a person, householders, torments himself and pursues the practice of torturing himself and also torments others and pursues the practice of torturing others?
“What kind of person is a body-witness?
“What kind of person is a Dhamma-follower?
“What kind of person is a faith-follower?
“What kind of person is one attained-to-view?
“What kind of person is one liberated-by-faith?
“What kind of person is one liberated-by-wisdom?
“What kind of person is one liberated-in-both-ways?
“What kind of person, bhikkhus, does not torment himself or pursue the practice of torturing himself and does not torment others or pursue the practice of tormenting others—the one who, since he torments neither himself nor others, is here and now hungerless, extinguished, and cooled, and abides experiencing bliss, having himself become holy?
“What kind of person, bhikkhus, torments himself and pursues the practice of torturing himself and also torments others and pursues the practice of torturing others?
“What kind of person, bhikkhus, torments others and pursues the practice of torturing others?
“What kind of person, householders, does not torment himself or pursue the practice of torturing himself and does not torment others or pursue the practice of torturing others—the one who, since he torments neither himself nor others, is here and now hungerless, extinguished, and cooled, and abides experiencing bliss, having himself become holy?
“What kind of person, householders, torments himself and pursues the practice of torturing himself?
“What kind of person, householders, torments others and pursues the practice of torturing others?
“What kind of regular daily donation does the king of Anga give you, brahmin?”
“What more is to be done?
“What more is to be done?
“What more is to be done?
“What more is to be done?
“What more is to be done?
“What more is to be done?
“What more is to be done?
“What more is to be done?
“What more is to be done?
“What one thinks and ponders by night based upon one’s actions during the day is the ‘fuming by night.’
“What qualities make him difficult to admonish?
“What qualities make him easy to admonish?
“What reasons does Master Vacchāyana see that he has such firm confidence in the recluse Gotama?”
“What should be done for his disciples out of compassion by a teacher who seeks their welfare and has compassion for them, that I have done for you, bhikkhus.
“What should be done for his disciples out of compassion by a teacher who seeks their welfare and has compassion for them, that I have done for you, Cunda.
“What should be done for his disciples out of compassion by a teacher who seeks their welfare and has compassion for them, that I have done for you, Ānanda.
“What should be done for his disciples out of compassion by a Teacher who seeks their welfare and has compassion for them, that I have done for you, Ānanda.
“What should be done, Anuruddha, by a clansman who has gone forth thus?
“What taints, bhikkhus, should be abandoned by avoiding?
“What taints, bhikkhus, should be abandoned by developing?
“What taints, bhikkhus, should be abandoned by enduring?
“What taints, bhikkhus, should be abandoned by removing?
“What taints, bhikkhus, should be abandoned by restraining?
“What taints, bhikkhus, should be abandoned by seeing?
“What taints, bhikkhus, should be abandoned by using?
“What the Blessed One has said appears reasonable, what the Blessed One has said appears to be supported by reason.
“What the Blessed One has said appears reasonable, what the Blessed One has said appears to be supported by reason.
“What the Blessed One has said appears reasonable, what the Blessed One has said appears to be supported by reason: ‘There is no recluse or brahmin who knows all, who sees all, simultaneously; that is not possible.’”
“What they earlier abandoned, Aggivessana, they later gather together again.
“What was your conversation with him like, Tapassī?”
“What was your conversation with him like, venerable sir?”
“What, bhikkhu, is the air element?
“What, bhikkhu, is the earth element?
“What, bhikkhu, is the fire element?
“What, bhikkhu, is the space element?
“What, bhikkhu, is the water element?
“What, bhikkhus, are the five shackles in the heart that he has not severed?
“What, bhikkhus, are the five shackles in the heart that he has severed?
“What, bhikkhus, are the five wildernesses in the heart that he has abandoned?
“What, bhikkhus, are the five wildernesses in the heart that he has not abandoned?
“What, bhikkhus, are the imperfections that defile the mind?
“What, bhikkhus, is fear of crocodiles?
“What, bhikkhus, is fear of sharks?
“What, bhikkhus, is fear of waves?
“What, bhikkhus, is fear of whirlpools?
“What, bhikkhus, is noble right concentration with its supports and its requisites, that is, right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, and right mindfulness?
“What, bhikkhus, is the way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pain?
“What, bhikkhus, is the way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pleasure?
“What, bhikkhus, is the way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pain?
“What, bhikkhus, is the way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pain?
“What, bhikkhus, is the way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure?
“What, friend, is the way in which these states are different in meaning and different in name?
“What, friends, is the air element?
“What, friends, is the earth element?
“What, friends, is the fire element?
“What, friends, is the water element?
“What, householder, is the immeasurable deliverance of mind?
“What, Rāhula, is the air element?
“What, Rāhula, is the fire element?
“What, Rāhula, is the space element?
“What, Rāhula, is the water element?
“What, student, is that work involving a great deal of activity…which, when it fails, is of small fruit?
“What, student, is the path to the company of Brahmā?
“What, venerable sir, is the gratification, what is the danger, and what is the escape in the case of material form?
“Whatever exists therein of feeling, perception, formations, and consciousness, he sees those states as impermanent, as suffering, as a disease, as a tumour, as a barb, as a calamity, as an affliction, as alien, as disintegrating, as void, as not self.
“Whatever exists therein of feeling, perception, formations, and consciousness, he sees those states as impermanent…as not self.
“Whatever exists therein of feeling, perception, formations, and consciousness, he sees those states as impermanent…as not self.
“Whatever exists therein of material form, feeling, perception, formations, and consciousness, he sees those states as impermanent, as suffering, as a disease, as a tumour, as a barb, as a calamity, as an affliction, as alien, as disintegrating, as void, as not self.
“Whatever exists therein of material form, feeling, perception, formations, and consciousness, he sees those states as impermanent…as not self.
“Whatever recluses and brahmins have right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration, if they make an aspiration and they lead the holy life, they are able to procure fruit; if they make no aspiration and they lead the holy life, they are still able to procure fruit; if they both make an aspiration and make no aspiration and they lead the holy life, they are still able to procure fruit; if they neither make an aspiration nor make no aspiration and they lead the holy life, they are still able to procure fruit.
“Whatever recluses and brahmins have wrong view, wrong intention, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, and wrong concentration, if they make an aspiration and they lead the holy life, they are unable to procure any fruit; if they make no aspiration and they lead the holy life, they are still unable to procure any fruit; if they both make an aspiration and make no aspiration and they lead the holy life, they are still unable to procure any fruit; if they neither make an aspiration nor make no aspiration and they lead the holy life, they are still unable to procure any fruit.
“When a bhikkhu abides thus, if his mind inclines to talking, he resolves: ‘Such talk as is low, vulgar, coarse, ignoble, unbeneficial, and which does not lead to disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, peace, direct knowledge, enlightenment, and Nibbāna, that is, talk of kings, robbers, ministers, armies, dangers, battles, food, drink, clothing, beds, garlands, perfumes, relatives, vehicles, villages, towns, cities, countries, women, heroes, streets, wells, the dead, trivialities, the origin of the world, the origin of the sea, whether things are so or are not so: such talk I shall not utter.’
“When a bhikkhu abides thus, if his mind inclines to thinking, he resolves: ‘Such thoughts as are low, vulgar, coarse, ignoble, unbeneficial, and which do not lead to disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, peace, direct knowledge, enlightenment, and Nibbāna, that is, thoughts of sensual desire, thoughts of ill will, and thoughts of cruelty: such thoughts I shall not think.’
“When a bhikkhu abides thus, if his mind inclines to walking, he walks, thinking: ‘While I am walking thus, no evil unwholesome states of covetousness and grief will beset me.’
“When a bhikkhu has abandoned craving, cut it off at the root, made it like a palm stump, done away with it so that it is no longer subject to future arising, then that bhikkhu is an arahant with taints destroyed, one who has lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached the true goal, destroyed the fetters of being, and is completely liberated through final knowledge.”
“When a bhikkhu has known that covetousness and unrighteous greed is an imperfection that defiles the mind and has abandoned it; when a bhikkhu has known that ill will…negligence is an imperfection that defiles the mind and has abandoned it, he acquires unwavering confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is accomplished, fully enlightened, perfect in true knowledge and conduct, sublime, knower of worlds, incomparable leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of gods and humans, enlightened, blessed.’
“When a bhikkhu possesses these eleven qualities, he is capable of growth, increase, and fulfilment in this Dhamma and Discipline.”
“When a bhikkhu possesses these eleven qualities, he is incapable of growth, increase, and fulfilment in this Dhamma and Discipline.
“When a bhikkhu’s mind is liberated thus, Master Gotama, where does he reappear?”
“When a bhikkhu’s mind is thus liberated, he possesses three unsurpassable qualities: unsurpassable vision, unsurpassable practice, and unsurpassable deliverance.
“When a forest-dwelling bhikkhu comes to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha, he should be easy to correct and should associate with good friends.
“When a forest-dwelling bhikkhu comes to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha, he should be skilled in good behaviour regarding seats thus: ‘I shall sit down in such a way that I do not encroach upon elder bhikkhus and do not deny new bhikkhus a seat.’
“When a forest-dwelling bhikkhu comes to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha, he should not be haughty and personally vain.
“When a forest-dwelling bhikkhu comes to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha, he should not be rough-tongued and loose-spoken.
“When a forest-dwelling bhikkhu comes to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha, he should not enter the village too early or return late in the day.
“When a forest-dwelling bhikkhu comes to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha, he should not go before the meal or after the meal to visit families.
“When a man possesses four qualities, carpenter, I describe him, not as accomplished in what is wholesome or perfected in what is wholesome or an ascetic invincible attained to the supreme attainment, but as one who stands in the same category as the young tender infant lying prone.
“When a man possesses ten qualities, carpenter, I describe him as accomplished in what is wholesome, perfected in what is wholesome, an ascetic invincible attained to the supreme attainment.
“When a noble disciple has thus become one who is possessed of virtue, who guards the doors of his sense faculties, who is moderate in eating, who is devoted to wakefulness, who possesses seven good qualities, who obtains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhānas that constitute the higher mind and provide a pleasant abiding here and now, he is called one in higher training who has entered upon the way.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood ageing and death, the origin of ageing and death, the cessation of ageing and death, and the way leading to the cessation of ageing and death…he here and now makes an end of suffering.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood being, the origin of being, the cessation of being, and the way leading to the cessation of being…he here and now makes an end of suffering.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood birth, the origin of birth, the cessation of birth, and the way leading to the cessation of birth…he here and now makes an end of suffering.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood clinging, the origin of clinging, the cessation of clinging, and the way leading to the cessation of clinging…he here and now makes an end of suffering.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood consciousness, the origin of consciousness, the cessation of consciousness, and the way leading to the cessation of consciousness …he here and now makes an end of suffering.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood contact, the origin of contact, the cessation of contact, and the way leading to the cessation of contact…he here and now makes an end of suffering.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood craving, the origin of craving, the cessation of craving, and the way leading to the cessation of craving…he here and now makes an end of suffering.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood feeling, the origin of feeling, the cessation of feeling, and the way leading to the cessation of feeling…he here and now makes an end of suffering.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood formations, the origin of formations, the cessation of formations, and the way leading to the cessation of formations…he here and now makes an end of suffering.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood ignorance, the origin of ignorance, the cessation of ignorance, and the way leading to the cessation of ignorance…he here and now makes an end of suffering.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood mentality-materiality, the origin of mentality-materiality, the cessation of mentality-materiality, and the way leading to the cessation of mentality-materiality…he here and now makes an end of suffering.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood nutriment, the origin of nutriment, the cessation of nutriment, and the way leading to the cessation of nutriment, he entirely abandons the underlying tendency to greed, he abolishes the underlying tendency to aversion, he extirpates the underlying tendency to the view and conceit ‘I am,’ and by abandoning ignorance and arousing true knowledge he here and now makes an end of suffering.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood suffering, the origin of suffering, the cessation of suffering, and the way leading to the cessation of suffering…he here and now makes an end of suffering.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood the sixfold base, the origin of the sixfold base, the cessation of the sixfold base, and the way leading to the cessation of the sixfold base…he here and now makes an end of suffering.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood the taints, the origin of the taints, the cessation of the taints, and the way leading to the cessation of the taints, he entirely abandons the underlying tendency to lust, he abolishes the underlying tendency to aversion, he extirpates the underlying tendency to the view and conceit ‘I am,’ and by abandoning ignorance and arousing true knowledge he here and now makes an end of suffering.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood the unwholesome and the root of the unwholesome, the wholesome and the root of the wholesome, he entirely abandons the underlying tendency to lust, he abolishes the underlying tendency to aversion, he extirpates the underlying tendency to the view and conceit ‘I am,’ and by abandoning ignorance and arousing true knowledge he here and now makes an end of suffering.
“When a noble disciple is possessed of virtue, that pertains to his conduct.
“When a noble disciple is thus possessed of seven factors, he has well sought the character for realisation of the fruit of stream-entry.
“When a virtuous person to an immoral person gives
“When asked: ‘But, friend, is purification of virtue final Nibbāna without clinging?’ you replied: ‘No, friend.’
“When did you concoct that hymn of praise to the recluse Gotama, householder?”
“When he abides contemplating rise and fall in these five aggregates affected by clinging, the conceit ‘I am’ based on these five aggregates affected by clinging is abandoned in him.
“When he attends unwisely in this way, one of six views arises in him.
“When he comes to know this, he investigates him further thus: ‘Are there found in the Tathāgata or not any mixed states cognizable through the eye or through the ear?’
“When he comes to know this, he investigates him further thus: ‘Are there found in the Tathāgata or not cleansed states cognizable through the eye or through the ear?’
“When he comes to know this, he investigates him further thus: ‘Has this venerable one acquired renown and attained fame, so that the dangers are found in him?’
“When he comes to know this, he investigates him further thus: ‘Has this venerable one attained this wholesome state over a long time or did he attain it recently?’
“When he comes to know this, he investigates him further thus: ‘Is this venerable one restrained without fear, not restrained by fear, and does he avoid indulging in sensual pleasures because he is without lust through the destruction of lust?’
“When he goes indoors, he does not raise or lower his body, or bend it forward or back.
“When he grows up and his faculties mature, the child plays at such games as toy ploughs, tipcat, somersaults, toy windmills, toy measures, toy cars, and a toy bow and arrow.
“When he grows up and his faculties mature, the youth enjoys himself provided and endowed with the five cords of sensual pleasure, with forms cognizable by the eye… sounds cognizable by the ear…odours cognizable by the nose… flavours cognizable by the tongue…tangibles cognizable by the body that are wished for, desired, agreeable and likeable, connected with sensual desire, and provocative of lust.
“When he has eaten and receives water for the bowl, he does not raise or lower the bowl or tip it forwards or backwards.
“When he has eaten, he puts the bowl on the floor neither too far nor too near; and he is neither careless of the bowl nor over-solicitous about it.
“When he has eaten, he sits in silence for a while, but he does not let the time for the blessing go by.
“When he has given up, expelled, released, abandoned, and relinquished in part, he considers thus: ‘I am possessed of unwavering confidence in the Buddha,’ and he gains inspiration in the meaning, gains inspiration in the Dhamma, gains gladness connected with the Dhamma.
“When he has gone to the monastery, he sits down on a seat made ready.
“When he has gone to the monastery, he teaches the Dhamma to an audience.
“When he has heard a sound with the ear…smelt an odour with the nose…tasted a flavour with the tongue…touched a tangible with the body…cognized a mind-object with the mind, if his consciousness does not follow after the sign of the mind-object, is not tied and shackled by gratification in the sign of the mind-object, is not fettered by the fetter of gratification in the sign of the mind-object, then his consciousness is called ‘not distracted and scattered externally.’
“When he has heard a sound with the ear…smelt an odour with the nose…tasted a flavour with the tongue…touched a tangible with the body…cognized a mind-object with the mind, if his consciousness follows after the sign of the mind-object, is tied and shackled by gratification in the sign of the mind-object, is fettered by the fetter of gratification in the sign of the mind-object, then his consciousness is called ‘distracted and scattered externally.’
“When he has investigated him and has seen that he is purified from states based on delusion, then he places faith in him; filled with faith he visits him and pays respect to him; having paid respect to him, he gives ear; when he gives ear, he hears the Dhamma; having heard the Dhamma, he memorises it and examines the meaning of the teachings he has memorised; when he examines their meaning, he gains a reflective acceptance of those teachings; when he has gained a reflective acceptance of those teachings, zeal springs up; when zeal has sprung up, he applies his will; having applied his will, he scrutinises; having scrutinised, he strives; resolutely striving, he realises with the body the supreme truth and sees it by penetrating it with wisdom.
“When he has investigated him and has seen that he is purified from states based on greed, he next investigates him in regard to states based on hate: ‘Are there in this venerable one any states based on hate such that, with his mind obsessed by those states…he might urge others to act in a way that would lead to their harm and suffering for a long time?’
“When he has investigated him and has seen that he is purified from states based on hate, he next investigates him in regard to states based on delusion: ‘Are there in this venerable one any states based on delusion such that, with his mind obsessed by those states…he might urge others to act in a way that would lead to their harm and suffering for a long time?’
“When he knows and sees thus, his mind is liberated from the taint of sensual desire, from the taint of being, and from the taint of ignorance.
“When he knows and sees thus, his mind is liberated from the taint of sensual desire, from the taint of being, and from the taint of ignorance.
“When he knows and sees thus, his mind is liberated from the taint of sensual desire, from the taint of being, and from the taint of ignorance.
“When he knows and sees thus, his mind is liberated from the taint of sensual desire, from the taint of being, and from the taint of ignorance.
“When he knows and sees thus, his mind is liberated from the taint of sensual desire, from the taint of being, and from the taint of ignorance.
“When he knows and sees thus, his mind is liberated from the taint of sensual desire, from the taint of being, and from the taint of ignorance.
“When he knows and sees thus, his mind is liberated from the taint of sensual desire, from the taint of being, and from the taint of ignorance.
“When he knows and sees thus, his mind is liberated from the taint of sensual desire, from the taint of being, and from the taint of ignorance.
“When he receives rice, he does not raise or lower the bowl or tip it forwards or backwards.
“When he receives the water for the bowl, he does not raise or lower the bowl or tip it forwards or backwards.
“When he recollects his manifold past lives…with their aspects and particulars, that pertains to his true knowledge.
“When he walks, he steps out with the right foot first.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified and bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the recollection of past lives……Thus with their aspects and particulars he recollects his manifold past lives.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified and bright…attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the destruction of the taints.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified and bright…attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the passing away and reappearance of beings……Thus with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he understands how beings pass on according to their actions.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the destruction of the taints.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the destruction of the taints.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the destruction of the taints.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the destruction of the taints.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the destruction of the taints.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the destruction of the taints.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the passing away and reappearance of beings.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the passing away and reappearance of beings.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the passing away and reappearance of beings......
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the passing away and reappearance of beings......Thus with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he sees beings passing away and reappearing, inferior and superior, fair and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and he understands how beings pass on according to their actions.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the passing away and reappearance of beings… …Thus with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he sees beings passing away and reappearing, inferior and superior, fair and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and he understands how beings pass on according to their actions.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the passing away and reappearance of beings…...
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the recollection of past lives.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the recollection of past lives.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the recollection of past lives.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the recollection of past lives.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the recollection of past lives.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the recollection of past lives.
“When I knew and saw thus, my mind was liberated from the taint of sensual desire, from the taint of being, and from the taint of ignorance.
“When I knew and saw thus, my mind was liberated from the taint of sensual desire, from the taint of being, and from the taint of ignorance.
“When I recollect the past ninety-one aeons, Vaccha, I do not recall any Ājīvaka who, on the dissolution of the body, went to heaven, with one exception, and he held the doctrine of the moral efficacy of action, the doctrine of the moral efficacy of deeds.” 
“When I saw these four footprints of the recluse Gotama, I came to the conclusion: ‘The Blessed One is fully enlightened, the Dhamma is well proclaimed by the Blessed One, the Sangha is practising the good way.’”
“When I was twenty or twenty-five years old, Master Raṭṭhapāla, I was an expert rider of elephants…strong in thighs and arms, sturdy, capable in battle.
“When many voices shout at once
“When Master Gotama is asked these four questions, he replies: ‘The term “reappears” does not apply, Vaccha; the term “does not reappear” does not apply, Vaccha; the term “both reappears and does not reappear” does not apply, Vaccha; the term “neither reappears nor does not reappear” does not apply, Vaccha.’
“When my concentrated mind was thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, I directed it to knowledge of the destruction of the taints.
“When my concentrated mind was thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, I directed it to knowledge of the destruction of the taints.
“When my concentrated mind was thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, I directed it to knowledge of the passing away and reappearance of beings.
“When my concentrated mind was thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, I directed it to knowledge of the passing away and reappearance of beings…… Thus with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, I saw beings passing away and reappearing, inferior and superior, fair and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and I understood how beings pass on according to their actions.
“When my concentrated mind was thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, I directed it to knowledge of the recollection of past lives.
“When my concentrated mind was thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, I directed it to knowledge of the recollection of past lives.
“When one abides inflamed by lust, fettered, infatuated, contemplating gratification, then the five aggregates affected by clinging are built up for oneself in the future; and one’s craving—which brings renewal of being, is accompanied by delight and lust, and delights in this and that—increases.
“When one abides uninflamed by lust, unfettered, uninfatuated, contemplating danger, then the five aggregates affected by clinging are diminished for oneself in the future; and one’s craving—which brings renewal of being, is accompanied by delight and lust, and delights in this or that—is abandoned.
“When one does not say: ‘All those engaged in the pursuit of self-mortification…have entered upon the wrong way,’ but says instead: ‘The pursuit is a state beset by suffering, vexation, despair, and fever, and it is the wrong way,’ then one teaches only the Dhamma.
“When one does not say: ‘All those who have not abandoned the fetter of being…have entered upon the wrong way,’ but says instead: ‘As long as the fetter of being is unabandoned, being too is unabandoned,’ then one teaches only the Dhamma.
“When one person, owing to another, has become free from doubt about suffering, about the origin of suffering, about the cessation of suffering, and about the way leading to the cessation of suffering, I say that it is not easy for the former to repay the latter by paying homage to him…and medicinal requisites.
“When one person, owing to another, has come to abstain from killing living beings, from taking what is not given, from misconduct in sensual pleasures, from false speech, and from wine, liquor, and intoxicants, which are the basis of negligence, I say that it is not easy for the former to repay the latter by paying homage to him…and medicinal requisites.
“When one person, owing to another, has come to possess unwavering confidence in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha, and to possess the virtues loved by noble ones, I say that it is not easy for the former to repay the latter by paying homage to him…and medicinal requisites.
“When one regards as a gain the gain of sounds cognizable by the ear…the gain of odours cognizable by the nose…the gain of flavours cognizable by the tongue…the gain of tangibles cognizable by the body…the gain of mind-objects cognizable by the mind that are wished for, desired, agreeable, gratifying, and associated with worldliness—or when one recalls what was formerly obtained that has passed, ceased, and changed—joy arises.
“When one regards as a non-gain the non-gain of sounds cognizable by the ear…the non-gain of odours cognizable by the nose…the non-gain of flavours cognizable by the tongue…the non-gain of tangibles cognizable by the body…the non-gain of mind-objects cognizable by the mind that are wished for, desired, agreeable, gratifying, and associated with worldliness—or when one recalls what was formerly not obtained that has passed, ceased, and changed—grief arises.
“When one says: ‘All those engaged in the pursuit of self-mortification—painful, ignoble, and unbeneficial— are beset by suffering, vexation, despair, and fever, and they have entered upon the wrong way,’ one thus disparages some.
“When one says: ‘All those who have not abandoned the fetter of being are beset by suffering, vexation, despair, and fever, and they have entered upon the wrong way,’ one thus disparages some.
“When seated indoors, he does not fidget with his hands.
“When that bh ikkhu thus recollects the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha, if equanimity supported by the wholesome does not become established in him, then he arouses a sense of urgency thus: ‘It is a loss for me, it is no gain for me, it is bad for me, it is no good for me, that when I thus recollect the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha, equanimity supported by the wholesome does not become established in me.’
“When that bhikkhu clings, venerable sir, it seems he clings to the best clinging.”
“When that bhikkhu clings, Ānanda, he clings to the best clinging; for this is the best clinging, namely, the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
“When that was said, venerable sir, I addressed the venerable Anuruddha thus: ‘Friend Anuruddha…What kind of bhikkhu could illuminate this Gosinga Sāla-tree Wood?’
“When the colt has become peaceful in that action, the horse-trainer further makes him act in keeping in step, in running in a circle, in prancing, in galloping, in charging, in the kingly qualities, in the kingly heritage, in the highest speed, in the highest fleetness, in the highest gentleness.
“When the colt has become peaceful in that action, the horse-trainer further makes him get used to wearing the harness.
“When the colt has become peaceful in these actions, the horse-trainer further rewards him with a rubbing down and a grooming.
“When the Dhamma has thus been shown by me in presentations, it may be expected of those who will not concede, allow, and accept what is well stated and well spoken by others that they will take to quarreling, brawling, and disputing, stabbing each other with verbal daggers.
“When there is no ear, no sound, and no ear-consciousness… When there is no nose, no odour, and no nose-consciousness… When there is no tongue, no flavour, and no tongueconsciousness… When there is no body, no tangible, and no body-consciousness…When there is no mind, no mind-object, and no mind-consciousness…it is impossible to point out the manifestation of besetment by perceptions and notions mental proliferation.
“When there is no eye, no form, and no eye-consciousness, it is impossible to point out the manifestation of contact.
“When there is the ear, a sound, and ear-consciousness…When there is the nose, an odour, and nose-consciousness…When there is the tongue, a flavour, and tongue-consciousness…When there is the body, a tangible, and body-consciousness…When there is the mind, a mind-object, and mind-consciousness…it is possible to point out the manifestation of besetment by perceptions and notions mental proliferation.
“When there is the eye, a form, and eye-consciousness, it is possible to point out the manifestation of contact.
“When this was said I asked them: ‘Bhikkhus, have you ever known me to speak like this before?’—‘No, venerable sir’ —‘Bhikkhus, the Tathāgata is an Accomplished One, a Fully Enlightened One.
“When this was said, Baka the Brahmā told me: ‘Good sir, I say of the permanent that it is permanent, of the everlasting that it is everlasting, of the eternal that it is eternal, of the total that it is total, of what is not subject to pass away that it is not subject to pass away, of where one is neither born nor ages nor dies nor passes away nor reappears that here one is neither born nor ages nor dies nor passes away nor reappears; and when there is no escape beyond this, I say that there is no escape beyond this.
“When this was said, I told Baka the Brahmā: ‘The worthy Baka the Brahmā has lapsed into ignorance; he has lapsed into ignorance in that he says of the impermanent that it is permanent, of the transient that it is everlasting, of the non-eternal that it is eternal, of the incomplete that it is total, of what is subject to pass away that it is not subject to pass away, of where one is born, ages, dies, passes away, and reappears, that here one is neither born nor ages nor dies nor passes away nor reappears; and when there is another escape beyond this, he says there is no other escape beyond this.’
“When this was said, I told Māra the Evil One: ‘I know you, Evil One.
“When this was said, I told Māra the Evil One: ‘I know you, Evil One.
“When this was said, I told the Nigaṇṭhas: ‘There are five things, friend Nigaṇṭhas, that may turn out in two different ways here and now.
“When this was said, I told them: ‘But, friends, do you know that you existed in the past, and that it is not the case that you did not exist?’—‘No, friend.’—‘But, friends, do you know that you did evil actions in the past and did not abstain from them?’—‘No, friend.’—‘But, friends, do you know that you did such and such evil actions?’—‘No, friend.’—‘But, friends, do you know that so much suffering has already been exhausted, or that so much suffering has still to be exhausted, or that when so much suffering has been exhausted all suffering will have been exhausted?’—‘No, friend.’—‘But, friends, do you know what the abandoning of unwholesome states is and what the cultivation of wholesome states is here and now?’—‘No, friend.’
“When this was said, the bhikkhus of the group of five answered me thus: ‘Friend Gotama, by the conduct, the practice, and the performance of austerities that you undertook, you did not achieve any superhuman states, any distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.
“When this was said, the Nigaṇṭhas told me: ‘Friend, the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta is omniscient and all-seeing and claims to have complete knowledge and vision thus: “Whether I am walking or standing or asleep or awake, knowledge and vision are continuously and uninterruptedly present to me.”
“When this was said, the Ājīvaka Upaka said: ‘May it be so, friend.’
“When this was said, they replied: ‘Friend, the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta is omniscient and all-seeing and claims to have complete knowledge and vision thus: “Whether I am walking or standing or asleep or awake, knowledge and vision are continuously and uninterruptedly present to me.”
“When this was said, venerable sir, I addressed the venerable Mahā Kassapa thus: ‘Friend Kassapa…What kind of bhikkhu could illuminate this Gosinga Sāla-tree Wood?’
“When this was said, venerable sir, I addressed the venerable Mahā Moggallāna thus: ‘Friend Moggallāna…What kind of bhikkhu could illuminate this Gosinga Sāla-tree Wood?’
“When this was said, venerable sir, I addressed the venerable Revata thus: ‘Friend Revata…What kind of bhikkhu could illuminate this Gosinga Sāla-tree Wood?’
“When those bhikkhus, Sunakkhatta, declared final knowledge in my presence, there were some bhikkhus who declared final knowledge rightly and there were some who declared final knowledge because they overestimated themselves.
“When, Aggivessana, the noble disciple guards the doors of his sense faculties, then the Tathāgata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, be moderate in eating.
“When, Aggivessana, the noble disciple is devoted to wakefulness, then the Tathāgata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, be possessed of mindfulness and full awareness.
“When, Aggivessana, the noble disciple is moderate in eating, then the Tathāgata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, be devoted to wakefulness.
“When, Aggivessana, the noble disciple is virtuous…and seeing fear in the slightest fault, trains by undertaking the training precepts, then the Tathāgata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, guard the doors of your sense faculties.
“When, Aggivessana, the noble disciple possesses mindfulness and full awareness, then the Tathāgata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, resort to a secluded resting place: the forest, the root of a tree, a mountain, a ravine, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a jungle thicket, an open space, a heap of straw.’
“When, Anuruddha, I had developed concentration with applied thought and sustained thought…when I had developed concentration accompanied by equanimity, the knowledge and vision arose in me: ‘My deliverance is unshakeable; this is my last birth; now there is no renewal of being.’” 
“When, Anuruddha, I understood that doubt is an imperfection of the mind and had abandoned doubt, an imperfection of the mind; when I understood that inattention is an imperfection of the mind and had abandoned inattention… abandoned sloth and torpor…abandoned fear…abandoned elation...
“When, Anuruddha, I understood that doubt is an imperfection of the mind, I abandoned doubt, an imperfection of the mind.
“When, brahmin, the bhikkhu guards the doors of his sense faculties, then the Tathāgata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, be moderate in eating.
“When, brahmin, the bhikkhu is devoted to wakefulness, then the Tathāgata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, be possessed of mindfulness and full awareness.
“When, brahmin, the bhikkhu is moderate in eating, then the Tathāgata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, be devoted to wakefulness.
“When, brahmin, the bhikkhu is virtuous…and seeing fear in the slightest fault, trains by undertaking the training precepts, then the Tathāgata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, guard the doors of your sense faculties.
“When, brahmin, the bhikkhu possesses mindfulness and full awareness, then the Tathāgata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, resort to a secluded resting place: the forest, the root of a tree, a mountain, a ravine, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a jungle thicket, an open space, a heap of straw.’
“When, brahmin, they are thus advised and instructed by me, some of my disciples attain Nibbāna, the ultimate goal, and some do not attain it.”
“When, by knowing the impermanence, change, fading away, and cessation of sounds…of odours…of flavours…of tangibles …of mind-objects, one sees as it actually is with proper wisdom that mind-objects both formerly and now are all impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, one generates a longing for the supreme liberations thus: ‘When shall I enter upon and abide in that base that the noble ones now enter upon and abide in?’
“When, by knowing the impermanence, change, fading away, and cessation of sounds…of odours…of flavours…of tangibles… of mind-objects, one sees as it actually is with proper wisdom that mind-objects both formerly and now are all impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, equanimity arises.
“When, by knowing the impermanence, change, fading away, and cessation of sounds…of odours…of flavours…of tangibles… of mind-objects, one sees as it actually is with proper wisdom that mind-objects both formerly and now are all impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, joy arises.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands ageing and death, the origin of ageing and death, the cessation of ageing and death, and the way leading to the cessation of ageing and death, in that way he is one of right view…and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands being, the origin of being, the cessation of being, and the way leading to the cessation of being, in that way he is one of right view…and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands birth, the origin of birth, the cessation of birth, and the way leading to the cessation of birth, in that way he is one of right view…and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands clinging, the origin of clinging, the cessation of clinging, and the way leading to the cessation of clinging, in that way he is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands consciousness, the origin of consciousness, the cessation of consciousness, and the way leading to the cessation of consciousness, in that way he is one of right view…and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands contact, the origin of contact, the cessation of contact, and the way leading to the cessation of contact, in that way he is one of right view…and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands craving, the origin of craving, the cessation of craving, and the way leading to the cessation of craving, in that way he is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands feeling, the origin of feeling, the cessation of feeling, and the way leading to the cessation of feeling, in that way he is one of right view…and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands formations, the origin of formations, the cessation of formations, and the way leading to the cessation of formations, in that way he is one of right view…and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands ignorance, the origin of ignorance, the cessation of ignorance, and the way leading to the cessation of ignorance, in that way he is one of right view…and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands mentality-materiality, the origin of mentality-materiality, the cessation of mentality-materiality, and the way leading to the cessation of mentality-materiality, in that way he is one of right view…and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands nutriment, the origin of nutriment, the cessation of nutriment, and the way leading to the cessation of nutriment, in that way he is one of right view…and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands suffering, the origin of suffering, the cessation of suffering, and the way leading to the cessation of suffering, in that way he is one of right view…and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands the sixfold base, the origin of the sixfold base, the cessation of the sixfold base, and the way leading to the cessation of the sixfold base, in that way he is one of right view…and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands the taints, the origin of the taints, the cessation of the taints, and the way leading to the cessation of the taints, in that way he is one of right view, whose view is straight, who has unwavering confidence in the Dhamma, and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands the unwholesome and the root of the unwholesome, the wholesome and the root of the wholesome, in that way he is one of right view, whose view is straight, who has unwavering confidence in the Dhamma and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“When, Ānanda, a bhikkhu is skilled in the elements, skilled in the bases, skilled in dependent origination, skilled in what is possible and what is impossible, in that way he can be called a wise man and an inquirer.”
“Where is he living now, Master Kaccāna, that Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened?”
“Where is he living now, that Master Gotama, accomplished and fully enlightened, Master Udena?”
“While I walked, the fear and dread came upon me; I neither stood nor sat nor lay down till I had subdued that fear and dread.
“While in these births the differences
“While taints, vexation, and fever might arise in one who does not use the requisites thus, there are no taints, vexation, or fever in one who uses them thus.
“While you are training in concord, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, some bhikkhu might commit an offence or a transgression.
“While you are training in concord, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, there might arise mutual verbal friction, insolence in views, mental annoyance, bitterness, and dejection.
“While you are training in concord, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, two bhikkhus might make different assertions about the higher Dhamma.
“While you are walking, recluse, you tell me you have stopped;
“Who knows about his former lives, Sees heaven and states of deprivation, And has arrived at birth’s destruction—
“Who makes his living among men 
“Who once did live in negligence
“Why do you ask that, great king?”
“Why do you ask that, great king?”
“Why do you say this, prince: ‘Then, venerable sir, the Nigaṇṭhas have lost in this’?” 
“Why have I declared that?
“Why have I left that undeclared?
“Why not, Aggivessana?
“Why not, venerable sir?
“Why not, venerable sir?
“Why not, venerable sir?
“Why not, venerable sir?
“Why not, venerable sir?
“Why, brahmin, go to the Bāhukā River?
“Wisdom and consciousness, friend—are these states conjoined or disjoined?
“Wisdom and consciousness, friend—these states are conjoined, not disjoined, and it is impossible to separate each of these states from the other in order to describe the difference between them.
“With the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous disappearance of joy and grief, I entered upon and abided in the fourth jhāna, which has neither-pain-nor-pleasure and purity of mindfulness due to equanimity.
“With the divine ear element, which is purified and surpasses the human, he hears both kinds of sounds, the divine and the human, those that are far as well as near.
“With the divine ear element, which is purified and surpasses the human, one hears both kinds of sounds, the divine and the human, those that are far as well as near.
“With the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he sees beings passing away and reappearing, inferior and superior, fair and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and he understands how beings pass on according to their actions.
“With the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, one sees beings passing away and reappearing, inferior and superior, fair and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and one understands how beings pass on according to their actions.
“With the fading away as well of rapture, I abided in equanimity, and mindful and fully aware, still feeling pleasure with the body, I entered upon and abided in the third jhāna, on account of which noble ones announce: ‘He has a pleasant abiding who has equanimity and is mindful.’
“With the stilling of applied and sustained thought, he enters upon and abides in the second jhāna…the third jhāna…the fourth jhāna.
“With the stilling of applied and sustained thought, he enters upon and abides in the second jhāna…With the fading away as well of rapture…he enters upon and abides in the third jhāna…With the abandoning of pleasure and pain…he enters upon and abides in the fourth jhāna…Why is that?
“With the stilling of applied and sustained thought, I entered upon and abided in the second jhāna, which has self-confidence and singleness of mind without applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of concentration.
“With the stilling of applied and sustained thought, I entered upon and abided in the second jhāna…With the fading away as well of rapture…I entered upon and abided in the third jhāna…With the abandoning of pleasure and pain…I entered upon and abided in the fourth jhāna…But such pleasant feeling that arose in me did not invade my mind and remain.
“Would the Blessed One, venerable Ānanda, behave with speech…behave with the mind in such a way that he could be censured by recluses and brahmins?”
“Yes, dear sir,” the brahmin woman Dhānañjāni replied.
“Yes, friend,” he replied, and he went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, sat down at one side.
“Yes, friend,” he replied, and he went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, sat down at one side.
“Yes, friend,” the bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, friend,” the bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, friend,” the bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, friend,” they replied and, getting up from their seats, taking their bowls and outer robes, went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, sat down at one side.
“Yes, friend,” they replied, and they went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, sat down at one side.
“Yes, friend,” they replied, and they went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, sat down at one side.
“Yes, friend,” they replied, and they went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, they sat down at one side.
“Yes, friend,” those bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, friends,” he replied, and he went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, he sat down at one side and said: “Venerable sir, a transgression overcame me, in that like a fool, confused and blundering, when a training precept was being made known by the Blessed One, when the Sangha of bhikkhus was undertaking the training, I declared my refusal.
“Yes, friends,” they replied.
“Yes, great king.”
“Yes, madam,” he replied, and he went to the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
“Yes, madam,” he replied.
“Yes, Mallikā, Kāsi and Kosala are dear to me.
“Yes, Mallikā, Princess Vajīrī is dear to me.”
“Yes, Master Gotama, I am familiar with the road leading to Rājagaha.”
“Yes, Master Gotama.
“Yes, Master Gotama.
“Yes, Master Raṭṭhapāla, I do.”
“Yes, sir, I have heard of them.
“Yes, sir, the village of Naḷakāra is near here, not far from here.”
“Yes, sir,” he replied.
“Yes, sir,” he replied.
“Yes, sir,” he replied.
“Yes, sir,” he replied.
“Yes, sir,” he replied.
“Yes, sir,” Sañjikāputta replied, and he went to the Blessed One and announced that it was time thus: “It is time, Master Gotama, the meal is ready.”
“Yes, sir,” Sañjikāputta replied, and he went to the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
“Yes, sir,” that man replied, and he went to the venerable Anuruddha.
“Yes, sir,” the brahmin Pingalakoccha replied.
“Yes, sir,” the brahmin student replied.
“Yes, sir,” the brahmin student Subha replied.
“Yes, sir,” the man replied, and he went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to the Blessed One, he sat down at one side and delivered his message.
“Yes, sir,” the minister replied, and he went to the brahmin householders of Opasāda and gave them the message.
“Yes, sir,” they replied, and some dug out ovens, some chopped wood, some washed dishes, some set out water jugs, some prepared seats, while the matted-hair ascetic Keṇiya himself set up a pavilion.
“Yes, sire,” Dīgha Kārāyaṇa replied.
“Yes, sire,” he replied.
“Yes, sire,” the man replied, and he went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, he sat down at one side and delivered his message.
“Yes, sire,” the man replied, and he went to the venerable Ānanda, and after paying homage to him, he stood at one side and said to the venerable Ānanda: “Venerable sir, King Pasenadi of Kosala pays homage with his head at the venerable Ānanda’s feet and he says this: ‘Venerable sir, if the venerable Ānanda has no urgent business, perhaps the venerable Ānanda would wait a moment, out of compassion.’”
“Yes, sire,” the man replied.
“Yes, venerable sir, I am.”
“Yes, venerable sir, I am.”
“Yes, venerable sir, it is.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” he replied, and after he had made seats ready in the hall of the central door, he returned to the householder Upāli and told him: “Venerable sir, the seats are made ready in the hall of the central door.
“Yes, venerable sir,” he replied, and he went to the bhikkhus led by Assaji and Punabbasuka and told them: “The Teacher calls you, friends.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” he replied, and he went to the householder Upāli and told him: “Venerable sir, the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta is standing at the outer gate with a large assembly of Nigaṇṭhas; he wishes to see you.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” he replied, and he went to the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta and told him: “Venerable sir, the householder Upāli says: ‘Enter, venerable sir, if you wish.’”
“Yes, venerable sir,” he replied, and he went to those bhikkhus and told them: “The Teacher calls the venerable ones.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” he replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” Potaliya the householder replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” Potaliya the householder replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” Potaliya the householder replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” Prince Abhaya replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” Sunakkhatta, son of the Licchavis, replied to the Blessed One.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the householder Upāli replied, and he rose from his seat, and after paying homage to the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta, keeping him on his right, he left to go to the Blessed One in Pāvārika’s Mango Grove.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the man replied, and he went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to the Blessed One, he sat down at one side and delivered his message.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the novice Cunda replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the venerable Angulimāla replied, and having gone into Sāvatthī, he told that woman: “Sister, since I was born with the noble birth, I do not recall that I have ever intentionally deprived a living being of life.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the venerable Bhaddāli replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the venerable Lomasakangiya replied to the Blessed One.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the venerable Nandaka replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the venerable Nandaka replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the venerable Puṇṇa replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the venerable Rāhula replied, and taking his sitting cloth with him, he followed close behind the Blessed One.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the venerable Ānanda replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the venerable Ānanda replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the venerable Ānanda replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” they replied, and they rose from their seats, and after paying homage to the Blessed One, keeping him on their right, they put away the things in their resting places, and taking their bowls and outer robes, they departed.
“Yes, venerable sir,” they replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” they replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” they replied.
“Yes, venerable sir.
“Yes, venerable sir.
“Yes, venerable sir.
“Yes, venerable sir.
“Yes, venerable sir.
“Yes, venerable sir.
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yet, Sāriputta, by such conduct, by such practice, by such performance of austerities, I did not attain any superhuman states, any distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.
“You claim full enlightenment,” the brahmin Sela said, “You tell me, O Gotama, ‘I am supreme king of the Dhamma;
“You may go, brahmin, at your own convenience.” 
“You may go, great king, at your own convenience.”
“You may go, great king, at your own convenience.”
“You may go, great king, at your own convenience.”
“You may go, great king, at your own convenience.”
“You may go, householder, at your own convenience.”
“You may go, Pessa, at your own convenience.”
“You may remember this discourse on the Dhamma, Ānanda, as ‘The Many Kinds of Elements’ and as ‘The Four Cycles’ and as ‘The Mirror of the Dhamma’ and as ‘The Drum of the Deathless’ and as ‘The Supreme Victory in Battle.’”
“You see, bhikkhus, do you not, that mountain Vebhāra?” —“Yes, venerable sir.”
“You should discover the cause for that, Anuruddha.
“Ānanda he is indeed, venerable sir, and Ānanda he appears.
“Ānanda, a bhikkhu does not shine by delighting in company, by taking delight in company, by devoting himself to delight in company; by delighting in society, by taking delight in society, by rejoicing in society.
“Ānanda, a disciple should not seek the Teacher’s company for the sake of discourses, stanzas, and expositions.
“Ānanda, I say to you: continue this good practice instituted by me and do not be the last man.
“Ānanda, it was actually a true presentation that the carpenter Pañcakanga would not accept from Udāyin, and it was actually a true presentation that Udāyin would not accept from the carpenter Pañcakanga.
“Ānanda, just as this Palace of Migāra’s Mother is void of elephants, cattle, horses, and mares, void of gold and silver, void of the assembly of men and women, and there is present only this non-voidness, namely, the singleness dependent on the Sangha of bhikkhus; so too, a bhikkhu—not attending to the perception of village, not attending to the perception of people—attends to the singleness dependent on the perception of forest.
“Ānanda, speak to the Sakyans of Kapilavatthu about the disciple in higher training who has entered upon the way.
“Ānanda, there are four kinds of persons to be found existing in the world.
“Ānanda, there are many resting places prepared in Kāḷakhemaka the Sakyan’s dwelling.
“Ānanda, there are these five aggregates affected by clinging,  in regard to which a bhikkhu should abide contemplating rise and fall thus: ‘Such is material form, such its arising, such its disappearance; such is feeling, such its arising, such its disappearance; such is perception, such its arising, such its disappearance; such are formations, such their arising, such their disappearance; such is consciousness, such its arising, such its disappearance.’
“Ānanda, there are these five cords of sensual pleasure.
“Ānanda, there are these five cords of sensual pleasure.
“Ānanda, there are these four kinds of litigation.
“Ānanda, there are these seven kinds of settlement of litigation.
“Ānanda, there are these six principles of cordiality that create love and respect, and conduce to cohesion, to non-dispute, to concord, and to unity.
“Ānanda, whatever recluses and brahmins in the past entered upon and abided in pure, supreme, unsurpassed voidness, all entered upon and abided in this same pure, supreme, unsurpassed voidness.
“‘ any world has no shelter and no protector’: this is the second summary of the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One who knows and sees…
“‘ any world has nothing of its own; one has to leave all and pass on’: this is the third summary of the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One who knows and sees…
“‘ any world is incomplete, insatiate, the slave of craving’: this is the fourth summary of the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One who knows and sees…
“‘ any world is unstable, it is swept away’: this is the first summary of the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“‘Almsfood is of two kinds, I say’…
“‘Among the teachers of training it is he that is called the incomparable leader of persons to be tamed.’
“‘As far as moon and sun revolve
“‘Bhikkhu, this person consists of eighteen kinds of mental exploration.’
“‘Bhikkhu, this person consists of six bases of contact.’
“‘Bhikkhu, this person consists of six elements.’
“‘Bhikkhu, this person has four foundations.’
“‘Bhikkhus, bodily conduct is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.
“‘Bhikkhus, verbal conduct is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.
“‘Blemish, blemish,’ is said, friend, but what is this word ‘blemish’ a term for?
“‘Blemish,’ friend, is a term for the spheres of these evil unwholesome wishes.
“‘Brahmā, having directly known earth as earth, and having directly known that which is not partaken of the earthness of earth, I did not claim to be earth, I did not claim to be in earth, I did not claim to be apart from earth, I did not claim earth to be “mine,” I did not affirm earth.
“‘Brahmā, having directly known water as water…fire as fire…air as air…beings as beings…gods as gods…Pajāpati as Pajāpati…Brahmā as Brahmā…the gods of Streaming Radiance as the gods of Streaming Radiance…the gods of Refulgent Glory as the gods of Refulgent Glory…the gods of Great Fruit as the gods of Great Fruit…the Overlord as the Overlord…all as all, and having directly known that which is not partaken of the allness of all, I did not claim to be all, I did not claim to be in all, I did not claim to be apart from all, I did not claim all to be “mine,” I did not affirm all.
“‘But since, friend Nigaṇṭhas, when there is intense exertion, intense striving, then you feel painful, racking, piercing feelings due to intense exertion, but when there is no intense exertion, no intense striving, then you do not feel painful, racking, piercing feelings due to intense exertion, you are therefore feeling only the painful, racking, piercing feelings of your self-imposed exertion, and it is through ignorance, unknowing, and delusion that you mistakenly hold: “Whatever this person feels…all suffering will be exhausted.”’ Speaking thus, bhikkhus, I did not see any legitimate defence of their position by the Nigaṇṭhas.
“‘But since, friend Nigaṇṭhas, you do not know that you existed in the past and that it is not the case that you did not exist…or what the abandoning of unwholesome states is and what the cultivation of wholesome states is here and now, it is not fitting for the venerable Nigaṇṭhas to declare: “Whatever this person feels…all suffering will be exhausted.”’
“‘But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of formations; with the cessation of formations, cessation of consciousness; with the cessation of consciousness, cessation of mentality-materiality; with the cessation of mentality-materiality, cessation of the sixfold base; with the cessation of the sixfold base, cessation of contact; with the cessation of contact, cessation of feeling; with the cessation of feeling, cessation of craving; with the cessation of craving, cessation of clinging; with the cessation of clinging, cessation of being; with the cessation of being, cessation of birth; with the cessation of birth, ageing and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair cease.
“‘But, Brahmā, there are three other bodies, which you neither know nor see, and which I know and see.
“‘But, friend, how does the venerable one know, how does he see, so that in regard to this body with its consciousness and all external signs, I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit have been eradicated in him?’ 
“‘But, friend, there are these six internal and external bases rightly proclaimed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“‘But, friend, without abandoning that thing, can one realise Nibbāna?’
“‘But, friends, do you know that you existed in the past, and that it is not the case that you did not exist?’—‘No, friend.’—‘But, friends, do you know that you did evil actions in the past and did not abstain from them?’—‘No, friend.’—‘But, friends, do you know that you did such and such evil actions?’—‘No, friend.’—‘But, friends, do you know that so much suffering has already been exhausted, or that so much suffering has still to be exhausted, or that when so much suffering has been exhausted all suffering will have been exhausted?’— ‘No, friend.’—‘But, friends, do you know what the abandoning of unwholesome states is and what the cultivation of wholesome states is here and now?’—‘No, friend.’
“‘But, friends, I can abide without moving my body or uttering a word, experiencing exclusively pleasure for one day and night…for two, three, four, five, and six days and nights…for seven days and nights.
“‘But, sirs, do you know how the descent of an embryo comes about?’
“‘But, sirs, do you know if the father who begot you went only with a brahmin woman and never with a non-brahmin woman?’—‘No, sir.’
“‘But, sirs, do you know if the mother who bore you went only with a brahmin and never with a non-brahmin?’—‘No, sir.’
“‘But, sirs, do you know if your father’s fathers back to the seventh generation went only with brahmin women and never with non-brahmin women?’—‘No, sir.’
“‘But, sirs, do you know if your mother’s mothers back to the seventh generation went only with brahmins and never with non-brahmins?’—‘No, sir.’
“‘Cities are of two kinds, I say’…
“‘Consciousness non-manifesting, Boundless, luminous all-round: In the first edition, I retained Ñm’s own translation of these lines, which read:
“‘Districts are of two kinds, I say’…
“‘Enough, good sir.
“‘Feeling, feeling’ is said, friend.
“‘Flavours cognizable by the tongue are of two kinds, I say’…
“‘Friend Gotama, pleasure is not to be gained through pleasure; pleasure is to be gained through pain.
“‘Friend Nigaṇṭhas, suppose a man were wounded by an arrow thickly smeared with poison, and because of this he felt painful, racking, piercing feelings.
“‘Friend, there are these five aggregates affected by clinging, rightly proclaimed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“‘Friend, there are these six elements rightly proclaimed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“‘Friends, formerly when I lived the home life I was ignorant.
“‘Friends, having known feeling…Having known perception…Having known formations…Having known consciousness to be feeble, fading away, and comfortless, with the destruction, fading away, cessation, giving up, and relinquishing of attraction and clinging regarding consciousness, of mental standpoints, adherences, and underlying tendencies regarding consciousness, I have understood that my mind is liberated.
“‘Friends, having known material form to be feeble, fading away, and comfortless, with the destruction, fading away, cessation, giving up, and relinquishing of attraction and clinging regarding material form, of mental standpoints, adherences, and underlying tendencies regarding material form, I have understood that my mind is liberated.
“‘Friends, I have treated the earth element as not self, with no self based on the earth element.
“‘Friends, I have treated the water element…the fire element…the air element…the space element…the consciousness element as not self, with no self based on the consciousness element.
“‘Friends, regarding the seen I abide unattracted, unrepelled, independent, detached, free, dissociated, with a mind rid of barriers.
“‘Friends, with the destruction, fading away, cessation, giving up, and relinquishing of desire, lust, delight, craving, attraction, and clinging, and of mental standpoints, adherences, and underlying tendencies regarding the eye, forms, eye-consciousness, and things cognizable through eye-consciousness, I have understood that my mind is liberated.
“‘Good sir, I shall vanish from you.’
“‘Good sir, if that is not partaken of by the allness of all, may it not turn out to be vacuous and empty for you!’ 
“‘Have you heard of the seer Devala the Dark, sirs?’—‘Yes, sir.’—‘I am he, sirs.’
“‘Having seen fear in being
“‘Having thus abandoned these five hindrances, imperfections of the mind that weaken wisdom, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, I entered upon and abided in the first jhāna, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
“‘He has declared of her: “With the destruction of three fetters and with the attenuation of lust, hate, and delusion, she has become a once-returner, returning once to this world to make an end of suffering.”…
“‘He has declared of her: “With the destruction of three fetters and with the attenuation of lust, hate, and delusion, she has become a once-returner, returning once to this world to make an end of suffering.”…
“‘He has declared of her: “With the destruction of three fetters she has become a stream-enterer, no longer subject to perdition, bound, headed for enlightenment.”’ And she has either seen that sister for herself or heard it said of her: ‘That sister’s virtue was thus, her state was thus, her wisdom was thus, her abiding was thus, her deliverance was thus.’
“‘He has declared of her: “With the destruction of three fetters she has become a stream-enterer, no longer subject to perdition, bound, headed for enlightenment.”’ And she has either seen that sister for herself…she directs her mind to such a state.
“‘He has declared of him: “With the destruction of three fetters and with the attenuation of lust, hate, and delusion, he has become a once-returner, returning once to this world to make an end of suffering.”…
“‘He has declared of him: “With the destruction of three fetters he has become a stream-enterer, no longer subject to perdition, bound, headed for enlightenment.”’ And he has either seen that venerable one for himself or heard it said of him: ‘That venerable one’s virtue was thus, his state was thus, his wisdom was thus, his abiding was thus, his deliverance was thus.’
“‘I did so and went away.
“‘I did so and went away.
“‘I know that too, Brahmā.
“‘If, friend Nigaṇṭhas, when there was intense exertion, intense striving, then painful, racking, piercing feelings due to intense exertion were present, and when there was no intense exertion, no intense striving, then painful, racking, piercing feelings due to intense exertion were still present; that being so, it would be fitting for the venerable Nigaṇṭhas to declare: “Whatever this person feels…all suffering will be exhausted.”
“‘If, friend Nigaṇṭhas, you knew that you existed in the past and that it is not the case that you did not exist; or that you did evil actions in the past and did not abstain from them; or that you did such and such evil actions; or that so much suffering has already been exhausted, or that so much suffering has still to be exhausted, or that when so much suffering has been exhausted all suffering will have been exhausted; or what the abandoning of unwholesome states is and what the cultivation of wholesome states is here and now; that being so, it would be fitting for the venerable Nigaṇṭhas to declare: “Whatever this person feels……all suffering will be exhausted.”
“‘Inclination of mind is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.
“‘It feels, it feels,’ friend; that is why ‘feeling’ is said.
“‘It is a gain for the potter Ghaṭīkāra, it is a great gain for him that the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, relies on him thus.’
“‘It is by knowing thus, seeing thus, friends, that in regard to this body with its consciousness and all external signs, I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit have been eradicated in me.’
“‘It is by knowing thus, seeing thus, regarding these five aggregates affected by clinging, that through not clinging my mind is liberated from the taints.’
“‘It is by knowing thus, seeing thus, regarding these six elements, that through not clinging my mind is liberated from the taints.’
“‘It is by knowing thus, seeing thus, regarding these six internal and external bases, that through not clinging my mind is liberated from the taints.’
“‘It perceives, it perceives,’ friend; that is why ‘perception’ is said.
“‘Mental conduct is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.
“‘Mind-objects cognizable by the mind are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.’
“‘Now, good sir, how far do you understand my reach and my sway to extend?’
“‘Odours cognizable by the nose are of two kinds, I say’…
“‘On another occasion when I was living at Vebhalinga my hut leaked.
“‘On another occasion when I was living at Vebhalinga, it being morning, I dressed, and taking my bowl and outer robe, I went to the potter Ghaṭīkāra’s parents and asked them: “Where has the potter gone, please?”—“Venerable sir, your supporter has gone out; but take some porridge from the vessel and sauce from the saucepan and eat.”
“‘On one occasion when I was living at Vebhalinga, it being morning, I dressed, and taking my bowl and outer robe, I went to the potter Ghaṭīkāra’s parents and asked them: “Where has the potter gone, please?”—“Venerable sir, your supporter has gone out; but take rice from the cauldron and sauce from the saucepan and eat.”
“‘One of right view, one of right view,’ is said, friends.
“‘One should know how to define pleasure, and knowing that, one should pursue pleasure within oneself.’
“‘One should know what it is to extol and what it is to disparage, and knowing both, one should neither extol nor disparage but should teach only the Dhamma.’
“‘One should not insist on local language, and one should not override normal usage.’
“‘One should not neglect wisdom, should preserve truth, should cultivate relinquishment, and should train for peace.’
“‘One should not pursue sensual pleasure, which is low, vulgar, coarse, ignoble, and unbeneficial; and one should not pursue self-mortification, which is painful, ignoble, and unbeneficial.’
“‘One should not utter covert speech, and one should not utter overt sharp speech.’
“‘One should speak unhurriedly, not hurriedly.’
“‘One who is unwise, one who is unwise’ is said, friend.
“‘One who is wise, one who is wise,’ is said, friend.
“‘One wisely understands, one wisely understands,’ friend; that is why it is said, ‘one who is wise.’
“‘Perception, perception,’ is said, friend.
“‘Persons are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.’
“‘Recluses, recluses,’ bhikkhus, that is how people perceive you.
“‘Recluses, recluses,’ bhikkhus, that is how people perceive you.
“‘Resting places are of two kinds, I say’…
“‘Sāriputta, robes are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.’
“‘Sir, we do not know for sure whether that gandhabba is a noble, or a brahmin, or a merchant, or a worker.’
“‘Sir, we know how the descent of an embryo comes about.
“‘So it seems, friend Nigaṇṭhas, that it is impossible that an action is to be experienced here and now can, through exertion and striving, become one is to be experienced in the next life, and impossible that an action is to be experienced in the next life can, through exertion and striving, become one is to be experienced here and now; impossible that an action is to be experienced as pleasant can, through exertion and striving, become one is to be experienced as painful, and impossible that an action is to be experienced as painful can, through exertion and striving, become one is to be experienced as pleasant; impossible that an action is to be experienced in a matured can, by exertion and striving, become one is to be experienced in an unmatured, and impossible that an action is to be experienced in an unmatured can, through exertion and striving, become one is to be experienced in a matured; impossible that an action is to be much experienced can, through exertion and striving, become one is to be little experienced, and impossible that an action is to be little experienced can, through exertion and striving, become one is to be much experienced; impossible that an action is to be experienced can, through exertion and striving, become one is not to be experienced, and impossible that an action is not to be experienced can, through exertion and striving, become one is to be experienced.
“‘So it seems, friend Nigaṇṭhas, that when there is intense exertion…you feel painful, racking, piercing feelings due to intense exertion; but when there is no intense exertion…you do not feel any painful, racking, piercing feelings due to intense exertion.
“‘So too, friend Nigaṇṭhas, if you knew that you existed in the past and that it is not the case that you did not exist…or what the abandoning of unwholesome states is and what the cultivation of wholesome states is here and now; that being so, it would be fitting for the venerableNigaṇṭhas to declare: “Whatever this person feels…all suffering will be exhausted.”
“‘So, friends, it seems that you do not know that you existed in the past and that it is not the case that you did not exist; or that you did evil actions in the past and did not abstain from them; or that you did such and such evil actions; or that so much suffering has already been exhausted, or that so much suffering has still to be exhausted, or that when so much suffering has been exhausted all suffering will have been exhausted; or what the abandoning of unwholesome states is and what the cultivation of wholesome states is here and now.
“‘So, friends, it seems that you do not know that you existed in the past and that it is not the case that you did not exist; or that you did evil actions in the past and did not abstain from them; or that you did such and such evil actions; or that so much suffering has already been exhausted, or that so much suffering has still to be exhausted, or that when so much suffering has been exhausted all suffering will have been exhausted; or what the abandoning of unwholesome states is and what the cultivation of wholesome states is here and now.
“‘Sounds cognizable by the ear are of two kinds, I say’…
“‘Surely the venerable Nigaṇṭhas have uttered those words rashly and without reflection.
“‘Surely, friend Gotama, we uttered those words rashly and without reflection.
“‘S̄riputta, forms cognizable by the eye are of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.’
“‘Tangibles cognizable by the body are of two kinds, I say’…
“‘That being so, sir, we do not know what we are.’
“‘That being so, sirs, then what are you?’
“‘That being so, the venerable Gotama abides in greater pleasure than King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha.’”
“‘The acquisition of individuality is of two kinds, I say:  to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.
“‘The acquisition of perception is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.
“‘The acquisition of view is of two kinds, I say: to be cultivated and not to be cultivated.
“‘The eighteen kinds of mental exploration should be understood.’
“‘The Middle Way discovered by the Tathāgata avoids both these extremes; giving vision, giving knowledge, it leads to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbāna.’
“‘The six classes of consciousness should be understood.’
“‘The six classes of consciousness should be understood.’
“‘The six classes of contact should be understood.’
“‘The six classes of contact should be understood.’
“‘The six classes of craving should be understood.’
“‘The six classes of feeling should be understood.’
“‘The six external bases should be understood.’
“‘The six external bases should be understood.’
“‘The six internal bases should be understood.’
“‘The six internal bases should be understood.’
“‘The thirty-six positions of beings should be understood.’
“‘The tides of conceiving do not sweep over one who stands upon these, and when the tides of conceiving no longer sweep over him he is called a sage at peace.’
“‘Then the potter Ghaṭīkāra thought: “It is a gain for me, it is a great gain for me that the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, has so much trust in me!” And rapture and happiness never left him for a half-month or his parents for a week.
“‘Then the potter Ghaṭīkāra thought: “It is a gain for me, it is a great gain for me that the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, has so much trust in me!” And rapture and happiness never left him for a half-month or his parents for a week.
“‘Then the potter Ghaṭīkāra thought: “It is a gain for me, it is a great gain for me that the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, has so much trust in me!” And the rapture and happiness never left him for a half-month or his parents for a week.
“‘Then the potter Ghaṭīkāra went to his parents and asked: “Who has removed the grass from the workshop?”—“The bhikkhus did, my dear; the hut of the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, is leaking.”
“‘Then, friends, I shall ask you a question in return.
“‘Then, sirs, do you know for sure whether that gandhabba is a noble, or a brahmin, or a merchant, or a worker?’
“‘There are three foundations of mindfulness that the Noble One cultivates, cultivating which the Noble One is a teacher fit to instruct a group.’
“‘There is the body called Refulgent Glory… There is the body called Great Fruit.
“‘Therein, by depending on this, abandon that.’
“‘They did so.
“‘Those recluses and brahmins who are not rid of lust, hate, and delusion regarding sounds cognizable by the ear…regarding odours cognizable by the nose…regarding flavours cognizable by the tongue...
“‘Those recluses and brahmins who are rid of lust, hate, and delusion regarding sounds cognizable by the ear…regarding odours cognizable by the nose…regarding flavours cognizable by the tongue…regarding tangibles cognizable by the body…regarding mind-objects cognizable by the mind, whose minds are inwardly peaceful, and who conduct themselves righteously in body, speech, and mind…should be honoured… Since we see higher righteous conduct on the part of those good recluses and brahmins, they should be honoured, respected, revered, and venerated.’
“‘Towns are of two kinds, I say’…
“‘Vanish from me if you can, Brahmā.’
“‘Vanish from me if you can, good sir.’
“‘Villages are of two kinds, I say’…
“‘We have put away our hatred towards you, sir.
“‘What do you think, friend Nigaṇṭhas?
“‘What do you think, friend Nigaṇṭhas?
“‘What do you think, friend Nigaṇṭhas?
“‘What do you think, friend Nigaṇṭhas?
“‘When I knew and saw thus, my mind was liberated from the taint of sensual desire, from the taint of being, and from the taint of ignorance.
“‘When my concentrated mind was thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfections, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, I directed it to knowledge of the destruction of the taints.
“‘With being as condition, birth’: so it was said.
“‘With birth as condition, ageing and death’: so it was said.
“‘With clinging as condition, being’: so it was said.
“‘With consciousness as condition, mentality-materiality’: so it was said.
“‘With contact as condition, feeling’: so it was said.
“‘With craving as condition, clinging’: so it was said.
“‘With feeling as condition, craving’: so it was said.
“‘With formations as condition, consciousness’: so it was said.
“‘With ignorance as condition, formations’: so it was said.
“‘With mentality-materiality as condition, the sixfold base’: so it was said.
“‘With the cessation of being, cessation of birth’…‘With the cessation of clinging, cessation of being’…‘With the cessation of craving, cessation of clinging’…‘With the cessation of feeling, cessation of craving’…‘With the cessation of contact, cessation of feeling’ …’With the cessation of the sixfold base, cessation of contact’…‘With the cessation of mentality-materiality, cessation of the sixfold base’…‘With the cessation of consciousness, cessation of mentality-materiality’…‘With the cessation of formations, cessation of consciousness’…‘With the cessation of ignorance, cessation of formations’: so it was said.
“‘With the cessation of birth, cessation of ageing and death’: so it was said.
“‘With the destruction, fading away, cessation, giving up, and relinquishing of desire, lust, delight, craving, attraction, and clinging, and of mental standpoints, adherences, and underlying tendencies regarding the ear, sounds, ear-consciousness, and things cognizable through ear-consciousness… regarding the nose, odours, nose-consciousness, and things cognizable through nose-consciousness…regarding the tongue, flavours, tongue-consciousness, and things cognizable through tongue consciousness…regarding the body, tangibles, body-consciousness, and things cognizable through body-consciousness…regarding the mind, mind-objects, mind-consciousness, and things cognizable through mind-consciousness, I have understood that my mind is liberated.
“‘With the sixfold base as condition, contact’: so it was said.
“‘With the support of no anger and irritation, anger and irritation are to be abandoned.’
“‘With the support of no rapacity and greed, rapacity and greed are to be abandoned.’
“‘With the support of no spite and scolding, spite and scolding are to be abandoned.’
“‘With the support of non-arrogance, arrogance is to be abandoned.’
“‘With the support of taking only what is given, the taking of what is not given is to be abandoned.’
“‘With the support of the non-killing of living beings, the killing of living beings is to be abandoned.’
“‘With the support of truthful speech, false speech is to be abandoned.’
“‘With the support of unmalicious speech, malicious speech is to be abandoned.’
“‘Yes, your honour,’ the charioteer Mātali replied.
“‘Yes, your honour,’ the charioteer Mātali replied.
“‘Your asceticism is not in vain, sirs, your holy life is not fruitless.
“‘… unmindful and not fully aware…I am established in mindfulness...’
“‘…desirous of gain, honour, and renown…I have few wishes…’
“‘…given to self-praise and disparagement of others…I am not given to self-praise and disparagement of others…’
“‘…lazy and wanting in energy…I am energetic…’
“‘…overcome by sloth and torpor…I am without sloth and torpor…’
“‘…overcome with restlessness and unpeaceful in mind…I have a peaceful mind…’
“‘…subject to alarm and terror…I am free from trepidation…’
“‘…uncertain and doubting…I have gone beyond doubt…’
“‘…unconcentrated and with straying minds…I am possessed of concentration…’
“‘…with a mind of ill will and intentions of hate…I have a mind of loving-kindness…’
“…That too is how a bhikkhu abides contemplating the body as a body.
“…That too is how a bhikkhu abides contemplating the body as a body.
…
…and abides experiencing bliss, having himself become holy.”
…and he understands how beings pass on according to their actions.
…He understands as it actually is: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of the taints.’
…I purified my mind from doubt.
…that is why at a later time he does not exert himself in...
…That very night or that very day, that bhikkhu should depart from that person without taking leave; he should not continue following him.
…Then the bhikkhunīs paid homage to the Blessed One and departed keeping him on their right.
…What village or town or city she lives in?’ and he would reply: ‘No.’
Fig-trees whose trunks are composed of a basket-work of interlacing and anastomosing roots are called strangling figs because normally they begin life on other trees and gradually squeeze them to death.
made like a palm stump, obliterated so that it is no more subject to future arising, in such a case the bhikkhu has excised the tumour’s root not excised before.
A being enters upon saṁsara;
A being enters upon saṁsara;
A being enters upon saṁsara;
A bhikkhu is hungerless and fully quenched.
A bhikkhu liberated by wisdom, liberated by nonclinging through revulsion towards feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, through its fading away and cessation, is called one liberated by wisdom.
A bhikkhu liberated by wisdom, liberated by nonclinging through revulsion towards form, through its fading away and cessation, is called one liberated by wisdom.
A bhikkhu of pure virtue, well liberated in mind:
A bhikkhu who dwells happily is said to be quenched in that respect.
A bhikkhu who dwells happily is said to be quenched in that respect.”
A bhikkhu who has no students and no  teacher dwells happily, in comfort.
A bhikkhu who has no students and no teacher dwells happily, in comfort.”
A bhikkhu who has students and a teacher dwells in suffering, not in comfort.
A bhikkhu who has students and a teacher dwells in suffering, not in comfort.
A bhikkhu who has surmounted five ties
A bhikkhu who is a trainee should enter and dwell in these four establishments of mindfulness.”
A bhikkhu who is beyond training should enter and dwell in these four establishments of mindfulness.”
A bhikkhu who is concentrated understands things as they really are.
A bhikkhu who is concentrated understands things as they really are.
A bhikkhu who is concentrated understands things as they really are.
A bhikkhu who is concentrated understands things as they really are.
A bhikkhu who is concentrated understands things as they really are.”
A bhikkhu who is secluded understands things as they really are.
A bhikkhu who is secluded understands things as they really are.
A bhikkhu who is secluded understands things as they really are.
A bhikkhu with clinging does not attain Nibbana.
A bhikkhu with clinging does not attain Nibbana.
A bhikkhu without clinging attains Nibbana.
A blanket that for seven months
A blanket that for seven months
A blazing fire that devours much, A conflagration with blackened trail:
A brahmin who is fully quenched, A bhikkhu undelighted, untroubled, Who has crossed over attachment to the world.” 
A brahmin who is fully quenched, Who by not halting, not straining, Has crossed over attachment to the world.” 
A certain bhikkhu saw the steep precipice off Paṭibhana Peak and said to the Blessed One: “That precipice is indeed steep, venerable sir; that precipice is extremely frightful.
A comrade when the need arises
A disciple of the Buddha, mindful, Concentrated, comprehending clearly, Understands feelings
A faithful female lay follower, rightly imploring her only daughter, dear and beloved, might implore her thus: ‘Dear, you should become like Khujjuttara the lay follower and Veḷukaṇḍakiya, Nanda’s mother’—for this is the standard and criterion for my female disciples who are lay followers, that is, Khujjuttara the lay follower and Veḷukaṇḍakiya, Nanda’s mother.
A faithful female lay follower, rightly imploring her only son, dear and beloved, might implore him thus: ‘Dear, you should become like Citta the householder and Hatthaka of Aḷavaka’—for this is the standard and criterion for my male disciples who are lay followers, that is, Citta the householder and Hatthaka of Aḷavaka.
A few good ones conquer many.
A few key points: The repetitive phrase “contemplating the body in the body” serves “to determine the object by isolating it” from other things such as feeling, mind, etc., and to show that one contemplates only the body as such, not as permanent, pleasurable, a self, or beautiful.
A field of blighted sesamum plants, Some with one leaf, some with two:
A field of blighted sesamum plants, Some with one leaf, some with two:
A fierce serpent and a blazing fire, A famous khattiya, And a bhikkhu of perfect virtue.”
A fifth one is not found here.
A fifth one is not found here.
A first point is not discerned of beings roaming and wandering on hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving.
A first point is not discerned of beings roaming and wandering on hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving.
A first point is not discerned of beings roaming and wandering on hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving.
A first point is not discerned of beings roaming and wandering on hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving.
A first point is not discerned of beings roaming and wandering on hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving.
A first point is not discerned of beings roaming and wandering on hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving.
A first point is not discerned of beings roaming and wandering on hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving.
A first point is not discerned of beings roaming and wandering on hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving.
A first point is not discerned of beings roaming and wandering on hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving.
A first point is not discerned of beings roaming and wandering on hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving.
A first point is not discerned of beings roaming and wandering on hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving.
A first point is not discerned of beings roaming and wandering on hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving.
A first point is not discerned of beings roaming and wandering on hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving….
A first point is not discerned of beings roaming and wandering on, hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving.
A fourth time the yakkha Aḷavaka said to the Blessed One: “Get out, ascetic.”
A full treatise on the various kinds of iddhi mentioned in the canon is at Paṭis -.
A gift is not given.
A gift is not given.
A hundred thousand nirabbudas.” 
A husband, the token of a woman.”
A khattiya of noble birth, A high-born prince of glorious fame:
A khattiya, great king, should not be despised and disparaged as ‘young’; a snake should not be despised and disparaged as ‘young’; a fire should not be despised and disparaged as ‘young’; and a bhikkhu should not be despised and disparaged as ‘young.’
A limpid lake the good praise to the good—
A long struggle ensues between parasite and host, but if the fig-plant is vigorous it surely kills its support and finally stands in its place on a massive basket of roots.
A maiden is the best of wives, The first born, the best of sons.” 
A man should not disparage him.
A man should not disparage it.
A man should not disparage it.
A man will strain with all his limbs;
A man with a drawn sword will be following right behind you, and wherever you spill even a little of it, right there he will fell your head.’
A man with good sight would inspect it, ponder it, and carefully investigate it, and it would appear to him to be void, hollow, insubstantial.
A man with good sight would inspect it, ponder it, and carefully investigate it, and it would appear to him to be void, hollow, insubstantial.
A man with good sight would inspect it, ponder it, and carefully investigate it, and it would appear to him to be void, hollow, insubstantial.
A man with good sight would inspect it, ponder it, and carefully investigate it, and it would appear to him to be void, hollow, insubstantial.
A man with good sight would inspect it, ponder it, and carefully investigate it, and it would appear to him to be void, hollow, insubstantial.
A man would come along wanting to live, not wanting to die, desiring happiness and averse to suffering.
A man would come along wanting to live, not wanting to die, desiring happiness and averse to suffering.
A mind fortified by renunciation becomes wieldy in regard to those things that are to be realized by direct knowledge.”
A mind fortified by renunciation becomes wieldy in regard to those things that are to be realized by direct knowledge.”
A mind fortified by renunciation becomes wieldy in regard to those things that are to be realized by direct knowledge.” 
A mother is the friend in one’s own home;
A nihilist, a scoffer, who hinders
A nihilist, a scoffer, who hinders
A noble disciple who possesses four things slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.
A noble disciple who possesses these four things has transcended all fear of a bad destination.”
A noble disciple who possesses these four things is a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.
A noble disciple who possesses these four things is a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.
A number of bhikkhus heard that such a pernicious view had arisen in the bhikkhu Yamaka.
A person with a sense of shame...
A person without a sense of shame … who is unafraid of wrongdoing … who is lazy … unwise … angry … malicious: this is a case of decline.
A proponent of the Dhamma does not dispute with anyone in the world.
A resolute sage, though from low family, Is a thoroughbred restrained by a sense of shame.
A secluded bhikkhu understands things as they really are.”
A second time and a third time Citta the householder asked the same question, and a second time and a third time the venerable chief elder was silent.
A second time and a third time Citta the householder asked the same question, and a second time and a third time the venerable chief elder was silent.
A second time and a third time Talapuṭa the troupe headman said: “Venerable sir, I have heard it said among actors of old in the lineage of teachers: … … What does the Blessed One say about that?”
A second time and a third time the Blessed One addressed the Venerable Sariputta thus: “Sariputta, in ‘The Questions of Ajita’ in the Parayana it is said...
A second time and a third time the naked ascetic Kassapa said to the Blessed One: “We would like to ask Master Gotama about a certain point, if he would grant us the favour of answering our question.”
A second time and a third time the Venerable Sariputta was silent.
A second time and a third time the Venerable Udayı̄ stated his position, and a second time and a third time the carpenter Pañcakaṅga stated his, but the Venerable Udayı̄ could not convince the carpenter Pañcakaṅga nor could the carpenter Pañcakaṅga convince the Venerable Udayı̄.
A second time and a third time Yodhajı̄va the headman said: “Venerable sir, I have heard it said by mercenaries of old in the lineage of teachers: … What does the Blessed One say about that?” 
A second time in the morning the Blessed One dressed and, taking bowl and robe, approached the residence of the brahmin Udaya….
A second time Sakka addressed Suvı̄ra … … but a second time Suvı̄ra became negligent.
A second time that brahmin youth approached the Venerable Udayı̄ …...
A second time the bhikkhu Kokalika said to the Blessed One: A second time the bhikkhu Kokalika said to the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, although the Blessed One has my faith and trust, all the same I say that Sariputta and Moggallana have evil wishes; they have come under the control of evil wishes.”
A second time the Blessed One was silent.
A second time the Venerable Ananda said to the Venerable Mahakassapa: “Come, Venerable Kassapa, let us go to the bhikkhunı̄s’ quarters.”
A second time … A third time the Blessed One addressed the Venerable Ananda: “Delightful is Vesali, Ananda….
A second time … A third time the yakkha Aḷavaka said to the Blessed One: “Get out, ascetic!”
A second time … … A third time the light disappeared and darkness appeared before the householder Anathapiṇḍika.
A second time, while the Venerable Godhika was dwelling diligent, ardent, and resolute, he reached temporary liberation of mind, but he fell away from that temporary liberation of mind.
A second time, while the Venerable Samiddhi was alone in seclusion, a reflection arose in his mind … And a second time Mara the Evil One … … made a loud noise, frightful and terrifying, as though the earth were splitting open.
A second time…A third time the Blessed One addressed the Venerable Kimbila: “How is it now, Kimbila, that concentration by mindfulness of breathing is developed and cultivated so that it is of great fruit and benefit?”
A serpent one may see by chance
A seventh time, while the Venerable Godhika was dwelling diligent, ardent, and resolute, he reached temporary liberation of mind.
A similar case of suicide is reported of the bhikkhu Vakkali at:.
A Skt version in Śrav-bh reads varivad dhṛtaṁ, “maintained like water,” which seems to me unlikely to correspond to the original reading.
A stone that looked like a lump of fat.
a sudda youth … who is trained … ready to stand his place.
a sudda youth … who is untrained … quick to flee.
A Tathagata awakens to this and breaks through to it.
A tawny wife with pockmarked face
A tawny wife with pockmarked face
A third suttanta use is to denote the Buddha’s discovery of the Dhamma, as here and in the verb form abhisameti at: below.
A third time in the morning the Blessed One dressed and, taking bowl and robe, approached the residence of the brahmin Udaya.
A third time Sakka addressed Suvı̄ra … but a third time Suvı̄ra became negligent.
A third time the bhikkhu Kokalika said to the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, although the Blessed One has my faith and trust, all the same I say that Sariputta and Moggallana have evil wishes; they have come under the control of evil wishes.”
A third time the Venerable Ananda said to the Venerable Mahakassapa: “Come, Venerable Kassapa, let us go to the bhikkhunı̄s’ quarters.”
A third time the Venerable Kimbila was silent.
A third time…A fourth time … A fifth time…A sixth time, while the Venerable Godhika was dwelling diligent, ardent, and resolute, he reached temporary liberation of mind, but he fell away from that temporary liberation of mind.
A thousand have left Death behind.
A trainee upon whom come gain, honour, and praise while he has not yet reached his mind’s ideal.
A trainee upon whom come gain, honour, and praise while he has not yet reached his mind’s ideal.
a trainee’s right concentration.
A triple knowledge man, attained to spiritual powers, I am skilled in the course of others’ minds.” 
a vessa youth...
a vessa youth...
A virtuous bhikkhu should carefully attend to these five aggregates subject to clinging as impermanent … as nonself.
A woman ranks as the best of goods; 
About unarisen problems
Abstinence from false speech, abstinence from divisive speech, abstinence from harsh speech, abstinence from idle chatter: this is called right speech.
Abstinence from the destruction of life, abstinence from taking what is not given, abstinence from sexual misconduct: this is called right action.
accomplishment in desire … accomplishment in self...
accomplishment in desire … accomplishment in self...
Accomplishment in desire...
Accomplishment in desire...
accomplishment in diligence … accomplishment in careful attention …  … He develops right concentration, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion.
Accomplishment in diligence … Accomplishment in careful attention …  … He develops right concentration, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
accomplishment in diligence … accomplishment in careful attention … … He develops right concentration, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Accomplishment in diligence … Accomplishment in careful attention …...
accomplishment in diligence … accomplishment in careful attention.
accomplishment in diligence … … accomplishment in careful attention.
accomplishment in self...
accomplishment in self...
Accomplishment in self...
Accomplishment in self...
accomplishment in view...
accomplishment in view...
Accomplishment in view...
Accomplishment in view...
accomplishment in view...
accomplishment in view...
Accomplishment in virtue...
Accomplishment in virtue...
According to the Abhidhamma system, with its conception of the supramundane path as lasting for only a single mind-moment, both the faith-follower and the Dhamma-follower should be such for only the one mind-moment of the path.
Acquires right here the essence for herself.”
Acquisitions truly are a man’s delight;
Acquisitions truly are a man’s delight;
Acquisitions truly are a man’s sorrow;
Acquisitions truly are a man’s sorrows;
Additional explanation is found at Vism  and Vibh-a -.
Additional support comes from AN II,-, which explains the antaraparinibbayi as one who has abandoned the fetter of rebirth without yet having abandoned the fetter of existence.
Adorned with jewellery and earrings, Are not worth a sixteenth part
Afflict that fool in this world and the next.
After a long time at last I see
After giving him that beating, he would drive the bull away.
After paying homage to him, they sat down to one side and told the Blessed One all that had taken place after he had left, adding: “Then, venerable sir, we approached the Venerable Ananda and asked him about the meaning.
After paying homage to him, they sat down to one side and told the Blessed One all that had taken place after he had left, adding: “Then, venerable sir, we approached the Venerable Ananda and asked him about the meaning.
After paying homage to the Blessed One, he sat down to one side and said to him: “Venerable sir, doesn’t the Blessed One in many ways praise sympathy for families, the protection of families, compassion for families?”
After renouncing sensual pleasures, They weep for this one too, my son, For though alive he’s really dead.
After rising, in the last watch of the night, while walking back and forth and sitting, he purifies his mind of obstructive states.
After rising, in the last watch of the night, while walking back and forth and sitting, he purifies his mind of obstructive states.
After standing for two or three days that man saw the Blessed One coming in the distance.
After the meal, when I have finished my breakfast, it is my custom to roam and wander from park to park, from garden to garden.
After washing his feet, he entered the hall and sat down against the central pillar facing east.
Afterwards the bitter fruit is theirs, For bad indeed is the result.” 
Afterwards the bitter fruit is theirs, For bad indeed is the result.” 
Again and again, grain comes to the realm.
Again and again, one is born and dies;
Again and again, one wearies and trembles;
Again and again, ploughmen plough the field;
Again and again, the calf goes to its mother;
Again and again, the dolt enters the womb;
Again and again, the donors give;
Again and again, the sky-god sends down rain;
Again and again, they take one to the cemetery.
Again, the first bhikkhu, dissatisfied with the other’s answer, approached still another bhikkhu and asked him: “In what way, friend, is a bhikkhu’s vision well purified?”
Again, the first bhikkhu, dissatisfied with the other’s answer, approached still another bhikkhu and asked him: “In what way, friend, is a bhikkhu’s vision well purified?”
Aggregates, sense bases, and elements.
Aging-and-death, bhikkhus, is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen, subject to destruction, vanishing, fading away, and cessation.
Agitation and a constellation of mental states born of preoccupation with the change of consciousness remain obsessing his mind.
Agitation and a constellation of mental states born of preoccupation with the change of form remain obsessing his mind.
Aimed at the immortal state, 
Alas, sir, Brahma Baka is immersed in ignorance, in so far as he will say of what is actually impermanent that it is permanent; and will say of what is actually unstable that it is stable; and will say of what is actually noneternal that it is eternal; and will say of what is actually incomplete that it is complete; and will say of what is actually perishable that it is imperishable; and with reference to where one is born, ages, dies, passes away, and is reborn, will say thus: ‘Indeed, this is where one is not born, does not age, does not die, does not pass away, and is not reborn’; and when there is another escape superior to this, will say, ‘There is no other escape superior to this.’”
Alas, the world is to perish, in that the mind of the Tathagata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, inclines to living at ease, not to teaching the Dhamma.”
Alas, this homeless one will snatch many people
All beings, all living beings, all creatures, all souls are without mastery, power, and energy; moulded by destiny, circumstance, and nature, they experience pleasure and pain in the six classes?” 
All beings, great king, are subject to death, terminate in death, and cannot escape death.
All formations are impermanent; all phenomena are nonself.’
All formations are impermanent; all phenomena are nonself.” 
All have entered the stream, Never returning to the animal realm.
All I have demolished along with their root.
All is nonself….
All is oppressed….
All is stricken….” 
All is subject to cessation….” 
All is subject to death….
All is subject to defilement….
All is subject to destruction….
All is subject to origination….
All is subject to sickness….
All is subject to sorrow….
All is subject to vanishing….
All is suffering….
All is to be abandoned….
All is to be directly known….
All is to be fully understood through direct knowledge….
All is to be fully understood….
All is to be realized….
All of its shards and fragments would sink downwards, but the ghee or oil there would rise upwards.
All the cittas from the investigating consciousness onwards are mind-consciousness element, which is of seventy-six types.
All under its control.”
All under its control.” 
All under its control.” 
All under its control?”
All under its control?”
All under its control?”
Alone in a secluded lodging
Alone in a secluded lodging
Alone in the forest, Gotama?”
Along with ignorance have been expunged, The arahants with taints destroyed:
Along with ignorance have been expunged, The arahants with taints destroyed:
Along with ignorance, Has crossed this ocean so hard to cross
Along with one’s possessions.
Along with the neither-painful-nor-pleasant, Both the internal and the external, Whatever kind of feeling there is:
Along with the object of mind-consciousness it includes all feeling, perception, and volitional factors that accompany consciousness in the process of cognition.
Also has death as destination.
Also, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that suffering has arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another, it is impossible that they will experience without contact.”
Also, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that suffering has arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another, that too is conditioned by contact.
Also, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that suffering is created both by oneself and by another, it is impossible that they will experience without contact.
Also, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that suffering is created both by oneself and by another, that too is conditioned by contact.
Also, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that suffering is created by another, it is impossible that they will experience without contact.
Also, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that suffering is created by another, that too is conditioned by contact.
Also, the noble disciple who becomes enlightened through the aforesaid assemblage of states is called ‘one being enlightened’.
Also, the unarisen enlightenment factor of mindfulness arises and the arisen enlightenment factor of mindfulness comes to fulfilment by development … the unarisen enlightenment factor of equanimity arises and the arisen enlightenment factor of equanimity comes to fulfilment by development.”
Also, the unarisen enlightenment factor of mindfulness does not arise and the arisen enlightenment factor of mindfulness ceases...
Also, venerable sir, the bodily touch of those ladies is just like that of a tuft of cotton wool or kapok; so it is with the royal ladies so delicately nurtured.
Alternatively, the first “it” might be taken to refer to craving, and the second to the five aggregates arisen through craving.
Although, bhikkhus, a noble disciple maintains himself by lumps of almsfood and wears rag-robes, still, as he possesses four things, he is freed from hell, the animal realm, and the domain of ghosts, freed from the plane of misery, the bad destinations, the nether world.
altruistic joy...
Always ablaze, my mind always concentrated, I am an arahant living the holy life.
Among the deva host, Jalini!
Among the hills of Rajagaha, Seta, the best of snow-clad mountains, The sun, the best of travellers in the sky.
Among the Tavatiṁsa devas
Among the violent, they are quenched;
Among these five aggregates subject to clinging, I do not regard anything as self or as belonging to self.”
Among these who have become so avid, Flowing along in the stream of existence, Who here have abandoned craving?
Among those who grasp, they do not grasp:
An axe is born inside his mouth
An early word gloss is at Vibh -.
An easterly wind would drive it westward; a westerly wind would drive it eastward; a northerly wind would drive it southward; a southerly wind would drive it northward.
An easterly wind would drive it westward; a westerly wind would drive it eastward; a northerly wind would drive it southward; a southerly wind would drive it northward.
An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the cessation of suffering.’
An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the cessation of suffering.’
An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the origin of suffering.’
An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the origin of suffering.’
An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
AN II - draws an alternative distinction between the sasaṅkharaparinibbayi and the asaṅkharaparinibbayi: the former reaches arahantship through meditation on the “austere” meditation subjects such as the foulness of the body, the perception of the repulsiveness of food, discontent with the whole world, the perception of impermanence in all formations, and mindfulness of death; the latter, through the four jhanas.
An immeasurable one by taking his measure?
An immeasurable one by taking his measure?
An impure Dhamma devised by those still stained.
An inspiration has come to me, Fortunate One!”
An inspiration has come to me, Fortunate One!”
An inspiration has come to me, Fortunate One!”
An inspiration has come to me, Fortunate One!”
An inspiration has come to me, Fortunate One!”
An inspiration has come to me, Fortunate One!”
An inspiration has come to me, Fortunate One!” 
An inspiration has come to me, friend Sariputta!”
An obedient woman is the best of wives, A dutiful boy, the best of sons.” 
An offering given from what little one has
An offering given from what little one has
Ananda too, to whatever extent he wishes, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, enters and dwells in the first jhana’?”
And a second time the Blessed One said to the bhikkhu Kokalika: “Do not speak thus, Kokalika!… Sariputta and Moggallana are well behaved.”
And a steady supply of moisture:
And a third time the Blessed One said to the bhikkhu Kokalika: “Do not speak thus, Kokalika!… Sariputta and Moggallana are well behaved.”
And about arisen ones.
And also of liberation by wisdom;
And also with liberation by wisdom;
And as to these five lower fetters taught by the Blessed One, I do not see any of these unabandoned in myself.”
And as to these five lower fetters taught by the Blessed One, I do not see any of these unabandoned in myself.”
And as to these training rules for the laity taught by the Blessed One, I do not see within myself any that has been broken.”
And because that financier householder murdered his brother’s only son for the sake of his fortune, as a result of that kamma he was tormented in hell for many years, for many hundreds of years, for many thousands of years, for many hundreds of thousands of years.
And by clinging to what does ‘I am’ occur, not without clinging?
And by destruction of the taints, He is sorrowless, beyond despair, Why trouble one gone forth?
and by thinking: ‘If wholesome states that have arisen in me cease, this may lead to my harm.’
And carefully investigate it, It appears but hollow and void
And causeways over rough terrain.
And deeply respectful towards the Saṅgha, These brighten up the heavens
And deeply respectful towards the Saṅgha:
And do deeds hard to do:
And do not soil the mind by thinking, ‘ is displeasing to me.’ 
And do not yield to desire for the lovely.
And does not remain holding it tightly.
And drives away the wild dog.
And during that same rains he attained final Nibbana.
And even though this may be so, bhikkhus, I do not say that the breakthrough to the Four Noble Truths is accompanied by suffering or displeasure.
and exercise bodily mastery as far as the brahma world?” 
And experience suffering for a long time.
And faith arose within me.
And four things which, when developed and cultivated, fulfil seven things?
And four things which, when developed and cultivated, fulfil seven things?
And further:
And further:
And further:
And further:
And further:
And hard for the inept to endure, For many are the obstructions there
and have spoken in praise of arousing energy.”
And having seen those that give no delight, Dispel the path of lust towards the delightful
And he dwells perceiving after and before: ‘As before, so after; as after, so before; as below, so above; as above, so below; as by day, so at night; as at night, so by day.’
And he dwells perceiving after and before: ‘As before, so after; as after, so before; as below, so above; as above, so below; as by day, so at night; as at night, so by day.’
And he dwells perceiving after and before: “As before, so after; as after, so before; as below, so above; as above, so below; as by day, so at night; as at night, so by day.”
And he dwells perceiving after and before: “As before, so after; as after, so before; as below, so above; as above, so below; as by day, so at night; as at night, so by day.”
And he dwells perceiving after and before: “As before, so after; as after, so before; as below, so above; as above, so below; as by day, so at night; as at night, so by day.”
And he dwells perceiving after and before: “As before, so after; as after, so before; as below, so above; as above, so below; as by day, so at night; as at night, so by day.”
And he has dwelt perceiving after and before: ‘As before, so after; as after, so before; as below, so above; as above, so below; as by day, so at night; as at night, so by day.’
And he has dwelt perceiving after and before: ‘As before, so after; as after, so before; as below, so above; as above, so below; as by day, so at night; as at night, so by day.’
And he has sufficient faith in the Tathagata, sufficient devotion to him.
And he has sufficient faith in the Tathagata, sufficient devotion to him.
And he is one who, by realizing it for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life enters and dwells in that unsurpassed goal of the holy life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the household life into homelessness.”
And he is one who, by realizing it for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life enters and dwells in that unsurpassed goal of the holy life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the household life into homelessness.”
And he is one who, by realizing it for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life enters and dwells in that unsurpassed goal of the holy life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the household life into homelessness.”
And he is one who, by realizing it for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life enters and dwells in that unsurpassed goal of the holy life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the household life into homelessness.”
And he might say, ‘They speak to me.’
And he says: ‘See!
And he uses his wealth without being tied to it, uninfatuated with it, not blindly absorbed in it, seeing the danger in it, understanding the escape.
And here, bhikkhu, you should clearly see the eye as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
And here, bhikkhu, you should clearly see the eye as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
And here, bhikkhu, you should clearly see the mind as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
And here, bhikkhu, you should clearly see the mind as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
And his disciples now dwell following that path and become possessed of it afterwards.
And his disciples now dwell following that path and become possessed of it afterwards.
And his slaves, servants, and workers, spurred on by punishment and fear, were busy making the preparations, wailing with tearful faces.
And his slaves...
And household thoughts entirely, One should not nurture lust towards anything;
And how is it, bhikkhus, that the four bases for spiritual power, when developed and cultivated, are of great fruit and benefit?
And how is this so?
And how is this so?
And how is this so?
And how should I explain in accordance with the Dhamma, so that no reasonable consequence of my assertion would give ground for criticism?”
And how should we explain in accordance with the Dhamma so that no reasonable consequence of our assertion would give ground for criticism?”
And how should we explain in accordance with the Dhamma so that no reasonable consequence of our assertion would give ground for criticism?”
And how, Ananda, does a bhikkhu dwell with himself as his own island, with himself as his own refuge, with no other refuge; with the Dhamma as his island, with the Dhamma as his refuge, with no other refuge?
And how, Ananda, does a bhikkhu who has a good friend, a good companion, a good comrade, develop and cultivate the Noble Eightfold Path?
And how, bhikkhus, is concentration by mindfulness of breathing developed and cultivated so that it is of great fruit and benefit?
And how, bhikkhus, is concentration by mindfulness of breathing developed and cultivated so that no shaking or trembling occurs in the body, and no shaking or trembling occurs in the mind?
And how, bhikkhus, is mindfulness of breathing developed and cultivated so that it is of great fruit and benefit?
And how, bhikkhus, is mindfulness of breathing developed and cultivated so that it is of great fruit and benefit?
And how, bhikkhus, is mindfulness of breathing developed and cultivated so that it is of great fruit and benefit?
And I don’t praise my virtues.
And I have also said: ‘Whatever is felt is included in suffering.’
And I, venerable sir, invite the Blessed One: Is there any deed of mine, either bodily or verbal, which the Blessed One would censure?”
And if I were to teach you about the origin and the passing away of suffering with reference to the future, saying, ‘So it will be in the future,’ perplexity and uncertainty about that might arise in you.
And if women were to come here
And if, when I was asked by him, ‘Is there no self?’
And ignorance have been expunged, The arahants with taints destroyed:
and in celestial forms, sounds, odours, tastes, and tactile objects.”
and in celestial forms, sounds, odours, tastes, and tactile objects.”
and in celestial forms, sounds, odours, tastes, and tactile objects.”
and in my presence recited these verses:
And in seeing the cessation of conditions, when one sees the cessation of the conditionally arisen phenomena owing to the cessation of their conditions, the eternalist view, which might otherwise arise, does not occur.
And in the case of a disciple who was a person of the highest kind, a supreme person, one who had attained the supreme attainment, when that disciple has passed away and died he also declares his rebirth thus: “That one was reborn there, that one was reborn there.”
And in the future a bad destination.”
And in the future a good destination.”
And invite the learned to dwell in them;
And it is because the four establishments of mindfulness are developed and cultivated that the true Dhamma endures long after a Tathagata has attained final Nibbana.
And it is because the four establishments of mindfulness are developed and cultivated that the true Dhamma endures long after a Tathagata has attained final Nibbana.
And it is because these four establishments of mindfulness are developed and cultivated that the true Dhamma endures long after a Tathagata has attained final Nibbana.” 
And it is enough, friend Sariputta, for diligence.”
And it is enough, friend Sariputta, for diligence.”
And it is enough, friend Sariputta, for diligence.”
And it is enough, friend Sariputta, for diligence.”
And it is here that the arisen displeasure faculty ceases without remainder.
And it is here that the arisen equanimity faculty ceases without remainder.
And it is here that the arisen joy faculty ceases without remainder.
And it is here that the arisen pain faculty ceases without remainder.
And it is here that the arisen pleasure faculty ceases without remainder.
And it is when these four establishments of mindfulness are developed and cultivated that the true Dhamma does not decline.”
And just as an ornament of finest gold—very skilfully burnished in a furnace by an adroit goldsmith—when placed on a brocade cloth, shines and beams and radiates, so too the young devas in Susima’s assembly … displayed diverse lustrous colours.
And just as in the autumn, when the sky is clear and cloudless, the sun, ascending in the sky, dispels all darkness from space as it shines and beams and radiates, so too the young devas in Susima’s assembly—elated, gladdened, full of rapture and joy—displayed diverse lustrous colours.
And just as, when the night is fading, the morning star shines and beams and radiates, so too the young devas in Susima’s assembly...
And lead them away beyond the King of Death.” 
and light.
and light.
and lighting.
And make a refuge for himself;
And Maṇicūḷaka was able to convince that assembly.
And not far from the Blessed One, Devadatta too was walking back and forth with a number of bhikkhus.
And now that I have heard this Dhamma teaching of the Venerable Ananda, I have made the breakthrough to the Dhamma.”
And now that I have heard this Dhamma teaching of the Venerable Sariputta, my mind is liberated from the taints by nonclinging.” 
And of aeons of such length, we have wandered through so many aeons, so many hundreds of aeons, so many thousands of aeons, so many hundreds of thousands of aeons.
And of aeons of such length, we have wandered through so many aeons, so many hundreds of aeons, so many thousands of aeons, so many hundreds of thousands of aeons.
And of that which the wise in the world agree upon as existing, I too say that it exists.
And on a later occasion that brahma went to attend upon the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.
And on what one ground may he be praised?
And on what two grounds may he be praised?
And one has that confirmed confidence in the Buddha which the instructed noble disciple possesses, because of which the latter, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
And one has that confirmed confidence in the Dhamma which the instructed noble disciple possesses, because of which the latter, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world: ‘The Dhamma is well expounded by the Blessed One … to be personally experienced by the wise.’
And one has that confirmed confidence in the Saṅgha which the instructed noble disciple possesses, because of which the latter, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world: ‘The Saṅgha of the Blessed One’s disciples is practising the good way … the unsurpassed field of merit for the world.’
And one has those virtues dear to the noble ones which the instructed noble disciple possesses, because of which the latter, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world: virtues dear to the noble ones … leading to concentration.
And one’s view is straightened out, They say that one isn’t poor;
And people fight with one another, Among those who fight, they do not fight;
and perceptions have not subsided, there is also feeling with that as condition.
And remains tightly holding to it.
and said to him....
and said to him:
and said to him:
and said to him:
and said to him:
and said to him:
and said to him: “Here, venerable sir, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, I see women, with the breakup of the body, after death, being reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
and said to the Blessed One: “Here, venerable sir, a great mass of people have been put in bondage by King Pasenadi of Kosala, some with ropes, some with clogs, some with chains.”
And Sakka, lord of the devas, addressed the Tavatiṁsa devas thus: ‘Dear sirs, in the impending battle between the devas and the asuras, if the devas win and the asuras are defeated, bind Vepacitti, lord of the asuras, by his four limbs and neck and bring him to me in the Sudhamma assembly hall.’
And Sakka, lord of the devas, addressed the Tavatiṁsa devas: ‘Good sirs, if in this impending battle the devas win and the asuras are defeated, bind Vepacitti, lord of the asuras, by his four limbs and neck and bring him to me in Sudhamma, the assembly hall of the devas.’
And seven things which, when developed and cultivated, fulfil two things?”
And seven things which, when developed and cultivated, fulfil two things?”
And six about slanting to the ocean.
And six about slanting to the ocean.
And six about slanting to the ocean.
And six about slanting to the ocean.
And six about slanting to the ocean.
And six about slanting to the ocean.
And six about slanting to the ocean.
And six about slanting to the ocean.
And so in regard to the Dhamma and the Saṅgha.
And so in regard to the Dhamma and the Saṅgha.
And so in regard to the Dhamma and the Saṅgha.
And so in regard to the Dhamma and the Saṅgha.
And so in regard to the Dhamma and the Saṅgha.
And so in regard to the Dhamma and the Saṅgha.
And so in the Dhamma and the Saṅgha.
And so it is with you venerable ones: when you were face to face with the Teacher you passed by the Blessed One, thinking that I should be asked about the meaning.
And soon, not long after his higher ordination … the Venerable Talapuṭa became one of the arahants.
And soon, not long after his higher ordination, dwelling alone … … the Venerable Bharadvaja became one of the arahants.
And soon, not long after his higher ordination, dwelling alone, withdrawn, diligent, ardent, and resolute … the Venerable Nanda became one of the arahants.”
And soon, not long after his higher ordination, dwelling alone, withdrawn, diligent, ardent, and resolute, the Venerable Bharadvaja, by realizing it for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life entered and dwelt in that unsurpassed goal of the holy life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the household life into homelessness.
And soon, not long after his higher ordination, dwelling alone, withdrawn, diligent, ardent, and resolute, the Venerable Kassapa, by realizing it for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life entered and dwelt in that unsurpassed goal of the holy life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the household life into homelessness.
And soon, not long after his higher ordination, dwelling alone, withdrawn, diligent, ardent, and resolute, the Venerable Kassapa, by realizing it for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life entered and dwelt in that unsurpassed goal of the holy life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the household life into homelessness.
and spoken in praise of arousing energy?”
And that bhikkhu became one of the arahants.
And that bhikkhu became one of the arahants.
And that bhikkhu became one of the arahants.
And that bhikkhu became one of the arahants.
And that bhikkhu became one of the arahants.
And that bhikkhu became one of the arahants.
And the birds have settled down, The mighty forest itself murmurs:
And the birds have settled down, The mighty forest itself murmurs:
And the birds have settled down, The mighty forest itself murmurs:
And the birds have settled down, The mighty forest itself murmurs:
And the Blessed One recovered from that illness.
And the Blessed One says to you, friend Vakkali: ‘Do not be afraid, Vakkali, do not be afraid!
And the Blessed One says to you, friend Vakkali: “Do not be afraid, Vakkali, do not be afraid!
And the devatas too are pleased.”
And the disciple dwells in that Dhamma practising in accordance with it, practising it properly, conducting himself accordingly.
And the disciple dwells in that Dhamma practising in accordance with it, practising it properly, conducting himself accordingly.
And the distrust of one’s heart, If one has cast away aversion, One can understand well-spoken counsel.”
And the four established in the fruit:
And the good of the future life.
And the good of the future life.
And the origin of feelings, Where they finally cease, And the path leading to their destruction.
And the origin of identity, Also the Noble Eightfold Path
And the painful as a dart, Seen as impermanent the peaceful feeling
And the teachings proclaimed by the Tathagata are accepted by him after being pondered to a sufficient degree with wisdom.
And the teachings proclaimed by the Tathagata are accepted by him after being pondered to a sufficient degree with wisdom.
And the transcendence of ignorance, That knowledge has been cleansed, Why trouble one gone forth?
And the Venerable Bahiya became one of the arahants.
And the Venerable Bahiya became one of the arahants.
And the Venerable Bharadvaja became one of the arahants.
And the Venerable Kassapa became one of the arahants.
And the Venerable Kassapa became one of the arahants.
And the Venerable Khemaka has explained, taught, proclaimed, established, disclosed, analysed, and elucidated the Blessed One’s teaching in detail.”
And the Venerable Mahakassapa recovered from that illness.
And the Venerable Maluṅkyaputta became one of the arahants.
And the Venerable Migajala became one of the arahants.
And there Vepacitti, lord of the asuras, was bound by his four limbs and neck.
And these six sense bases have what as their source…?
And these volitional formations have what as their source, what as their origin, from what are they born and produced?
And they are ones who, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in that unsurpassed goal of the holy life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the household life into homelessness.”
And thirty-six more, and five abbudas, The maligner of noble ones goes to hell, Having set evil speech and mind against them.” 
And this consciousness has what as its source…?
And this contact has what as its source…?
And this name-and-form has what as its source…?
And this state too is hard to see, that is, the stilling of all formations, the relinquishment of all acquisitions, the destruction of craving, dispassion, cessation, Nibbana.
And those bhikkhus are listening to the Dhamma with eager ears….
And those bhikkhus are listening to the Dhamma with eager ears….
And those bhikkhus were listening to the Dhamma with eager ears, attending to it as a matter of vital concern, applying their whole mind to it.
And those bhikkhus were listening to the Dhamma with eager ears, attending to it as a matter of vital concern, applying their whole minds to it.
And those bhikkhus were listening to the Dhamma with eager ears, attending to it as a matter of vital concern, applying their whole minds to it.
And those bhikkhus were listening to the Dhamma with eager ears, attending to it as a matter of vital concern, applying their whole minds to it.
And those bhikkhus were listening to the Dhamma with eager ears, attending to it as a matter of vital concern, directing their whole mind to it.
And those bhikkhus were listening to the Dhamma with eager ears, attending to it as a matter of vital concern, directing their whole mind to it.
and those who maintain that pleasure and pain have arisen fortuitously … in each case it is impossible that they will experience without contact.
and those who maintain that pleasure and pain have arisen fortuitously … in each case that is conditioned by contact.
and those who maintain that suffering has arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another, it is impossible that they will experience without contact.
And those who speak in terms of ‘mine’—
And those who speak in terms of ‘mine’—
And to the excellence of the Dhamma.” 
And view that has been rectified, They say that one is not poor, That one’s life is not vain.
And view that has been rectified, They say that one is not poor, That one’s life is not vain.
And went forth into homelessness:
And what are those huge trees with tiny seeds and huge bodies?
And what becomes manifest to him as it really is?
And what becomes manifest to him as it really is?”
And what concentration is it through the development and cultivation of which no shaking or trembling occurs in the body, and no shaking or trembling occurs in the mind?
And what does it cognize?
And what does it feel?
And what does it perceive?
And what have you seen that doesn’t exist in the world?’
And what in the world has a pleasant and agreeable nature?
And what is disintegrating?
And what is empty of self and of what belongs to self?
And what is impermanent?
And what is impermanent?
And what is impermanent?
And what is impermanent?
And what is impermanent?
And what is impermanent?
And what is impermanent?
And what is it that experiences their resort and domain?”
And what is it that one does not seek delight in?
And what is it that one seeks delight in, what does one welcome, to what does one remain holding?
And what is it that the arahants maintain must cease to exist for there to be no pleasure and pain?”
And what is it, bhikkhus, that is not yours?
And what is it, bhikkhus, that is not yours?
And what is it, bhikkhus, that is not yours?
And what is nonself?
And what is nonself?
And what is subject to disintegration?
And what is suffering?
And what is suffering?
And what is that ancient path, that ancient road?
And what is that method of exposition?
And what is that method of exposition?
And what is that middle way awakened to by the Tathagata, which gives rise to vision … leads to Nibbana?
And what is that other kind of happiness?
And what is that other kind of happiness?
And what is that other kind of happiness?
And what is that other kind of happiness?
And what is that other kind of happiness?
And what is that other kind of happiness?
And what is that other kind of happiness?
And what is that other kind of happiness?
And what is that other kind of happiness?
And what is the beginning of wholesome states?
And what is the beginning of wholesome states?
And what is the cause and reason for the nondecline of the true Dhamma?”…
And what is the cause and reason why some beings here attain Nibbana in this very life?”
And what is the cause and reason why someone here is reckoned as gentle?” 
And what is the cause and reason why the true Dhamma endures long after a Tathagata has attained final Nibbana?’”
And what is the cause and reason why the true Dhamma endures long after a Tathagata has attained final Nibbana?”
And what is the cause and reason why the true Dhamma endures long after a Tathagata has attained final Nibbana?”
And what is the cause and reason why when the ascetic Gotama is asked such questions, he does not give such answers?” 
And what is the cause and reason why, when Master Gotama is asked such questions, he does not give such answers?”
And what is the cause and reason why, when the ascetic Gotama is asked such questions, he does not give such answers?”
And what is the cause and reason why, when the ascetic Gotama is asked such questions, he does not give such answers?”
And what is the conditioned that they construct?
And what is the Noble Eightfold Path?
And what is the path and the way that leads to the cessation of craving?
And what is the path and the way that leads to the destruction of craving?
And what is the proximate cause for birth?
And what is the proximate cause for clinging?
And what is the proximate cause for concentration?
And what is the proximate cause for craving?
And what is the proximate cause for dispassion?
And what is the proximate cause for existence?
And what is the proximate cause for faith?
And what is the proximate cause for gladness?
And what is the proximate cause for happiness?
And what is the proximate cause for liberation?
And what is the proximate cause for rapture?
And what is the proximate cause for revulsion?
And what is the proximate cause for suffering?
And what is the proximate cause for the knowledge and vision of things as they really are?
And what is the proximate cause for the knowledge of destruction?
And what is the proximate cause for tranquillity?
And what is the proximate cause for volitional formations?
And what is the starting point of wholesome states?
And what is the starting point of wholesome states?
And what you have seen doesn’t exist in the world.’
And what, bhikkhus, are the five kinds of feelings?
And what, bhikkhus, is the all that is burning?
And what, bhikkhus, is the all that is subject to birth?
And what, bhikkhus, is the all that is weighed down?
And what, bhikkhus, is the diversity of elements?
And what, bhikkhus, is the right way?
And what, bhikkhus, is the wrong way?
And what, friends, is that in the world by which one is a perceiver of the world, a conceiver of the world?
And what, headman, is concentration of the Dhamma?
And what, Radha, is Mara?
And what, Radha, is Mara?”… 
And what, Radha, is subject to cessation?
And what, venerable sir, is the method by which these things are one in meaning and different only in phrasing?
And whatever food the mother eats—
And when bodily feelings have arisen that are painful, racking, sharp, piercing, harrowing, disagreeable, through his leonine manner he endures them, mindful and clearly comprehending, without becoming distressed.”
And when bodily feelings have arisen that are painful, racking, sharp, piercing, harrowing, disagreeable, through his tamed manner he endures them, mindful and clearly comprehending, without becoming distressed.”
And when bodily feelings have arisen that are painful...
And when bodily feelings have arisen that are painful...
And when bodily feelings have arisen that are painful...
And when I heard his Dhamma teaching I made the breakthrough to the Dhamma.” 
And when I’m sitting all alone
And when the Blessed One had relinquished his vital formation, a great earthquake occurred, frightening and terrifying, and peals of thunder shook the sky.
And when the man came upon him while he was alone and took his life with a sharp knife, wasn’t he a murderer then too, though the other did not recognize him as ‘my murderer’?”
And when the man was serving him, rising up before him, retiring after him, doing whatever he wants, agreeable in his conduct, endearing in his speech, wasn’t he a murderer then too, though the other did not recognize him as ‘my murderer’?
And when the Wheel of the Dhamma had been set in motion by the Blessed One, the earth-dwelling devas raised a cry: “At Baraṇasi, in the Deer Park at Isipatana, this unsurpassed Wheel of the Dhamma has been set in motion by the Blessed One, which cannot be stopped by any ascetic or brahmin or deva or Mara or Brahma or by anyone in the world.”
And where, bhikkhus, do these three unwholesome thoughts cease without remainder?
And while this discourse was being spoken, that bhikkhu’s mind was liberated from the taints by nonclinging.
And while this discourse was being spoken, the minds of sixty elder bhikkhus and of the Venerable Khemaka were liberated from the taints by nonclinging.
And while this discourse was being spoken, the minds of the bhikkhus of the group of five were liberated from the taints by nonclinging.
And while this discourse was being spoken, the minds of the thousand bhikkhus were liberated from the taints by nonclinging.
And while this discourse was being spoken, the Venerable Rahula’s mind was liberated from the taints by nonclinging, and in those many thousands of devatas there arose the dust-free, stainless vision of the Dhamma: “Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.” 
And while this discourse was being spoken, there arose in that bhikkhu the dust-free, stainless vision of the Dhamma: “Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.” 
And while this discourse was being spoken, there arose in the Venerable Kondañña the dust-free, stainless vision of the Dhamma: “Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.”
And while this exposition was being spoken, the minds of the thirty bhikkhus from Pava were liberated from the taints by nonclinging.
And who is the wise one, ever mindful?” 
And who, when he takes away, is dear?
And whose success I much desired, Being instigated by their wives, Chase me out as dogs chase swine.
And why, bhikkhus, have I not taught those many things?
And why, bhikkhus, have I taught this?
And with consciousness.
And would he say, ‘They speak to me’?” 
And you have confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
And you have confirmed confidence in the Dhamma thus: ‘The Dhamma is well expounded by the Blessed One … to be personally experienced by the wise.’
And you have confirmed confidence in the Saṅgha thus: ‘The Saṅgha of the Blessed One’s disciples is practising the good way … the unsurpassed field of merit for the world.’
And you have right intention … right speech … right action … right livelihood … right effort … right mindfulness … right concentration … … right knowledge … right liberation.
And you have right view.
And you have those virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken … leading to concentration.
And you, good man, being struck day after day by three hundred spears will have a life span of a hundred years, will live a hundred years; and then, after a hundred years have passed, you will make the breakthrough to the Four Noble Truths, to which you had not broken through earlier.’ 
And you’ll experience delight.” 
And, bhikkhus, between the obtaining of sovereignty over the four continents and the obtaining of the four things, the obtaining of sovereignty over the four continents is not worth a sixteenth part of the obtaining of the four things.” 
And, venerable sir, if the Blessed One wishes, he need only resolve that the Himalayas, the king of mountains, should become gold, and it would turn to gold.” 
And, venerable sir, the Blessed One, who is at present the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, first abandoned the five hindrances, corruptions of the mind and weakeners of wisdom; and then, with his mind well established in the four establishments of mindfulness, he developed correctly the seven factors of enlightenment; and thereby he has awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment.”
And, venerable sir, whatever Arahants, Perfectly Enlightened Ones will arise in the future, all those Blessed Ones will first abandon the five hindrances, corruptions of the mind and weakeners of wisdom; and then, with their minds well established in the four establishments of mindfulness, they will develop correctly the seven factors of enlightenment; and thereby they will awaken to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment.
Anger crushes evil people.’” 
Anger crushes evil people.’” 
Angry and displeased, he approached the Blessed One and abused and reviled him with rude, harsh words.
Angry and displeased, he approached the Blessed One and abused and reviled him with rude, harsh words.
Angry and displeased, he approached the Blessed One and silently stood to one side.
Another giving food to beggars:
Another giving food to beggars:
Answer as you see fit.
Answer as you see fit.
Answer as you see fit.
Answer as you see fit.
Answer as you see fit.
Answer as you see fit.
Answer as you see fit.
Anupadaparinibbanatthaṁ.
Any bhikkhu who relishes and enjoys the arisen gain, honour, and praise is called a bhikkhu who has been struck with a corded harpoon,  who has met with calamity and disaster, and the Evil One can do with him as he wishes.
Any bhikkhu who relishes and enjoys the arisen gain, honour, and praise is called a bhikkhu who has swallowed the baited hook, who has met with calamity and disaster, and the Evil One can do with him as he wishes.
Any of its shards or fragments there would sink downwards, but the ghee or oil would rise upwards.
Anyone answering rightly would answer just as Sariputta has done.
Anyone answering rightly would answer just as Sariputta has done.
Anyone at all who engages in sexual misconduct is bound for a state of misery, bound for hell.
Anyone at all who speaks falsehood is bound for a state of misery, bound for hell.
Anyone at all who takes what is not given is bound for a state of misery, bound for hell.
Anyone at all who takes what is not given...
apart from acceptance of a view after pondering it, does the Venerable Musı̄la have personal knowledge thus: ‘With existence as condition, birth’?… ‘With ignorance as condition, volitional formations’?”
apart from acceptance of a view after pondering it, does the Venerable Musı̄la have personal knowledge: ‘With the cessation of birth comes cessation of aging-and-death’?
apart from acceptance of a view after pondering it, I know this, I see this: ‘With ignorance as condition, volitional formations.’”
apart from acceptance of a view after pondering it, I know this, I see this: ‘With the cessation of birth comes cessation of aging-and-death.’… ‘With the cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional formations.’”
apart from acceptance of a view after pondering it—can declare final knowledge thus: ‘Destroyed is birth...
Apparently here tulaṁ and atulaṁ are taken as by-forms of tullaṁ and atullaṁ respectively.
Appears as big as a cloud.”
Apply your mindfulness to the body, Be engrossed in revulsion.
Approach that Blessed One and ask him about this matter.
approached me...
Are able to understand this state?
Are always offered by family custom, 
Are always yoked evenly together.
are busy making preparations, wailing with tearful faces.”
Are fully quenched in the world.” 
Are kept at bay and fail to grip him.” 
Are kept at bay and fail to grip him?” 
Are not worth even a fraction of one like him.” 
Are obtained only with difficulty.
Are obtained without difficulty.
Are the Buddha’s bosom sons.
Are the people who will go beyond
Are there any people in Uruvelakappa on whose account sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair would arise in you if they were to be executed, imprisoned, fined, or censured?” 
Are those in the world no longer avid.” 
Are unskilled in the Dhamma.’
Are unskilled in the Dhamma.’
Are unskilled in the Dhamma.” 
Are unskilled in the Dhamma.” 
Are used to increase their worldly gains.
Are you free from bondage?”
As a bhikkhu undelighted, untroubled:
As a bull does one who flees.’
As a bull does one who flees.’ 
As a collection for the future life.
As a collection for the future life.
As a collection for the future life.
As a consequence of this, delight arises.
As a consequence of this, delight arises….
As a consequence of this, delight in consciousness ceases….
As a consequence of this, delight in form ceases.
As a lay follower of the Buddha Kassapa.
As a lay follower of the Buddha Kassapa.
As a residual result of that same kamma, he has furnished the royal treasury with this seventh heirless fortune.
As a residual result of that same kamma, he obtained the position of financier seven times in this same city of Savatthi.
As a technical term, abhisamaya appears in the Nikayas in two main contexts: As signifying the initial breakthrough to the Dhamma, dhammabhisamaya, it is identical with the obtaining of the vision of the Dhamma, and thus with the attainment of stream-entry; see:.
As a tortoise draws its limbs into its shell, Independent, not harassing others, fully quenched, A bhikkhu would not blame anyone.
As a tortoise draws its limbs into its shell, Independent, not harassing others, fully quenched, A bhikkhu would not blame anyone.” 
As aging and death are rolling in on me, venerable sir, what else should be done but to live by the Dhamma, to live righteously, and to do wholesome and meritorious deeds?”
As aging and death are rolling in on you, what else should be done but to live by the Dhamma, to live righteously, and to do wholesome and meritorious deeds?”
As an elephant does a hut of reeds.
As apart from consciousness?” - “No, friend.”
As apart from consciousness?” - “No, venerable sir.”
As apart from feeling?
As apart from feeling?
As apart from perception?
As apart from perception?
As apart from volitional formations?
As apart from volitional formations?
As consciousness has originated from what is impermanent, how could it be permanent?
As consciousness has originated from what is nonself, how could it be self?
As consciousness has originated from what is suffering, how could it be happiness?
As for those who dwell in diligence, To them I humbly pay homage.”
As for those who dwell in diligence, To them I humbly pay homage.”
As form has originated from what is impermanent, how could it be permanent?
As form has originated from what is nonself, how could it be self?
As form has originated from what is suffering, how could it be happiness?
As he did so, the Blessed One saw beings with little dust in their eyes and with much dust in their eyes, with keen faculties and with dull faculties, with good qualities and with bad qualities, easy to teach and difficult to teach, and a few who dwelt seeing blame and fear in the other world.
As he does not harm others.”
As he dwells contemplating phenomena in phenomena, the mind becomes dispassionate, and by nonclinging it is liberated from the taints.
As he dwells contemplating the body in the body, the mind becomes dispassionate, and by nonclinging it is liberated from the taints.
As he dwells in the measureless state.
As he dwells thus contemplating phenomena in phenomena, the phenomena are fully understood.
As he dwells thus contemplating phenomena in phenomena, whatever desire he has for phenomena is abandoned.
As he dwells thus contemplating rise and fall in the five aggregates subject to clinging, the residual conceit ‘I am,’ the desire ‘I am,’ the underlying tendency ‘I am’ that had not yet been uprooted—this comes to be uprooted.
As he dwells thus contemplating rise and fall in the five aggregates subject to clinging, the residual conceit ‘I am,’ the desire ‘I am,’ the underlying tendency ‘I am’ that had not yet been uprooted—this comes to be uprooted.”
As he dwells thus contemplating the body in the body, the body is fully understood.
As he dwells thus contemplating the body in the body, whatever desire he has for the body is abandoned.
As he dwells thus, the underlying tendency to aversion in regard to contact and in regard to painful feeling is abandoned by him.
As he dwells thus, the underlying tendency to aversion in regard to the body and in regard to painful feeling is abandoned by him.
As he dwells thus, the underlying tendency to ignorance in regard to contact and in regard to neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling is abandoned by him.
As he dwells thus, the underlying tendency to ignorance in regard to the body and in regard to neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling is abandoned by him.
As he dwells thus, the underlying tendency to lust in regard to contact and in regard to pleasant feeling is abandoned by him.
As he dwells thus, the underlying tendency to lust in regard to the body and in regard to pleasant feeling is abandoned by him.
As he explained it to you, so you should have remembered it.”
As he explains it to you, so you should remember it.”
As he investigates them, they appear to him to be void, hollow, insubstantial.
As he keeps on running and revolving around them, he is not freed from form, not freed from feeling, not freed from perception, not freed from volitional formations, not freed from consciousness.
As he lives obsessed by these notions, that consciousness of his changes and alters.
As he lives obsessed by these notions, that feeling of his changes and alters.
As he lives obsessed by these notions, that perception of his changes and alters.
As he lives obsessed by these notions, those volitional formations of his change and alter.
As he lives unobsessed by these notions, that consciousness of his changes and alters.
As he lives unobsessed by these notions, that feeling of his changes and alters.
As he lives unobsessed by these notions, that form of his changes and alters.
As he lives unobsessed by these notions, that perception of his changes and alters.
As he lives unobsessed by these notions, those volitional formations of his change and alter.
As he no longer keeps running and revolving around them, he is freed from form, freed from feeling, freed from perception, freed from volitional formations, freed from consciousness.
As he teaches the dust-free Dhamma, Nibbana inaccessible to fear.
As he unrolls the coil, he would not find even softwood, let alone heartwood.
As he unrolls the coil, he would not find even softwood, let alone heartwood.
As his foremost treasure.
As I do not obtain concentration, it occurs to me: ‘Let me not fall away!’”
As I have seen such a knowledge-master.
As I understand the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One, a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed is annihilated and perishes with the breakup of the body and does not exist after death.”
As if you struck a stump with your breast, You part from Gotama disappointed.”
As in consciousness?
As in consciousness?
As in perception?
As in perception?
As in volitional formations?
As in volitional formations?
As it rolls towards security from bondage.
As its own fruit destroys the reed.”
As its own fruit destroys the reed.” 
As listening to true Dhamma frees one
As long as Prince Ajatasattu goes to attend upon Devadatta morning and evening with five hundred carts, and an offering of food is conveyed to him in five hundred pots, only decline can be expected of Devadatta in regard to wholesome states, not growth.
As one discards the human state, What can one call truly one’s own?
As one fully released, It isn’t good for you, an ascetic, To be instructing others.” 
As signifying the complete breaking through of conceit it is equivalent to the attainment of arahantship; see: and I, v.
As such a principle exists, O brahmin, This is their rule of conduct.
As swift as that man is, and as swift as are the sun and moon, and as swift as are the deities that run before the sun and moon, the vital formations perish even more swiftly than that.
As the Blessed One answers us, so we should remember it.”
As the Blessed One explains it to you, so you should remember it.”
As the Blessed One explains it to you, so you should remember it.”
As the Blessed One reflected thus, his mind inclined to living at ease, not to teaching the Dhamma.
As the days and nights pass by.
As the eye has originated from what is impermanent, how could it be permanent?
As the eye has originated from what is nonself, how could it be self?
As the eye has originated from what is suffering, how could it be happiness?
As the fig-roots and their supporting trunk increase in thickness they press upon each other, but the fig-roots, being the stronger, slowly crush the bark of the support against its wood, with the effect that the supporting trunk is gradually ringed, and its limbs begin to die back, its crown becoming stag-headed and uneven.
As the mind has originated from what is impermanent, how could it be permanent?
As the mind has originated from what is nonself, how could it be self?
As the mind has originated from what is suffering, how could it be happiness?
As the rivers carry their waters to the sea.”
As the rivers carry their waters to the sea.” 
As the stem form itthatta is clearly neuter, it is difficult to accept the commentarial explanation of itthattaya as an ablative.
As the tall Vepulla Mountain
As the wind, a fallen cotton tuft.
As they catch the forest elephant.
As they were sitting there, the Venerable Mahakassapa instructed, exhorted, inspired, and gladdened those bhikkhunı̄s with a Dhamma talk, after which he rose from his seat and departed.
As to this neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, venerable sir, the Blessed One has said that this is included in the peaceful and sublime pleasure.”
As to those ascetics and brahmins who do not understand birth … existence … clinging … craving...
As to those ascetics and brahmins who understand birth … volitional formations, their origin, their cessation, and the way leading to their cessation: it is possible that they will abide having transcended volitional formations.”
As to those consummate ones, there is no round for describing them.
As to those consummate ones, there is no round for describing them.
As to those consummate ones, there is no round for describing them.
As to those consummate ones, there is no round for describing them.”
As usual, the Abhidhamma analysis, at Vibh -, treats the iddhipada as factors of the supramundane paths.
As vijjacaraṇasampanna is one of the nine chief epithets of the Buddha and is also used to describe the arahant, the second couplet, if read apart from the commentarial explanation, expresses the Buddhistic rather than the brahmanical point of view.
As we are established in the five training rules, let the Blessed One teach us the Dhamma further.”
As you consider within yourself that confirmed confidence in the Buddha, your pains may subside on the spot.
As you consider within yourself that confirmed confidence in the Dhamma, your pains may subside on the spot.
As you consider within yourself that confirmed confidence in the Saṅgha, your pains may subside on the spot.
As you consider within yourself that right liberation, your pains may subside on the spot.”
As you consider within yourself that right view, your pains may subside on the spot.
As you consider within yourself those virtues dear to the noble ones, your pains may subside on the spot.
As ‘I am’ has not vanished, there takes place a descent of the five faculties—of the eye faculty, the ear faculty, the nose faculty, the tongue faculty, the body faculty.
Ascetics fully understand desire;
Ask him for a guarantee of safety.
Ask me that question when we are in the presence of the Blessed One.” 
Ask me that series of questions and I will answer you.” 
Ask what lies beyond Death’s realm.
Ask, bhikkhu!
Asked about their way of conduct, Being discreet, tell me, dear sir.’ 
Asked about their way of conduct, Being discreet, tell me, dear sir.’— it is in such a way that I understand in detail the meaning of this that was stated in brief.”
Association with superior persons, hearing the true Dhamma, careful attention, practice in accordance with the Dhamma.
Association with superior persons, hearing the true Dhamma, careful attention, practice in accordance with the Dhamma.
Association with superior persons, hearing the true Dhamma, careful attention, practice in accordance with the Dhamma.
Association with superior persons, hearing the true Dhamma, careful attention, practice in accordance with the Dhamma.
Association with superior persons, Sariputta, is a factor for stream-entry.
At a later time, when his body had become quite slim, King Pasenadi of Kosala stroked his limbs with his hand and on that occasion uttered this inspired utterance: “The Blessed One showed compassion towards me in regard to both kinds of good—the good pertaining to the present life and that pertaining to the future life.” 
At an alms offering, however, the Buddhist monk does not immerse his bowl in water; rather, when the meal is finished, water is poured into his empty bowl, and he uses his soiled right hand to clean the bowl, so that bowl and hand are washed simultaneously.
At AN III,, sahadhammika vadanuvada garayha ṭhana agacchanti occurs in a context where it means simply “reasonable rebukes, grounds for criticism, come up,” and is contrasted with sahadhammika pasaṁsa ṭhana agacchanti, “reasonable grounds for praise come up.”
At AN IV -, resolution guided by the formula, again with the rider, leads to one of the five levels of nonreturning or to arahantship.
At AN V,-, the Buddha describes this creed as the highest of outside speculative views, the reason being that one who accepts such a view will not be attracted to existence nor averse to the cessation of existence.
At Baraṇasi in the Deer Park at Isipatana.
At Baraṇasi in the Deer Park at Isipatana.
At Baraṇasi in the Deer Park at Isipatana….
At Baraṇasi in the Deer Park at Isipatana….
At Baraṇasi in the Deer Park at Isipatana….
At best can only equal him.’
At best can only equal him.’”
At best can only equal him.”
At best can only equal him.” 
At Kapilavatthu.
At Kapilavatthu.
At Kapilavatthu.
At Kapilavatthu.
At KS:, C.Rh.D seems to have mistaken them for second person plural optatives in the active voice, while at LDB, pp.,, Walshe has used a roundabout rendering, presumably to avoid having to identify the forms.
At MN II,-, practice guided by the full formula, with the rider, culminates in rebirth in the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception or in Nibbana.
At MN III,– it is said that he attained final Nibbana “at a  later time”, without specifying that this occurred during the same rains.
At noon they strike him with a hundred spears.
At Paṭaliputta.
At Paṭaliputta.
at present abandon the three discriminations, all do so because they have developed and cultivated these seven factors of enlightenment.” 
At present I have arisen in the world, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One.
at present regard that in the world with a pleasant and agreeable nature as impermanent, as suffering, as nonself, as a disease, as fearful: they are abandoning craving.
at present regard that in the world with a pleasant and agreeable nature as permanent, as happiness, as self, as healthy, as secure: they are nurturing craving.
At Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove.
At Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove.
At Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove.
At Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove.
At Saketa.
At Saketa.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi.
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthi….
At Savatthı̄ in Jeta’s Grove.
At Savatthı̄ in Jeta’s Grove.
At Savatthı̄ in Jeta’s Grove.
At Savatthı̄ in Jeta’s Grove.
At Savatthı̄ in Jeta’s Grove.
At Savatthı̄ in Jeta’s Grove.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At Savatthı̄.
At S̄vatthı̄.
At that time the Blessed One Kakusandha, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One, had arisen in the world.
At that time the Blessed One Kassapa, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One, had arisen in the world.
At that time the Blessed One Koṇagamana, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One, had arisen in the world.
At the end of every hundred years a man would remove one mustard seed from there.
At the end of every hundred years a man would remove one seed from there.
At the end of every hundred years a man would stroke it once with a piece of Kasian cloth.
At the end of the four months, if the bhikkhus are satisfied with him, they may if they wish give him the going forth and the higher ordination to the state of a bhikkhu.
At the end of the four years, if the bhikkhus are satisfied with me, let them if they wish give me the going forth and the higher ordination to the state of a bhikkhu.”
At the end of the paragraph, Ee reads ayaṁ vuccati bhikkhave samuppado, but this must be an editorial error as both Be and Se have paṭicca-samuppado.
At the four gates I had gifts given to ascetics, brahmins, paupers, wayfarers, mendicants, and beggars.
At Ud,- the shorter formula is applied to mindfulness of the body; one who dwells thus gradually crosses attachment, i.e., wins arahantship.
At:- they come at the end of the more usual list of noble persons, in place of the one practising for the realization of the fruit of stream-entry, and here the faith-follower is placed below the Dhamma-follower for the reason that his faculties are weaker.
Attend a sacrifice like this.
Attend upon Gotama, The sage perfect in all respects, Gone to the far shore of suffering.” 
Attend upon the Fortunate One
Attending on the Fortunate One, Applying themselves to Gotama’s Teaching, Who train in it with diligence.” 
Atulaṁ occurs elsewhere in the texts: at Sn b atulyo describes a teacher of the path, probably the Buddha; at Sn a, it is used in apposition to the Bodhisatta, the future Buddha; at Thi a atuliyaṁ describes the akampitaṁ dhammaṁ, “the unshaken state,” presumably Nibbana.
Austerity and the holy life—
Austerity and the holy life—
ava-nij and PED, s.v.
Avoid the left-hand branch and take the right-hand branch.
Avoid these fissures completely.” 
Be consistently has the second verb too as nirujjhati,  but the variant in Se and Ee is more likely to be original.
Be free from perplexity and doubt about this.
Because at least it can be used as fodder for the cattle.”
Because craving is his partner, and he has abandoned it; therefore he is called a lone dweller.”
Because craving is his partner, and he has not abandoned it; therefore he is called one dwelling with a partner.
Because for a long time his mind has slanted, sloped, and inclined towards seclusion.
Because for a long time his mind has slanted, sloped, and inclined towards seclusion.
Because for a long time his mind has slanted, sloped, and inclined towards seclusion.
Because for a long time this has been held to by him, appropriated, and grasped thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self.’
Because growth and decline is seen in this body composed of the four great elements, it is seen being taken up and laid aside.
Because he has abandoned delusion, other people do not irritate him.
Because he has abandoned hatred, other people do not irritate him.
Because he has abandoned lust, other people do not irritate him.
Because he has clearly seen the Four Noble Truths.
Because he has not abandoned delusion, other people irritate him.
Because he has not abandoned hatred, other people irritate him.
Because he has not abandoned lust, other people irritate him.
Because he knows: ‘I will fall into this charcoal pit and I will thereby meet death or deadly suffering.’
Because he knows: ‘I will fall into this charcoal pit and on that account I will meet death or deadly suffering.’
Because here, bhikkhus, there is no conduct guided by the Dhamma, no righteous conduct, no wholesome activity, no meritorious activity.
Because his mind is not obsessed, he is not frightened, distressed, or anxious, and through nonclinging he does not become agitated.
Because his mind is not obsessed, he is not frightened, distressed, or anxious, and through nonclinging he does not become agitated.
Because his mind is obsessed, he is frightened, distressed, and anxious, and through clinging he becomes agitated.
Because his mind is obsessed, he is frightened, distressed, and anxious, and through clinging he becomes agitated.
Because his mind was overcome and obsessed by gain, honour, and praise, Devadatta provoked a schism in the Saṅgha.
Because his view is rightly directed.
Because his view is rightly directed.
Because his view is wrongly directed.
Because his wealth is being used properly, kings do not take it away, thieves do not take it away, fire does not burn it, water does not carry it away, and unloved heirs do not take it.
Because his wealth is not being used properly, kings take it away, or thieves take it away, or fire burns it, or water carries it away, or unloved heirs take it.
Because I had not seen those like yourself
Because if they understand even a single sentence, that will lead to their welfare and happiness for a long time.
Because if they understand even a single sentence, that will lead to their welfare and happiness for a long time.”
Because it can at least be used for washing dishes.”
Because it has a deep base and is securely planted.
Because it is not easy to bend back that sharp-pointed spear with one’s hand or fist, to twist it out of shape, or to twirl it around.
Because lust does not exist and has been abandoned, hatred does not exist and has been abandoned, delusion does not exist and has been abandoned.
Because lust does not exist and has been abandoned, hatred does not exist and has been abandoned, delusion does not exist and has been abandoned.
Because lust still exists and has not been abandoned, hatred still exists and has not been abandoned, delusion still exists and has not been abandoned.
Because lust still exists and has not been abandoned, hatred still exists and has not been abandoned, delusion still exists and has not been abandoned.
Because of developing the four establishments of mindfulness … the four right strivings … the four bases for spiritual power … the five spiritual faculties … the five powers … the seven factors of enlightenment … the Noble Eightfold Path.
Because of developing what?
Because of developing what?
Because of developing … the Noble Eightfold Path.
Because of going for refuge to the Buddha, some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
Because of going for refuge to the Buddha, some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
Because of going for refuge to the Dhamma, some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
Because of going for refuge to the Sȧgha...
Because of going for refuge to the Sȧgha...
Because of going for refuge to the Saṅgha, some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.”
Because of going for refuge to the Saṅgha, some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.”
Because of not developing the four establishments of mindfulness … the four right strivings … the four bases for spiritual power … the five spiritual faculties … the five powers … the seven factors of enlightenment … the Noble Eightfold Path.
Because of not developing what?
Because of not developing what?
Because of not developing … the Noble Eightfold Path.
Because of possessing confirmed confidence in the Buddha, some beings here are stream-enterers, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as their destination.
Because of possessing confirmed confidence in the Buddha, some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
Because of possessing confirmed confidence in the Buddha, some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
Because of possessing confirmed confidence in the Buddha, some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
Because of possessing confirmed confidence in the Dhamma, some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
Because of possessing confirmed confidence in the Saṅgha, some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
Because of possessing the virtues dear to the noble ones some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
Because of possessing the virtues dear to the noble ones, some beings here are stream-enterers, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as their destination.”
Because of possessing the virtues dear to the noble ones, some beings here are stream-enterers, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as their destination.”
Because of possessing the virtues dear to the noble ones, some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.”
Because of possessing the virtues dear to the noble ones, some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.”
Because of possessing the virtues dear to the noble ones, some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.”
Because of possessing the virtues dear to the noble ones, some beings here, with the breakup of the body, after death, are reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.”
Because of possessing the virtues dear to the noble ones...
Because of the lightness of the tuft.
Because of the minuteness of their bodies.
Because of the prayers of the great crowd of people, because of their praise, because they circumambulate him making reverential salutations, would that person, with the breakup of the body, after death, be reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world?”
Because of the prayers of the great crowd of people, because of their praise, because they circumambulate him making reverential salutations, would that person, with the breakup of the body, after death, be reborn in a state of misery … in hell?”
Because of the prayers of the great crowd of people, because of their praise, because they circumambulate it making reverential salutations, would that boulder emerge, rise up, and come up on to high ground?”
Because of the prayers of the great crowd of people, because of their praise, because they circumambulate it making reverential salutations, would that ghee or oil sink down or settle or go downwards?”
Because of their own accord they act towards themselves in the same way that a dear person might act towards one who is dear; therefore they treat themselves as dear.’”
Because of their own accord they act towards themselves in the same way that a foe might act towards a foe; therefore they treat themselves as a foe.
Because of this she would despise the other beetles, thinking: ‘I am a dung-eater, stuffed with dung, full of dung, and in front of me there is a large dunghill.’
Because of this, here among beings, The noble path does not appear.”
Because of which you’ve come here.” 
Because phenomena become manifest, he is reckoned as ‘one who dwells diligently.’ 
Because phenomena become manifest, one is reckoned as ‘one who dwells diligently.’
Because phenomena become manifest, one is reckoned as ‘one who dwells diligently.’
Because phenomena do not become manifest, he is reckoned as ‘one who dwells negligently.’
Because phenomena do not become manifest, one is reckoned as ‘one who dwells negligently.’
Because right view slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.”
Because Sakka, lord of the devas, is not devoid of lust, not devoid of hatred, not devoid of delusion; he can be timid, petrified, frightened, quick to flee.
Because that foolish, incompetent, unskilful cook does not pick up the sign of his own master’s preference.
Because that hen with eight, ten, or twelve eggs had covered, incubated, and nurtured them properly.
Because that hen with eight, ten, or twelve eggs had not covered, incubated, and nurtured them properly.
Because that protection is external, not internal; therefore they leave themselves unprotected.
Because that protection is internal, not external; therefore they protect themselves.’”
Because that wise, competent, skilful cook picks up the sign of his own master’s preference.
Because that would not be within their domain.
Because that would not be within their domain.
Because that would not be within their domain.
Because the body has been fully understood, the Deathless is realized.
Because the current of the river Ganges slants, slopes, and inclines towards the ocean.
Because the fool has not lived the holy life for the complete destruction of suffering.
Because the great ocean is deep, immeasurable, hard to fathom.”
Because the instructed noble disciple knows of an escape from painful feeling other than sensual pleasure.
Because the mind is excited, bhikkhus, and it is difficult to calm it down with those things.
Because the mind is excited, bhikkhus, and it is difficult to calm it down with those things.
Because the mind is excited, bhikkhus, and it is easy to calm it down with those things.
Because the mind is excited, bhikkhus, and it is easy to calm it down with those things.
Because the mind is sluggish, bhikkhus, and it is difficult to arouse it with those things.
Because the mind is sluggish, bhikkhus, and it is difficult to arouse it with those things.
Because the mind is sluggish, bhikkhus, and it is easy to arouse it with those things.
Because the mind is sluggish, bhikkhus, and it is easy to arouse it with those things.
Because the phenomena have been fully understood, the Deathless is realized.”
Because the pillar has a deep base and is securely planted.
Because the river Ganges slants, slopes, and inclines towards the east, and it is not easy to make it slant, slope, and incline towards the west.
Because the river Ganges slants, slopes, and inclines towards the east, and it is not easy to make it slant, slope, and incline towards the west.
Because the river Ganges slants, slopes, and inclines towards the east, and it is not easy to make it slant, slope, and incline towards the west.
Because the spike is rightly directed.
Because the spike is rightly directed.
Because the spike is wrongly directed.
Because the uninstructed worldling does not know of any escape from painful feeling other than sensual pleasure.
Because the wise man has lived the holy life for the complete destruction of suffering.
Because there is another kind of happiness more excellent and sublime than that happiness.
Because there is another kind of happiness more excellent and sublime than that happiness.
Because there is another kind of happiness more excellent and sublime than that happiness.
Because there is another kind of happiness more excellent and sublime than that happiness.
Because there is another kind of happiness more excellent and sublime than that happiness.
Because there is another kind of happiness more excellent and sublime than that happiness.
Because there is another kind of happiness more excellent and sublime than that happiness.
Because there is another kind of happiness more excellent and sublime than that happiness.
Because there is another kind of happiness more excellent and sublime than that happiness.
Because there is no sap.”
Because there is sap.”
Because they are unbeneficial, irrelevant to the fundamentals of the holy life, and do not lead to revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
Because they dwell with me as their island, with me as their shelter, with me as their protector, with me as their refuge.
Because they dwell with me as their island, with me as their shelter, with me as their protector, with me as their refuge.
Because they dwell with me as their island, with me as their shelter, with me as their protector, with me as their refuge.
Because they dwell with me as their island, with me as their shelter, with me as their protector, with me as their refuge.
Because they fear blame, attack, and condemnation.” 
Because they have not seen the Four Noble Truths.
Because they have not seen the Four Noble Truths.
Because they have not seen the Four Noble Truths.
Because this body composed of the four great elements is seen standing for one year, for two years, for three, four, five, or ten years, for twenty, thirty, forty, or fifty years, for a hundred years, or even longer.
Because this is beneficial, relevant to the fundamentals of the holy life, and leads to revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
Because this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning; a first point cannot be discerned of blows by spears, blows by swords, blows by axes.
Because we have not known true Dhamma
Because when one has heard the Dhamma from such bhikkhus one dwells withdrawn by way of two kinds of withdrawal—withdrawal of body and withdrawal of mind.
Because you’ve lost wealth or pine for it, Or committed some crime in the village?
Because you’ve lost wealth or pine for it, Or committed some crime in the village?
Because, bhikkhu, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning….
Because, bhikkhu, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning….
Because, bhikkhus, that foolish, incompetent, unskilful bhikkhu does not pick up the sign of his own mind.
Because, bhikkhus, that wise, competent, skilful bhikkhu picks up the sign of his own mind.”
Because, bhikkhus, that would not be within his domain.” 
Because, bhikkhus, that would not be within his domain.” 
Because, bhikkhus, the noble disciple has clearly seen with correct wisdom as it really is this dependent origination and these dependently arisen phenomena.”
Because, bhikkhus, the Tathagata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One is devoid of lust, devoid of hatred, devoid of delusion; he is brave, courageous, bold, ready to stand his place.”
Because, bhikkhus, they have clearly seen the Four Noble Truths.
Because, bhikkhus, they have not seen the Four Noble Truths.
Because, bhikkhus, they have not seen the Four Noble Truths.
Because, bhikkhus, they have not seen the Four Noble Truths.
Because, bhikkhus, they have not seen the Four Noble Truths.
Because, bhikkhus, this reflection is beneficial, relevant to the fundamentals of the holy life, and leads to revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
Because, bhikkhus, this reflection is beneficial, relevant to the fundamentals of the holy life, and leads to revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
Because, bhikkhus, this reflection is unbeneficial, irrelevant to the fundamentals of the holy life, and does not lead to revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
Because, bhikkhus, this reflection is unbeneficial, irrelevant to the fundamentals of the holy life, and does not lead to revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
Because, bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning.
Because, bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning.
Because, bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning….
Because, bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning….
Because, bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning….
Because, bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning….
Because, bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning….
Because, bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning….
Because, bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning….
Because, bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning….
Because, bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning….
Because, bhikkhus, this talk is beneficial, relevant to the fundamentals of the holy life, and leads to revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
Because, bhikkhus, this talk is beneficial, relevant to the fundamentals of the holy life, and leads to revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
Because, bhikkhus, this talk is unbeneficial, irrelevant to the fundamentals of the holy life, and does not lead to revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
Because, bhikkhus, this talk is unbeneficial, irrelevant to the fundamentals of the holy life, and does not lead to revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
Because, brahmin, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning….
Because, venerable sir, that is neither our self nor what belongs to our self.”
Because, venerable sir, that is neither our self nor what belongs to our self.”
Because, venerable sir, that is neither our self nor what belongs to our self.”
Become established in what can be expressed.
Been crushed beneath advancing age.
Before you saw Ciravası̄’s mother or heard about her, did you have any desire, attachment, or affection for her?”
Begs for alms at others’ homes.
Behave like enemies towards themselves.
Behold him, the releaser from bondage, Unattached, dissecting into parts.
Behold the wise one, all-knowing, The great seer treading the noble path.” 
Being an item rescued from the fire, You wish to be burnt again.” 
Being asked thus, Ananda, you should answer in such a way.”
Being asked thus, friend, I would answer in such a way.” 
Being asked thus, friends, you should answer thus: ‘If, friends, one is devoid of lust, desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving in regard to form, then with the change and alteration of form sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair do not arise in one.
Being asked thus, friends, you should answer thus: ‘If, friends, one is not devoid of lust, desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving in regard to form, then with the change and alteration of form there arise in one sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
Being asked thus, friends, you should answer: ‘Our teacher, friends, teaches the removal of desire and lust for form, the removal of desire and lust for feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness.’
Being asked thus, friends, you should answer: ‘Our teacher, friends, teaches the removal of desire and lust.’
Being asked thus, I would answer in such a way.
Being asked thus, those wanderers would not be able to reply and, further, they would meet with vexation.
Being asked thus, those wanderers would not be able to reply and, further, they would meet with vexation.
Being asked thus, those wanderers would not be able to reply and, further, they would meet with vexation.
Being asked thus, venerable sir, I would answer in such a way.”
Being asked thus, venerable sir, I would answer in such a way.”
Being asked thus, venerable sir, I would answer in such a way.”
Being asked thus, venerable sir, I would answer in such a way.”
Being asked thus, venerable sir, I would answer in such a way.”
Being asked thus, venerable sir, I would answer in such a way.” 
Being asked thus, venerable sir, I would answer in such a way.” 
Being asked, please explain to me.”
Being capable of making an end, They fare no more in birth and aging.”
Being confident, may they show their confidence to me!’ Such a bhikkhu’s teaching of the Dhamma is impure.
Being contacted by painful feeling, he does not seek delight in sensual pleasure.
Being contacted by painful feeling, he seeks delight in sensual pleasure.
Being exhorted, you should practise accordingly.”
Being exhorted, you should practise accordingly.”
Being exhorted, you should practise accordingly.” 
Being in a state of displeasure, one understands: ‘I am in a state of displeasure.’
Being in a state of equanimity, one understands: ‘I am in a state of equanimity.’
Being in a state of joy, one understands: ‘I am in a state of joy.’
Being in a state of pain, one understands: ‘I am in a state of pain.’
Being in a state of pleasure, one understands: ‘I am in a state of pleasure.’
Being irritated by others, he manifests irritation: he is reckoned as wrathful.
Being irritated by others, he manifests irritation: he is reckoned as wrathful.
Being irritated by others, he manifests irritation: he is reckoned as wrathful.
Being repelled, humiliated, and disgusted with this body, they sought for an assailant.
Being repelled, humiliated, and disgusted with this body, they sought for an assailant.
Being unagitated, he personally attains Nibbana.
Being unagitated, he personally attains Nibbana.
Being unagitated, he personally attains Nibbana.
Being unagitated, he personally attains Nibbana.
Being unagitated, he personally attains Nibbana.
Being unagitated, he personally attains Nibbana.
Being unagitated, he personally attains Nibbana.
Being unagitated, he personally attains Nibbana.
Being unagitated, he personally attains Nibbana.
Being unagitated, one dwells happily.
Being unagitated, one dwells happily.
Being unagitated, one personally attains Nibbana.
Being yourself free from sorrow, behold the people
Belonging to the host of Thirty.’ 
Belonging to the host of Thirty.”
below.
Better done is the good deed
Between those friends from the past, Both now inwardly developed, Bearers of their final bodies.
Beyond this there is still the pair, ignorance and volitional formations, which are like the unbroken region of the empty pit.
Bhavasaṅkhara is not “kamma leading to new existence,” but the vital formation that the Buddha has just rejected.
Bhikkhu Saṅgha.
Bhikkhus, even though a woman, when one is alone with her, may not persist obsessing one’s mind, still gain, honour, and praise might persist obsessing one’s mind.
Bhikkhus, even though the most beautiful girl of the land, when one is alone with her, may not persist obsessing one’s mind, still gain, honour, and praise might persist obsessing one’s mind.
Bhikkhus, high in the sky winds called gales are blowing.
Bhikkhus, I have known of a certain person here whose mind I have encompassed with my own mind: ‘This venerable one would not tell a deliberate lie even for the sake of a golden bowl filled with powdered silver.’
Bhikkhus, I have known of a certain person here whose mind I have encompassed with my own mind: ‘This venerable one would not tell a deliberate lie even for the sake of a silver bowl filled with powdered gold.’
Bhikkhus, I have known of a certain person here whose mind I have encompassed with my own mind: ‘This venerable one would not tell a deliberate lie even for the sake of a suvaṇṇanikkha … even for the sake of a hundred suvaṇṇanikkhas … even for the sake of a siṅginikkha … for a hundred siṅginikkhas … for the earth filled with gold...
Bhikkhus, I have known of a certain person here, whose mind I have encompassed with my own mind: ‘This venerable one would not tell a deliberate lie even for the sake of his mother...
Bhikkhus, I see some person here whose mind is overcome and obsessed by honour, with the breakup of the body, after death, reborn in a state of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell.
Bhikkhus, in dependence on a contact to be experienced as pleasant, a pleasant feeling arises.
Bhikkhus, in regard to the Dhamma that has been thus taught by me discriminately, a reflection arose in the mind of a certain bhikkhu thus: ‘How should one know, how should one see, for the immediate destruction of the taints to occur?’
Bhikkhus, the liberation of mind by altruistic joy has the base of the infinity of consciousness as its culmination, I say, for a wise bhikkhu here who has not penetrated to a superior liberation.
Bhikkhus, the liberation of mind by compassion has the base of the infinity of space as its culmination, I say, for a wise bhikkhu here who has not penetrated to a superior liberation.
Bhikkhus, the liberation of mind by equanimity has the base of nothingness as its culmination, I say, for a wise bhikkhu here who has not penetrated to a superior liberation.”
Bhikkhus, with the utter destruction of the five lower fetters the lay follower Dighavu has become one of spontaneous birth, due to attain Nibbana there without returning from that world.”
Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire and lust for whatever is impermanent.”
Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire and lust for whatever is impermanent.”
Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire and lust for whatever is nonself.”
Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire and lust for whatever is nonself.”
Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire and lust for whatever is suffering.”
Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire and lust for whatever is suffering.” 
Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire for whatever is impermanent.”
Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire for whatever is impermanent.”
Bhikkhus, you should abandon lust for whatever is impermanent.”
Bile, phlegm, and also wind, Imbalance and climate too, Carelessness and assault, With kamma result as the eighth.
Birds, squirrels, and monkeys, which eat the fruits, drop the seeds on the branches of the forest-trees, where they grow into epiphytic bushes that hold on by strong roots encircling the branches.
Birth is impermanent...
birth receding causes aging-and-death to recede.”
birth; with birth as condition, aging-and-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair come to be.
Blessed One, I might dwell alone, withdrawn, diligent, ardent, and resolute.”
Blooms in the morning, its fragrance unspent, Behold Aṅgirasa, the Radiant One, Like the sun beaming in the sky.” 
Blow back and forth across the sky, Easterly winds and westerly winds, Northerly winds and southerly winds, Dusty winds and dustless winds, Sometimes cold, sometimes hot, Those that are strong and others mild—
Bodily and mental.
body-contact...
Bojjhaṅga is a compound of bodhi + aṅga.
Bondage, murder, affliction—
Both by day and at night.
Both by day and at night.
Both celestial and human;
Both celestial and human;
Both celestial and human;
Both celestial and human;
Both have been extinguished, brought to an end.
Both in this world and the next.
Both in this world and the next.
Both in this world and the next.
Both methods are suitable in this exposition, which combines the mundane and the supramundane.
Both now inwardly developed, Bearers of their final bodies.
Bound by the fetter of delight, Migajala, a bhikkhu is called one dwelling with a partner.
Bounded by the deep dark ocean—
Brahma Baka saw the Blessed One coming in the distance and said to him: “Come, dear sir!
Brahma does not eat such food, lady:
Brahmin, the aeons that have elapsed and gone by are even more numerous than that.
Breathing in short, he knows: ‘I breathe in short’; or breathing out short, he knows: ‘I breathe out short.’
Briefly, the faith-follower and the Dhamma-follower differ with regard to their dominant faculty: the former relies on faith as the vehicle of progress, the latter on wisdom.
Bring me just that sound.’
Bring me my staff, friend.
Broods like the carter with a broken axle.” 
Broods mournfully with a broken axle—
Burning with the fire of lust, with the fire of hatred, with the fire of delusion; burning with birth, aging, and death; with sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair, I say.
Burning with the fire of lust, with the fire of hatred, with the fire of delusion; burning with birth, aging, and death; with sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair, I say.
Burning with what?
Burning with what?
Burns one with fire, One does not gain sons and cattle, Nor do one’s heirs acquire wealth.
Burst asunder is delusion’s net.
But a footing gained, standing on the ground, He need not strain for he has gone beyond.
But a monkey who is foolish and frivolous approaches the pitch and seizes it with his hand; he gets caught there.
But a third time the yakkha Sivaka, invisible, made the proclamation:
But after being cursed by those seers who were virtuous and of good character, Sambara, lord of the asuras, was gripped by alarm three times in the course of the night.” &lt;&gt;
But after giving, he later felt regret and thought: ‘It would have been better if the slaves or workers had eaten that almsfood!’ Moreover, he murdered his brother’s only son for the sake of his fortune.
But again, though the Venerable Ananda was given such an obvious signal by the Blessed One, though he was given such an obvious hint, he was unable to penetrate it….
But all the time, day and night, The Buddha shines with glory.” 
But as to how dwelling alone is fulfilled in detail, listen to that and attend closely, I will speak.”
But as to how mindfulness of breathing is fulfilled in detail, Ariṭṭha, listen and attend closely, I will speak.” 
But ask whatever you want, friend.”
But ask whatever you want, friend.” 
But at present, venerable sir, the Blessed One has bhikkhu disciples who are wise … and who can teach the efficacious Dhamma.
But at present, venerable sir, the Blessed One has female lay disciples who are wise, disciplined, confident, secure from bondage, learned, upholders of the Dhamma, practising in accordance with the Dhamma, practising in the proper way, conducting themselves accordingly; who have learned their own teacher’s doctrine and can explain it, teach it, proclaim it, establish it, disclose it, analyse it, and elucidate it; who can refute thoroughly with reasons the prevalent tenets of others and can teach the efficacious Dhamma.
But because consciousness is nonself, consciousness leads to affliction, and it is not possible to have it of consciousness: ‘Let my consciousness be thus; let my consciousness not be thus.’
But because consciousness is pleasurable … beings become enamoured with it.
But because consciousness is suffering … beings experience revulsion towards it.
But because form is nonself, form leads to affliction, and it is not possible to have it of form: ‘Let my form be thus; let my form not be thus.’ 
But because form is pleasurable, immersed in pleasure, steeped in pleasure, and is not steeped in suffering, beings become enamoured with it.
But because form is suffering, immersed in suffering, steeped in suffering, and is not steeped in pleasure, beings experience revulsion towards it.
But because he found nothing tasty there, The crow departed from that spot.
But because one who enters and dwells amidst unwholesome states dwells in suffering in this very life, with vexation, despair, and fever, and because he can expect a bad destination with the breakup of the body, after death, the Blessed One praises the abandoning of unwholesome states.
But because one who enters and dwells amidst wholesome states dwells happily in this very life, without vexation, despair, and fever, and because he can expect a good destination with the breakup of the body, after death, the Blessed One praises the acquisition of wholesome states.”
But because that financier householder later felt regret about giving, as a result of that kamma his mind did not incline to the enjoyment of excellent food, excellent clothing, and excellent vehicles, nor to the enjoyment of excellent items among the five cords of sensual pleasure.
But because the air element is pleasurable, immersed in pleasure, steeped in pleasure, and is not steeped in suffering, beings become enamoured with it.
But because the air element is suffering, immersed in suffering, steeped in suffering, and is not steeped in pleasure, beings experience revulsion towards it.”
But because the earth element is pleasurable, immersed in pleasure, steeped in pleasure, and is not steeped in suffering, beings become enamoured with it.
But because the earth element is suffering, immersed in suffering, steeped in suffering, and is not steeped in pleasure, beings experience revulsion towards it.
But because the tortoise did not extend any of its limbs or its neck, the jackal, failing to gain access to it, lost interest in it and departed.
But because there is not even this much form that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, this living of the holy life for the complete destruction of suffering is discerned.
But because there is not even this much individual existence that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, this living of the holy life for the complete destruction of suffering is discerned.
But because they have been included by insight earlier, they do not undergo exploration separately; hence he does not mention them.
But by directly knowing and fully understanding the eye...
But come crushing everything.
But comes crushing everything.” 
But even this they cut and wander forth, Unconcerned, having abandoned sensual pleasures.” 
But for me the quest for this Dhamma
But for me the Venerable Sariputta was an advisor and counsellor, one who instructed, exhorted, inspired, and gladdened me.
But for one who understands, Patient endurance is the true victory.
But from the time I achieved dispassion the good men call
But go, brahmin.
But having abandoned lust, hate, and delusion, Those speaking on Dhamma are alone the good.”
But having cognized a disagreeable mental phenomenon with the mind, he is not dismayed by it, not daunted, not dejected, without ill will.
But having known Dhamma and abandoned doubt, Those bhikkhus become even surmounters of ties.” 
But having seen a disagreeable form with the eye, he is not dismayed by it, not daunted, not dejected, without ill will.
But he uses his wealth while being tied to it, infatuated with it, blindly absorbed in it, not seeing the danger in it, not understanding the escape.
But here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu speaking rightly might say:
But his mind, which has been fortified over a long time by faith, virtue, learning, generosity, and wisdom—that goes upwards, goes to distinction.
But how should one know, how should one see, for the immediate destruction of the taints to occur?” 
But how, friend Sariputta, should the meaning of this statement be seen?”
But I do not say that there is any method by which gold and silver may be consented to or sought.”
But I do not speak thus.
But I do not speak thus.
But I do not speak thus.
But I do not speak thus.
But I have come upon this assailant even without a search.’
But I say they are an obstacle to those pleasant dwellings in this very life which are achieved by one who dwells diligent, ardent, and resolute.
But I worship those endowed with virtue, Those long trained in concentration, Those who have properly gone forth
But I, bhikkhus, proclaim the way going upwards in the Noble One’s Discipline, the way which leads to utter revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
But if a bhikkhu of perfect virtue
But if each time someone has died you approach and question me about this matter, that would be troublesome for the Tathagata.
But if each time someone has died you approach and question me about this matter, that would be troublesome for the Tathagata.
But if he does not address me, neither will I address him.”
But if it abates in me, I understand, ‘It has abated in me for a particular reason.’
But if one does not find delight there, Guarded and mindful, dwell in the Saṅgha.
But if she possesses the power of beauty and the power of wealth too, then she is complete in that respect.
But if she possesses the powers of beauty and wealth, and the power of relatives too, then she is complete in that respect.
But if she possesses the powers of beauty, wealth, and relatives, and the power of sons too, then she is complete in that respect.
But if she possesses the powers of beauty, wealth, relatives, and sons, and the power of virtue too, then she is complete in that respect.
But in the case of a disciple who was a person of the highest kind, a supreme person, one who had attained the supreme attainment, when that disciple has passed away and died he does not declare his rebirth thus: “That one was reborn there, that one was reborn there.”
But in the future the bhikkhus will become delicate, with soft and tender hands and feet; they will sleep until sunrise on soft beds with pillows of cotton wool.
But in the future the Licchavis will become delicate, with soft and tender hands and feet; they will sleep until sunrise on soft beds with pillows of cotton wool.
But individual differences are recognized by me.” 
But infatuation with jewellery and earrings, Anxious concern for wives and children—
But is there anyone, great king, more dear to you than yourself?”
But is there, venerable sir, any other conflagration more terrible and frightful than that one?”
But is there, venerable sir, any other darkness greater and more frightful than that one?”
But is there, venerable sir, any other precipice steeper and more frightful than that one?”
But it is difficult for those bhikkhus who are undeveloped in body, undeveloped in virtue, undeveloped in mind, undeveloped in wisdom.
But it is one who does no harm at all
But it’s to you that I ought to speak.
But knowing, Kassapa, I say, “I know”; seeing, I say, “I see.” “‘Therefore, Kassapa, you should train yourself thus: “I will arouse a keen sense of shame and fear of wrongdoing towards elders, the newly ordained, and those of middle status.”
But listen to me too:
But listen to me too:
But listen to me too: 
But Master Kaccana said ‘with sense doors guarded.’
But my mind does not launch out upon the stilling of all formations, the relinquishing of all acquisitions, the destruction of craving, dispassion, cessation, Nibbana; nor does it acquire confidence, settle down, and resolve on it.
But no one can reproach a person
But now I know it as a witness
But now today I see for myself
But one not shaken in the three discriminations
But one who is able to endure them—
But rather, friends, wherever happiness is found and in whatever way, the Tathagata describes that as included in happiness.’” 
But rather, the desire and lust for them, that is the clinging there.” 
But rather, with birth as condition, aging-and-death.”
but rather, with name-and-form as condition, consciousness.’
But Sakka, lord of the devas, took off his boots, handed over his sword to others, lowered his parasol, and entered the hermitage through an gate; then he stood on the lee side, raising his joined hands in reverential salutation, paying homage to those seers who were virtuous and of good character.
But should he hold such a view as this: ‘If an actor, in the theatre or the arena, entertains and amuses people by truth and lies, then with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the company of the laughing devas’—that is a wrong view on his part.
But should he hold such a view as this: ‘When a mercenary strives and exerts himself in battle, if others slay him and finish him off while he is striving and exerting himself in battle, then with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the company of the battle-slain devas’—that is a wrong view on his part.
But since the eye is not the fetter of forms nor are forms the fetter of the eye —but rather the desire and lust that arise there in dependence on both is the fetter there—the living of the holy life is discerned for the complete destruction of suffering.
But since the mind is not the fetter of mental phenomena nor are mental phenomena the fetter of the mind—but rather the desire and lust that arise there in dependence on both is the fetter there—the living of the holy life is discerned for the complete destruction of suffering.
But since you see your transgression as a transgression and make amends for it in accordance with the Dhamma, we pardon you for it.
But since you see your transgression as a transgression and make amends for it in accordance with the Dhamma, we pardon you for it.
But some elder bhikkhus answered thus: “Friends, ‘the fetter’ and ‘the things that fetter’ are one in meaning and different only in phrasing.”
But still this youngster does not know his measure!”
But still this youngster does not know his measure!”
But such does not happen to one who sees the Dhamma.
But that Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, is dwelling at Rajagaha in the Hot Springs Park.
But that is not the ocean in the Noble One’s Discipline; that is only a great mass of water, a great body of water.
But that is not the ocean in the Noble One’s Discipline; that is only a great mass of water, a great expanse of water.
But that turtle went to that region, and a hunter struck him with a corded harpoon.
But that which is called ‘mind’ and ‘mentality’ and ‘consciousness’ arises as one thing and ceases as another by day and by night.
But the bhikkhunı̄ Thullananda fell away from the holy life.
But the bhikkhunı̄ Thullatissa fell away from the holy life.
But the Blessed One  endured them, mindful and clearly comprehending, without becoming distressed.
But the Blessed One endured them, mindful and clearly comprehending, without becoming distressed.
But the Blessed One endured them, mindful and clearly comprehending, without becoming distressed.
But the Blessed One has said: “Whatever is felt is included in suffering.”
But the Blessed One paid no attention, as he was liberated in the unsurpassed extinction of acquisitions.
But the Blessed One paid no attention, as he was liberated in the unsurpassed extinction of acquisitions.
But the Blessed One paid no attention, as he was liberated in the unsurpassed extinction of acquisitions.
But the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, is able to bring it about that with the breakup of the body, after death, the entire world might be reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.”
But the Buddha is the best of those that shine:
But the Buddha is the best of those that shine:
But the Dhamma of the good does not decay:
But the instructed noble disciple does not become frightened over an unfrightening matter.
But the lay follower Candanaṅgalika bestowed those five upper robes upon the Blessed One.
But the one who teaches the Dhamma
But the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance, the mass of darkness: this is the peaceful state, this is the sublime state, that is, the stilling of all formations, the relinquishment of all acquisitions, the destruction of craving, dispassion, cessation, Nibbana.’
But the Teacher swept them away right there
But the verses spoken by Sakka, lord of the devas, are in the sphere of nonpunishment and nonviolence; hence freedom from conflict, freedom from contention, and freedom from strife.
But the wanderers of other sects were not honoured, respected, esteemed, venerated, and revered, and they did not obtain robes, almsfood, lodgings, and medicinal requisites.
But the wise man guards diligence
But the yakkha Sivaka, invisible, made the proclamation:
But then it occurred to him: “It is not proper for me to abuse and revile the ascetic Mahakaccana solely on the basis of what I have heard from these youths.
But these are seen by way of craving, clinging, and existence.
But these beings are more numerous who are born in water.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not abstain from damaging seed and plant life.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not abstain from divisive speech.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not abstain from eating at improper times.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not abstain from false speech.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not abstain from harsh speech.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not abstain from idle chatter.…” 
But these beings are more numerous who do not abstain from sexual misconduct.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not abstain from taking what is not given.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not abstain from the destruction of life.…” 
But these beings are more numerous who do not abstain from wines, liquors, and intoxicants that are a basis for negligence.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not honour ascetics.
But these beings are more numerous who do not honour brahmins.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not honour their father.…” 
But these beings are more numerous who do not honour their mother.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not respect their elders in the family.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not so abstain.
But these beings are more numerous who do not so abstain.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not so abstain.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not so abstain.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not so abstain.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not so abstain.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not so abstain.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not so abstain.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not so abstain.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not so abstain.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not so abstain.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not so abstain.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not so abstain.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not so abstain.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not so abstain.…”
But these beings are more numerous who do not so abstain.…” 
But these beings are more numerous who do not so abstain.…” 
But these beings are more numerous, who are immersed in ignorance and confused.…”
But they do so with the thought: ‘I am immersed in birth, aging, and death; in sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
But they know him when he speaks, Pointing out the deathless state.
But this body is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen.
But this body is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen.
But this body is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen.
But this contact is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen.
But this contact is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen.
But this contact is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen.
But this generation delights in adhesion, takes delight in adhesion, rejoices in adhesion.
But this one does not become engaged and cling through that engagement and clinging, mental standpoint, adherence, underlying tendency; he does not take a stand about ‘my self.’
But those beings are more numerous who are reborn elsewhere than among human beings.
But those beings are more numerous who are reborn elsewhere than among human beings.
But those beings are more numerous who are reborn in the outlying countries among the uncultured barbarians.
But those beings are more numerous who, when they pass away as devas, are reborn in hell … in the animal realm … in the domain of ghosts.…”
But those beings are more numerous who, when they pass away as devas, are reborn in hell … in the animal realm … in the domain of ghosts.…”
But those beings are more numerous who, when they pass away as human beings, are reborn in hell … in the animal realm … in the domain of ghosts.…”
But those beings are more numerous who, when they pass away as human beings, are reborn in hell.
But those beings are more numerous who, when they pass away as human beings, are reborn in the animal realm.…” 
But those beings are more numerous who, when they pass away as human beings, are reborn in the domain of ghosts.…”
But those beings are more numerous who, when they pass away from hell, are reborn in hell … in the animal realm … in the domain of ghosts.…”
But those beings are more numerous who, when they pass away from hell, are reborn in hell … in the animal realm … in the domain of ghosts.…” 
But those beings are more numerous who, when they pass away from the animal realm, are reborn in hell … in the animal realm … in the domain of ghosts.…”
But those beings are more numerous who, when they pass away from the animal realm, are reborn in hell … in the animal realm … in the domain of ghosts.…”
But those beings are more numerous who, when they pass away from the domain of ghosts, are reborn in hell … in the animal realm … in the domain of ghosts.…”
But those beings are more numerous who, when they pass away from the domain of ghosts, are reborn in hell.” 
But those beings are more numerous who, when they pass away from the domain of ghosts, are reborn in the animal realm.”
But those beings are more numerous who, when they pass away from the domain of ghosts, are reborn in the domain of ghosts.
But those by whom this has been known … they would be without perplexity or doubt about this: that the faculty of faith … … the faculty of wisdom, when developed and cultivated, has the Deathless as its ground, the Deathless as its destination, the Deathless as its final goal.”
But those by whom this has been known, seen, understood, realized, and contacted with wisdom—they would be without perplexity or doubt about this: that the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom, when developed and cultivated, has the Deathless as its ground, the Deathless as its destination, the Deathless as its final goal.
But those people in Uruvelakappa in relation to whom no sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair would arise in me—these are the ones for whom I have no desire and attachment.”
But those who engage in good conduct of body, speech, and mind protect themselves.
But those who engage in good conduct of body, speech, and mind treat themselves as dear.
But though I feel regret over this, that evil deed of mine cannot be undone.’
But though I feel regret over this, that evil deed of mine cannot be undone.’
But though I feel regret over this, that evil deed of mine cannot be undone.’
But though I feel regret over this, that evil deed of mine cannot be undone.’
But though the Venerable Ananda was given such an obvious signal by the Blessed One, though he was given such an obvious hint, he was unable to penetrate it.
But to whatever extent the devas found fault with this … that yakkha became more and more handsome, more and more comely, more and more graceful.’ - ‘That must be the anger-eating yakkha.’
But today, great king, the financier householder is being roasted in the Great Roruva Hell.” 
But we do not partake of your meal; we do not enter upon an exchange.
But what is the benefit that Master Gotama lives for?”
But what now are those five cords of sensual pleasure?’”
But when a bhikkhu has abandoned ignorance and aroused true knowledge, then, with the fading away of ignorance and the arising of true knowledge, he does not generate a meritorious volitional formation, or a demeritorious volitional formation, or an imperturbable volitional formation.
But when a bhikkhu who is ardent
But when beings have directly known all this as it really is, then they have escaped from this world with its devas and humans … they have become detached from it, released from it, and they dwell with a mind rid of barriers.”
But when beings have directly known all this as it really is, then they have escaped from this world with its devas and humans...
But when beings have directly known all this as it really is, then they have escaped from this world with … its devas and humans; they have become detached from it, released from it, and they dwell with a mind rid of barriers.”
But when I considered my devotion and reverence for the Blessed One, and my sense of shame and fear of wrongdoing, I went forth from the household life into homelessness.
But when I directly knew all this as it really is, then I claimed to have awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment in this world with … its devas and humans.
But when I directly knew all this as it really is, then I claimed to have awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment in this world with … its devas and humans.
But when I directly knew all this as it really is, then I claimed to have awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment in this world with … its devas and humans.
But when I directly knew all this as it really is, then I claimed to have awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment in this world with … its devas and humans.
But when I directly knew all this as it really is, then I claimed to have awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment in this world with … its devas and humans.
But when I directly knew all this as it really is, then I claimed to have awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment in this world with … its devas and humans.
But when I directly knew all this as it really is, then I claimed to have awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment in this world with...
But when I enter my harem guarded in body, speech, and mind, with mindfulness set up, restrained in the sense faculties, on that occasion states of lust do not assail me in such a way.
But when it has worn away, the knowledge occurs to him that it has worn away.
But when it occurred to him: ‘The asuras are righteous, the devas are unrighteous; now I will go there to the city of the asuras,’ then he saw himself bound by his four limbs and neck and he was deprived of the five cords of divine sensual pleasure.
But when my knowledge and vision of these Four Noble Truths as they really are in their three phases and twelve aspects was thoroughly purified in this way, then I claimed to have awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment in this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, in this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans.
But when noble knowledge has arisen in the noble disciple, then there is stability of the four faculties, then there is steadiness of the four faculties.
But when noble knowledge has arisen in the noble disciple, then there is stability of the four faculties, then there is steadiness of the four faculties.
But when one returns to the home life
But when the Blessed One approved of my answer, it occurred to me: ‘If the Blessed One were to question me about this matter with various terms and with various methods for a whole day, for a whole day I would be able to answer him with various terms and with various methods.
But when the Blessed One approved of my answer, it occurred to me: “If the Blessed One were to question me about this matter for up to seven days and nights, for up to seven days and nights I would be able to answer him with various terms and with various methods.”’”
But when the Dhamma has been taught by me in such a way through methods of exposition, it may be expected of those who will concede, allow, and approve of what is well stated and well spoken by others that they will live in concord, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, blending like milk and water, viewing each other with kindly eyes.
But when the man becomes aware that the householder or householder’s son has placed trust in him, then, finding him alone, he would take his life with a sharp knife.
But when the quail knew, ‘That hawk has come close,’ he slipped inside that clod, and the hawk shattered her breast right on the spot.
But when those discourses that are mere poetry composed by poets, beautiful in words and phrases, created by outsiders, spoken by disciples, are being recited, they will be eager to listen to them, will lend an ear to them, will apply their minds to understand them; and they will think those teachings should be studied and mastered.
But when those little boys or girls lose their lust, desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for those sand castles, then they scatter them with their hands and feet, demolish them, shatter them, and put them out of play.
But where these cease, That they consider suffering.
But while these eight causes and conditions for the destruction of families exist, if anyone speaks thus of me: ‘The Blessed One is practising for the annihilation of families, for the calamity of families, for the destruction of families,’ if he does not abandon that assertion and that state of mind, and if he does not relinquish that view, then according to his deserts he will be, as it were, dropped off in hell.”
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional formations; with the cessation of volitional formations, cessation of consciousness….
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional formations; with the cessation of volitional formations, cessation of consciousness….
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional formations; with the cessation of volitional formations, cessation of consciousness….
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional formations; with the cessation of volitional formations, cessation of consciousness….
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional formations; with the cessation of volitional formations, cessation of consciousness….
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional formations; with the cessation of volitional formations, cessation of consciousness….
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional formations; with the cessation of volitional formations, cessation of consciousness….
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional formations; with the cessation of volitional formations, cessation of consciousness….
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional formations; with the cessation of volitional formations, cessation of consciousness….
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional formations; with the cessation of volitional formations, cessation of consciousness….
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance that body does not exist conditioned by which that pleasure and pain arise internally; that speech does not exist conditioned by which that pleasure and pain arise internally; that mind does not exist conditioned by which that pleasure and pain arise internally.
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of that same craving comes cessation of clinging … cessation of existence … cessation of birth; with the cessation of birth, aging-and-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair cease.
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of that same craving comes cessation of clinging … cessation of existence … cessation of birth; with the cessation of birth, aging-and-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair cease.
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of that same craving comes cessation of clinging; with the cessation of clinging, cessation of existence; with the cessation of existence, cessation of birth; with the cessation of birth, aging-and-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair cease.
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of that same craving comes cessation of clinging; with the cessation of clinging, cessation of existence; with the cessation of existence, cessation of birth; with the cessation of birth, aging-and-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair cease.
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of that same craving comes cessation of clinging; with the cessation of clinging, cessation of existence….
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of that same craving comes cessation of clinging; with the cessation of clinging, cessation of existence….
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of the six bases for contact comes cessation of contact; with the cessation of contact, cessation of feeling; with the cessation of feeling, cessation of craving; with the cessation of craving, cessation of clinging; with the cessation of clinging, cessation of existence; with the cessation of existence, cessation of birth; with the cessation of birth, aging-and-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair cease.
But, friend Sariputta, it does not occur to me, ‘I am the eye’ or ‘The eye is mine’; ‘I am the ear’ or ‘The ear is mine’ … ‘I am the mind’ or ‘The mind is mine,’ so why should there be any alteration in my body or any change in my faculties?”
But, friend, that a bhikkhu who guards the doors of the sense faculties, who is moderate in eating, and who is devoted to wakefulness will maintain all his life the complete and pure holy life—this is possible.
But, Kassapa, ‘The one who acts is one, the one who experiences is another,’ with reference to one stricken by feeling: ‘Suffering is created by another.’
But, Mahanama, how many things must an individual possess for you to recognize him as a stream-enterer … with enlightenment as his destination?”
But, Nandiya, as to how a noble disciple is one who dwells negligently and one who dwells diligently, listen to that and attend closely, I will speak.” 
But, Sariputta, if they were to ask you: ‘Friend Sariputta, through what kind of deliverance have you declared final knowledge thus: “I understand: Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being”?’—being asked thus, how would you answer?”
But, sire, there is the bhikkhunı̄ named Khema, a disciple of the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.
But, Timbaruka, ‘The feeling is one, the one who feels it is another,’ with reference to one stricken by feeling: ‘Pleasure and pain are created by another.’
But, Vaccha, the Tathagata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, does not regard form as self...
But, Vaccha, the Tathagata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, does not regard form as self...
But, Vaccha, the Tathagata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, regards the eye thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
But, Vaccha, the Tathagata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, regards the eye...
But, venerable sir, when I am being touched by such painful feeling, I dwell contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
But, venerable sir, when the Blessed One was ill my body seemed as if it were drugged, I had become disoriented, the teachings were not clear to me.
By a fierce naga longing for human flesh, You freed it forcefully by a valiant act:
By being enamoured with it, they are captivated by it, and by being captivated by it they are defiled.
By being enamoured with it, they are captivated by it, and by being captivated by it they are defiled.
By being liberated, it is steady; by being steady, it is content; by being content, he is not agitated.
By being liberated, it is steady; by being steady, it is content; by being content, he is not agitated.
By being liberated, it is steady; by being steady, it is content; by being content, he is not agitated.
By body, speech, or mind, Who really is a harmless one
By clinging to six the world
By clinging to what is the world
By consorting with a lethargic person.
By craving it‘s dragged here and there.
By desire many beings are bound
By destroying all the fetters.”
By developing the path to enlightenment—
By diffusion and confinement in the abode the sign of forms, one is called one who roams about in an abode.
By diffusion and confinement in the abode the sign of sounds … the sign of odours … the sign of tastes … the sign of tactile objects … the sign of mental phenomena, one is called one who roams about in an abode.
By directly knowing and fully understanding feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, by becoming dispassionate towards it and abandoning it, one is capable of destroying suffering.” 
By eating our son’s flesh we can cross the rest of this desert.
By energy one overcomes suffering, By wisdom one is purified.” 
By final knowledge the wise are quenched:
By five things one gathers dust, By five things one is purified.” 
By frequently giving attention to things that are a basis for doubt, unarisen doubt arises and arisen doubt increases and expands.
By frequently giving attention to things that are a basis for ill will, unarisen ill will arises and arisen ill will increases and expands.
By frequently giving attention to things that are a basis for restlessness and remorse, unarisen restlessness and remorse arise and arisen restlessness and remorse increase and expand.
By frequently giving attention to things that are a basis for sloth and torpor, unarisen sloth and torpor arise and arisen sloth and torpor increase and expand.
By frequently giving attention to things that are a basis for the enlightenment factor of equanimity, the unarisen enlightenment factor of equanimity arises and the arisen enlightenment factor of equanimity comes to fulfilment by development.”
By giving, by taming oneself, by self-control, by speaking truth, there is merit and an outcome of merit.’ “There arose in me, venerable sir, the perplexity and doubt: ‘Which of these honourable ascetics and brahmins speak truth and which speak falsehood?’”
By giving, by taming oneself, by self-control, by speaking truth, there is merit and an outcome of merit.”
By giving, by taming oneself, by self-control, by speaking truth, there is no merit and no outcome of merit.’
By giving, by taming oneself, by self-control, by speaking truth, there is no merit and no outcome of merit’?”
By having developed and cultivated these same five faculties, venerable sir, I eliminated desire for sensual pleasures and thus, with the breakup of the body, after death, I was reborn in a good destination, in the brahma world.
By having understood your Dhamma
By his compassion and sympathy.” 
By his delightful voice, Sonorous and lovely, The bhikkhus incline their ears.”
By how many does one gather dust?
By how many is one purified?”
By means of this principle that is seen, understood, immediately attained, fathomed, he applies the method to the past and to the future….
By means of travelling, Yet without reaching the world’s end
By means of which I’ll catch you yet:
By means of which the world is illumined?
By means of which the world is illumined?
By mind it’s dragged here and there.
By nonassociation the woods is cut.
By one who does a wrongful deed.
By one who relishes contradiction, By one with a corrupt mind
By one who seeks it outwardly.
By patience, harmlessness, lovingkindness, and sympathy.
By the cessation of what does the cessation of birth come about?’
By the destruction of the taints, in this very life he enters and dwells in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for himself with direct knowledge.
By the destruction of the taints, in this very life he enters and dwells in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for himself with direct knowledge.
By the extinction of perception and consciousness, By the cessation and appeasement of feelings:
By the gracious power of the staff, If I stumble I still stand firm.”
By the pursuit, development, and cultivation.
By the removal of desire it is freed.
By the removal of desire, misery is removed; by the removal of misery, suffering is removed.” 
By the removal of what is it freed?
By the world with its devas;
By this are mortals purified, Not by clan or wealth.
By this are mortals purified, Not by clan or wealth.
By this foul, putrid body, Subject to break up, fragile:
By this method, Ananda, it may be understood how the entire holy life is good friendship, good companionship, good comradeship.’
By this method, Ananda, it may be understood how the entire holy life is good friendship, good companionship, good comradeship.”
By this the being there is maintained, The person inside the mother’s womb.” 
By those afflicted with lust for existence, Who flow along in the stream of existence, Deeply mired in Mara’s realm.
By those oppressed by lust and hate.
By truthfulness one wins acclaim;
By understanding that Dhamma here
by way of the mind, they appear to be void, hollow, empty.
By what are many beings bound
By what are the six sense bases conditioned?’
By what are volitional formations conditioned?’
By what dart has it been wounded?
By what do they sustain their life?”
By what do they sustain their life?”
By what is aging-and-death conditioned?’
By what is birth conditioned?’
By what is clinging conditioned?’
By what is consciousness conditioned?’
By what is contact conditioned?’
By what is craving conditioned?’
By what is existence conditioned?’
By what is feeling conditioned?’
By what is it dragged here and there?
By what is it dragged here and there?
By what is it enveloped?
By what is it enveloped?
By what is it enveloped?”
By what is name-and-form conditioned?’
By what is name-and-form conditioned?’
By what is the world ensnared?
By what is the world shut in?
By which he finds no happiness.
By which in the past they crossed the flood, By which they will cross and cross over now.’”
By which in the past they crossed the flood, By which they will cross and cross over now.”
By which men purify themselves, Being impure, you think you’re pure:
By which one does not afflict oneself
By which one’s mind becomes disturbed.
By which the wise ones, the meditators, Are released from the bondage of Mara.
By whom has this puppet been created?
By you, dear, has the seed been sown;
c.
Can one advance on this firm path of practice
Can this same meaning be stated in detail in a way that is deep and deep in implications?” 
Can’t we escape being called a youngster by the Venerable Mahakassapa?” 
Careful attention is a factor for stream-entry.
Careful attention is a factor for stream-entry.
Cattle are of those living by work;
Cattle are the best of things that go forth;
cease without remainder.
cease without remainder.
ceases and subsides.
Childless and heirless they become, Like stumps of palmyra trees.
Citta the householder heard about this and approached the naked ascetic Kassapa.
Citta the householder heard about this and, together with a number of lay followers, approached Nigaṇṭha Nataputta.
Citta the householder shook out his cloak and stood to one side, shocked and terrified.
Clinging has craving as its source...
Clinging to sensual pleasure, clinging to views, clinging to rules and vows, clinging to a doctrine of self.
clinging … craving...
clinging...
clinging...
clinging...
clinging...
clinging...
clinging...
clinging...
clinging....craving...
cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, a bhikkhu’s body is steady and his mind is steady, inwardly well composed and well liberated in regard to both agreeable and disagreeable mental phenomena, then his restraint of the sense faculties has been developed and cultivated in such a way that it fulfils the three kinds of good conduct.
cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind...
Come get me now, hawk!’
Come now, dear Dighavu, pay close attention to what the Blessed One is saying to you.”
Come now, let us also dwell diligently, with diligence for support.’
Come now, let us also dwell diligently, with diligence for support.’
Come now, let us practise good conduct of body, speech, and mind.’
Come up on to high ground, good boulder!’ What do you think, headman?
Come, bhikkhu, here’s a seat, sit down.’
Come, bhikkhu, here’s a seat, sit down.’
Come, dear sir, let us go to that brahma world and stir up a sense of urgency in that brahma.” 
Come, friend Cunda, let us go to the Blessed One and report this matter to him.”
Come, having returned to the lower life, enjoy wealth and do meritorious deeds.’
Come, having returned to the lower life, enjoy wealth and do meritorious deeds.’
Come, having returned to the lower life, enjoy wealth and do meritorious deeds.’
Come, noble lady, let us rejoice
Compared to Sineru, the king of mountains, the seven grains of gravel the size of mung beans are not calculable, do not bear comparison, do not amount even to a fraction.” 
Compared to the former mass of suffering that has been destroyed and eliminated, the latter is not calculable, does not bear comparison, does not amount even to a fraction, as there is a maximum of seven more lives.
Compared to the former mass of suffering that has been destroyed and eliminated, the latter is not calculable, does not bear comparison, does not amount even to a fraction, as there is a maximum of seven more lives.
Compared to the former mass of suffering that has been destroyed and eliminated, the latter is not calculable, does not bear comparison, does not amount even to a fraction, as there is a maximum of seven more lives.
Compared to the former mass of suffering that has been destroyed and eliminated, the latter is not calculable, does not bear comparison, does not amount even to a fraction, as there is a maximum of seven more lives.
Compared to the great earth that has been destroyed and eliminated, the seven little balls of clay the size of jujube kernels that remain are not calculable, do not bear comparison, do not amount even to a fraction.”
Compared to the great earth, it is not calculable, does not bear comparison, does not amount even to a fraction.”
Compared to the great earth, that little bit of soil is not calculable, does not bear comparison, does not amount even to a fraction.”
Compared to the great earth, that little bit of soil is not calculable, does not bear comparison, does not amount even to a fraction.” 
Compared to the great earth, the little bit of soil that the Blessed One has taken up in his fingernail is not calculable, does not bear comparison, does not amount even to a fraction.”
Compared to the great earth, those seven little balls of clay the size of jujube kernals are trifling; they are not calculable, do not bear comparison, do not amount even to a fraction.”
Compared to the Himalayas, the king of mountains, the seven grains of gravel the size of mustard seeds are not calculable, do not bear comparison, do not amount even to a fraction.”
Compared to the portion of Sineru that would be destroyed and eliminated, the seven grains of gravel the size of mung beans that remain are not calculable, do not bear comparison, do not amount even to a fraction.”
Compared to the portion of the Himalayas, the king of mountains, that has been destroyed and eliminated, the seven grains of gravel the size of mustard seeds that remain are not calculable, do not bear comparison, do not amount even to a fraction.”
Compared to the water at the confluence that has been destroyed and eliminated, the two or three drops of water that remain are trifling; they are not calculable, do not bear comparison, do not amount even to a fraction.”
Compared to the water at the confluence, the two or three drops of water that have been drawn out are not calculable, do not bear comparison, do not amount even to a fraction.”
Compared to the water in the great ocean, the two or three drops of water that have been drawn out are not calculable, do not bear comparison, do not amount even to a fraction.”
Compared to the water in the pond, the water drawn out on the tip of the blade of kusa grass is not calculable, does not bear comparison, does not amount even to a fraction.”
Compared to the water that has been destroyed and eliminated, the two or three drops of water that remain are not calculable, do not bear comparison, do not amount even to a fraction.”
Complete in eight factors
Complete in eight factors
Comprehending, ever mindful.
Concentration by mindfulness of breathing, Ananda, is the one thing which, when developed and cultivated, fulfils the four establishments of mindfulness.
Concentration partaking of penetration, aroused subsequent to insight, is described.”
Concentration with thought and examination: this is called the path leading to the unconditioned….”
Concentration with thought and examination; concentration without thought, with examination only; concentration without thought and examination: this is called the path leading to the unconditioned….”
Concentration without thought and examination….”
Concentration without thought, with examination only….”
Confident in the assemblies—
Conjure up whatever forms you wish, But you will never make me tremble.” 
Conscientious, everywhere restrained, One is said to be protected.”
consciousness as self, or self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
Consciousness has volitional formations as its source….
Consciousness is impermanent.
Consciousness is impermanent.
Consciousness is impermanent.
Consciousness is impermanent.
Consciousness is impermanent.
Consciousness is nonself.
Consciousness is nonself.
Consciousness is nonself.
Consciousness is suffering.
Consciousness is suffering.
Consciousness should be seen as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
Consciousness should be seen as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
Consciousness together with its nutriment should be seen as like the five kinds of seeds.
Consciousness, bhikkhus, while standing, might stand engaged with form; based upon form, established upon form, with a sprinkling of delight, it might come to growth, increase, and expansion.
consciousness...
consciousness...
consciousness...
Considering that they end in the destruction of birth, aging, and death,  the bhikkhu Piṇḍola Bharadvaja has declared final knowledge thus: ‘I understand: Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
Considering these two benefits, venerable sir, I have long been a forest dweller...
Considering what reason has the Venerable Piṇḍola Bharadvaja declared final knowledge thus?”
Contact has the six sense bases as its source, the six sense bases as its origin; it is born and produced from the six sense bases.
Contact has the six sense bases as its source….
Contact is impermanent...
Contact is the cause and condition for the manifestation of the feeling aggregate.
Contact is the cause and condition for the manifestation of the perception aggregate.
Contact is the cause and condition for the manifestation of the volitional formations aggregate.
contact...
contact...
contact...
contact...
contact...
contact...
contact...
contact...
contact...
Contemplation of this is said to lead to equanimity.
Content with that confirmed confidence in the Buddha, he does not make further effort for solitude by day nor for seclusion at night.
Content with those virtues dear to the noble ones, he does not make further effort for solitude by day nor for seclusion at night.
Contentment brings along happiness.”
Coomaraswamy, “The Parts of a Vı̣̄̄”.
Copper is a corruption of gold...
Corner’s Wayside Trees of Malaya, cited by Emeneau, “The Strangling Figs in Sanskrit Literature,” pp.
Craving for existence has been cut off; the conduit to existence has been destroyed; now there is no more renewed existence.”
craving for mental phenomena permanent or impermanent?”–“Impermanent, venerable sir.”…
craving for odours … craving for tastes...
Craving for sensual pleasures, craving for existence, craving for extermination.
Craving for sounds … Craving for odours … Craving for tastes … Craving for tactile objects … Craving for mental phenomena is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
craving for sounds...
craving for tactile objects...
Craving has feeling as its source...
Craving is the one thing that has
Craving is the way leading to the origination of feeling.
Craving is what one must forsake
Craving is what one must forsake
craving...
craving...
craving...
craving...
craving...
craving...
craving...
Creating beautiful and hideous shapes.
Creating beautiful and hideous shapes.
Creditors who call at dawn, Chiding him, ‘Pay up!
Creditors who call at dawn, Chiding me, ‘Pay up!
Criticizing the noble Dhamma
Crossed over, gone beyond, the brahmin stands on high ground.
Crossed over, gone beyond, the brahmin stands on high ground.
Crossed over, gone beyond, the brahmin stands on high ground.”
Crosses the flood so hard to cross.
Cut down at the root, my woods is dried up.
Cut off is the conceit ‘I am,’
Cut off is the root of suffering:
d, and Sn d.
Dancing around merrily:
Dancing around merrily:
Dear sir, you should go to attend upon that Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.”
Death has not made its arrival.” 
Death spares none along the way
Deeds of merit are the support for living beings in the other world.’” 
Deeds of merit are the support for living beings in the other world.”
Deep affection for this Dhamma.
Deformed by cold, deformed by heat, deformed by hunger, deformed by thirst, deformed by contact with flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, and serpents.
Deformed by what?
Delight and lust should be seen as like the water element.
Delight in form is clinging.
delight in mental phenomena, take delight in mental phenomena, rejoice in mental phenomena.
delight in odours … delight in tastes...
delight in tactile objects...
Delightful is the Udena Shrine, delightful the Gotamaka Shrine, delightful the Sattamba Shrine, delightful the Bahuputta Shrine, delightful the Sarandada Shrine, delightful the Capala Shrine.
Delighting in such volitional formations, they generate volitional formations that lead to birth, generate volitional formations that lead to aging, generate volitional formations that lead to death, generate volitional formations that lead to sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
Delighting in such volitional formations, they generate volitional formations that lead to birth, generate volitional formations that lead to aging, generate volitional formations that lead to death, generate volitional formations that lead to sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
Delighting in such volitional formations, they generate volitional formations that lead to birth, generate volitional formations that lead to aging, generate volitional formations that lead to death, generate volitional formations that lead to sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
Delighting in the destruction of clinging, They call him truly a superior man.” 
Deliverance connected with the form sphere is carnal deliverance.
Deliverance connected with the formless sphere is spiritual deliverance.
Depart from this physical body, Then it lies there cast away:
Dependent on contact.
Dependent on contact.
Dependent on contact.
Dependent on contact.
Dependent on contact.
Dependent on just this body.
Dependent on just this body.
Dependent on just this contact.
Dependent on just this contact.
Dependent on just this contact.
Dependent on the dyad there is contact.
Dependent on the dyad there is contact.
Dependent on this very body.
Dependent on what?
Dependent on what?
Dependent on what?
Dependent on what?
Dependent on what?
Dependent on what?
Dependent on what?
Dependent on what?
Dependent on what?
Dependent on what?
Dependent on what?
Dependent upon what you meditate.’” 
Desirable, lovely, agreeable, So long as it’s said: ‘They are.’
Desire and lust for sounds … for odours … for tastes … for tactile objects … for mental phenomena is a corruption of the mind.
Desire and lust for the ear … for the nose … for the tongue … for the body … for the mind is a corruption of the mind.
Desire drags a person around;
Desire for these has vanished in me:
Desire is hard to discard in the world.
Desire is what one must forsake
Despite the change and alteration of consciousness, his consciousness does not become preoccupied with the change of consciousness.
Despite the change and alteration of form, his consciousness does not become preoccupied with the change of form.
Despite the commentators, ñaya has no relation to ñaṇa but is derived from ni + i.
Detached is he, free from fetters, Attained to Nibbana by nonclinging.
Devas and humans delight in sounds...
Devote themselves to negligence.
df, v.
Dhamma practised well brings happiness;
Dhamma practised well brings happiness;
Dhamma, the directly visible Dhamma.’
Did I not exist in the past?
Did the Venerable Mahamoggallana approach the Blessed One by means of spiritual power, or did the Blessed One approach the Venerable Mahamoggallana by means of spiritual power?” 
Did you get to hear a Dhamma talk today in the presence of the Blessed One?”
Did you hear an old jackal howling when the night was fading?”
Differs for the good and the bad:
Diffusion and confinement in the abode the sign of forms: these have been abandoned by the Tathagata, cut off at the root, made like a palm stump, obliterated so that they are no more subject to future arising.
Diffusion and confinement in the abode the sign of sounds … the sign of odours … the sign of tastes … the sign of tactile objects … the sign of mental phenomena: these have been abandoned by the Tathagata, cut off at the root, made like a palm stump, obliterated so that they are no more subject to future arising.
Direct your mind there 
disagreeable, through his beast-of-burden’s manner he endures them, mindful and clearly comprehending, without becoming distressed.”
disagreeable, through his chief bull’s manner he endures them, mindful and clearly comprehending, without becoming distressed.”
disagreeable, through his thoroughbred manner he endures them, mindful and clearly comprehending, without becoming distressed.”
Disappeared right on the spot.
Discontent doesn’t spread over me.”
Discontent doesn’t spread over you.” 
Dispel desire for this, be unstirred:
Dispel sensual desires, O brahmin!
Dispel the course of hate towards the raucous, And do not soil the mind by thinking, ‘ is displeasing to me.’
displayed diverse lustrous colours.
Do I not exist?
Do not attend that sacrifice
Do not avoid a pit, or a precipice, or a stump, or a thorny place, or a village pool, or a cesspool.
Do not become angry at those who are angry.
Do not blame one who is blameless;
Do not come under the End-maker’s control, of the powerful King of Death.”
Do not do an evil deed
Do not let the Deathless be lost on you.
Do not let the Deathless be lost on you.”
Do not let your friendships decay.
Do not misrepresent the Blessed One.
Do not speak thus, Kokalika!
Do not utter divisive speech.
Do they explain in accordance with the Dhamma so that no reasonable consequence of their assertion would be open to criticism?”
Do those who speak thus, venerable sir, state what has been said by the Blessed One and not misrepresent him with what is contrary to fact?
Do whatever has to be done, good man!’
Do whatever has to be done, good man!’
Do whatever has to be done, good man!’ 
Do whatever you have to do.”
Do whatever you think should be done, great king.’
Do whatever you think should be done, great king.’
Do you have an accountant or calculator or mathematician who can count the grains of sand in the river Ganges thus: ‘There are so many grains of sand,’ or ‘There are so many hundreds of grains of sand,’ or ‘There are so many thousands of grains of sand,’ or ‘There are so many hundreds of thousands of grains of sand’?”
Do you have an accountant or calculator or mathematician …  … The Tathagata, great king, is liberated from reckoning in terms of consciousness: he is deep, immeasurable, hard to fathom like the great ocean.
Do you know the Koliyans’ hirelings with drooping head-dresses?” 
Do you know whether the Koliyans’ hirelings with drooping head-dresses are virtuous or immoral?”
Do you really think, O Evil One, ‘My evil does not ripen’?
Do you regard the ear, ear-consciousness, and things cognizable with ear-consciousness thus…?
Do you regard the mind thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?”
Do you regard the mind, mind-consciousness, and things cognizable with mind-consciousness thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?
Do you see Ananda walking back and forth with a number of bhikkhus?”
Do you see Anuruddha walking back and forth with a number of bhikkhus?”
Do you see Devadatta walking back and forth with a number of bhikkhus?”
Do you see Kassapa walking back and forth with a number of bhikkhus?” 
Do you see Moggallana walking back and forth with a number of bhikkhus?”
Do you see Puṇṇa Mantaniputta walking back and forth with a number of bhikkhus?”
Do you see the radiance
Do you see Upali walking back and forth with a number of bhikkhus?”
Do you speak of feeling … of perception … of volitional formations … of consciousness as “I am,” or do you speak of “I am” apart from consciousness?
Do you speak of form as “I am,” or do you speak of “I am” apart from form?
Do you thus recollect your manifold past abodes with their modes and details?”
Do you understand a mind with lust as a mind with lust; a mind without lust as a mind without lust; a mind with hatred as a mind with hatred; a mind without hatred as a mind without hatred; a mind with delusion as a mind with delusion; a mind without delusion as a mind without delusion; a contracted mind as contracted and a distracted mind as distracted; an exalted mind as exalted and an unexalted mind as unexalted; a surpassable mind as surpassable and an unsurpassable mind as unsurpassable; a concentrated mind as concentrated and an unconcentrated mind as unconcentrated; a liberated mind as liberated and an unliberated mind as unliberated?”
Do you utter such speech?”
Do your friends and colleagues, kinsmen and relatives, as well as guests come to visit you?”
Does no evil from fear of others’ censure.
Does not neglect clear comprehension, Then that wise man fully understands
Does not neglect clear comprehension, Then that wise man fully understands
Does not sorrow when he passes on.
Does not think, ‘I am equal or better.’ 
Does not yield great fruit.’
Does the Venerable Khemaka regard anything as self or as belonging to self among these five aggregates subject to clinging?’”
Doesn’t eye-consciousness arise in dependence on the eye and forms?” 
Don’t ask me that!’ But still, I will answer you.
Don’t ask me that!’ But still, I will answer you.
Don’t ask me that!’”
Don’t ask me that!’”
Don’t ask me that!”
Don’t ask me that!”
Don’t babble.”
Don’t be afraid, Mahanama!
Don’t be afraid, Mahanama!
Don’t be afraid, Mahanama!
Don’t be angry!
Don’t be remorseful later!”
Don’t burn up again and again.
Don’t come under sloth’s control.”
Don’t give the Saṅgha occasion to investigate you further.
Don’t let sensual dust drag you down.
Don’t let the time pass me by!” </ span>
Don’t let the time pass you by!” 
Don’t speak as one wouldn’t act.
Don’t they know the rule of order?” 
Don’t understand it in its presence.
Don’t you have a little nest?
Don’t you have any lines extended?
Don’t you have sufficient goals to meet?
doubt does not arise and arisen doubt is abandoned.
Doubt has arisen in you about a perplexing matter.
Doubt has arisen in you about a perplexing matter.”
Drawing in the mind’s thoughts
Drawn out, my dear, from an inferno, You wish to plunge into an inferno.
Drink it if you wish.
Drink it if you wish.
during the evening, I dwell in that factor of enlightenment during the evening.
during the middle of the day...
Dwell contemplating feelings in feelings … in order to know feelings as they really are.
Dwell contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Dwell contemplating mind in mind internally … externally … internally and externally, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Dwell contemplating mind in mind … in order to know mind as it really is.
Dwell contemplating phenomena in phenomena … in order to know phenomena as they really are.’ 
Dwell contemplating phenomena in phenomena, internally … externally … internally and externally, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Dwell contemplating the body in the body externally, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Dwell contemplating the body in the body internally and externally, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Dwell pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with altruistic joy, likewise the second quarter, the third quarter, and the fourth quarter.
Dwell pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with compassion, likewise the second quarter, the third quarter, and the fourth quarter.
Dwell pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with equanimity, likewise the second quarter, the third quarter, and the fourth quarter.
Dwell uncorrupted, with faith their partner.
Dwell, bhikkhus, with your minds well established in these four establishments of mindfulness.
Each attempt to resolve the expression into its elements gives rise to its own special problems, and even the aṭṭhakathas and ṭikas offer conflicting explanations, e.g., Sv III,- and Vibh-a,- take niggayha to be absolutive and turn varita into the absolutive varetva; their respective ṭikas, Sv-pṭ III,- and Vibh-mṭ,-, take niggayha as the gerundive niggahetabba and varita as the gerundive varetabba.
Each of the following sub-sections is to be elaborated in accordance with the method employed in the sub-section on direct knowledge.
Each of the following suttas is to be elaborated in accordance with the fourfold method employed in §.
Ear-consciousness … Nose-consciousness … Tongue-consciousness … Body-consciousness … Mind-consciousness is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
Ear-contact … Nose-contact … Tongue-contact … Body-contact … Mind-contact is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
Ee is the same except for the omission of iti.
Ee omits ten’ ev’ antaravassena pañcamattani upasikasatani paṭipadesi, found in Be and Se.
Ee omits the next paragraph on the assumption that it is identical with the corresponding section of the preceding sutta, and Woodward follows suit at KS:.
Ee puts a hiatus after niggayha, and Ee separates it off entirely; the other eds.
Either deliberately, Ananda, one generates that bodily volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally; or undeliberately one generates that bodily volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally.
Either deliberately, Ananda, one generates that mental volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally; or undeliberately one generates that mental volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally.
Either deliberately, Ananda, one generates that verbal volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally; or undeliberately one generates that verbal volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally.
Either I should exhort the bhikkhus, Kassapa, or you should.
Either I should exhort the bhikkhus, Kassapa, or you should.
Either I should exhort the bhikkhus, Kassapa, or you should.
Either I should give them a Dhamma talk or you should.”
Either I should give them a Dhamma talk or you should.”
Either I should give them a Dhamma talk or you should.” 
Either openly or in secret.
Elated, that bhikkhu delighted in the Blessed One’s statement.
Elated, that bhikkhu delighted in the Blessed One’s statement.
Elated, that brahma delighted in his statement.
Elated, the bhikkhus of the group of five delighted in the Blessed One’s statement.
Elated, the elder bhikkhus delighted in the Venerable Khemaka’s statement.
Elated, the householder Nakulapita delighted in the Venerable Sariputta’s statement.
Elated, the Venerable Ananda delighted in the Blessed One’s statement.
Elated, the Venerable Mahakassapa delighted in the Blessed One’s statement.
Elated, the Venerable Rahula delighted in the Blessed One’s statement.
Elated, the Venerable Tissa delighted in the Blessed One’s statement.
Elated, the Venerable Yamaka delighted in the Venerable Sariputta’s statement.
Elated, those bhikkhus delighted in the Blessed One’s statement.
Elated, those bhikkhus delighted in the Blessed One’s statement.
Elated, those bhikkhus delighted in the Blessed One’s statement.
Elated, those bhikkhus delighted in the Blessed One’s statement.
Elated, those bhikkhus delighted in the Blessed One’s statement.
Elated, those bhikkhus delighted in the Blessed One’s statement.
Elated, those bhikkhus delighted in the Blessed One’s statement.
Elated, those bhikkhus delighted in the Venerable Mahamoggallana’s statement.
Elated, those bhikkhus delighted in the Venerable Sariputta’s statement.
Elated, those devatas paid homage to the Blessed One and, keeping him on the right, they disappeared right there.
Elsewhere itthatta signifies the human state as contrasted with higher states of being.
Elsewhere the formula includes a rider, yad atthi yaṁ bhūtaṁ taṁ pajahami, “what exists, what has come to be, that I am abandoning.”
Emeneau quotes Milton’s Paradise Lost, IX, -, “the locus classicus on these trees in English literature”: The Figtree … spreds her Armes
Emptiness concentration….”
End in the destruction of what?
Endowed with such self-control and peacefulness, you will be able to dwell in the Sunaparanta country.
Endowed with wisdom and virtue.
Engage in combat with a fool?’
Engaged in a quest for harmlessness, the instructed noble disciple conducts himself rightly in three ways—with body, speech, and mind.
Engaged in a quest for renunciation, the instructed noble disciple conducts himself rightly in three ways—with body, speech, and mind.
Engaged in a quest ill will, the uninstructed worldling conducts himself wrongly in three ways—with body, speech, and mind.
Engaged in a quest non-ill will, the instructed noble disciple conducts himself rightly in three ways—with body, speech, and mind.
Engaged in a quest to harm, the uninstructed worldling conducts himself wrongly in three ways—with body, speech, and mind.
Engaged in a sensual quest, the uninstructed worldling conducts himself wrongly in three ways—with body, speech, and mind.
Enjoy human sensual pleasures, bhikkhu; do not abandon what is directly visible in order to pursue what takes time.”
Enjoy human sensual pleasures, sirs; do not abandon what is directly visible in order to pursue what takes time.” 
Enjoy the delights of sensual pleasure:
enjoying sensual pleasures with women as if he were a king.’
enjoying sensual pleasures with women as if he were a king?’
Enlightened, bearing his final body, The One with Vision teaches the Dhamma.”
Enough, Evil One, with that trick of yours:
Enough, Evil One, with that trick of yours:
Equanimity keeps the burden balanced, Desirelessness serves as upholstery.
equanimity … without ill will.’
Established in identity, And miserable too are those beings
Evaporates without being drunk, So when a scoundrel acquires wealth
Even a bhikkhu who has gone beyond
Even a bhikkhu who has gone beyond
Even affluent khattiyas, affluent brahmins, and affluent householders … speak deliberate lies for the sake of sensual pleasures, with sensual pleasures as the cause, on account of sensual pleasures.
Even alone, Mara, I don’t fear you.
even approaching them...
even attending on them...
even for the sake of his brother...
even for the sake of his father...
even going forth after them is helpful, I say.
Even if a forceful blast of wind comes along—whether from the east, the west, the north, or the south—the column would not shake, quake, or tremble.
Even if a forceful blast of wind comes—whether from the east, the west, the north, or the south—that pillar would not shake, quake, or tremble.
Even in the case of those affluent brahmins … affluent householders—rich...
Even in the case of those affluent khattiyas—rich, with great wealth and property, with abundant gold and silver, abundant treasures and commodities, abundant wealth and grain—because they have taken birth, there is nothing other than aging and death.
Even in the case of those bhikkhus who are arahants, whose taints are destroyed, who have lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached their own goal, utterly destroyed the fetters of existence, and are completely liberated through final knowledge: even for them this body is subject to breaking up, subject to being laid down.
Even khattiyas here salute him.”
Even my path you will not see.”
Even my path you will not see.”
Even one who cuts off another’s head with a sharp sword does not deprive anyone of life; the sword merely passes through the space between the seven bodies.
even prominent forms that enter into range of the eye do not obsess the mind, not to speak of those that are trifling.
even recollecting them...
Even these here, stricken, get to sleep; 
Even those beings in the animal realm have been diversified by the mind, yet the mind is even more diverse than those beings in the animal realm.
Even those royal bull elephants, bound by strong thongs in the villages, towns, and capital cities, burst and break their bonds asunder; frightened, they urinate and defecate and flee here and there.
Even though a company of elephant troops may protect them, or a company of cavalry, or a company of chariot troops, or a company of infantry, still they leave themselves unprotected.
Even though no company of elephant troops protects them, nor a company of cavalry, nor a company of charioteers, nor a company of infantry, still they protect themselves.
Even though no such wish as this might arise in her: ‘Oh, that my chicks might pierce their shells with the points of their claws and beaks and hatch safely!’ yet the chicks are capable of piercing their shells with the points of their claws and beaks and of hatching safely.
Even though some foolish people may have perplexity or uncertainty regarding the Tathagata, when they hear this Dhamma exposition their perplexity or uncertainty regarding the Tathagata will be abandoned.” 
Even though such a wish as this might arise in her: ‘Oh, that my chicks might pierce their shells with the points of their claws and beaks and hatch safely!’ yet the chicks are incapable of piercing their shells with the points of their claws and beaks and hatching safely.
Even though that cloth would become pure and clean, it would still retain a residual smell of cleaning salt, lye, or cowdung that had not yet vanished.
Even though they may say, “We regard ourselves as a foe,” still they treat themselves as dear.
Even though they may say, “We regard ourselves as dear,” still they treat themselves as a foe.
even trifling forms that enter into range of the eye obsess the mind, not to speak of those that are prominent.
Even when there’s little, giving is good.
Even when there’s little, giving is good.
Even when there’s little, giving is good.
Even when there’s little, giving is good.
Even when there’s little, giving is good.
Eventually the time came when the Summoner’s original drumhead had disappeared and only a collection of pegs remained.
Everything impermanent decays;
Everywhere darkness has been destroyed.” 
Evil unwholesome states have overwhelmed him, states that defile, that lead to renewed existence, that bring trouble, that result in suffering, and that lead to future birth, aging, and death.
Exert yourself in the Buddha’s Teaching.
Existence has clinging as its source...
Existence is impermanent … Clinging is impermanent … Craving is impermanent … Feeling is impermanent...
existence...
existence...
existence...
existence...
existence...
existence...
existence...
existence...
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate….
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate….
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate….
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate….
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate….
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate….
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate….
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate….
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate….
Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate….
Experiencing revulsion, they become dispassionate, and through dispassion they are purified.
Experiencing revulsion, they become dispassionate, and through dispassion they are purified.
Extinguish the great fire of lust;
eye-consciousness as impermanent...
Eye-consciousness is empty of self and of what belongs to self.
Eye-consciousness is suffering...
Eye-consciousness … Eye-contact … Whatever feeling arises with eye-contact as condition—whether pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant—becomes manifest to him as it really is—as impermanent.
eye-contact as impermanent … whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition … as impermanent, wrong view is abandoned.
Eye-contact does not arise in dependence on feeling born of eye-contact; the eye element does not arise in dependence on eye-contact….
Eye-contact is empty of self and of what belongs to self….
Eye-contact is suffering...
Eye-contact too is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
Faith is good when established;
Faith is good when made secure;
Faithful, gentle, generous, amiable:
Families come to destruction on account of the king, or on account of thieves, or on account of fire, or on account of water; or they do not find what they have put away; or mismanaged undertakings fail; or there arises within a family a wastrel who squanders, dissipates, and fritters away its wealth; and impermanence is the eighth.
Far more numerous are those people in the world who, when they obtain superior possessions, become intoxicated and negligent, yield to greed for sensual pleasures, and mistreat other beings.’”
Faring on to body, he is not freed from birth, aging, and death; not freed from sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair; not freed from suffering, I say.
Fasting and sleeping on the ground, Bathing at dawn, the three Vedas, Rough hides, matted locks, and dirt;
Fear, trepidation, and terror arose in him and he wanted to turn back.
Fear, trepidation, and terror arose in him and he wanted to turn back.
Feeling born of ear-contact … Feeling born of nose-contact … Feeling born of tongue-contact … Feeling born of body-contact … Feeling born of mind-contact is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
feeling born of ear-contact...
Feeling born of eye-contact … feeling born of mind-contact.
feeling born of mind-contact permanent or impermanent?”–“Impermanent, venerable sir.”…
feeling born of nose-contact … feeling born of tongue-contact … feeling born of body-contact...
Feeling has contact as its source...
Feeling has contact as its source….
Feeling is impermanent … Perception is impermanent … Volitional formations are impermanent … Consciousness is impermanent: I have no perplexity about this, venerable sir, I do not doubt that whatever is impermanent is suffering.
Feeling is impermanent … Perception is impermanent … Volitional formations are impermanent … Consciousness is impermanent; I should abandon desire for it.
Feeling is impermanent….
Feeling is not yours … Perception is not yours … Volitional formations are not yours … Consciousness is not yours: abandon it.
Feeling is the fragile … Perception is the fragile …
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is a thing that can be clung to; the desire and lust for it is the clinging there.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is a thing that fetters; the desire and lust for it is the fetter there.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is impermanent.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is impermanent; what is impermanent is suffering; what is suffering has ceased and passed away.’
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is impermanent; you should abandon desire for it.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is Mara.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is Mara.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is of a painful nature.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is of a selfless nature.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is of an impermanent nature.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is something that should be fully understood.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is subject to arising.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is subject to cessation.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is subject to cessation.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is subject to destruction.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is subject to Mara.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is subject to vanishing.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness that is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change: this the wise in the world agree upon as existing, and I too say that it exists.
Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change: this the wise in the world agree upon as not existing, and I too say that it does not exist.
Feeling, perception, volition, contact, attention: this is called name.
feeling...
feeling...
feeling...
feeling...
feeling...
feeling...
feeling...
feeling...
feeling...
feeling...
feeling...
Feelings in their entirety.
Feelings in their entirety.
felt a tactile object with the body...
Few, having reached the end of suffering, Fare evenly amidst the uneven.” 
Fire is indeed produced from any wood.
First enjoy, bhikkhu, then seek alms:
First information is gathered by them and afterwards I will make them disclose it.
First one thinks and examines, then afterwards one breaks into speech; that is why thought and examination are the verbal formation.
Fitted with wheels of wholesome states.
Five are awake when sleep.
Five hundred bulls, five hundred bullocks, five hundred heifers, five hundred goats, and five hundred rams had been led to the pillar for the sacrifice.
Five hundred bulls...
Floods, bonds, kinds of clinging, Knots, and underlying tendencies, Cords of sensual pleasure, hindrances, Aggregates, fetters lower and higher.
Floods, bonds, kinds of clinging, Knots, and underlying tendencies, Cords of sensual pleasure, hindrances, Aggregates, fetters lower and higher.
Floods, bonds, kinds of clinging, Knots, and underlying tendencies, Cords of sensual pleasure, hindrances, Aggregates, fetters lower and higher.
Floods, bonds, kinds of clinging, Knots, and underlying tendencies, Cords of sensual pleasure, hindrances, Aggregates, fetters lower and higher.
Floods, bonds, kinds of clinging, Knots, and underlying tendencies, Cords of sensual pleasure, hindrances, Aggregates, fetters lower and higher.
Floods, bonds, kinds of clinging, Knots, and underlying tendencies, Cords of sensual pleasure, hindrances, Aggregates, fetters lower and higher.
Floods, bonds, kinds of clinging, Knots, and underlying tendencies, Cords of sensual pleasure, hindrances, Aggregates, fetters lower and higher.
Floods, bonds, kinds of clinging, Knots, and underlying tendencies, Cords of sensual pleasure, hindrances, Aggregates, fetters lower and higher.
Floods, bonds, kinds of clinging, Knots, and underlying tendencies, Cords of sensual pleasure, hindrances, Aggregates, fetters lower and higher.
Floods, bonds, kinds of clinging, Knots, and underlying tendencies, Cords of sensual pleasure, hindrances, Aggregates, fetters lower and higher.
Following in succession, The wise praise diligence
Following in succession, The wise praise diligence
Following this, an investigating consciousness arises, a wholesome-resultant or unwholesome-resultant citta which investigates the object; then a determining consciousness, a functional citta which defines the object; and then comes a string of cittas called javana, which constitute either a wholesome or an unwholesome response to the object.
Food for others, without volition.
Foolish girl, aren’t you afraid of rogues?” 
Fools and the wise are alike cut off and perish with the breakup of the body; after death they do not exist’?”
For a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed, lust has been tranquillized, hatred has been tranquillized, delusion has been tranquillized.”
For a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed, lust has been tranquillized, hatred has been tranquillized, delusion has been tranquillized.”
For a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed, lust has ceased, hatred has ceased, delusion has ceased.
For a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed, lust has subsided, hatred has subsided, delusion has subsided.
For a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed, these have been abandoned, cut off at the root, made like palm stumps, obliterated so that they are no more subject to future arising.
For a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed, these have been abandoned, cut off at the root, made like palm stumps, obliterated so that they are no more subject to future arising.
For a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed, these have been abandoned, cut off at the root, made like palm stumps, obliterated so that they are no more subject to future arising.
For a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed, these have been abandoned, cut off at the root, made like palm stumps, obliterated so that they are no more subject to future arising.
For a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed, these have been abandoned, cut off at the root, made like palm stumps, obliterated so that they are no more subject to future arising.
For a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed, this has been abandoned, cut off at the root, made like a palm stump, obliterated so that it is no more subject to future arising.
For a detailed discussion of the mutual conditionality of consciousness and name-and-form, see Bodhi, The Great Discourse on Causation, pp.
For a detailed discussion, see Harvey, The Selfless Mind, pp.
For a long philosophical commentary on this sutta by Ñaṇananda, see SN-Anth:-.
For a long time you have been arrested as burglars, highwaymen, and adulterers, and when you were beheaded, the stream of blood that you shed is greater than the water in the four great oceans.
For a long time you have been buffalo, sheep, goats, deer, chickens, and pigs….
For a long time, bhikkhus, you have been cows, and when as cows you were beheaded, the stream of blood that you shed is greater than the waters in the four great oceans.
For a long time, bhikkhus, you have experienced the death of a mother; as you have experienced this, weeping and wailing because of being united with the disagreeable and separated from the agreeable, the stream of tears that you have shed is more than the water in the four great oceans.
For a noble disciple who possesses wisdom, the faith that follows from it becomes stabilized, the energy that follows from it becomes stabilized, the mindfulness that follows from it becomes stabilized, the concentration that follows from it becomes stabilized.
For a person with wrong view, I say, there is one of two destinations: either hell or the animal realm.”
For a person with wrong view, I say, there is one of two destinations: either hell or the animal realm.” 
For a slack wanderer’s life
For a translation of the commentarial passage on this basic formula, see Soma, The Way of Mindfulness, pp.
For a wise person who has arrived at true knowledge, right view springs up.
For an alternative rendering based on the reading vaṅkam, see Ñaṇananda, SN-Anth:, -.
For an interesting discussion of the two models, see Gethin, The Buddhist Path to Awakening, pp.
For an unwise person immersed in ignorance, wrong view springs up.
For Anathapiṇḍika the householder had full confidence in the Venerable Sariputta.”
for any material reward...
For as that fierce snake glides along, Manifesting in diverse shapes, 
For bewildered devas and humans;
For consciousness: volitional formations.
For contact: the six sense bases.
For details, see CMA:-,:-.
For experts say no purity is gained
For formerly, when this young deva was a human being, he was a poor man, a pauper, an indigent.
For he is the field for one seeking merit.”
For he is the field for one seeking merit.”
For him all knots of conceit are consumed.
For him attraction and repulsion no more exist;
For him there are no transgressions, For him there is no going astray;
For him those forms are then supreme; for him those forms are unsurpassed.
For him those tactile objects are then supreme; for him those tactile objects are unsurpassed.”
For his noble wisdom is his faculty of wisdom; his noble liberation is his faculty of concentration.
For I have arrived.”
For I stand firmly in the Dhamma.
For I, great king, have awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment.”
For if any ascetic or brahmin should speak thus … … ‘This is not the fourth noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering taught by the ascetic Gotama; having rejected this fourth noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering, I will make known another fourth noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering’—this is impossible.
For if any ascetic or brahmin should speak thus: ‘This is not the first noble truth of suffering taught by the ascetic Gotama; having rejected this first noble truth of suffering, I will make known another first noble truth of suffering’—this is impossible.
For if any ascetic or brahmin should speak thus: ‘This is not the fourth noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering taught by the ascetic Gotama; having rejected this fourth noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering, I will make known another fourth noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering’—this is impossible.
For if consciousness should stand tied to  gratification in the sign or in the features, and if one should die on that occasion, it is possible that one will go to one of two destinations: hell or the animal realm.
For if consciousness should stand tied to gratification in the sign or in the features, and if one should die on that occasion, it is possible that one will go to one of two destinations: hell or the animal realm.
For if consciousness should stand tied to gratification in the sign or in the features, and if one should die on that occasion, it is possible that one will go to one of two destinations: hell or the animal realm.
For if consciousness should stand tied to gratification in the sign or in the features, and if one should die on that occasion, it is possible that one will go to one of two destinations: hell or the animal realm.
For if consciousness should stand tied to gratification in the sign or in the features, and if one should die on that occasion, it is possible that one will go to one of two destinations: hell or the animal realm.
For if I had spoken about it, others would not have believed me, and if they had not believed me that would have led to their harm and suffering for a long time.
For if I had spoken about it, others would not have believed me, and if they had not believed me that would have led to their harm and suffering for a long time.
For if I should cling, it is only form that I would be clinging to, only feeling … only perception … only volitional formations … only consciousness that I would be clinging to.
For if it gains a stock of fuel, Having become a conflagration, It may attack and burn the fool, Whether a man or a woman.
For if one speaking rightly were to say of anyone: ‘He was a lay follower who had gone for refuge over a long time to the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha,’ it is of Sarakani the Sakyan that one could rightly say this.
For if, bhikkhus, consciousness were self, this consciousness would not lead to affliction, and it would be possible to have it of consciousness: ‘Let my consciousness be thus; let my consciousness not be thus.’
For if, bhikkhus, form were self, this form would not lead to affliction, and it would be possible to have it of form: ‘Let my form be thus; let my form not be thus.’
For in seeing the dependency of the world, when one sees the nontermination of the conditionally arisen phenomena owing to the nontermination of their conditions, the annihilationist view, which might otherwise arise, does not occur.
For in seeing the Dhamma, Vakkali, one sees me; and in seeing me, one sees the Dhamma.
For in the past, venerable sir, when I was still a householder, I did not have much concern for the Dhamma or the Saṅgha.
For it is growth in the Noble One’s Discipline when one sees one’s transgression as a transgression, makes amends for it in accordance with the Dhamma, and undertakes future restraint.”
For it is growth in the Noble One’s Discipline when one sees one’s transgression as a transgression, makes amends for it in accordance with the Dhamma, and undertakes future restraint.” 
For it may happen that this lord of men, This khattiya, shall gain the throne, And in his anger thrash one harshly
For Master Mahakassapa to think of speaking on the Dhamma in the presence of Master Ananda, the Videhan sage—this is just as if a needle-peddler would think he could sell a needle to a needle-maker!”
For myself I see a pleasant dwelling in this very life, and I have compassion for later generations, thinking, ‘May those of later generations follow my example!’ For when they hear, ‘The enlightened disciples of the Buddha were for a long time forest dwellers and spoke in praise of forest dwelling … were energetic and spoke in praise of arousing energy,’ then they will practise accordingly, and that will lead to their welfare and happiness for a long time.
For name-and-form: consciousness.
For of these five hundred bhikkhus, Sariputta, sixty bhikkhus are triple-knowledge bearers, sixty bhikkhus are bearers of the six direct knowledges, sixty bhikkhus are liberated in both ways, while the rest are liberated by wisdom.” 
For on that occasion craving is its fuel.”
For on that occasion the wind is its fuel.” 
For one diminishing suffering thus
For one dismantling suffering thus, Nibbana is said to be close by.
For one keen on his welfare, brahmin.
For one not seeing the escape from it.
For one not seeing the escape from it.
For one of right action, right livelihood springs up.
For one of right effort, right mindfulness springs up.
For one of right intention, right speech springs up.
For one of right livelihood, right effort springs up.
For one of right mindfulness, right concentration springs up.” 
For one of right speech, right action springs up.
For one of right view, right intention springs up.
For one of wrong action, wrong livelihood springs up.
For one of wrong effort, wrong mindfulness springs up.
For one of wrong intention, wrong speech springs up.
For one of wrong livelihood, wrong effort springs up.
For one of wrong mindfulness, wrong concentration springs up.
For one of wrong speech, wrong action springs up.
For one of wrong view, wrong intention springs up.
For one who accumulates suffering thus
For one who accumulates suffering thus
For one who dwells with a mind well established in the four establishments of mindfulness, or for one who develops the signless concentration.
For one who has attained the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception, the perception pertaining to the base of nothingness has ceased.
For one who has attained the base of nothingness, the perception pertaining to the base of the infinity of consciousness has ceased.
For one who has attained the base of the infinity of consciousness, the perception pertaining to the base of the infinity of space has ceased.
For one who has attained the base of the infinity of space, the perception of form has ceased.
For one who has attained the cessation of perception and feeling, perception and feeling have been tranquillized.
For one who has attained the cessation of perception and feeling, perception and feeling have ceased.
For one who has attained the cessation of perception and feeling, perception and feeling have subsided.
For one who has attained the first jhana speech has subsided….
For one who has attained the first jhana, speech has been tranquillized.
For one who has attained the first jhana, speech has ceased.
For one who has attained the fourth jhana, in-breathing and out-breathing have been tranquillized.
For one who has attained the fourth jhana, in-breathing and out-breathing have ceased.
For one who has attained the second jhana, thought and examination have been tranquillized.
For one who has attained the second jhana, thought and examination have ceased.
For one who has attained the third jhana, rapture has been tranquillized.
For one who has attained the third jhana, rapture has ceased.
For one who has entered the homeless life
For one who knows what, for one who sees what, does the destruction of the taints come about?
For one who knows what, for one who sees what, does the destruction of the taints come about?
For one who knows what, who sees what, does the destruction of the taints come about?
For one who makes such sacrifice
For others engaged in giving alms:
For others engaged in giving alms:
For seven days, friend, I ate the country’s almsfood as a debtor, but on the eighth day final knowledge arose.
For seven more times at most, 
For since I shaved off my hair and beard, put on saffron robes, and went forth from the home life into homelessness, I do not recall ever having acknowledged any other teacher except the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.
For such a generation this state is hard to see, that is, specific conditionality, dependent origination.
For such a long time, bhikkhus, you have experienced suffering, anguish, and disaster, and swelled the cemetery.
For such a long time, bhikkhus, you have experienced suffering, anguish, and disaster, and swelled the cemetery.
For that does not exist for him
For that young deva, Ananda, was Anathapiṇḍika.”
For that, Sariputta, is the supreme honour with which a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed conducts himself towards the Tathagata and the Tathagata’s teaching.”
For that, Sariputta, is the unsurpassed security from bondage that a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed considers as the benefit when he conducts himself in a way that shows supreme honour towards the Tathagata and the Tathagata’s teaching.
For the abandoning of all suffering
For the arahant, friend, there is nothing further that has to be done and no repetition of what he has already done.
For the attainment of Nibbana, For making an end to suffering
For the attainment of Nibbana, From desire to learn one gains wisdom
For the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling, two things are helpful: serenity and insight.” 
For the Blessed One, brahmin, has stated that sensual pleasures are time-consuming, full of suffering, full of despair, and the danger in them is still greater, while this Dhamma is directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise.” 
For the Buddhas
For the destruction of craving, Radha, is Nibbana.”
For the Dhamma is taught by me for the sake of final Nibbana without clinging.
For the Dhamma is taught by me for the sake of the fading away of lust.
For the Dhamma is the banner of seers.” 
For the diligent ones, meditating, Attain supreme happiness.” 
For the fool that ignorance has not been abandoned and that craving has not been utterly destroyed.
for the full understanding of the course … for the destruction of the taints...
For the learned one who has comprehended Dhamma, Who clearly sees this world and the next, Desirable things do not provoke his mind, Towards the undesired he has no aversion.
for the most beautiful girl of the land.
for the nutriment contact...
for the nutriment mental volition … for the nutriment consciousness … consciousness does not become established there and come to growth.
for the purpose of revulsion towards the mind, for its fading away and cessation, one can be called a bhikkhu who is a speaker on the Dhamma.
for the realization of the fruit of true knowledge and liberation...
For the removal of lust and hatred, For transcending ignorance:
for the sake of his life...
for the sake of knowledge and vision...
For the six sense bases: name-and-form.
For the staff drives off the wild bull
for the uprooting of the underlying tendencies...
For the Venerable Mahamoggallana is of such great spiritual power and might that if so he wished he could live on for an aeon.” 
For the Venerable Sariputta has been extolled, lauded, and praised in many ways by the Blessed One:
For the wise man that ignorance has been abandoned and that craving has been utterly destroyed.
For the worldling this dyad is misconstrued as the duality of self and world; for the noble disciple it is simply the duality of internal and external phenomena.
For them the tangle is disentangled.
For them the tangle is disentangled.
For there is one who’s a match for you, So why think yourself the victor?”
For these worthies respect and revere the Dhamma.”
For this has been called a mastered base by the Blessed One.’
For this has been called a mastered base by the Blessed One.’
For this has been called decline by the Blessed One.’
For this has been called decline by the Blessed One.’
For this has been called decline by the Blessed One.’
For this has been called decline by the Blessed One.’
For this has been called nondecline by the Blessed One.’
For this has been called nondecline by the Blessed One.’
For this has been called nondecline by the Blessed One.’
For this has been called nondecline by the Blessed One.’
For this is a complete heap of the unwholesome, that is, the five hindrances.
For this is a complete heap of the unwholesome, that is, the five hindrances.
For this is a complete heap of the wholesome, that is, the four establishments of mindfulness.
For this is a complete heap of the wholesome, that is, the four establishments of mindfulness.
For this is a complete heap of the wholesome, that is, the four establishments of mindfulness.”
For this is a complete heap of the wholesome, that is, the four establishments of mindfulness.”
For this is frightening to the uninstructed worldling: ‘It might not be, and it might not be for me; it will not be, it will not be for me.’
For this is not frightening to the noble disciple: ‘It might not be, and it might not be for me; it will not be, it will not be for me.’ 
For this reason the definitions in the Abhidhamma commentaries, parallel to the passage cited from Spk above, omit “mundane” in relation to the path.
For this, bhikkhus, is death in the Noble One’s Discipline: that one gives up the training and returns to the lower life.
For those bhikkhus who are arahants … these five hindrances have been abandoned, cut off at the root, made like palm stumps, obliterated so that they are no more subject to future arising.
For those whose standard is the clan, But one accomplished in knowledge and conduct
For those whose standard is the clan, But one accomplished in knowledge and conduct
For those with blocked minds it is obscure, Sheer darkness for those who do not see.
For to whatever extent I wish, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, I enter and dwell in the first jhana, which is accompanied by thought and examination, with rapture and happiness born of seclusion.
For we would not wish to misrepresent the Blessed One, venerable sir.”
For what reason, friend Moggallana, did you display that smile?”
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what reason?
For what substance could there be in a lump of foam?
For what substance could there be in a magical illusion?
For what substance could there be in a mirage?
For what substance could there be in a water bubble?
For what substance could there be in consciousness?
For what substance could there be in feeling?
For what substance could there be in form?
For what substance could there be in perception?
For what substance could there be in the trunk of a plantain tree?
For what substance could there be in volitional formations?
For whatever one conceives, bhikkhus, whatever one conceives in, whatever one conceives from, whatever one conceives as ‘mine’—that is otherwise.
For whatever one conceives, bhikkhus, whatever one conceives in, whatever one conceives from, whatever one conceives as ‘mine’—that is otherwise.
For when you look up at the crest of his standard, whatever fear or trepidation or terror you may have will be abandoned.
For when you look up at the crest of his standard, whatever fear or trepidation or terror you may have will be abandoned.’ 
For when you look up at the crest of my standard, whatever fear or trepidation or terror you may have will be abandoned.
For when you recollect me, bhikkhus, whatever fear or trepidation or terror you may have will be abandoned.
For when you recollect the Dhamma, bhikkhus, whatever fear or trepidation or terror you may have will be abandoned.
For when you recollect the Saṅgha, bhikkhus, whatever fear or trepidation or terror you may have will be abandoned.
For whom all desires are fulfilled.
For whom is there no going astray?
For you can give them what you wish, Whether it be danger or safety.’ 
For you have asked me: ‘Friend Ananda, as to the wholesome virtues spoken of by the Blessed One, what is the purpose for which they were spoken of by him?’”
For you have asked me: ‘Friend Ananda, it is said, “the holy life, the holy life.”
For you have asked me: ‘Friend Ananda, it is said, “the holy life, the holy life.”
For you have asked me: ‘Friend Ananda, it is said, “the unholy life, the unholy life.”
For you have asked me: ‘Friend Ananda, what is the cause and reason why the true Dhamma does not endure long after a Tathagata has attained final Nibbana?
For you, Sariputta, are wise, one of great wisdom, of wide wisdom, of joyous wisdom, of swift wisdom, of sharp wisdom, of penetrative wisdom.
For, bhikkhus, it is for the full understanding of suffering that the holy life is lived under me.
For, bhikkhus, it is for the full understanding of suffering that the holy life is lived under me.
For, bhikkhus, whatever one conceives, whatever one conceives in, whatever one conceives from, whatever one conceives as ‘mine’—that is otherwise.
For, brahmin, the holy life is lived with Nibbana as its ground, Nibbana as its destination, Nibbana as its final goal.” 
For, friends, knowing, the Blessed One knows; seeing, he sees; he has become vision, he has become knowledge, he has become the Dhamma, he has become the holy one; he is the expounder, the proclaimer, the elucidator of meaning, the giver of the Deathless, the lord of the Dhamma, the Tathagata.
For, headman, gold and silver are not allowable for the ascetics following the Sakyan son; the ascetics following the Sakyan son do not consent to gold and silver; the ascetics following the Sakyan son do not accept gold and silver.
For, Radha, the holy life is lived with Nibbana as its ground, Nibbana as its destination, Nibbana as its final goal.”
For, Sariputta, it is considering as benefit the unsurpassed security from bondage that a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed conducts himself in a way that shows supreme honour towards the Tathagata and the Tathagata’s teaching.
For, venerable sir, I dwell contemplating impermanence in all formations, perceiving suffering in what is impermanent, perceiving nonself in what is suffering, perceiving abandonment, perceiving fading away, perceiving cessation.
For, venerable sir, I possess confirmed confidence in the Buddha … in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.
For, venerable sir, I possess confirmed confidence in the Buddha … in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.… I possess the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken … leading to concentration.”
For, venerable sir, I possess confirmed confidence in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha.
For, venerable sir, the Blessed One is the originator of the path unarisen before, the producer of the path unproduced before, the declarer of the path undeclared before.
For, venerable sir, we possess confirmed confidence in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha.
Foreseeing trouble, O Brahma, I did not speak
Form is impermanent … Consciousness is impermanent; you should abandon desire for it.
Form is impermanent; you should abandon desire for it.
Form is Mara.
Form is misery; feeling is misery; perception is misery; volitional formations are misery; consciousness is misery.
Form is nonself … consciousness is nonself.
Form is nonself, feeling is nonself, perception is nonself, volitional formations are nonself, consciousness is nonself.
Form is not yours: abandon it.
Form is subject to cessation.
Form is the fragile; its cessation, subsiding, passing away is the unfragile.
Form should be seen as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
Form should be seen as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
Form that is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change: this the wise in the world agree upon as existing, and I too say that it exists.
Form that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change: this the wise in the world agree upon as not existing, and I too say that it does not exist.
Form, bhikkhus, is a thing that can be clung to; the desire and lust for it is the clinging there.
Form, bhikkhus, is a thing that fetters; the desire and lust for it is the fetter there.
Form, bhikkhus, is a world-phenomenon in the world to which the Tathagata has awakened and broken through.
Form, bhikkhus, is something that should be fully understood.
Form, bhikkhus, is something that should be fully understood; feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness is something that should be fully understood.
Formerly, Anuradha, and also now, I make known just suffering and the cessation of suffering.” 
Formerly, when this young deva was a human being, he undertook faith, virtue, learning, generosity, and wisdom in the Dhamma and Discipline proclaimed by the Tathagata.
Forms are empty of self and of what belongs to self.
Forms are impermanent … Eye-consciousness is impermanent … Eye-contact is impermanent … Whatever feeling arises with eye-contact as condition … that too is impermanent; you should abandon desire for it.
Forms are impermanent … Eye-consciousness is impermanent … Eye-contact is impermanent … Whatever feeling arises with eye-contact as condition—whether pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant—that too is impermanent; you should abandon desire for it.
Forms are impermanent … Mental phenomena are impermanent; you should abandon desire and lust for them.
Forms are nonself … Mental phenomena are nonself; you should abandon desire and lust for them.
Forms are not yours … Eye-consciousness is not yours … Eye-contact is not yours … Whatever feeling arises with eye-contact as condition—whether pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant—that too is not yours: abandon it.
Forms are suffering … Whatever feeling arises with eye-contact as condition … that too is suffering … The mind is suffering … Whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition … that too is suffering: it is for the full understanding of this that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One.
Forms are suffering: it is for the full understanding of them that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One.
Forms are suffering… Mental phenomena are suffering; you should abandon desire and lust for them.
Forms become manifest to him as they really are—as impermanent.
Forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
Forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
Forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
Forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
Forms cognizable by the eye...
Forms cognizable by the eye...
Forms cognizable by the eye...
Forms … Eye-consciousness … Eye-contact … Whatever feeling arises with eye-contact as condition … that too is subject to birth.
Fortune is the abode of wealth;
Fourteen oxen, Not seen now for the past six days:
Fourteen oxen, Not seen now for the past six days:
Fourth, speak the truth, not falsehood.”
Friend Sariputta, when a bhikkhu is liberated by the destruction of craving, there is no round for describing him.” 
Friends, although ‘I am’ has not yet vanished in me in relation to these five aggregates subject to clinging, still I do not regard as ‘This I am.’
Friends, although ‘I am’ has not yet vanished in me in relation to these five aggregates subject to clinging, still I do not regard as ‘This I am.’
Friends, ‘I am’ has not yet vanished in me in relation to these five aggregates subject to clinging, but I do not regard as ‘This I am.’” 
From a desire to behold the Teacher, Your disciple Vaṅgisa, O great hero, Bows down in worship at your feet.”
From attraction and repulsion.”
From dread of speaking falsely.” 
from false speech … from divisive speech … from harsh speech … from idle chatter come together and unite with those who so abstain.”
from false speech … from wine, liquor, and intoxicants that cause negligence come together and unite with those who so abstain.”
From the abbuda the pesi is produced;
From the Buddha, Kinsman of the Sun:
From the ghana emerge the limbs, The head-hair, body-hair, and nails.
From the home to the homeless life.
From the kalala comes the abbuda;
From the pesi the ghana arises;
From the pools they enter the lakes, then the streams, then the rivers, and finally they enter the ocean.
From the pools they enter the lakes, then the streams, then the rivers, and finally they enter the ocean.
From the suffering of living beings.
From thence their roots spread down the trunk of the supporting tree to the ground, where they grow vigorously.
From these, it seems that to go beyond “merely the seen” is to ascribe a pleasing sign —an attractive attribute—to the objects seen, heard, etc., and from this such defilements as attraction and annoyance result.
From this spring discontent, delight, and terror;
From today let Master Bharadvaja remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
From today let Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
From today let Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
From today let Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
From today let Master Kaccana remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.
From today let Master Udayı̄ remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
From today let the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
From today let the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
From today let the Blessed One remember us as lay followers who have gone for refuge for life.”
From village to village, town to town, Paying homage to the Enlightened One
From village to village, town to town.
From what is he not yet freed?”
From whatever it is that evil comes, From this one should rein in the mind.” 
From where do one’s bones and liver come?
Fully quenched within himself.” 
Fully released, without acquisitions!
Further, friend, it is because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that I directly know the thousandfold world.” 
Further, friends, it is because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that I directly knew the inferior state as inferior; that I directly knew the middling state as middling; that I directly knew the sublime state as sublime.” 
Further, friends, it is because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that I recollect a thousand aeons.”
Further, if I were to die before the Blessed One does, it would not be surprising if the Blessed One were to declare of me: ‘There is no fetter bound by which Citta the householder could return to this world.’” 
Further, Norman seems to have overlooked the phrase bhagavantaṁ dhotahatthaṁ onı̄tapattapaṇiṁ, where the washing of the hand is already covered by dhotahatthaṁ.
Gain, honour, and praise cut through the outer skin, then through the inner skin, then through the flesh, then through the sinews, then through the bone.
Gain, honour, and praise cut through the outer skin, then through the inner skin, then through the flesh, then through the sinews, then through the bone.
Get up and sit in your own seat, as your mind has confidence in me.”
Gethin discusses the basic formula, Buddhist Path to Awakening, pp.
Gethin discusses the two versions of the simile, The Buddhist Path to Awakening, pp.
Give a Dhamma talk to the bhikkhus.
Give almsfood to the ascetics following the Sakyan son.”
Give food and drink and things to eat, Clothing to wear and beds and seats.
Giver of food, drink, and clothes, Provider of beds, seats, and coverlets —
Giving a lamp, one gives sight.
Giving a vehicle, one gives ease;
Giving clothes, one gives beauty;
Giving discriminately too is good.
Giving is a doctrine of fools.
Giving what does one give beauty?
Giving what does one give ease?
Giving what does one give sight?
Giving with discretion too is good.
Giving, one binds friends.
Go a little further and you will see a delightful expanse of level ground.’
Go a little further and you will see a dense thicket.
Go a little further and you will see a steep precipice.
Go a little further and you will see a vast marshy swamp.
Go along it a little way and you will see a fork in the road.
Go back, Samiddhi, and dwell diligent, ardent, and resolute.”
Go downwards, good ghee or oil!’ What do you think, headman?
Go forward, householder!
Go forward, householder!
Go now, dear turtle, you are no longer one of us.’
Go off to rescue your thesis, for you’re defeated, or disentangle yourself if you can.’
Go off to rescue your thesis, for you’re defeated, or disentangle yourself if you can.’
Go there, Suvı̄ra, And take me along with you.’
Go there, Suvı̄ra, And take me along with you.’
Go there, Suvı̄ra, And take me along with you.’ 
Go, dear Suvı̄ra, launch a counter-march against the asuras.’ - ‘Yes, your lordship,’ Suvı̄ra replied, but he became negligent.
Go, Moggallana, stir up a sense of urgency in those bhikkhus.”
Goals shine when achieved:
Goals shine when achieved:
Goes to the terrible hell, Like Sambara, for a hundred years.’” 
Going forward is better for you, not turning back again.”
Going forward is better for you, not turning back again.”
Gold and silver are not allowable for the ascetics following the Sakyan son; the ascetics following the Sakyan son do not consent to gold and silver; the ascetics following the Sakyan son do not accept gold and silver.
Good friendship.
Good friendship.
Good is restraint with the mind, Restraint everywhere is good.
Good, lord of the devas, is the going for refuge to the Dhamma.
Good, lord of the devas, is the going for refuge to the Saṅgha.
Good, lord of the devas, is the possession of the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken … leading to concentration.
Grant me that, Sakka, as a boon.’
Grant me that, Sakka, as a boon.’ 
Greed, hatred, and delusion.
Greed, hatred, and delusion.
Grounded upon the holy life.” 
Growing in these five areas of growth, a woman noble disciple grows with a noble growth, and she acquires the essence, acquires the best, of this bodily existence.
Harassed in regard to what?”
Hard to cross, indeed, is the dusty abyss;
Has become even dearer than them.
Has become for me nondelight.” 
Has been covered with swarms of vermin:
Has been covered with swarms of vermin:
Has been realized by the One with Vision;
Has the Venerable Mahamoggallana spent the day in a peaceful dwelling?”
Has the venerable one ever met him?”
Has, by means of this vehicle, Drawn close to Nibbana.” 
Have been fully liberated.
Have been fully liberated.…”
have been led to the pillar for the sacrifice.
Have been united for a very long time.
Have crossed over attachment to the world.”
Have crossed over attachment to the world.” 
Have you now, Sariputta, encompassed with your mind the minds of all the Arahants, the Perfectly Enlightened Ones, arisen in the past and known thus: ‘Those Blessed Ones were of such virtue, or of such qualities, or of such wisdom, or of such dwellings, or of such liberation’?” 
Having abandoned conceit, well concentrated, With lofty mind, everywhere released:
Having abandoned covetousness, he is uncovetous.
Having abandoned covetousness, he is uncovetous.
Having abandoned divisive speech, he abstains from divisive speech.
Having abandoned divisive speech, he abstains from divisive speech.
Having abandoned false speech, he abstains from false speech.
Having abandoned false speech, he abstains from false speech.
Having abandoned harsh speech, he abstains from harsh speech.
Having abandoned harsh speech, he abstains from harsh speech.
Having abandoned idle chatter, he abstains from idle chatter.
Having abandoned idle chatter, he abstains from idle chatter.
Having abandoned ill will and hatred, he has a mind without ill will.
Having abandoned ill will and hatred, he has a mind without ill will.
Having abandoned mental misconduct, you should develop good mental conduct.
Having abandoned sense pleasures, Mindful and clearly comprehending, One should not pursue a course
Having abandoned sense pleasures, Mindful and clearly comprehending, One should not pursue a course
Having abandoned sexual misconduct, he abstains from sexual misconduct.
Having abandoned sexual misconduct, he abstains from sexual misconduct.
Having abandoned the hindrances, be pure.
Having abandoned the taking of what is not given, he abstains from taking what is not given.
Having abandoned the taking of what is not given, he abstains from taking what is not given.
Having abandoned verbal misconduct, you should develop good verbal conduct.
Having abandoned wrong view, he is one of right view.
Having abandoned wrong view, he is one of right view.
Having approached and paid homage, while massaging the Blessed One’s limbs, he said to him: “It is wonderful, venerable sir!
Having approached that bhikkhu, she addressed him in verse:
Having approached, he arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, knelt down with his right knee on the ground, and, raising his joined hands in reverential salutation towards that yakkha, he announced his name three times: ‘I, dear sir, am Sakka, lord of the devas!
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, sat down to one side, and related to the Blessed One his conversation with Queen Mallika.
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, sat down to one side, and reported to the Blessed One the entire conversation he had had with those bhikkhus.
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, sat down to one side, and said to him:
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, sat down to one side, and said to him: “Venerable sir, the Venerable Sariputta has declared final knowledge thus: ‘I understand: Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’” 
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, sat down to one side, and said to him: “Venerable sir, the Venerable Sariputta has roared his lion’s roar thus: ‘Friends, the first question that the Blessed One asked me had not been previously considered by me: thus I hesitated over it.
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, stood to one side, and addressed the Blessed One in verse:
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, stood to one side, and recited these verses in the presence of the Blessed One:
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, stood to one side, and recited these verses in the presence of the Blessed One:
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, stood to one side, and recited these verses in the presence of the Blessed One:
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, stood to one side, and recited this verse in the presence of the Blessed One:
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, stood to one side, and recited this verse in the presence of the Blessed One:
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, stood to one side, and recited this verse in the presence of the Blessed One:
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, stood to one side, and said to him:
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, stood to one side, and said to him:
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, stood to one side, and said to him:
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, stood to one side, and said to him: “So it is, Blessed One!
Having approached, he paid homage to the Blessed One, stood to one side, and said to the Blessed One:
Having approached, he paid homage to the Venerable Mahamoggallana and stood to one side.
Having approached, he paid homage to the Venerable Mahamoggallana and stood to one side.
Having approached, he paid homage to the Venerable Mahamoggallana and stood to one side.
Having approached, he paid homage to the Venerable Mahamoggallana and stood to one side.
Having approached, he paid homage to the Venerable Mahamoggallana and stood to one side.
Having approached, he paid homage to the Venerable Mahamoggallana and stood to one side.
Having approached, he paid homage to the Venerable Mahamoggallana and stood to one side.
Having approached, he paid homage to the Venerable Mahamoggallana and stood to one side.
Having approached, he stood in the air and said to the bhi kkhu Kokalika: “Placeconfidence in Sariputta and Moggallana, Kokalika.
Having approached, she paid homage to the Blessed One, stood to one side, and recited these verses in the presence of the Blessed One:
Having approached, she paid homage to the Blessed One, stood to one side, and recited these verses in the presence of the Blessed One:
Having approached, shocked and terrified, he stood to one side.
Having approached, shocked and terrified, he stood to one side.
Having approached, some paid homage to the Blessed One and sat down to one side.
Having approached, they paid homage to the Blessed One and sat down to one side.
Having approached, they paid homage to the Blessed One and sat down to one side.
Having approached, they paid homage to the Blessed One and sat down to one side.
Having approached, they paid homage to the Blessed One and stood to one side.
Having approached, they paid homage to the Blessed One and stood to one side.
Having approached, they paid homage to the Blessed One and stood to one side.
Having approached, they paid homage to the Blessed One and stood to one side.
Having approached, they paid homage to the Blessed One and stood to one side.
Having approached, they paid homage to the Blessed One and stood to one side.
Having approached, they saw the Blessed One sitting in that woodland thicket with his legs folded crosswise, holding his body erect, having set up mindfulness in front of him.
Having approached, we will report this matter to him.” 
Having arisen from this, the mind’s thoughts as boys toss up a crow.
Having arisen, they cease:
Having arisen, they cease:
Having arisen, they cease:
Having arisen, they cease:
Having as object release: here release is Nibbana, for Nibbana is called release because it is the releasing of the conditioned, its relinquishment.
Having attained the auspicious—supreme enlightenment—
Having bathed in the hot springs and come back out, he stood in one robe drying his limbs.
Having been instructed, exhorted, inspired, and gladdened by the Dhamma talk, the brahmin youth rose from his seat, approached the brahmin lady of the Verahaccani clan, and said to her: “See now, madam, you should know that the ascetic Udayı̄ teaches a Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; he reveals a holy life that is perfectly complete and pure.”
Having been tormented in hell for many years, for many hundreds of years, for many thousands of years, for many hundreds of thousands of years as a result of that kamma, as a residual result of that same kamma he is experiencing such a form of individual existence.” 
Having been tormented in hell for many years, for many hundreds of years, for many thousands of years, for many hundreds of thousands of years as a result of that kamma, as a residual result of that same kamma she is experiencing such a form of individual existence.”
Having been what, what did I become in the past?’
Having been what, what will I become in the future?’
Having climbed up on a large clod, he stood there and addressed the hawk: ‘Come get me now, hawk!
Having cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, a bhikkhu does not grasp its signs and features.
having cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, a bhikkhu understands an agreeable one thus...
Having cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, do not grasp its signs and features.
Having cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, he is intent upon a pleasing mental phenomenon and repelled by a displeasing mental phenomenon.
Having cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, he is not intent upon a pleasing mental phenomenon and not repelled by a displeasing mental phenomenon.
Having cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, someone is intent upon a pleasing mental phenomenon and repelled by a displeasing mental phenomenon.
Having cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, someone is not intent upon a pleasing mental phenomenon and not repelled by a displeasing mental phenomenon.
having cognized an agreeable mental phenomenon with the mind, a bhikkhu does not long for it, or become excited by it, or generate lust for it.
Having come as if in shock, Why do you stand there frightened?”
Having come as if in shock, Why do you stand there frightened?”
Having come from home into homelessness, Where it is hard to take delight—
Having come out, he stretches himself, surveys the four quarters all around, and roars his lion’s roar three times.
Having conquered the army of Death, I dwell without defiling taints.” 
Having created a thousand transformations of himself, he said to the independent brahma Subrahma: “Do you see, dear sir, how much power and might I have?”
Having cut off all greedy urge for existence, 
Having cut through the bone, it would reach right to the marrow.
Having cut through the bone, they reach right to the marrow.
Having cut through the bone, they reach right to the marrow.
Having cut through the net of Death, The noble ones, O Kamada, go their way.”
Having directly known them, I have explained them to the bhikkhus, the bhikkhunı̄s, the male lay followers, and the female lay followers.
Having done so, he does not make himself happy and pleased, nor does he share it and do meritorious deeds.
Having done so, he does not make himself happy and pleased, nor does he share it and do meritorious deeds.
Having done so, he does not make himself happy and pleased, nor does he share it and do meritorious deeds.
Having done so, he explains it, teaches it, proclaims it, establishes it, discloses it, analyses it, elucidates it.
Having done so, he explains it, teaches it, proclaims it, establishes it, discloses it, analyses it, elucidates it.
Having done so, he explains it, teaches it, proclaims it, establishes it, discloses it, analyses it, elucidates it.
Having done so, he explains it, teaches it, proclaims it, establishes it, discloses it, analyses it, elucidates it.
Having done so, he makes himself happy and pleased, and he shares it and does meritorious deeds.
Having done so, he makes himself happy and pleased, and he shares it and does meritorious deeds.
Having done so, he makes himself happy and pleased, and he shares it and does meritorious deeds.
Having done so, he makes himself happy and pleased, and he shares it and does meritorious deeds.
Having done so, he makes himself happy and pleased, but he does not share it and do meritorious deeds.
Having done so, he makes himself happy and pleased, but he does not share it and do meritorious deeds.
Having done so, he makes himself happy and pleased, but he does not share it and do meritorious deeds.
Having done so, he would bind them to a strong post or pillar.
Having done so, he would impale the large creatures in the ocean on the large stakes, the middle-sized creatures on the middle-sized stakes, and the small creatures on the small stakes.
Having done so, he would put them down, saying: ‘This is my mother, this my mother’s mother.’
Having done so, he would tie the ropes together with a knot in the middle and release them.
Having done so, he would winnow the ashes in a strong wind or let them be carried away by the swift current of a river.
Having done so, with the breakup of the body, after death, he has been reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world, in the company of the Tavatiṁsa devas, where he outshines the other devas in regard to beauty and glory.’
Having done so, with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
Having done so, with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
Having done so, with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell.
Having done so, with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell.
Having done so, with the breakup of the body, after death, he was reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world, in the company of the Tavatiṁsa devas, where he outshone the other devas in regard to beauty and glory.
Having done so, with the breakup of the body, after death, we were reborn in the company of egg-born nagas.
Having drawn out craving with its root, Godhika has attained final Nibbana.”
Having emerged from the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception, he attained the base of nothingness.
Having emerged from the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception, he attained the cessation of perception and feeling.
Having emerged from the base of nothingness, he attained the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception.
Having emerged from the base of nothingness, he attained the base of the infinity of consciousness.
Having emerged from the base of the infinity of consciousness, he attained the base of nothingness.
Having emerged from the base of the infinity of consciousness, he attained the base of the infinity of space.
Having emerged from the base of the infinity of space, he attained the base of the infinity of consciousness.
Having emerged from the base of the infinity of space, he attained the fourth jhana.
Having emerged from the cessation of perception and feeling, he attained the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception.
Having emerged from the first jhana, he attained the second jhana.
Having emerged from the first jhana, he attained the second jhana.
Having emerged from the fourth jhana, he attained the base of the infinity of space.
Having emerged from the fourth jhana, he attained the third jhana.
Having emerged from the fourth jhana, immediately after this the Blessed One attained final Nibbana.
Having emerged from the second jhana, he attained the first jhana.
Having emerged from the second jhana, he attained the third jhana.
Having emerged from the second jhana, he attained the third jhana.
Having emerged from the third jhana, he attained the fourth jhana.
Having emerged from the third jhana, he attained the fourth jhana.
Having emerged from the third jhana, he attained the second jhana.
Having entered the woods all alone, Are you on the lookout for a man?”
Having entirely abandoned conceit, Be an end-maker by knowledge, peaceful.” 
Having expelled all evil, unsullied, Cooled at heart, he comes seeking alms.
Having expunged desire here, One is thus released from suffering.” 
Having felt a tactile object with the body … Having cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, a bhikkhu does not grasp its signs and its features.
Having felt a tactile object with the body...
Having felt a tactile object with the body...
having felt a tactile object with the body...
having felt an agreeable tactile object with the body...
Having finished this work of ploughing, One is released from all suffering.”
Having folded his legs crosswise, straightened his body, and set up mindfulness in front of him, just mindful he breathes in, mindful he breathes out….
Having folded his legs crosswise, straightened his body, and set up mindfulness in front of him, just mindful he breathes in, mindful he breathes out….
Having folded his legs crosswise, straightened his body, and set up mindfulness in front of him, just mindful he breathes in, mindful he breathes out….
Having folded his legs crosswise, straightened his body, and set up mindfulness in front of him, just mindful he breathes in, mindful he breathes out….
Having folded his legs crosswise, straightened his body, and set up mindfulness in front of him, just mindful he breathes in, mindful he breathes out….
Having folded his legs crosswise, straightened his body, and set up mindfulness in front of him, just mindful he breathes in, mindful he breathes out….
Having folded his legs crosswise, straightened his body, and set up mindfulness in front of him, just mindful he breathes in, mindful he breathes out….
Having folded his legs crosswise, straightened his body, and set up mindfulness in front of him, just mindful he breathes in, mindful he breathes out….
Having fully understood feelings, He is taintless in this very life.
Having fully understood feelings, He is taintless in this very life.
Having fully understood feelings, He is taintless in this very life.
Having generated such volitional formations, they are burnt by the conflagration of birth, burnt by the conflagration of aging, burnt by the conflagration of death, burnt by the conflagration of sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
Having generated such volitional formations, they tumble down the precipice of birth, tumble down the precipice of aging, tumble down the precipice of death, tumble down the precipice of sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
Having generated such volitional formations, they tumble into the darkness of birth, tumble into the darkness of aging, tumble into the darkness of death, tumble into the darkness of sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
Having given and enjoyed as fits his means, Blameless he goes to the heavenly state.”
Having had rice pots filled with dung, he said to the bhikkhus: ‘Sirs, eat as much as you want from this and take the rest away with you.’...” 
Having heard a sound with the ear … Having cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, he is intent upon a pleasing mental phenomenon and repelled by a displeasing mental phenomenon.
Having heard a sound with the ear … Having cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, he is intent upon a pleasing mental phenomenon and repelled by a displeasing mental phenomenon.
Having heard a sound with the ear … Having cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, he is not intent upon a pleasing mental phenomenon and not repelled by a displeasing mental phenomenon.
Having heard a sound with the ear … Having cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, he is not intent upon a pleasing mental phenomenon and not repelled by a displeasing mental phenomenon.
Having heard a sound with the ear … Having smelt an odour with the nose … Having savoured a taste with the tongue … Having felt a tactile object with the body … Having cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, do not grasp its signs and features.
Having heard a sound with the ear … Having smelt an odour with the nose … Having tasted a taste with the tongue...
Having heard a sound with the ear...
Having heard a sound with the ear...
Having heard a sound with the ear...
Having heard a sound with the ear...
Having heard a sound with the ear...
Having heard a sound with the ear...
Having heard it from him, the bhikkhus will remember it.”
Having heard it from him, the bhikkhus will remember it.”
Having heard it from him, the bhikkhus will remember it.”
Having heard it from him, the bhikkhus will remember it.”
Having heard it from him, the bhikkhus will remember it.”
Having heard it from him, the bhikkhus will remember it.”
Having heard it from him, the bhikkhus will remember it.”
Having heard it from him, the bhikkhus will remember it.” 
Having heard it from him, the bhikkhus will remember it.”…
Having heard it from the Blessed One, the bhikkhus will remember it.”
Having heard it from the Blessed One, the bhikkhus will remember it.”
Having heard the cry of the devas of the realm of the Four Great Kings, the Tavatiṁsa devas … the Yama devas … the Tusita devas … the Nimmanarati devas … the Paranimmitavasavatti devas … the devas of Brahma’s company raised a cry: “At Baraṇasi, in the Deer Park at Isipatana, this unsurpassed Wheel of the Dhamma has been set in motion by the Blessed One, which cannot be stopped by any ascetic or brahmin or deva or Mara or Brahma or by anyone in the world.”
Having heard the cry of the earth-dwelling devas, the devas of the realm of the Four Great Kings raised a cry: “At Baraṇasi … this unsurpassed Wheel of the Dhamma has been set in motion by the Blessed One, which cannot be stopped … by anyone in the world.”
Having heard the Dhamma from him, I went forth into homelessness.
Having known acquisition as a tie in the world, A person should train for its removal.” 
Having known acquisition as a tie in the world, A person should train for its removal.” 
Having known and realized it himself, He taught the chief matter to the five.
Having known the dust-free, sorrowless state, The transcender of existence rightly understands.
Having known the world’s impermanence, They made an end to suffering.
Having known the world’s impermanence, They made an end to suffering.
Having known the world’s rise and fall, Let him be lofty in mind and unattached.”
Having known the world’s rise and fall, Let him be lofty in mind and unattached.” 
Having known this, fare evenly.
Having known, “This is suffering, Perishable, disintegrating,”
Having laid the heavy burden down
Having learned this verse from the Blessed One, whenever King Pasenadi was taking his meal the brahmin youth Sudassana recited:
Having learnt the true Dhamma of the good, Beings abide comfortably.”
Having learnt the true Dhamma of the good, Beings abide comfortably.” 
Having learnt the true Dhamma of the good, Beings fare on to a good destination.
Having learnt the true Dhamma of the good, Beings fare on to a good destination.”
Having learnt the true Dhamma of the good, One becomes better, never worse.
Having learnt the true Dhamma of the good, One becomes better, never worse.”
Having learnt the true Dhamma of the good, One does not sorrow in the midst of sorrow.
Having learnt the true Dhamma of the good, One does not sorrow in the midst of sorrow.”
Having learnt the true Dhamma of the good, One is released from all suffering.”
Having learnt the true Dhamma of the good, One is released from all suffering.”
Having learnt the true Dhamma of the good, One shines amidst one’s relations.
Having learnt the true Dhamma of the good, One shines amidst one’s relations.”
Having learnt the true Dhamma of the good, Wisdom is gained, but not from another.
Having learnt the true Dhamma of the good, Wisdom is gained, but not from another.” 
Having listened, may they gain confidence in the Dhamma!
Having listened, may they understand the Dhamma!
Having listened, may they understand the Dhamma!
Having paid homage to him, they sat down to one side and reported to him the entire discussion between those wanderers and themselves.
Having paid homage to him, they sat down to one side and reported to him the entire discussion between those wanderers and themselves.
Having paid homage to the Blessed One, he sat down to one side, and the Blessed One said to him:
Having paid homage to the Blessed One, they sat down to one side, and the Venerable Lakkhaṇa said to the Venerable Mahamoggallana: “Here, as he was coming down from Mount Vulture Peak, the Venerable Mahamoggallana displayed a smile in a certain place.
Having paid homage to the Venerable Sariputta, he sat down to one side, and the Venerable Sariputta then said to him:
Having plunged into the Blind Men’s Grove, he sat down at the foot of a tree for the day’s abiding.
Having plunged into the Blind Men’s Grove, she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day’s abiding.
Having plunged into the Blind Men’s Grove, she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day’s abiding.
Having plunged into the Blind Men’s Grove, she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day’s abiding.
Having plunged into the Great Wood, he sat down at the foot of a beluva sapling for the day’s abiding.
Having reached the end of birth and death, He need not strain for he has gone beyond.” 
Having reached the goal, I am rid of sorrow.
Having reached the stage of the tamed, They are the victors in the world.
Having realized by his own direct knowledge this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans, he makes it known to others.
Having reflected thus, he abandons false speech and he abstains from false speech in the future.
Having reflected thus, he abandons sexual misconduct and he abstains from sexual misconduct in the future.
Having reflected thus, he abandons the destruction of life and he abstains from the destruction of life in the future.
Having reflected thus, he abandons the taking of what is not given and he abstains from taking what is not given in the future.
Having reflected thus, he becomes indifferent towards past consciousness, he does not seek delight in future consciousness, and he is practising for revulsion towards present consciousness, for its fading away and cessation.
Having reflected thus, he becomes indifferent towards past form, he does not seek delight in future form, and he is practising for revulsion towards present form, for its fading away and cessation.
Having reflected thus, he himself abstains from false speech, exhorts others to abstain from false speech, and speaks in praise of abstinence from false speech.
Having reflected thus, he himself abstains from idle chatter, exhorts others to abstain from idle chatter, and speaks in praise of abstinence from idle chatter.
Having reflected thus, he himself abstains from sexual misconduct, exhorts others to abstain from sexual misconduct, and speaks in praise of abstinence from sexual misconduct.
Having reflected thus, he himself abstains from taking what is not given, exhorts others to abstain from taking what is not given, and speaks in praise of abstinence from taking what is not given.
Having reflected thus, he himself abstains from the destruction of life, exhorts others to abstain from the destruction of life, and speaks in praise of abstinence from the destruction of life.
Having reflected, he would not drink the beverage but would reject it, and thereby he would not meet death or deadly suffering.
Having relinquished the careless way, You should reflect carefully.
Having replied, ‘Yes, teacher,’ the apprentice Medakathalika climbed up the bamboo pole and stood on the teacher’s shoulders.
Having said this, he further said this:
Having said this, he further said this:
Having said this, he further said this:
Having said this, he further said this:
Having said this, he paid homage to me and, keeping me on the right, he disappeared right there.
Having said this, he paid homage to me and, keeping me on the right, he disappeared right there.”
Having said this, he paid homage to the Blessed One and, keeping him on his right, he disappeared right there.
Having said this, he paid homage to the Blessed One and, keeping him on the right, he disappeared right there.
Having said this, he paid homage to the Blessed One and, keeping him on the right, he disappeared right there.
Having said this, the Blessed One rose from his seat and entered his dwelling.
Having said this, the Blessed One rose from his seat and entered his dwelling.
Having said this, the Fortunate One rose from his seat and entered his dwelling.
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this:
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this: 
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, further said this: 
Having said this, they paid homage to the Blessed One and, keeping him on their right, they disappeared right there.
Having said, ‘Give alms to the ascetic,’ he rose from his seat and departed.
Having said, “There will be an occasion for that, sister,” he rose from his seat and departed.
Having savoured a taste with the tongue...
Having savoured a taste with the tongue...
having savoured a taste with the tongue...
having savoured an agreeable taste with the tongue...
Having seen a form with the eye, do not grasp its signs and features.
Having seen a form with the eye, do not grasp its signs and features.
Having seen a sage who has crossed the flood, O madam, make merit leading to future bliss.” 
Having seen a sage who has crossed the flood, The lady made merit leading to future bliss.
Having seen as it really is with correct wisdom: ‘Its origination occurs with that as nutriment,’ one is practising for the purpose of revulsion towards its origination through nutriment, for its fading away and cessation.
Having seen as it really is with correct wisdom: ‘Its origination occurs with that as nutriment,’ through revulsion towards its origination through nutriment, through its fading away and cessation, one is liberated by nonclinging.
Having seen as it really is with correct wisdom: ‘This has come to be,’ one is practising for the purpose of revulsion towards what has come to be, for its fading away and cessation.
Having seen as it really is with correct wisdom: ‘This has come to be,’ through revulsion towards what has come to be, through its fading away and cessation, one is liberated by nonclinging.
Having seen as it really is with correct wisdom: ‘With the cessation of that nutriment, what has come to be is subject to cessation,’ one is practising for the purpose of revulsion towards what is subject to cessation, for its fading away and cessation.
Having seen as it really is with correct wisdom: ‘With the cessation of that nutriment, what has come to be is subject to cessation,’ through revulsion towards what is subject to cessation, through its fading away and cessation, one is liberated by nonclinging.
Having seen him, he addressed the bhikkhus thus:
Having seen him, he approached the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
Having seen him, he approached the Blessed One and recited these verses in the presence of the Blessed One:
Having seen him, he thought: “I take delight in getting work done in this woodland thicket.
Having seen him, he took the sacrificial cake in his left hand and the waterpot in his right hand and approached the Blessed One.
Having seen him, I thought: ‘If I should ever see the Teacher, it is the Blessed One himself that I would see.
Having seen him, the man approached the chamberlains Isidatta and Puraṇa and told them: “Sirs, this Blessed One is coming, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.
Having seen him, they approached the brahmin of the Bharadvaja clan and said to him: “See now, master, you should know that in such and such a woodland thicket an ascetic is sitting with his legs folded crosswise, holding his body erect, having set up mindfulness in front of him.”
Having seen this benefit, our teacher teaches the removal of desire and lust for form, the removal of desire and lust for feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness.’
Having seen this danger, I speak thus.
Having seen this danger, I speak thus.
Having seen this danger, I speak thus.
Having seen this danger, I speak thus.
Having seen this danger, I speak thus.
Having seen this danger, I speak thus.
Having seen this danger, our teacher teaches the removal of desire and lust for form, the removal of desire and lust for feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness.’ 
Having seen this, he answered Brahma Sahampati in verse:
Having seen this, he thought: ‘I must be mad!
Having seen this, just as quickly as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm, the Venerable Mahamoggallana disappeared from Jeta’s Grove and reappeared in that brahma world.
Having seen this, … the Venerable Anuruddha disappeared from Jeta’s Grove and reappeared in that brahma world.
Having seen this, … the Venerable Mahakappina disappeared from Jeta’s Grove and reappeared in that brahma world.
Having seen this, … the Venerable Mahakassapa disappeared from Jeta’s Grove and reappeared in that brahma world.
Having seen with wisdom the abandoning of covetousness and displeasure, he is one who looks on closely with equanimity.
Having seen with wisdom what is the abandoning of covetousness and displeasure, he is one who looks on closely with equanimity.
Having set evil speech and mind against them.”
Having slain anger, one does not sorrow;
Having slain anger, one does not sorrow;
Having slain anger, one does not sorrow;
Having slain anger, one does not sorrow;
Having slain what does one not sorrow?
Having slain what does one not sorrow?
Having slain what does one not sorrow?
Having slain what does one not sorrow?
having smelt an agreeable odour with the nose...
Having smelt an odour with the nose...
Having smelt an odour with the nose...
having smelt an odour with the nose...
Having sown seed there, he might or might not sow seed in the field that was inferior, the one that was rough, salty, with bad ground.
Having sown seed there, he would next sow seed in the field of middling quality.
Having stored it there, he might or might not store it in the waterpot that has cracks, which lets water seep through and escape.
Having stored water there, he would next store it in the waterpot that is without cracks, but which lets water seep through and escape.
Having supported his kin, free from blame, That noble man goes to a heavenly state.”
Having touched and touched them, seeing their fall, Thus one loses one’s passion for them.
Having traced the conditions for the phenomena back to name-and-form, he searched for its condition too and saw it to be consciousness.
Having understood a Dhamma-stanza, We might practise for our welfare.
Having understood him thus as a ‘thorn,’ one should understand restraint and nonrestraint.
Having understood this thus as ‘a thorn,’ I follow Se here: … ayaṁ vuccati ariyassa vinaye kaṇṭako.
Having understood this, I understand: Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’
Having understood this, the wise person
Having understood whose Dhamma
Having understood, may they practise accordingly!’ He teaches the Dhamma to others because of the intrinsic excellence of the Dhamma; he teaches the Dhamma to others from compassion and sympathy, out of tender concern.
Having understood, may they practise accordingly!’ Thus he teaches the Dhamma to others because of the intrinsic excellence of the Dhamma; he teaches the Dhamma to others from compassion and sympathy, out of tender concern.
Having undertaken the training rules, train in them.
Having vanquished both lust and hate, O bhikkhus, Go to the far shore beyond birth and death!” 
Having walked for alms in Savatthi, when he had returned from his alms round, after his meal he approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him:
He abandoned contentious talk with people, Refrained from falsehood, a speaker of truth.
He abandons feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness and does not cling to it.
He abandons form and does not cling to it.
He afflicts and torments himself, achieves a wholesome state, and realizes a superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.
He afflicts and torments himself, and achieves a wholesome state, yet he does not realize a superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.
He afflicts and torments himself, yet he does not achieve a wholesome state or realize a superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.
He ages slowly, guarding his life.”
He ages slowly, guarding his life.” 
He approached the Blessed One and said to him: “Maybe you’ve seen oxen, ascetic?”
He approached the Blessed One and said to smeared with mud.
He approached the Venerable Mahakassapa, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side, and the Venerable Mahakassapa said to him: “Friend Ananda, for how many reasons did the Blessed One lay down the rule that bhikkhus should not take meals among families in groups of more than three?” 
He approached the Venerable Yamaka and exchanged greetings with him, after which he sat down to one side and said to him: “Is it true, friend Yamaka, that such a pernicious view as this has arisen in you: ‘As I understand the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One, a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed is annihilated and perishes with the breakup of the body and does not exist after death’?”
He approached those bhikkhus and said to them: “You, sirs, have gone forth while young, lads with black hair, endowed with the blessing of youth, in the prime of life, without having dallied with sensual pleasures.
He arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, extended his joined hands in reverential salutation towards the Blessed One, and said to him: “So it is, Blessed One!
He arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, extended his joined hands towards me in reverential salutation, and said to me: ‘So it is, Blessed One!
He arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, knelt down with his right knee on the ground, raised his joined hands in reverential salutation towards the Blessed One, and said to him: “Venerable sir, let the Blessed One teach the Dhamma; let the Fortunate One teach the Dhamma.
He arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, raised his joined hands in reverential salutation towards the Blessed One, and said to him: “So it is, Blessed One!
He arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, raised his joined hands in reverential salutation towards the Blessed One, and said to him: “So it is, Blessed One!
He arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, raised his joined hands in reverential salutation towards the Blessed One, and said to him: “So it is, Blessed One!
he asked him a further question: “But, venerable sir, why are in-breathing and out-breathing the bodily formation?
He attained complete self-restraint.
He becomes engaged with feeling … with perception … with volitional formations … with consciousness, clings to it, and takes a stand upon it as ‘my self.’
He can disentangle this tangle.
He can disentangle this tangle.
He cannot feel at ease whether he goes into a cave, or to the foot of a tree, or into the open air.
He carries about his final body, Having conquered Mara and his mount.”
He carries about his final body, Having conquered Mara and his mount.” 
He categorically blames and reviles any ascetic who leads a rough life.’
He criticizes and censures false speech, and he says: ‘Abstain from false speech.’
He criticizes and censures sexual misconduct, and he says: ‘Abstain from sexual misconduct.’
He criticizes and censures the taking of what is not given, and he says: ‘Abstain from taking what is not given.’
He cut off craving here for name-and-form.
He cut off craving here for name-and-form.
He declares an exertion for their abandoning.
He descended from the walkway, sat down in the seat that was prepared, and said to the householder Anathapiṇḍika: “Come, Sudatta.” 
He develops right concentration, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion.
He develops right concentration, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion.
He develops right concentration, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion.
He develops right concentration, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion.
He develops right concentration, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion.
He develops right concentration, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He develops right concentration, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He develops right concentration, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He develops right concentration, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He develops right concentration, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He develops right intention … right speech … right action … right livelihood … right effort … right mindfulness … right concentration, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to mind and volitional formations of striving.
He develops the enlightenment factor of discrimination of states … the enlightenment factor of energy … the enlightenment factor of rapture … the enlightenment factor of tranquillity … the enlightenment factor of concentration … the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He develops the enlightenment factor of discrimination of states … the enlightenment factor of energy … the enlightenment factor of rapture … the enlightenment factor of tranquillity … the enlightenment factor of concentration … the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He develops the enlightenment factor of discrimination of states … … the enlightenment factor of equanimity accompanied by mindfulness of breathing, based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He develops the faculty of energy … the faculty of mindfulness … the faculty of concentration … the faculty of wisdom, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He develops the faculty of energy … the faculty of mindfulness … the faculty of concentration … the faculty of wisdom, which leads to peace, leads to enlightenment.
He develops the faculty of energy … the faculty of mindfulness … the faculty of concentration … the faculty of wisdom, which leads to peace, leads to enlightenment.
He develops the power of energy … the power of mindfulness … the power of concentration … the power of wisdom, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He develops … right concentration, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
He did not implore the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, let the Blessed One live on for the aeon!
He did not pay homage to his mother or father, nor to his teacher or eldest brother.
He did not render service to the bhikkhus at the time of making robes.
He directly knew: “Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.”
He directly knew: “Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.”
He directly knew: “Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.”
He directly knew: “Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.”
He directly knew: “Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.”
He directly knew: “Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.”
He directly knew: “Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.”
He directly knew: “Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.”
He directly knew: “Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.”
He directly knew: “Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.”
He directs his mind accordingly.
He directs his mind accordingly.
He directs his mind accordingly.
He directs his mind accordingly.
He directs his mind accordingly.”
He disappeared right there.
He dismantles feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness and does not build it up.
He dismantles form and does not build it up.
He does not become engaged with feeling … with perception … with volitional formations … with consciousness, cling to it, and take a stand upon it as ‘my self.’
He does not delight in forms, does not take delight in forms, does not rejoice in forms.
He does not delight in mental phenomena, does not take delight in mental phenomena, does not rejoice in mental phenomena.
He does not live obsessed by the notions: ‘I am consciousness, consciousness is mine.’
He does not live obsessed by the notions: ‘I am feeling, feeling is mine.’
He does not live obsessed by the notions: ‘I am form, form is mine.’
He does not live obsessed by the notions: ‘I am perception, perception is mine.’
He does not live obsessed by the notions: ‘I am volitional formations, volitional formations are mine.’
He does not regard feeling as self … or perception as self … or volitional formations as self...
He does not regard feeling as self … perception as self … volitional formations as self … consciousness as self, or self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
He does not rejoice with them or sorrow with them, he is not happy when they are happy and sad when they are sad, and he does not involve himself in their affairs and duties.
He does not sink in the deep.” 
He does not understand as it really is the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these feelings.
He does not understand feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness subject to arising … subject to vanishing … subject to arising and vanishing as it really is thus: ‘Consciousness is subject to arising and vanishing.’
He does not understand feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation.
He does not understand feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation.
He does not understand form subject to arising and vanishing as it really is thus: ‘Form is subject to arising and vanishing.’
He does not understand form subject to vanishing as it really is thus: ‘Form is subject to vanishing.’
He does not yearn for existence.” 
He does not yet dwell having contacted with the body that is their destination, their culmination, their fruit, their final goal; but having pierced it through with wisdom, he sees.
He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having put away covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind...
He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating impermanence in contact and in neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he dwells contemplating vanishing, contemplating fading away, contemplating cessation, contemplating relinquishment.
He dwells contemplating impermanence in contact and in painful feeling, he dwells contemplating vanishing, contemplating fading away, contemplating cessation, contemplating relinquishment.
He dwells contemplating impermanence in contact and in pleasant feeling, he dwells contemplating vanishing, contemplating fading away, contemplating cessation, contemplating relinquishment.
He dwells contemplating impermanence in the body and in neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he dwells contemplating vanishing, contemplating fading away, contemplating cessation, contemplating relinquishment.
He dwells contemplating impermanence in the body and in painful feeling, he dwells contemplating vanishing, contemplating fading away, contemplating cessation, contemplating relinquishment.
He dwells contemplating impermanence in the body and in pleasant feeling, he dwells contemplating vanishing, contemplating fading away, contemplating cessation, contemplating relinquishment.
He dwells contemplating mind in mind, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating the body in the body externally, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating the body in the body internally and externally, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells contemplating the nature of origination in feelings … He dwells contemplating the nature of origination in mind … He dwells contemplating the nature of origination in phenomena; he dwells contemplating the nature of vanishing in phenomena; he dwells contemplating the nature of origination and vanishing in phenomena—ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
He dwells having contacted with the body their destination, their culmination, their fruit, their final goal; and having pierced it through with wisdom, he sees.
He dwells having set up mindfulness of the body, with a measureless mind, and he understands as it really is that liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, wherein those evil unwholesome states cease without remainder.
He dwells having set up mindfulness of the body, with a measureless mind, and he understands as it really is that liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, wherein those evil unwholesome states cease without remainder.
He dwells having set up mindfulness of the body, with a measureless mind, and he understands as it really is that liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, wherein those evil unwholesome states cease without remainder.
He dwells having set up mindfulness of the body, with a measureless mind, and he understands as it really is that liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, wherein those evil unwholesome states cease without remainder.
He dwells having set up mindfulness of the body, with a measureless mind, and he understands as it really is that liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, wherein those evil unwholesome states cease without remainder.
He dwells having set up mindfulness of the body, with a measureless mind, and he understands as it really is that liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, wherein those evil unwholesome states cease without remainder.
He dwells having set up mindfulness of the body, with a measureless mind, and he understands as it really is that liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, wherein those evil unwholesome states cease without remainder.
He dwells having set up mindfulness of the body...
He dwells pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with compassion … with a mind imbued with altruistic joy … with a mind imbued with equanimity, likewise the second quarter, the third quarter, and the fourth quarter.
He dwells without having set up mindfulness of the body, with a limited mind, and he does not understand as it really is that liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, wherein those evil unwholesome states cease without remainder.
He dwells without having set up mindfulness of the body, with a limited mind, and he does not understand as it really is that liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, wherein those evil unwholesome states cease without remainder.
He dwells without having set up mindfulness of the body, with a limited mind, and he does not understand as it really is that liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, wherein those evil unwholesome states cease without remainder.
He dwells without having set up mindfulness of the body, with a limited mind, and he does not understand as it really is that liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, wherein those evil unwholesome states cease without remainder.
He dwells without having set up mindfulness of the body, with a limited mind, and he does not understand as it really is that liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, wherein those evil unwholesome states cease without remainder.
He dwells without having set up mindfulness of the body, with a limited mind, and he does not understand as it really is that liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, wherein those evil unwholesome states cease without remainder.
He dwells without having set up mindfulness of the body, with a limited mind, and he does not understand as it really is that liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, wherein those evil unwholesome states cease without remainder.
He dwells without having set up mindfulness of the body...
He earlier had aroused energy for the attainment of arahantship, and when he attained arahantship, the corresponding energy subsided.
He earlier had made up his mind to attain arahantship, and when he attained arahantship, the corresponding resolution subsided.
He earlier had the desire for the attainment of arahantship, and when he attained arahantship, the corresponding desire subsided.
He earlier made an investigation for the attainment of arahantship, and when he attained arahantship, the corresponding investigation subsided.
He endured the pain;
He engages in good conduct of body, speech, and mind.
He engages in good conduct of body, speech, and mind.
He engages in misconduct of body, speech, and mind.
He engages in misconduct of body, speech, and mind.
He enjoys himself and does his duty.
He entered the village for alms alone, he returned alone, he sat alone in private, he undertook walking meditation alone.
He exchanged greetings with him and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to him:
He exchanged greetings with Nigaṇṭha Nataputta and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, sat down to one side.
He exchanged greetings with the Blessed One...and said to him:
He exchanged greetings with the Venerable Ananda and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to him:
He exchanged greetings with the Venerable Ananda and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to him:
He exchanged greetings with the Venerable Mahakaccana and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to him: “Master Kaccana, did a number of brahmin youths, my students, come this way while collecting firewood?”
He exchanged greetings with the Venerable Mahakassapa and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to him:
He exchanged greetings with the Venerable Mahakassapa and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to him:
He exchanged greetings with the Venerable Mahakoṭṭhita and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to him:
He exchanged greetings with the Venerable Mahamoggallana and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to him:
He exchanged greetings with the Venerable Mahamoggallana … and said to him:
He exchanged greetings with the Venerable Sariputta and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to him:
He exchanged greetings with the Venerable Sariputta and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to him:
He exchanged greetings with the Venerable Sariputta and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to him:
He exchanged greetings with the Venerable Sariputta and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to him:
He exchanged greetings with the Venerable Upavaṇa and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side and said to him:
He exchanged greetings with those wanderers and, when they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side.
He exhorted us with that exhortation.
He exhorted us with the following exhortation:
He experiences acclaim and happiness;
He experiences revulsion towards the ear … towards the mind … towards whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition….
He experiences revulsion towards the ear...
He explains, teaches, proclaims, establishes, discloses, analyses, and elucidates the inferior.
He explains, teaches, proclaims, establishes, discloses, analyses, and elucidates the middling.
He explains, teaches, proclaims, establishes, discloses, analyses, and elucidates the superior.
He extinguishes feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness and does not kindle it.
He extinguishes form and does not kindle it.
He feels one feeling—a bodily one, not a mental one.
he feels one feeling—a bodily one, not a mental one.
He feels two feelings—a bodily one and a mental one.
he feels two feelings—a bodily one and a mental one.
He generates desire for the abandoning of arisen evil unwholesome states; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He generates desire for the abandoning of arisen evil unwholesome states; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He generates desire for the abandoning of arisen evil unwholesome states; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He generates desire for the abandoning of arisen evil unwholesome states….
He generates desire for the abandoning of arisen evil unwholesome states….
He generates desire for the abandoning of arisen evil unwholesome states….
He generates desire for the arising of unarisen wholesome states; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He generates desire for the arising of unarisen wholesome states; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He generates desire for the arising of unarisen wholesome states; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He generates desire for the arising of unarisen wholesome states….
He generates desire for the arising of unarisen wholesome states….
He generates desire for the arising of unarisen wholesome states….
He generates desire for the maintenance of arisen wholesome states, for their nondecay, increase, expansion, and fulfilment by development; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He generates desire for the maintenance of arisen wholesome states, for their nondecay, increase, expansion, and fulfilment by development; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He generates desire for the maintenance of arisen wholesome states, for their nondecay, increase, expansion, and fulfilment by development; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He generates desire for the maintenance of arisen wholesome states, for their nondecay, increase, expansion, and fulfilment by development; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He generates desire for the maintenance of arisen wholesome states, for their nondecay, increase, expansion, and fulfilment by development; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He generates desire for the maintenance of arisen wholesome states, for their nondecay, increase, expansion, and fulfilment by development; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He generates desire for the nonarising of unarisen evil unwholesome states … for the maintenance of arisen wholesome states, for their nondecay, increase, expansion, and fulfilment by development; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He generates desire for the nonarising of unarisen evil unwholesome states … for the maintenance of arisen wholesome states, for their nondecay, increase, expansion, and fulfilment by development; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He generates desire for the nonarising of unarisen evil unwholesome states … for the maintenance of arisen wholesome states, for their nondecay, increase, expansion, and fulfilment by development; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He generates desire for the nonarising of unarisen evil unwholesome states; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He generates desire for the nonarising of unarisen evil unwholesome states; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
He gets caught here and there, is held fast here and there, is bound here and there, and here and there he meets with calamity and disaster.
He gives a bed….
He gives a bed….
He gives a bed….
He gives a dwelling….
He gives a dwelling….
He gives a dwelling….
He gives a fragrance….
He gives a fragrance….
He gives a fragrance….
He gives a garland….
He gives a garland….
He gives a garland….
He gives a lamp.
He gives a lamp.
He gives a lamp.
He gives a vehicle….
He gives a vehicle….
He gives a vehicle….
He gives an unguent….
He gives an unguent….
He gives an unguent….
He gives clothing….
He gives clothing….
He gives clothing….
He gives drink….
He gives drink….
He gives drink….
He gives instructions to others, He does not become fettered
He had the Blessed One bathed with the hot water, and he mixed the molasses with hot water and offered it to him.
He has abandoned delusion.
He has abandoned hatred.
He has bewildered the King of Death.”
He has cut off craving, severed the fetters, and by completely breaking through conceit, he has made an end to suffering.”
He has cut off craving, severed the fetters, and by completely breaking through conceit, he has made an end to suffering.”
He has developed the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving, thinking: ‘Thus my investigation will be neither too slack nor too tense; and it will be neither constricted internally nor distracted externally.’… Thus, with a mind that is open and unenveloped, he has developed the mind imbued with luminosity.
He has developed the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving, thinking: ‘Thus my investigation will be neither too slack nor too tense; and it will be neither constricted internally nor distracted externally.’… Thus, with a mind that is open and unenveloped, he has developed the mind imbued with luminosity.
He has developed the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving, thinking: ‘Thus my investigation will be neither too slack nor too tense; and it will be neither constricted internally nor distracted externally.’… Thus, with a mind that is open and unenveloped, he has developed the mind imbued with luminosity.
He has gone beyond Mara’s realm:
He has heard: ‘Egg-born nagas are long-lived, beautiful, and abound in happiness.’
He has heard: ‘Egg-born nagas are long-lived, beautiful, and abound in happiness.’
He has heard: ‘Egg-born supaṇṇas are long-lived, beautiful, and abound in happiness.’
He has heard: ‘Egg-born supaṇṇas are long-lived, beautiful, and abound in happiness.’
He has heard: ‘The devas of the gandhabba order are long-lived, beautiful, and abound in happiness.’
He has heard: ‘The devas who dwell in fragrant roots are long-lived, beautiful, and abound in happiness.’
He has heard: ‘The devas who dwell in fragrant roots are long-lived, beautiful, and abound in happiness.’
He has laid down the rod towards frail and firm:
He has met with calamity and disaster and the hunter can do with him as he wishes.
He has met with calamity and disaster, and the Evil One can do with him as he wishes.
He has no perplexity or doubt that what arises is only suffering arising, what ceases is only suffering ceasing.
He has not abandoned delusion.
He has not abandoned hatred.
He has not fallen into confusion, And he is the wise one, ever mindful.
He has not met with calamity and disaster, and the Evil One cannot do with him as he wishes.
He has not risen up in the bottomless abyss, Nor has he even gained a foothold.
He has overwhelmed those evil unwholesome states that defile, that lead to renewed existence, that bring trouble, that result in suffering, and that lead to future birth, aging, and death.
He has risen up in the bottomless abyss, And he has also gained a foothold.
He has settled me in the truth.
He heard: “A Buddha, it is said, has arisen in the world!” He wanted to go and see the Blessed One immediately, but it occurred to him: “It is not the right time to go and see the Blessed One today.
He indeed taught what is worthy of trust:
He intends:
He is a bhikkhu who sees rightly, One who fully understands feelings.
He is a practitioner of water-purification … devoted to the practice of immersing himself in water at dusk and at dawn.
he is beheaded to the south of the city?’
he is beheaded to the south of the city?’
he is called ‘one who has no teacher.’
He is freed from birth, aging, and death; freed from sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair; freed from suffering, I say.”
He is freed from birth, aging, and death; freed from sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair; freed from suffering, I say.”
He is freed from birth, aging, and death; freed from sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair; freed from suffering, I say.” 
He is freed from suffering, I say.
He is freed from suffering, I say.”
He is handsome, good-looking, pleasing to behold, possessing supreme beauty of complexion.
He is handsome, wealthy, and virtuous; he is clever and industrious; and he begets children.
He is incapable of doing any deed by reason of which he might be reborn in hell, in the animal realm, or in the domain of ghosts; he is incapable of passing away without having realized the fruit of stream-entry.
He is incapable of doing any deed by reason of which he might be reborn in hell, in the animal realm, or in the domain of ghosts; he is incapable of passing away without having realized the fruit of stream-entry.
He is incapable of doing any deed by reason of which he might be reborn in hell, in the animal realm, or in the domain of ghosts; he is incapable of passing away without having realized the fruit of stream-entry.
He is indeed a bhikkhu.
He is not freed from birth, aging, and death; not freed from sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair; not freed from suffering, I say.
He is not freed from suffering.” 
He is not handsome, not wealthy, not virtuous; he is lethargic; and he does not beget children.
He is not one of joyous wisdom, nor of swift wisdom, and he has not attained liberation.
He is not one of joyous wisdom, nor of swift wisdom, and he has not attained liberation.
He is not one of joyous wisdom, nor of swift wisdom, and he has not attained liberation.
He is not one of joyous wisdom, nor of swift wisdom, and he has not attained liberation.
He is not one of joyous wisdom, nor of swift wisdom, and he has not attained liberation.
He is not one of joyous wisdom, nor of swift wisdom, and he has not attained liberation.
He is not one of joyous wisdom, nor of swift wisdom, and he has not attained liberation.
He is not one of joyous wisdom, nor of swift wisdom, and he has not attained liberation.
He is not one who gains food, drink, clothing, and vehicles; garlands, scents, and unguents; bedding, housing, and lighting.
He is not one who gains food...
He is now dwelling at Savatthi in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapiṇḍika’s Park.
He is one of joyous wisdom, of swift wisdom, and he has attained liberation.
He is one of joyous wisdom, of swift wisdom, and he has attained liberation.
He is one of joyous wisdom, of swift wisdom, yet he has not attained liberation.
He is one of joyous wisdom, of swift wisdom, yet he has not attained liberation.
He is one who gains food … and lighting.
He is one who gains food, drink, clothing, and vehicles; garlands, scents, and unguents; bedding, housing, and lighting.
He is one who guards the doors of the sense faculties, who is moderate in eating, and who is devoted to wakefulness.
He is one who understands as it really is: ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
He is one who understands as it really is: ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
He is one who understands as it really is: ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
He is one who understands as it really is: ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
He is the knower of the path, the discoverer of the path, the one skilled in the path.
He is the knower of the path, the discoverer of the path, the one skilled in the path.
He is the light unsurpassed.”
He is the light unsurpassed.”
He is the one that is truly great, Not the fool with a well-built body.” 
He is the one whom I worship, Matali.
He is the sage, self-controlled.
He is truly called a bhikkhu.”
He just keeps running and revolving around form, around feeling, around perception, around volitional formations, around consciousness.
He kissed the Blessed One’s feet, stroked them with his hands, and announced his name thus: “I am Manatthaddha, Master Gotama!
He lay down with his mindfulness directed to the Buddha, and during the night he got up three times thinking it was morning.
He lives obsessed by the notions: ‘I am consciousness, consciousness is mine.’
He lives obsessed by the notions: ‘I am feeling, feeling is mine.’
He lives obsessed by the notions: ‘I am perception, perception is mine.’
He lives obsessed by the notions: ‘I am volitional formations, volitional formations are mine.’
He maintains that the form of the compound requires that the initial past participle should apply to both the hand and the bowl and suggests that onı̄ta- is from Skt ava-nı̄, “to put or bring.”
He might hear the sound of a lute and say: ‘Good man, what is making this sound—so tantalizing, so lovely, so intoxicating, so entrancing, so enthralling?’
He might say too, ‘They speak to me.’
He might think: ‘Whatever large creatures enter or leave this city, all enter and leave through this one gate.’
He neither abandons nor clings to feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, but abides having abandoned it.
He neither abandons nor clings to form, but abides having abandoned it.
He neither builds up nor dismantles feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, but abides having dismantled it.
He neither builds up nor dismantles form, but abides having dismantled it.
He neither enjoys himself nor gives.
He neither extinguishes nor kindles feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, but abides having extinguished it.
He neither extinguishes nor kindles form, but abides having extinguished it.
He neither scatters nor amasses feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, but abides having scattered it.
He neither scatters nor amasses form, but abides having scattered it.
He no longer keeps running and revolving around form, around feeling, around perception, around volitional formations, around consciousness.
He overwhelms mental phenomena; mental phenomena do not overwhelm him.
He overwhelms odours; odours do not overwhelm him.
He overwhelms sounds; sounds do not overwhelm him.
He overwhelms tactile objects; tactile objects do not overwhelm him.
He overwhelms tastes; tastes do not overwhelm him.
He paid homage to the Blessed One, and then he sat down to one side and said to him: “Venerable sir, this wanderer Susı̄ma says that he wishes to lead the holy life in this Dhamma and Discipline.”
He places faith in the enlightenment of the Tathagata thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
He possesses confirmed confidence in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.… He dwells at home with a mind devoid of the stain of stinginess, freely generous, open-handed, delighting in relinquishment, one devoted to charity, delighting in giving and sharing.
He possesses confirmed confidence in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.… He possesses the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken … leading to concentration.
He possesses confirmed confidence in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.… He possesses the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken … leading to concentration.
He possesses confirmed confidence in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.… He possesses the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken … leading to concentration.
He possesses confirmed confidence in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.… He possesses the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken … leading to concentration.
He possesses confirmed confidence in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.… He possesses the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken … leading to concentration.
He possesses confirmed confidence in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.… He possesses the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken … leading to concentration.
He possesses confirmed confidence in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.… He possesses the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken … leading to concentration.
He possesses confirmed confidence in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.… He possesses the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken … leading to concentration.
He possesses confirmed confidence in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.… He possesses the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken … leading to concentration.
He possesses the aggregate of virtue of one beyond training, the aggregate of concentration of one beyond training, the aggregate of wisdom of one beyond training, the aggregate of liberation of one beyond training, the aggregate of the knowledge and vision of liberation of one beyond training.
He possesses these five factors.
He practised in accordance with the Dhamma and did not trouble me on account of the Dhamma.
He practised in accordance with the Dhamma and did not trouble me on account of the Dhamma.
He practises in that way and conducts himself accordingly.
He practises in that way and conducts himself accordingly.
He practises that way and conducts himself accordingly.
He practises that way and conducts himself accordingly.
He reflects thus: ‘In many ways the Blessed One criticizes and censures the destruction of life, and he says: “Abstain from the destruction of life.”
He reflects thus: ‘The purpose for the sake of which I directed my mind has been achieved.
He reflects thus: ‘What now is the divine track of the devas?’
He regards feeling as self … perception as self … volitional formations as self … consciousness as self, or self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
He regards feeling as self … perception as self … volitional formations as self … consciousness as self, or self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
He regards feeling as self … perception as self … volitional formations as self … consciousness as self, or self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
He regards feeling as self...
He regards feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self.’
He regards the ear...
He sat down in the appointed seat and addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus, who has been instructing, exhorting, inspiring, and gladdening the bhikkhus in the assembly hall with a Dhamma talk, with speech that is polished, clear, articulate, expressing well the meaning, comprehensive, unattached?”
He sat down in the appointed seat and performed such a feat of spiritual power that the bhikkhus would come to him, alone and in pairs, in a timid manner.
He sat down in the appointed seat and said to the Venerable Mahakassapa:
He saw the Blessed One sitting there … … having set up mindfulness in front of him.
He scatters feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness and does not amass it.
He scatters form and does not amass it.
He sees women there lightly clad or lightly attired and lust invades his mind.
He sees women there lightly clad or lightly attired and lust invades his mind.
He should live there, having relinquished all:
He should not relinquish himself.
He speaks only on the Dhamma, not on non-Dhamma.
He speaks only what is pleasant, not what is unpleasant.
He speaks only what is true, not what is false.
He spoke of two kinds of feelings: pleasant feeling and painful feeling.
He stayed there at Nalanda in Pavarika’s Mango Grove.
He still might say, ‘I speak,’
he supporting trunk becomes enveloped in a basket of fig-roots and the branches of the fig-bush begin to spread widely through the crown of its support.
He teaches a Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; he reveals a holy life that is perfectly complete and pure.’
He then approached the Blessed One and addressed him in verse:
He then approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and reported to the Blessed One the entire conversation between the Venerable Sariputta and the Venerable Bhūmija.
He then approached the Venerable Ananda and exchanged greetings with him.
He then said to the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, I will not veer towards the near shore, I will not veer towards the far shore, I will not sink in mid-stream, I will not get cast up on high ground, I will not get caught by human beings, I will not get caught by nonhuman beings, I will not get caught in a whirlpool, I will not become inwardly rotten.
He then sat down in the appointed seat and said to the householder Anathapiṇḍika: “I hope you are bearing up, householder, I hope you are getting better.
He then sat down in the appointed seat and said to the householder Sirivaḍḍha: “I hope you are bearing up, householder, I hope you are getting better.
He then sat down in the appointed seat and said to the lay follower Dighavu: “I hope you are bearing up, Dighavu, I hope you are getting better.
He then set his lodging in order, took his bowl and outer robe, and set out to wander towards the Sunaparanta country.
He thinks: ‘Oh, with the breakup of the body, after death, may I be reborn in the company of egg-born nagas!’ He gives food….
He thinks: ‘Oh, with the breakup of the body, after death, may I be reborn in the company of egg-born nagas!’ Then, with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the company of egg-born nagas.
He thinks: ‘Oh, with the breakup of the body, after death, may I be reborn in the company of egg-born supaṇṇas!’ He gives food….
He thinks: ‘Oh, with the breakup of the body, after death, may I be reborn in the company of egg-born supaṇṇas!’ Then, with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the company of egg-born supaṇṇas.
He thinks: ‘Oh, with the breakup of the body, after death, may I be reborn in the company of the devas of the gandhabba order!’ Then, with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the company of the devas of the gandhabba order.
He thinks: ‘Oh, with the breakup of the body, after death, may I be reborn in the company of the devas who dwell in fragrant roots!’ He becomes a giver of fragrant roots.
He trains thus: ‘Concentrating the mind, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Concentrating the mind, I will breathe out.’
He trains thus: ‘Contemplating cessation, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Contemplating cessation, I will breathe out.’
He trains thus: ‘Contemplating fading away, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Contemplating fading away, I will breathe out.’
He trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe out.’
He trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe out.’
He trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe out.’
He trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe out.’
He trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe out.’
He trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe out.’
He trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe out.’
He trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe out.’ 
He trains thus: ‘Experiencing happiness, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Experiencing happiness, I will breathe out.’
He trains thus: ‘Experiencing the mental formation, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Experiencing the mental formation, I will breathe out.’
He trains thus: ‘Experiencing the whole body, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Experiencing the whole body, I will breathe out.’
He trains thus: ‘Gladdening the mind, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Gladdening the mind, I will breathe out.’
He trains thus: ‘Liberating the mind, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Liberating the mind, I will breathe out.’ 
He trains thus: ‘Tranquillizing the bodily formation, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Tranquillizing the bodily formation, I will breathe out.’ 
He trains thus: ‘Tranquillizing the mental formation, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Tranquillizing the mental formation, I will breathe out.’ 
He understand thus: ‘There is nothing in the world that I could cling to without being blameworthy.
He understands a mind with lust as a mind with lust; a mind without lust as a mind without lust; a mind with hatred as a mind with hatred; a mind without hatred as a mind without hatred; a mind with delusion as a mind with delusion; a mind without delusion as a mind without delusion; a contracted mind as contracted and a distracted mind as distracted; an exalted mind as exalted and an unexalted mind as unexalted; a surpassable mind as surpassable and an unsurpassable mind as unsurpassable; a concentrated mind as concentrated and an unconcentrated mind as unconcentrated; a liberated mind as liberated and an unliberated mind as unliberated.
He understands as it really is the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these feelings.
He understands as it really is: ‘Forms are impermanent.’… ‘Eye-consciousness is impermanent.’… ‘Eye-contact is impermanent.’… ‘Whatever feeling arises with eye-contact as condition—whether pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant—that too is impermanent.’…
He understands as it really is: ‘The eye is impermanent.’
He understands as it really is: ‘This is suffering.’
He understands as it really is: ‘This is suffering.’
He understands as it really is: ‘This is suffering.’… ‘This is the origin of suffering.’… ‘This is the cessation of suffering.’… ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’ 
He understands as it really is: ‘This is the cessation of suffering.’
He understands as it really is: ‘This is the cessation of suffering.’
He understands as it really is: ‘This is the origin of suffering.’
He understands as it really is: ‘This is the origin of suffering.’
He understands as it really is: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
He understands as it really is: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
He understands birth...
He understands feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness subject to arising … subject to vanishing … subject to arising and vanishing as it really is thus: ‘Consciousness is subject to arising and vanishing.’
He understands feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation.
He understands feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation.
He understands form subject to arising and vanishing as it really is thus: ‘Form is subject to arising and vanishing.’
He understands form subject to vanishing as it really is thus: ‘Form is subject to vanishing.’
He understands that lust for forms does not exist internally thus: ‘There is in me no lust for forms internally.’
He understands that lust for forms exists internally thus: ‘There is in me lust for forms internally.’
He understands that lust for mental phenomena does not exist internally thus: ‘There is in me no lust for mental phenomena internally.’
He understands that lust for mental phenomena exists internally thus: ‘There is in me lust for mental phenomena internally.’
He understands the displeasure faculty; he understands the origin of the displeasure faculty; he understands the cessation of the displeasure faculty; and he understands where the arisen displeasure faculty ceases without remainder.
He understands the equanimity faculty; he understands the origin of the equanimity faculty; he understands the cessation of the equanimity faculty; and he understands where the arisen equanimity faculty ceases without remainder.
He understands the joy faculty; he understands the origin of the joy faculty; he understands the cessation of the joy faculty; and he understands where the arisen joy faculty ceases without remainder.
He understands the pain faculty; he understands the origin of the pain faculty; he understands the cessation of the pain faculty; and he understands where the arisen pain faculty ceases without remainder.
He understands the pleasure faculty; he understands the origin of the pleasure faculty; he understands the cessation of the pleasure faculty; and he understands where the arisen pleasure faculty ceases without remainder.
He understands thus: ‘I have heard that at present the devas hold nonoppression as supreme, and I do not oppress anyone, frail or firm.
He understands thus: ‘I have heard that at present the devas hold nonoppression as supreme, and I do not oppress anyone, frail or firm.
He understands thus: ‘In such a way the world ceases.’ 
He understands thus: ‘In such a way the world originates.’
He understands thus: ‘There has arisen in me this displeasure faculty.
He understands thus: ‘There has arisen in me this equanimity faculty.
He understands thus: ‘There has arisen in me this joy faculty.
He understands thus: ‘There has arisen in me this pain faculty.
He understands thus: ‘There has arisen in me this pleasure faculty.
He understands thus: ‘There is no other ascetic or brahmin outside here who teaches a Dhamma so real, true, actual as the Blessed One does.’
He understands: ‘...
He understands: ‘...
He understands: ‘...
He understands: ‘...
He understands: ‘...
He understands: ‘...
He understands: ‘...
He understands: ‘...
He understands: ‘...
He understands: ‘...
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’ 
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’” 
He understands: ‘These six faculties will cease completely and totally without remainder, and no other six faculties will arise anywhere in any way.’
He understands: ‘With the breakup of the body, following the exhaustion of life, all that is felt, not being delighted in, will become cool right here.’
He understands: ‘With the breakup of the body, following the exhaustion of life, all that is felt, not being delighted in, will become cool right here.’
He understands: ‘With the breakup of the body, following the exhaustion of life, all that is felt, not being delighted in, will become cool right here.’
He understands: ‘With the breakup of the body, following the exhaustion of life, all that is felt, not being delighted in, will become cool right here.’”
He understands: ‘With the breakup of the body, following the exhaustion of life, all that is felt, not being delighted in, will become cool right here; mere bodily remains will be left.’ 
He understands: ‘With the breakup of the body, following the exhaustion of life, all that is felt, not being delighted in, will become cool right here; mere bodily remains will be left.’ “What do you think, bhikkhus, can a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed generate a meritorious volitional formation, or a demeritorious volitional formation, or an imperturbable volitional formation?”
He understands: ‘Without thought and examination, internally mindful, I am happy.’ 
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’” 
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’” 
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’” 
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’” 
He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’” 
He undertook faith, virtue, learning, generosity, and wisdom in the Dhamma and Discipline proclaimed by the Tathagata.
He was a practitioner of water-purification, one who believed in purification by water, who dwelt devoted to the practice of immersing himself in water at dusk and at dawn.
He was unwearying in teaching the Dhamma; he was helpful to his brothers in the holy life.
He who has reached the Dhamma’s core, Delighting in destruction, Does not tremble thinking, ‘The King of Death will come.’” 
He who would measure an immeasurable one
He who would measure an immeasurable one
He wields the various kinds of spiritual power: having been one, he becomes many; having been many, he becomes one; … he exercises mastery with the body as far as the brahma world.
He wields the various kinds of spiritual power: having been one, he becomes many; having been many, he becomes one; … he exercises mastery with the body as far as the brahma world.”
He would catch a snake, a crocodile, a bird, a dog, a jackal, and a monkey, and tie each by a strong rope.
He would catch a snake, a crocodile, a bird, a dog, a jackal, and a monkey, and tie each by a strong rope.
He would cut down the sapling at its foot … … he would winnow the ashes in a strong wind or let them be carried away by the swift current of a river.
He would cut down the tree at its foot, dig it up, and pull out the roots, even the fine rootlets and root-fibre.
He would cut down the tree at its foot...
He would cut down the tree at its foot...
He would cut down the tree at its foot...
He would cut it down at the root, cut off the crown, and unroll the coil.
He would cut it down at the root, cut off the crown, and unroll the coil.
He would cut the tree into pieces, split the pieces, and reduce them to slivers.
He would follow it and would see an ancient city, an ancient capital that had been inhabited by people in the past, with parks, groves, ponds, and ramparts, a delightful place.
He would go forward mindfully, he would go back mindfully, thinking, ‘May no thorn prick me!’ So too, bhikkhus, whatever in the world has a pleasing and agreeable nature is called a thorn in the Noble One’s Discipline.
He would look down into the well and the knowledge would occur to him, ‘There is water,’ but he would not be able to make bodily contact with it.
He would reply: ‘Go, man, bring me that lute.’
He would see a great expanse of water whose near shore was dangerous and fearful, and whose further shore was safe and free from danger, but there would be no ferryboat or bridge for crossing over from the near shore to the far shore.
He would see an empty village.
he would winnow the ashes in a strong wind or let them be carried away by the swift current of a river.
he would winnow the ashes in a strong wind or let them be carried away by the swift current of a river.
he would winnow the ashes in a strong wind or let them be carried away by the swift current of a river.
Hear me too, O Uttara:
Hearing the Dhamma, one gains confidence;
Hearing the true Dhamma is a factor for stream-entry.
Hearing the true Dhamma is a factor for stream-entry.
Hence comparison of the different strata of early Pali literature shows the usage of the term to have undergone some degree of evolution, from the more general and pragmatic to the more specific and technical.
Hence one shouldn’t approve of birth.
Hence one who loves himself should not harm others.”
Hence their complexion is so serene.
Hence this ascetic is happy.
Hence this ascetic is happy.
Hence this ascetic is happy.
Hence this ascetic is happy.
Hence this ascetic is happy.
Hence this ascetic is happy.
Hence this ascetic is happy.”
Hence with drastic punishment
Hence with drastic punishment
Hence, O brahmin, I am happy.
Hence, O brahmin, I am happy.
Hence, O brahmin, I am happy.
Hence, O brahmin, I am happy.
Hence, O brahmin, I am happy.
Hence, O brahmin, I am happy.
Hence, O brahmin, I am happy.”
Hence, without enjoying, I seek alms:
Her outer robe, bowl, waistband, and body were burning, blazing, and flaming while she uttered cries of pain.
Her outer robe, bowl, waistband, and body were burning, blazing, and flaming while she uttered cries of pain….”
Here a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here a bhikkhu dwells pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with lovingkindness, likewise the second quarter, the third quarter, and the fourth quarter.
Here a bhikkhu, gone to the forest or to the foot of a tree or to an empty hut, reflects thus: ‘Empty is this of self or of what belongs to self.’
Here a noble disciple, having abandoned a wrong mode of livelihood, earns his living by a right livelihood: this is called right livelihood.
Here and beyond, in the heavens and all abodes, They do not find the one whose knots are cut, The one untroubled, free of longing.
Here and beyond, in the heavens and all abodes, They do not find the one whose knots are cut, The one untroubled, free of longing.”
Here Be and Se both read: … asucigamakaṇṭako ti.
Here in the world of the living.
Here in this sal woods, bhikkhu, By reason of which you find delight
Here menfolk are enmeshed.
Here name-and-form ceases, Stops without remainder.” 
Here no being is found.
Here no substance can be found.
Here one should give a proper gift, Here a gift bears great fruit.
Here or there as fits the case, But for all creatures association
Here or there as fits the case, But for all creatures association
Here some person has been reborn in a high family … with abundant wealth and grain; and he is handsome, attractive, graceful, possessing supreme beauty of complexion.
Here some person has been reborn in a high family—an affluent khattiya family, an affluent brahmin family, or an affluent householder family—one which is rich, with great wealth and property, with abundant gold and silver, abundant treasures and commodities, abundant wealth and grain; and he is handsome, attractive, graceful, possessing supreme beauty of complexion.
Here some person has been reborn in a low family...
Here some person has been reborn in a low family—a family of caṇḍalas, bamboo workers, hunters, cartwrights, or flower-scavengers—a poor family in which there is little food and drink and which subsists with difficulty, one where food and clothing are obtained with difficulty; and he is ugly, unsightly, deformed, chronically ill—purblind or cripple-handed or lame or paralyzed.
Here someone is immoral, one of evil character, of impure and suspect behaviour, secretive in his acts, no ascetic though claiming to be one, not a celibate though claiming to be one, inwardly rotten, corrupt, depraved.
Here someone is of right view … right concentration.
Here someone is of right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
Here someone is of right view...
Here someone is of right view...
Here someone is of wrong view, wrong intention, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, wrong concentration.
Here someone is of wrong view...
Here someone is of wrong view...
Here someone is of wrong view...
Here the bhikkhus, the bhikkhunı̄s, the male lay followers, and the female lay followers dwell with reverence and deference towards the Teacher; they dwell with reverence and deference towards the Dhamma; they dwell with reverence and deference towards the Saṅgha; they dwell with reverence and deference towards the training; they dwell with reverence and deference towards concentration.
Here the bhikkhus, the bhikkhunı̄s, the male lay followers, and the female lay followers dwell without reverence and deference towards the Teacher; they dwell without reverence and deference towards the Dhamma; they dwell without reverence and deference towards the Saṅgha; they dwell without reverence and deference towards the training; they dwell without reverence and deference towards concentration.
Here the foolish are bewildered.
Here the text reads kayassa va aññathattaṁ indriyanaṁ va vipariṇamaṁ, but I think the implications are very similar.
Here the word means, rather, the continuation of his present life until the end of the kappa.
Here there are just desirable things.
Here there is a double entendre, for the Pali upada means both clinging and fuel, so the goal of the Dhamma can also be understood as “the quenching through lack of fuel.”
Here there prevails mutual devouring, the devouring of the weak.
Here this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans, for the most part is submerged, become like a tangled skein, like a knotted ball of thread, like matted reeds and rushes, and cannot pass beyond the plane of misery, the bad destinations,  the nether world, saṁsara.
Here this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans, for the most part is submerged, become like a tangled skein, like a knotted ball of thread, like matted reeds and rushes, and cannot pass beyond the plane of misery, the bad destinations, the nether world, saṁsara.
Here, a bhikkhu sees the eye as impermanent, he sees forms as impermanent, he sees eye-consciousness as impermanent, he sees eye-contact as impermanent, he sees as impermanent whatever feeling arises with eye-contact as condition, whether pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant.
Here, a man would come to you from the east, one who is trustworthy and reliable; having approached, he would tell you: ‘For sure, great king, you should know this: I am coming from the east, and there I saw a great mountain high as the clouds coming this way, crushing all living beings.
Here, Ananda, a bhikkhu develops right view, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, Ananda, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, Ananda, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, Ananda, a bhikkhu, having gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, sits down.
Here, Ananda, a bhikkhu, having gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, sits down.
Here, Ananda, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
Here, Ananda, by completely transcending the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the cessation of perception and feeling.
Here, Ananda, by completely transcending the base of nothingness, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception.
Here, Ananda, by completely transcending the base of the infinity of consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing,’ a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the base of nothingness.
Here, Ananda, by completely transcending the base of the infinity of space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite,’ a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the base of the infinity of consciousness.
Here, Ananda, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the first jhana, which is accompanied by thought and examination, with rapture and happiness born of seclusion.
Here, Ananda, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and displeasure, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the fourth jhana, which is neither painful nor pleasant and includes the purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
Here, Ananda, with the complete transcendence of perceptions of forms, with the passing away of perceptions of sensory impingement, with nonattention to perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite,’ a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the base of the infinity of space.
Here, Ananda, with the fading away as well of rapture, a bhikkhu dwells equanimous and, mindful and clearly comprehending, he experiences happiness with the body; he enters and dwells in the third jhana of which the noble ones declare: ‘He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily.’
Here, Ananda, with the subsiding of thought and examination, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the second jhana, which has internal confidence and unification of mind, is without thought and examination, and has rapture and happiness born of concentration.
Here, Ariṭṭha, a bhikkhu, having gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, sits down.
Here, Bahiya, dwell contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhu, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhu, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhu, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhu, dwell contemplating the body in the body internally, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhu, dwell restrained by the restraint of the Patimokkha, accomplished in good conduct and proper resort, seeing danger in the slightest faults.
Here, bhikkhu, having abandoned bodily misconduct, you should develop good bodily conduct.
Here, bhikkhu, one develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release….
Here, bhikkhu, one develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release….
Here, bhikkhunis, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right intention … right speech … right action … right livelihood … right effort … right mindfulness … right concentration, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release: this is called the path leading to the unconditioned.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view … right concentration, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view … right concentration, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view … right concentration, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view … right concentration, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view … right concentration, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view … right concentration, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion….
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion….
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion….
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion….
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release: this is called the path leading to the unconditioned….” 
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release….
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release….
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release….
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release….
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release….
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving: this is called the path leading to the unconditioned….”
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy and volitional formations of striving….”
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving: this is called the path leading to the unconditioned….”
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to mind and volitional formations of striving….”
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of discrimination of states … the enlightenment factor of energy … the enlightenment factor of rapture … the enlightenment factor of tranquillity … the enlightenment factor of concentration … the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release: this is called the path leading to the unconditioned….”
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness accompanied by altruistic joy...
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness accompanied by compassion … the enlightenment factor of equanimity accompanied by compassion, based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness accompanied by equanimity … the enlightenment factor of equanimity accompanied by equanimity, based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness accompanied by the perception of a skeleton … he develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity accompanied by the perception of a skeleton, based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness accompanied by the perception of a skeleton … he develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity accompanied by the perception of a skeleton, based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness accompanied by the perception of a skeleton … he develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity accompanied by the perception of a skeleton, based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness accompanied by the perception of cessation … he develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity accompanied by the perception of cessation, based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness accompanied by the perception of cessation … he develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity accompanied by the perception of cessation, based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness … he develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion … which has the Deathless as its ground, the Deathless as its destination, the Deathless as its final goal … which slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness … he develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness … he develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness … he develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness … he develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness … the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release: this is called the path leading to the unconditioned….”
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release….
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release….
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release….
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release….
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release….
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the faculty of energy … the faculty of mindfulness … the faculty of concentration … the faculty of wisdom, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release: this is called the path leading to the unconditioned….”
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the faculty of faith … … the faculty of wisdom, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the faculty of faith, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the faculty of faith, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release: this is called the path leading to the unconditioned….” 
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the power of energy … the power of mindfulness … … the power of concentration … the power of wisdom, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release: this is called the path leading to the unconditioned….”
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the power of faith … the power of wisdom, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the power of faith … the power of wisdom, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the power of faith … the power of wisdom, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the power of faith, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the power of faith, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release: this is called the path leading to the unconditioned….”
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating feelings in feelings, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world….” 
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating mind in mind, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world….”
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world: this is called the path leading to the unconditioned….”
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having put away covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world: this is called the path leading to the unconditioned….”
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the nature of origination in the body; he dwells contemplating the nature of vanishing in the body; he dwells contemplating the nature of origination and vanishing in the body—ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu generates desire for the abandoning of arisen evil unwholesome states; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives….”
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu generates desire for the arising of unarisen wholesome states; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives….”
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu generates desire for the continuance of arisen wholesome states, for their nondecay, increase, expansion, and fulfilment by development; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives: this is called the path leading to the unconditioned….”
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu generates desire for the nonarising of unarisen evil unwholesome states … for the maintenance of arisen wholesome states, for their nondecay, increase, expansion, and fulfilment by development; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu generates desire for the nonarising of unarisen evil unwholesome states … for the maintenance of arisen wholesome states, for their nondecay, increase, expansion, and fulfilment by development; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu generates desire for the nonarising of unarisen evil unwholesome states; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu generates desire for the nonarising of unarisen evil unwholesome states; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu generates desire for the nonarising of unarisen evil unwholesome states; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu generates desire for the nonarising of unarisen evil unwholesome states; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu generates desire for the nonarising of unarisen evil unwholesome states; he makes an effort, arouses energy, applies his mind, and strives: this is called the path leading to the unconditioned….”
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu guards the mind against the taints and against tainted states.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu investigates by way of the elements, by way of the sense bases, and by way of dependent origination.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu is one who acts with clear comprehension when going forward and returning; when looking ahead and looking aside; when drawing in and extending the limbs; when wearing his robes and carrying his outer robe and bowl; when eating, drinking, chewing his food, and tasting; when defecating and urinating; when walking, standing, sitting, falling asleep, waking up, speaking, and keeping silent.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu is one who acts with clear comprehension when going forward and returning; when looking ahead and looking aside; when drawing in and extending the limbs; when wearing his robes and carrying his outer robe and bowl; when eating, drinking, chewing his food, and tasting; when defecating and urinating; when walking, standing, sitting, falling asleep, waking up, speaking, and keeping silent.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu reviews this very body upwards from the soles of the feet, downwards from the tips of the hairs, enclosed in skin, as full of many kinds of impurities: ‘There are in this body head-hairs, body-hairs, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, sinews, bones, bone-marrow, kidneys, heart, liver, pleura, spleen, lungs, intestines, mesentery, contents of the stomach, excrement, bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat, tears, grease, saliva, snot, fluid of the joints, urine.’
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu speaks only what is well spoken, not what is badly spoken.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu understands form, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation; he understands the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of form.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu who is one beyond training understands the five spiritual faculties—the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu wields the various kinds of spiritual power: having been one, he becomes many … he exercises mastery with the body as far as the brahma world.
Here, bhikkhus, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
Here, bhikkhus, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
Here, bhikkhus, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
Here, bhikkhus, at night a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving by way of the same qualities, the same features, the same aspects, as he develops that basis for spiritual power by day.
Here, bhikkhus, for a bhikkhu feelings are understood as they arise, understood as they remain present, understood as they pass away.
Here, bhikkhus, having completely transcended the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the cessation of perception and feeling.
Here, bhikkhus, having seen a form with the eye, if there is lust, hatred, or delusion internally, a bhikkhu understands: ‘There is lust, hatred, or delusion internally’; or, if there is no lust, hatred, or delusion internally, he understands: ‘There is no lust, hatred, or delusion internally.’
Here, bhikkhus, in the morning a woman dwells at home with her heart obsessed by the taint of selfishness; at noon she dwells at home with her heart obsessed by envy; in the evening she dwells at home with her heart obsessed by sensual lust.
Here, bhikkhus, secluded from sensual pleasures … a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the first jhana … the second jhana….
Here, bhikkhus, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the first jhana … the second jhana … the third jhana … the fourth jhana.
Here, bhikkhus, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the first jhana … the second jhana … the third jhana … the fourth jhana.
Here, bhikkhus, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the first jhana, which is accompanied by thought and examination, with rapture and happiness born of seclusion.
Here, bhikkhus, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the first jhana, which is accompanied by thought and examination, with rapture and happiness born of seclusion.
Here, bhikkhus, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the first jhana, which is accompanied by thought and examination, with rapture and happiness born of seclusion.
Here, bhikkhus, the bhikkhu Moggallana has developed the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving, thinking: ‘Thus my desire will be neither too slack nor too tense; and it will be neither constricted internally nor distracted externally.’
Here, bhikkhus, the bhikkhu Moggallana has developed the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
Here, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple does not regard form thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self.’
Here, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple … does not regard form as self … nor feeling as self … nor perception as self … nor volitional formations as self … nor consciousness as self … nor self as in consciousness.
Here, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple, who is a seer of the noble ones and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, who is a seer of superior persons and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, does not regard form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
Here, bhikkhus, the noble disciple dwells with energy aroused for the abandoning of unwholesome states and the acquisition of wholesome states; he is strong, firm in exertion, not shirking the responsibility of cultivating wholesome states.
Here, bhikkhus, the noble disciple dwells with energy aroused for the abandoning of unwholesome states and the acquisition of wholesome states; he is strong, firm in exertion, not shirking the responsibility of cultivating wholesome states.
Here, bhikkhus, the noble disciple gains concentration, gains one-pointedness of mind, having made release the object.
Here, bhikkhus, the noble disciple gains concentration, gains one-pointedness of mind, having made release the object.
Here, bhikkhus, the noble disciple is a person of faith, one who places faith in the enlightenment of the Tathagata thus: ‘The Blessed One is an arahant, perfectly enlightened, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, fortunate, knower of the world, unsurpassed leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
Here, bhikkhus, the noble disciple is a person of faith, one who places faith in the enlightenment of the Tathagata thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
Here, bhikkhus, the noble disciple is a person of faith, one who places faith in the enlightenment of the Tathagata thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’ 
Here, bhikkhus, the noble disciple is mindful, possessing supreme mindfulness and discretion, one who remembers and recollects what was done and said long ago.
Here, bhikkhus, the noble disciple is mindful, possessing supreme mindfulness and discretion, one who remembers and recollects what was done and said long ago.
Here, bhikkhus, the noble disciple is wise; he possesses wisdom directed to arising and passing away, which is noble and penetrative, leading to the complete destruction of suffering.
Here, bhikkhus, the noble disciple is wise; he possesses wisdom directed to arising and passing away, which is noble and penetrative, leading to the complete destruction of suffering.
Here, bhikkhus, the noble disciple is wise; he possesses wisdom directed to arising and passing away, which is noble and penetrative, leading to the complete destruction of suffering.
Here, bhikkhus, the noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is an arahant, perfectly enlightened, accomplished in true knowledge and conduct, fortunate, knower of the world, unsurpassed leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
Here, bhikkhus, the perception of after and before is well grasped by a bhikkhu, well attended to, well considered, well penetrated by wisdom.
Here, bhikkhus, the perception of light is well grasped by a bhikkhu; the perception of day is well resolved upon.
Here, bhikkhus, the Tathagata has developed the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving, thinking: ‘Thus my desire will be neither too slack nor too tense; and it will be neither constricted internally nor distracted externally.’
Here, bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling regards form thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self.’
Here, bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling … regards form as self … feeling as self … perception as self … volitional formations as self … consciousness as self … or self as in consciousness.
Here, bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling, who is not a seer of the noble ones and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, who is not a seer of superior persons and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, regards form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
Here, bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling, who is not a seer of the noble ones and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, who is not a seer of superior persons and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, regards form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
Here, bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling, who is not a seer of the noble ones and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, who is not a seer of superior persons and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, regards form as self.
Here, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu has seen a form with the eye, there arise in him evil unwholesome states, memories and intentions connected with the fetters.
Here, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu has seen a form with the eye, there arise in him evil unwholesome states, memories and intentions connected with the fetters.
Here, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu has seen a form with the eye, there arise in him evil unwholesome states, memories and intentions connected with the fetters.
Here, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu has seen a form with the eye, there do not arise in him evil unwholesome states, memories and intentions connected with the fetters.
Here, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu has seen a form with the eye, there do not arise in him evil unwholesome states, nor any memories and intentions connected with the fetters.
Here, by completely transcending the base of the infinity of consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing,’ a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the base of nothingness.
Here, chamberlains, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
Here, Dighavu, dwell contemplating impermanence in all formations, perceiving suffering in what is impermanent, perceiving nonself in what is suffering, perceiving abandonment, perceiving fading away, perceiving cessation.
Here, during the day, while walking back and forth and sitting, a bhikkhu purifies his mind of obstructive states.
Here, during the day, while walking back and forth and sitting, a bhikkhu purifies his mind of obstructive states.
Here, Elder, what lies in the past has been abandoned, what lies in the future has been relinquished, and desire and lust for present forms of individual existence has been thoroughly removed.
Here, friend, a bhikkhu arouses ardour by thinking: ‘If unarisen evil unwholesome states arise in me, this may lead to my harm’...
Here, friend, a bhikkhu becomes afraid at the thought: ‘If unarisen evil unwholesome states arise in me, this may lead to my harm’; … and at the thought: ‘If wholesome states that have arisen in me cease, this may lead to my harm.’
Here, friend, a bhikkhu does not become afraid at the thought: ‘If unarisen evil unwholesome states arise in me, this may lead to my harm’ … nor at the thought: ‘If wholesome states that have arisen in me cease, this may lead to my harm.’
Here, friend, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, friend, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, friend, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, friend, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, friend, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
Here, friend, I dwell contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, friend, I dwell contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, friend, I dwell contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, friend, I dwell contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, friends, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, friends, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, friends, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, friends, I dwell contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, friends, I dwell contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, Godha, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha … in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.… He possesses the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken … leading to concentration.
Here, having seen a form with the eye, a bhikkhu does not grasp its signs and features.
Here, having seen a form with the eye, a bhikkhu does not grasp its signs and features.
Here, having seen a form with the eye, a bhikkhu is intent upon a pleasing form and repelled by a displeasing form.
Here, having seen a form with the eye, a bhikkhu is intent upon a pleasing form and repelled by a displeasing form.
Here, having seen a form with the eye, a bhikkhu is intent upon a pleasing form and repelled by a displeasing form.
Here, having seen a form with the eye, a bhikkhu is not intent upon a pleasing form and not repelled by a displeasing form.
Here, having seen a form with the eye, a bhikkhu is not intent upon a pleasing form and not repelled by a displeasing form.
Here, having seen a form with the eye, a bhikkhu is not intent upon a pleasing form and not repelled by a displeasing form.
Here, householder, a bhikkhu does not live in association with laypeople.
Here, householder, someone does not engage in such talk as this: ‘You don’t understand this Dhamma and Discipline….
Here, householder, someone does not think: ‘May I have such form in the future!… May I have such consciousness in the future!’ It is in such a way that one is without expectations.
Here, householder, someone engages in such talk as this: ‘You don’t understand this Dhamma and Discipline.
Here, householder, someone is devoid of lust, desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving in regard to sensual pleasures.
Here, householder, someone is not devoid of lust, desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving in regard to sensual pleasures.
Here, householder, someone lives in association with laypeople: he rejoices with them and sorrows with them, he is happy when they are happy and sad when they are sad, and he involves himself in their affairs and duties.
Here, householder, someone thinks: ‘May I have such form in the future!
Here, householder, the instructed noble disciple, who is a seer of the noble ones and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, who is a seer of superior persons and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, does not regard form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
Here, householder, the noble disciple attends closely and carefully to dependent origination itself thus: ‘When this exists, that comes to be; with the arising of this, that arises.
Here, householder, the noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is an arahant, perfectly enlightened, accomplished in true knowledge and conduct, fortunate, knower of the world, unsurpassed leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
Here, householders, a noble disciple reflects thus: ‘I am one who wishes to live, who does not wish to die; I desire happiness and am averse to suffering.
Here, Kuṇḍaliya, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release….
Here, Kuṇḍaliya, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending and mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, Kuṇḍaliya, having abandoned bodily misconduct, a bhikkhu develops good bodily conduct; having abandoned verbal misconduct, he develops good verbal conduct; having abandoned mental misconduct, he develops good mental conduct.
Here, Kuṇḍaliya, having seen an agreeable form with the eye, a bhikkhu does not long for it, or become excited by it, or generate lust for it.
Here, Mahanama, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha … in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.… He possesses the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken … leading to concentration.
Here, Mahanama, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha … in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha….
Here, Nandaka, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
Here, Nandiya, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
Here, Nandiya, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
Here, reflecting carefully, a bhikkhu takes food neither for amusement nor for intoxication nor for the sake of physical beauty and attractiveness, but only for the support and maintenance of this body, for ending discomfort, and for assisting the holy life, considering: ‘Thus I shall terminate the old feeling and not arouse a new feeling, and I shall be healthy and blameless and live in comfort.’
Here, reflecting wisely, a bhikkhu takes food neither for amusement nor for intoxication nor for the sake of physical beauty and attractiveness, but only for the support and maintenance of this body, for ending discomfort, and for assisting the holy life, considering: ‘Thus I shall terminate the old feeling and not arouse a new feeling, and I shall be healthy and blameless and live in comfort.’
Here, Sariputta, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
Here, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the first jhana, which is accompanied by thought and examination, with rapture and happiness born of seclusion.
Here, someone lives in association with laypeople; he rejoices with them and sorrows with them, he is happy when they are happy and sad when they are sad, and he involves himself in their affairs and duties.
Here, someone lives the holy life with the aspiration into a certain order of devas, thinking: ‘By this virtue or vow or austerity or holy life I will become a deva or one among the devas.’
Here, venerable sir, I saw a bhikkhu named Bhaṇḍa, a pupil of Ananda, and a bhikkhu named Abhiñjika, a pupil of Anuruddha, competing with each other in regard to their learning, saying: ‘Come, bhikkhu, who can speak more?
Here, with nonattention to all signs, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the signless concentration of mind.
Here’s where menfolk are enmeshed.
His body is steady and his mind is steady, inwardly well composed and well liberated.
His body is steady and his mind is steady, inwardly well composed and well liberated.
His body is steady and his mind is steady, inwardly well composed and well liberated.
His clothes were like this: he wore a three-piece hempen garment.
his daughter … his wife.’
His head was like a huge block of steatite; his tusks were like pure silver; his trunk was like a huge plough pole.
His is the teaching I approve.” 
His knowledge about this is independent of others.
His mind is what runs around;
His mind is what runs around;
His mind is what runs around;
His outer robe, bowl, waistband, and body were burning, blazing, and flaming while he uttered cries of pain….”
His own and the other’s—
His own and the other’s—
His own and the other’s—
His practice does not succeed.” 
His rebirth, I say, is inferior.
His rebirth, I say, is middling.
His rebirth, I say, is superior.”
his sister...
his son...
His two chief disciples were named Bhiyyosa and Uttara, an excellent pair.
His two chief disciples were named Tissa and Bharadvaja, an excellent pair.
His two chief disciples were named Vidhura and Sañjı̄va, an excellent pair.
His vehicle was like this: he went about in a dilapidated little cart with a leaf awning.” 
His voice, like that of a myna bird, Pours forth inspired discourse.
Homage to the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One!
Homage to the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One!” 
Homage to you, O highest among men!
Honoured by the Bhikkhu Saṅgha.
Householder, one who destroys life engenders, on account of such behaviour, fearful animosity pertaining to the present life and fearful animosity pertaining to the future life, and he experiences mental pain and displeasure.
How am I?
How are they produced?
How are they produced?’
How are we to understand it?”
How are we to understand it?”
How are we to understand it?”
How are we to understand it?”
How are we to understand it?”
How are you insane?
How bind friends to oneself?
How can a disciple teach the Dhamma in the very presence of the Teacher?’
How can a disciple teach the Dhamma in the very presence of the Teacher?”
How can a wise person like me
How can I inflict upon another what is displeasing and disagreeable to me?’
How can I inflict upon another what is displeasing and disagreeable to me?’
How can I inflict upon another what is displeasing and disagreeable to me?’
How can I inflict upon another what is displeasing and disagreeable to me?’
How can I inflict upon another what is displeasing and disagreeable to me?’
How can one like me think of dying among the houses?”
How can one like me think of listening to the Blessed One’s teaching while seated on a high seat.”
How come, when you sit all alone, Discontent doesn’t spread over you?”
How could anyone else dispel my dissatisfaction and arouse delight?
How could anyone else dispel my dissatisfaction and arouse delight?
How crooked is this Citta the householder!
How crooked is this Citta the householder!
How delightful that appears to me!”
How delightful that appears to me!”
How does he meditate so sensual perceptions
How does one achieve acclaim?
How does one cross the rugged sea?
How does one escape from it?”
How does one escape from it?” 
How does one find wealth?
How does one overcome suffering?
How fearful that appears to me!”
How fearful that appears to me!”
How fraudulent and deceptive!’ If your former statement is true, venerable sir, then your latter statement is false, while if your former statement is false, then your latter statement is true.
How fraudulent and deceptive!”
How honest and open!
How honest and open!’—yet now we understand you to say: ‘See this, sirs!
How is it that beings are defiled with cause and condition?”
How is it that beings are purified with cause and condition?”
How is it that knowledge and vision are with cause and condition?” 
How is it that lack of knowledge and vision is with cause and condition?”
How is it that this Dhamma is directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise?”
How is no delight found in you?
How is one begotten in the womb?” 
How is one purified?”
How is one released from suffering?” 
How is that?’
How is the liberation of the mind by altruistic joy developed?
How is the liberation of the mind by compassion developed?
How is the liberation of the mind by equanimity developed?
How is this so, venerable sir?”
How lives the one who they say lives best?”
How lives the one whom they say lives best?”
How many are awake when sleep?
How Master Kaccana has declared one whose sense doors are actually guarded to be one ‘with sense doors guarded’!
How Master Kaccana has declared one whose sense doors are actually unguarded to be one ‘with sense doors unguarded’!
How much more, then, Sarakani the Sakyan?
How much more, then, Sarakani the Sakyan?
How should the meaning of this, stated in brief, be understood in detail?”
How should the meaning of this, stated in brief, be understood in detail?”
How should we answer if we are to state what has been said by the Blessed One and not misrepresent him with what is contrary to fact?
How should we answer if we are to state what has been said by the Blessed One and not misrepresent him with what is contrary to fact?
How should we understand your ploughing?”
How straightforward is this Citta the householder!
How straightforward is this Citta the householder!
How the ascetic has such great power and might!’
How the entire meaning can be stated by a single phrase!
How the meaning and the phrasing of both teacher and disciple coincide and agree with each other and do not diverge, that is, in regard to the chief matter.
How the meaning and the phrasing of both teacher and disciple coincide and agree with each other and do not diverge, that is, in regard to the chief matter.
How the meaning and the phrasing of both teacher and disciple coincide and agree with each other and do not diverge, that is, in regard to the chief matter.
How the meaning and the phrasing of both teacher and disciple coincide and agree with each other and do not diverge, that is, in regard to the chief matter.
How the meaning and the phrasing of both teacher and disciple coincide and agree with each other and do not diverge, that is, in regard to the chief matter.”
How the meaning and the phrasing of both teacher and disciple coincide and agree with each other and do not diverge, that is, in regard to the chief matter.” 
How then do you eat, ascetic?”
How was I in the past?
How well expounded is the Dhamma in that, after thirty years, you have not attained any superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones, no dwelling in comfort, but only nakedness, and the shaven head, and the brush for cleaning your seat.”
How well expounded is the Dhamma, in that a layman clothed in white can attain a superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones, a dwelling in comfort.
How well that has been stated by the Blessed One: ‘Whatever suffering arises, all that is rooted in desire, has desire as its source; for desire is the root of suffering.’
How well this has been stated by the Blessed One who knows and sees, the Arahant, the Fully Enlightened One.
How well this has been stated by the Blessed One: ‘All beings, great king, are subject to death, terminate in death, and cannot escape death.’”
How well this has been stated by the Blessed One: ‘Great king, being a layman...
How well this has been stated by the Venerable Sariputta.
How well this was stated by the Blessed One:
How well this was stated by the Blessed One:
How well this was stated by the Blessed One: ‘As to that end of the world, friend, where one is not born, does not age, does not die, does not pass away, and is not reborn—I say that it cannot be known, seen, or reached by travelling.’”
How well this was stated by the Blessed One: ‘As to that end of the world, friend, … I say that it cannot be known, seen, or reached by travelling.’
How will I be in the future?
How, Ananda, is it to be obtained here: ‘May what is born, come to be, conditioned, and subject to disintegration not disintegrate!’?
How, Ananda, is it to be obtained here: ‘May what is born, come to be, conditioned, and subject to disintegration not disintegrate!’?
How, bhikkhus, is it to be obtained here: ‘May what is born, come to be, conditioned, and subject to disintegration not disintegrate!’?
How, for one bestowing alms, Does an offering bring success—just how?” 
How, householder, should the meaning of this brief statement be understood in detail?”
How, venerable sir, should the meaning of this, stated by the Blessed One in brief, be understood in detail?”
How, venerable sir, should the meaning of this, stated in brief by the Blessed One, be understood in detail?”
However, bhikkhus, with consciousness unestablished, the clansman Vakkali has attained final Nibbana.”
However, he has these five things: the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom.
However, he has these five things: the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom.
However, he has these five things: the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom.
However, he has these five things: the faculty of faith, the faculty of energy, the faculty of mindfulness, the faculty of concentration, the faculty of wisdom.
However, in this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, in this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans, I do not see another ascetic or brahmin more perfect in virtue than myself, whom I could honour and respect and dwell in dependence on.
However, it would occur to me: ‘The Teacher, so influential, so powerful and mighty, has passed away.
However, venerable sir, the thought occurs to me: ‘After I am gone, may this householder Jotika not fall into distress.’” 
However, when these things are developed and cultivated, they lead to a pleasant dwelling in this very life and to mindfulness and clear comprehension.”
However...
However...
However...
However...
Humbly worship you, Vasava.
Hymns, rules and vows, austerities, Hypocrisy, bent staffs, ablutions:
I am a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as my destination.’
I am a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as my destination.’ 
I am a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as my destination.’”
I am a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as my destination.’”
I am Ahiṁsaka the Harmless, Master Gotama.”
I am freed from all bondage, Therefore I don’t fear you, friend.” 
I am freed from Mara’s bondage:
I am freed from the great bondage:
I am here to exhort, I am here to assist, I am here to instruct!”
I am immersed in suffering, oppressed by suffering.
I am Koṇḍañña, Fortunate One!” 
I am leading the holy life dissatisfied, and I have doubt about the teachings.”
I am Manatthaddha, Master Gotama!”
I am not bearing up, I am not getting better.
I am not bearing up….
I am not bearing up….
I am not bearing up….
I am one who gains robes, almsfood, lodgings, and medicinal requisites, but these other bhikkhus have little merit and influence, and they do not gain robes, almsfood, lodgings, and medicinal requisites.’
I am quite different from the Koliyans’ hirelings with drooping head-dresses.
I am without perplexity or doubt about this: that the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom, when developed and cultivated, has the Deathless as its ground, the Deathless as its destination, the Deathless as its final goal.”
I ask you this, O Gotama, Who can disentangle this tangle?”
I ask you this, O Gotama, Who can disentangle this tangle?” 
I ask you, O Gotama, broad of wisdom:
I attend as a matter of vital concern, not sluggishly.’
I attend as a matter of vital concern, not sluggishly.’… When arousing the enlightenment factor of equanimity, he understands: ‘My mind is well liberated; I have uprooted sloth and torpor and thoroughly removed restlessness and remorse.
I call that person ‘one who dwells alone.’” 
I call this a certain kind of body, Ananda, that is, breathing in and breathing out.
I call this a certain kind of body, Ananda, that is, breathing in and breathing out.
I call this a certain kind of feeling, Ananda, that is, close attention to breathing in and breathing out.
I call this a certain kind of feeling, Ananda, that is, close attention to breathing in and breathing out.
I can stand between your eyebrows
I cannot even number them
I cannot explain it in detail.
I declare, Vaccha, rebirth for one with fuel, not for one without fuel.
I directly knew feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation.
I directly knew form, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation.
I do not doubt that in regard to what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, I have no more desire, lust, or affection.
I do not doubt that in regard to what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, I have no more desire, lust, or affection.’”
I do not regard anything among these five aggregates subject to clinging as self or as belonging to self, yet I am not an arahant, one whose taints are destroyed.
I do not see another ascetic or brahmin more perfect in concentration than myself….
I do not see another ascetic or brahmin more perfect in liberation than myself….
I do not see another ascetic or brahmin more perfect in the knowledge and vision of liberation than myself, whom I could honour and respect, and on whom I could dwell in dependence.
I do not see another ascetic or brahmin more perfect in wisdom than myself….
I do not see anyone, bhikkhus, in this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, in this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans, who could satisfy the mind with an answer to these questions except the Tathagata or a disciple of the Tathagata or one who has heard it from them.
I do not see anyone, bhikkhus, in this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, in this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans, who could satisfy the mind with an answer to these questions except the Tathagata or a disciple of the Tathagata or one who has heard it from them.
I do not see anyone, bhikkhus, in this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, in this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans, who could satisfy the mind with an answer to these questions except the Tathagata or a disciple of the Tathagata or one who has heard it from them.
I do not sorrow, I do not weep, Nor do I fear you, friend.
I do not speak of feeling as ‘I am’ … nor of perception as ‘I am’ … nor of volitional formations as ‘I am’ … nor of consciousness as ‘I am,’ nor do I speak of ‘I am’ apart from consciousness.
I do not speak of feeling as ‘I am’ … nor of perception as ‘I am’ … nor of volitional formations as ‘I am’ … nor of consciousness as ‘I am,’ nor do I speak of ‘I am’ apart from consciousness.
I do not speak thus.
I don’t approve of their teachings;
I doubt these explanations capture the intended meaning and think it more likely skill in attainment is synonymous with the “mastery in attainment” described at Paṭis I thus: “He attains the first jhana where, when, and for as long as he wishes; he has no difficulty in attaining.”
I dwell, venerable sir, contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
I entered and dwelt in the base of the infinity of space.
I entered and dwelt in the fourth jhana….
I entered and dwelt in the third jhana….
I exchanged greetings with those wanderers and, when we had concluded our greetings and cordial talk, I sat down to one side.
I find that “established” works consistently better as a rendering for the participle patiṭṭhita, but “support” for the noun patiṭṭha, so to bridge the participle and the noun in the present passage I have coined this compound expression.
I folded in four my outer robe of patches and said to him: ‘Venerable sir, let the Blessed One sit down here.
I followed it and saw an ancient city, an ancient capital that had been inhabited by people in the past, with parks, groves, ponds, and ramparts, a delightful place.
I followed that path and by doing so I have directly known aging-and-death, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation.
I go for refuge to Master Gotama, and to the Dhamma, and to the Bhikkhu Saṅgha.
I go for refuge to Master Gotama, and to the Dhamma, and to the Bhikkhu Saṅgha.
I go for refuge to Master Gotama, and to the Dhamma, and to the Bhikkhu Saṅgha.
I go for refuge to the Blessed One, and to the Dhamma, and to the Bhikkhu Saṅgha.
I go for refuge to the Blessed One, and to the Dhamma, and to the Bhikkhu Saṅgha.
I go for refuge to the Blessed One, and to the Dhamma, and to the Bhikkhu Saṅgha.
I go for refuge to the Blessed One, and to the Dhamma, and to the Bhikkhu Saṅgha.
I had answered, ‘There is a self,’ this would have been siding with those ascetics and brahmins who are eternalists.
I had answered, ‘There is a self,’ would this have been consistent on my part with the arising of the knowledge that ‘all phenomena are nonself’?” 
I had answered, ‘There is no self,’ the wanderer Vacchagotta, already confused, would have fallen into even greater confusion, thinking, ‘It seems that the self I formerly had does not exist now.’” 
I had answered, ‘There is no self,’ this would have been siding with those ascetics and brahmins who are annihilationists.
I had, chariots with golden ornaments and golden banners, covered with nets of golden thread, the chief of which was the chariot Vejayanta.
I had, cities, the chief of which was the capital Kusavati.
I had, couches made of ivory, of heartwood, of gold and silver, decked with long-haired coverlets, embroidered with flowers, with choice spreads made of antelope hides, with red awnings overhead and red cushions at both ends.
I had, cows with tethers of fine jute and milk pails of bronze.
I had, halls with peaked roofs, the chief of which was the hall the Great Array.
I had, koṭis of garments made of fine linen, of fine silk, of fine wool, of fine cotton.
I had, palaces, the chief of which was the palace Dhamma.
I had, plates on which my meals were served both in the morning and in the evening.
I had, steeds with golden ornaments and golden banners, covered with nets of golden thread, the chief of which was the royal steed Valahaka.
I had, vassals of the khattiya caste, the chief of whom was the commander-gem.
I had, women, the chief of whom was Queen Subhadda.
I have a rest house in which there are beds, seats, a waterpot, and an oil lamp.
I have attained supreme purity:
I have clearly seen with wisdom just how far the danger in form extends.
I have clearly seen with wisdom just how far the danger in the earth element extends.
I have clearly seen with wisdom just how far the danger in the eye extends.
I have clearly seen with wisdom just how far the escape from consciousness extends.
I have clearly seen with wisdom just how far the escape from form extends.
I have clearly seen with wisdom just how far the escape from the earth element extends.
I have clearly seen with wisdom just how far the escape from the earth element extends.
I have clearly seen with wisdom just how far the escape from the eye extends.
I have clearly seen with wisdom just how far the escape from the mind extends.
I have clearly seen with wisdom just how far the gratification in form extends.
I have clearly seen with wisdom just how far the gratification in the earth element extends.
I have clearly seen with wisdom just how far the gratification in the eye extends.
I have come after conveying his heirless fortune to the palace, as he died intestate.
I have directly known birth...
I have fallen into captivity, So please be my refuge.”
I have fallen into captivity, So please be my refuge.”
I have made the breakthrough to the Dhamma, venerable sir, and have obtained the path which, when I have developed and cultivated it, will lead me on, while I am dwelling in the appropriate way, to such a state that I shall understand: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’
I have made the breakthrough to the Dhamma.” 
I have said, Ananda, that pleasure and pain are dependently arisen.
I have said, Ananda, that suffering is dependently arisen.
I have seen, bhikkhus, the heaven named ‘Contact’s Sixfold Base.’
I have seen, bhikkhus, the hell named ‘Contact’s Sixfold Base.’
I have spoken of two kinds of feelings by method of exposition; I have spoken of three kinds of feelings by method of exposition; I have spoken of five kinds of feelings … six kinds of feelings … eighteen kinds of feelings … thirty-six kinds of feelings by method of exposition; and I have spoken of one hundred and eight kinds of feelings by method of exposition.
I have spoken of two kinds of feelings by method of exposition; I have spoken of three kinds of feelings by method of exposition; I have spoken of five kinds of feelings … six kinds of feelings … eighteen kinds of feelings … thirty-six kinds of feelings by method of exposition; and I have spoken of one hundred and eight kinds of feelings by method of exposition.
I have taught: ‘This is suffering’; I have taught: ‘This is the origin of suffering’; I have taught: ‘This is the cessation of suffering’; I have taught: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
I have understood thus: ‘There is feeling with wrong view as condition, also feeling with right view as condition….
I have understood thus: ‘There is feeling with wrong view as condition, also feeling with the subsiding of wrong view as condition.
I hope no delight is found in you.
I hope that when you sit all alone
I hope that you venerable ones have learned the teachings well, grasped them well, attended to them well, reflected on them well, and penetrated them well with wisdom, so that when you answer you will state what has been said by the Blessed One and will not misrepresent him with what is contrary to fact; so that you will explain in accordance with the Dhamma, and no reasonable consequence of your assertion would give ground for criticism.” 
I hope that your painful feelings are subsiding and not increasing, and that their subsiding, not their increase, is to be discerned.”
I hope that your painful feelings are subsiding and not increasing, and that their subsiding, not their increase, is to be discerned.”
I hope that your painful feelings are subsiding and not increasing, and that their subsiding, not their increase, is to be discerned.”
I hope that your painful feelings are subsiding and not increasing, and that their subsiding, not their increase, is to be discerned.” 
I hope your painful feelings are subsiding and not increasing, and that their subsiding, not their increase, is to be discerned.”
I hope your painful feelings are subsiding and not increasing, and that their subsiding, not their increase, is to be discerned.”
I hope your painful feelings are subsiding and not increasing, and that their subsiding, not their increase, is to be discerned.”
I hope, venerable sir, that those who say, ‘The ascetic Gotama knows magic,’ state what has been said by the Blessed One and do not misrepresent him with what is contrary to fact; that they explain in accordance with the Dhamma, and that no reasonable consequence of their assertion gives ground for criticism.
I justify this apparent inconsistency on the ground that in Pali the verb saṅkappeti occurs very rarely, while English lacks a simple verb corresponding to “volition.” “A support for the establishing of consciousness” renders patiṭṭha viññaṇassa.
I keep myself well restrained
I know pleasure and pain, I see pleasure and pain.’
I know pleasure and pain, I see pleasure and pain.”
I know suffering, I see suffering.”
I know this, I see this: how these five faculties, when developed and cultivated, have the Deathless as their ground, the Deathless as their destination, the Deathless as their final goal.”
I know, O Brahma, your life span to be
I know: ‘Experiencing the whole body I will breathe in.’… I know: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe out.’ 
I lie down full of compassion for all beings.
I meditate taintless, O kinsman of the negligent!”
I must be insane!
I must be insane!
I myself will enter upon the rains right here in Beluvagamaka.”
I never become angry for long, Nor does anger persist in me.
I offer them right back to you, For I, O Mara, do not need them.
I part with the commentaries on the meaning of c’, which I take to represent ca; the syntax of the phrase as a whole clearly requires this.
I rarely get to see the Blessed One and the bhikkhus worthy of esteem.
I read the last word with Se and Ee as nanu savanti, as against Be nanusenti.
I read with Se and Ee: yattha cakkhuñ ca nirujjhati rūpasañña ca virajjati.
I regard the ear, ear-consciousness, and things cognizable with ear-consciousness thus…I regard the mind, mind-consciousness, and things cognizable with mind-consciousness thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’”
I remember the cessation of suffering as the third noble truth taught by the Blessed One.
I remember the cessation of suffering as the third noble truth taught by the Blessed One….
I remember the origin of suffering as the second noble truth taught by the Blessed One.
I remember the way leading to the cessation of suffering as the fourth noble truth taught by the Blessed One.
I remember the way leading to the cessation of suffering as the fourth noble truth taught by the Blessed One.
I rise early and send a man, saying, ‘Go, man, and find out how Ciravası̄ is.’
I saw the brahmin Jaṇussoṇi departing from Savatthı̄ in an all-white chariot drawn by mares….
I say that is accompanied by sorrow, anguish, and despair.
I say that is accompanied by sorrow, anguish, and despair.
I say, Ananda, that there is no development of concentration by mindfulness of breathing for one who is muddled and who lacks clear comprehension.
I say, Ananda, that there is no development of concentration by mindfulness of breathing for one who is muddled and who lacks clear comprehension.
I seek almsfood righteously and, having sought it, I eat my almsfood righteously.” 
I should not be approached by anyone except the one who brings me almsfood.’
I should not be approached by anyone except the one who brings me almsfood.”
I should not be approached by anyone except the one who brings me almsfood.”
I should not be approached by anyone except the one who brings me almsfood.” 
I should not be approached by anyone except the one who brings me almsfood.” 
I supported my mother and father then
I take itthattaya as a dative meaning “for this state of being,” i.e., for existence in any state of being, so that the phrase conveys the same sense as the alternative “roar of liberation,” natthi dani punabbhavo, “Now there is no renewed existence”, etc.).
I teach them the Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; I reveal the holy life that is perfectly complete and pure.
I teach them the Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; I reveal the holy life that is perfectly complete and pure.
I too will worship them—
I too will worship them—
I too will worship them—
I too, bhikkhus, will go to Senanigama in Uruvela in order to teach the Dhamma.” 
I translate, however, in compliance with natural English idiom rather than in strict conformity with the syntax of the Pali.
I understand a mind with lust as a mind with lust … an unliberated mind as an unliberated mind.”
I understand a mind with lust as a mind with lust; a mind without lust as a mind without lust; a mind with hatred as a mind with hatred; a mind without hatred as a mind without hatred; a mind with delusion as a mind with delusion; a mind without delusion as a mind without delusion; a contracted mind as contracted and a distracted mind as distracted; an exalted mind as exalted and an unexalted mind as unexalted; a surpassable mind as surpassable and an unsurpassable mind as unsurpassable; a concentrated mind as concentrated and an unconcentrated mind as unconcentrated; a liberated mind as liberated and an unliberated mind as unliberated.
I understand magic, headman, and the result of magic, and I understand how a magician, faring along, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in a state of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell.
I understand the meaning of this synopsis in detail to be thus.
I understand the “unestablished consciousness” here to mean a consciousness without the prospect of a future rebirth through the propulsive power of ignorance, craving, and the volitional formations.
I understand this Dhamma and Discipline.
I understand this Dhamma and Discipline.
I use “volition” as a rendering for cetana but “intends” for the corresponding verb ceteti; I use “intention” for the unrelated noun saṅkappa.
I was your fellow villager, In the past I was your friend.
I will ask the Venerable Narada that series of questions, and let him answer me.”
I will be one who possesses confirmed confidence in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.… I will be one who possesses the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken … leading to concentration.’
I will be zealous in providing him with robes, almsfood, lodging, and medicinal requisites.”
I will be zealous in providing Master Isidatta with robes, almsfood, lodgings, and medicinal requisites.”
I will be zealous in providing Master Mahaka with robes, almsfood, lodgings, and medicinal requisites.”
I will dwell contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.’
I will dwell there.”
I will give you a simile for this, since some wise people here understand the meaning of a statement by means of a simile.
I will go and see the Blessed One early tomorrow morning.”
I will see to it that the Blessed One gets alms.” 
I will so strive that the five aggregates will be terminated, so that the world presented by them will be terminated.”
I will speak to you on the Dhamma.”
I will speak.”
I will teach you the far shore … the subtle … the very difficult to see … the unaging … … the stable … the undisintegrating … the unmanifest … the unproliferated … the peaceful … the deathless … the sublime … the auspicious … … the secure ….
I will teach you the superior person and the one who is better than the superior person.
I will then present you daily with a hundred kahapaṇas as a perpetual grant.” 
I will use the knife, friend Sariputta, I have no desire to live.”
I wish to listen to the Dhamma
I worship the Kinsman of the Sun, Destroyer of the dart of craving.”
I worship your feet, One with Vision, Who has overcome all enmity and fear.
I, dear sir, am Sakka, lord of the devas!’ To whatever extent Sakka announced his name, to the same extent that yakkha became uglier and uglier and more and more deformed until he disappeared right there.
Iddhi, from the verb ijjhati—to prosper, to succeed, to flourish—originally meant success, but by the time of the Buddha it had already acquired the special nuance of spiritual success or, even more to the point, spiritual power.
Identity view, doubt, the distorted grasp of rules and vows, sensual desire, ill will.
If a bhikkhu does not seek delight in them … delight ceases.
If a bhikkhu does not seek delight in them … he is called a lone dweller.
If a bhikkhu does not seek delight in them … the Evil One cannot do with him as he wishes.”
If a bhikkhu does not seek delight in them … the Evil One cannot do with him as he wishes.”
If a bhikkhu does not seek delight in them … the Evil One cannot do with him as he wishes.”
If a bhikkhu does not seek delight in them, does not welcome them, and does not remain holding to them, delight ceases in him.
If a bhikkhu does not seek delight in them, does not welcome them, and does not remain holding to them, delight ceases.
If a bhikkhu does not seek delight in them, does not welcome them, and does not remain holding to them, delight ceases.
If a bhikkhu does not seek delight in them, does not welcome them, and does not remain holding to them, he is called a bhikkhu who has not entered Mara’s lair, who has not come under Mara’s control; Mara’s snare has been unfastened from him so that he is not bound by the bondage of Mara and the Evil One cannot do with him as he wishes.
If a bhikkhu does not seek delight in them, does not welcome them, and does not remain holding to them, he is called a bhikkhu who has not swallowed Mara’s hook, who has broken the hook, demolished the hook.
If a bhikkhu does not seek delight in them, does not welcome them, and does not remain holding to them, he is called a bhikkhu who is free among forms cognizable by the eye, who has not entered Mara’s lair, who has not come under Mara’s control; and the Evil One cannot do with him as he wishes.
If a bhikkhu does not seek delight in them, does not welcome them, and does not remain holding to them, he should understand this thus: ‘I am not declining away from wholesome states.
If a bhikkhu does not seek delight in them, does not welcome them, and does not remain holding to them, he should understand this thus: ‘I am not declining away from wholesome states.
If a bhikkhu does not seek delight in them, does not welcome them, and does not remain holding to them, his consciousness does not become dependent upon them or cling to them.
If a bhikkhu is practising for the purpose of revulsion towards aging-and-death, for its fading away and cessation, he can be called a bhikkhu who is practising in accordance with the Dhamma.
If a bhikkhu is practising for the purpose of revulsion towards ignorance, for its fading away and cessation, he can be called a bhikkhu who is practising in accordance with the Dhamma.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them … he is called one dwelling with a partner.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them … the Evil One can do with him as he wishes.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them … the Evil One can do with him as he wishes.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them, welcomes them, and remains holding to them, delight arises in him.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them, welcomes them, and remains holding to them, delight arises in him.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them, welcomes them, and remains holding to them, delight arises.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them, welcomes them, and remains holding to them, delight arises.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them, welcomes them, and remains holding to them, he is called a bhikkhu who has entered Mara’s lair, who has come under Mara’s control; Mara’s snare has been fastened to him so that he is bound by the bondage of Mara and the Evil One can do with him as he wishes.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them, welcomes them, and remains holding to them, he is called a bhikkhu who has swallowed Mara’s hook.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them, welcomes them, and remains holding to them, he is called a bhikkhu who is bound among forms cognizable by the eye, who has entered Mara’s lair, who has come under Mara’s control;  and the Evil One can do with him as he wishes.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them, welcomes them, and remains holding to them, he should understand this thus: ‘I am declining away from wholesome states.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them, welcomes them, and remains holding to them, he should understand this thus: ‘I am declining away from wholesome states.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them, welcomes them, and remains holding to them, his consciousness becomes dependent upon them and clings to them.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them, welcomes them, and remains holding to them, his consciousness becomes dependent upon them and clings to them.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them, … delight arises.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them...
If a bhikkhu wishes: ‘Avoiding both the unrepulsive and the repulsive, may I dwell equanimous, mindful and clearly comprehending,’ this same concentration by mindfulness of breathing should be closely attended to.
If a bhikkhu wishes: ‘May I dwell perceiving the repulsive in the unrepulsive and the repulsive,’ this same concentration by mindfulness of breathing should be closely attended to.
If a bhikkhu wishes: ‘May I dwell perceiving the unrepulsive in the repulsive and the unrepulsive,’ this same concentration by mindfulness of breathing should be closely attended to.
If a bhikkhu wishes: ‘May I dwell perceiving the unrepulsive in the repulsive,’ this same concentration by mindfulness of breathing should be closely attended to.
If a bird goes up there, the gale winds fling it about, and as it is flung about by the gale winds, its feet go one way, its wings another way, its head still another way, and its body still another way.
If a bull fond of barley enters the barley field, he might indulge himself as much as he likes.
If a bull fond of barley enters the barley field, the watchman would catch hold of him firmly by the muzzle.
If a cart or chariot comes from the east, west, north, or south, it would flatten that mound of soil.
If a man approaches it from the east with a blazing grass torch, or from the west, from the north, from the south, from below, or from above, whichever way he approaches it the fire fails to gain access to it, the fire fails to get a hold on it.
If a man approaches it from the east with a blazing grass torch, or from the west, from the north, from the south, from below, or from above, whichever way he approaches it the fire gains access to it, the fire gets a hold on it.
If a man being carried along by the current should grasp the kasa grass, it would break off and he would thereby meet with calamity and disaster; if he should grasp the kusa grass, it would break off and he would thereby meet with calamity and disaster; if he should grasp the rushes, reeds, or trees, they would break off and he would thereby meet with calamity and disaster.
If a man breaks it here and there with a sharp axe, would sap come out?”
If a man breaks it here and there with a sharp axe, would sap come out?” 
If a man pursuing a lizard has seen it enter a pit, he would descend, dig up the place where it entered, catch it, and depart; he wouldn’t dig up some other place where the lizard can’t be found.
If a man with good sight were to examine his own facial reflection in it, he would know and see it as it really is.
If a man with good sight were to examine his own facial reflection in it, he would know and see it as it really is.
If a man with good sight were to examine his own facial reflection in it, he would know and see it as it really is.
If a man with good sight were to examine his own facial reflection in it, he would know and see it as it really is.
If a man with good sight were to examine his own facial reflection in it, he would know and see it as it really is.
If a man with good sight were to examine his own facial reflection in it, he would neither know nor see it as it really is.
If a man with good sight were to examine his own facial reflection in it, he would neither know nor see it as it really is.
If a man with good sight were to examine his own facial reflection in it, he would neither know nor see it as it really is.
If a man with good sight were to examine his own facial reflection in it, he would neither know nor see it as it really is.
If a man with good sight were to examine his own facial reflection in it, he would neither know nor see it as it really is.
If anyone carrying around this body were to claim to be healthy even for a moment, what is that due to other than foolishness?
If by a prize village I could have redeemed her from death...
If by means of the country I could have redeemed her from death, I would have given away even the country so that she would not have died.”
If by means of the horse-gem I could have redeemed her from death...
If Ciravası̄ were to be executed, imprisoned, fined, or censured, would sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair arise in you?”
If Ciravası̄’s mother were to be executed, imprisoned, fined, or censured, would sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair arise in you?” 
If gold and silver are allowable for anyone, the five cords of sensual pleasure are allowable for him.
If he does not abandon that assertion and that state of mind, and if he does not relinquish that view, then according to his deserts he will be, as it were, dropped off in hell.
If he does not abandon that assertion … he will be, as it were, dropped off in hell.
If he does not abandon that assertion … he will be, as it were, dropped off in hell.
If he does not abandon that assertion … he will be, as it were, dropped off in hell.
If he does not get a robe he is not agitated, and if he gets one he uses it without being tied to it, uninfatuated with it, not blindly absorbed in it, seeing the danger in it, understanding the escape.
If he does not quickly extinguish it with his hands and feet, the creatures living in the grass and wood will meet with calamity and disaster.
If he examines them by way of the ear...
If he feels a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he feels it attached.
If he feels a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he feels it detached.
If he feels a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he understands: ‘It is impermanent’; he understands: ‘It is not held to’; he understands: ‘It is not delighted in.’
If he feels a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he understands: ‘It is impermanent’; he understands: ‘It is not held to’; he understands: ‘It is not delighted in.’
If he feels a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he understands: ‘It is impermanent’; he understands: ‘It is not held to’; he understands: ‘It is not delighted in.’
If he feels a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he understands: ‘It is impermanent’; he understands: ‘It is not held to’; he understands: ‘It is not delighted in.’
If he feels a painful feeling, he feels it attached.
If he feels a painful feeling, he feels it detached.
If he feels a painful feeling, he understands: ‘It is impermanent’; he understands: ‘It is not held to’; he understands: ‘It is not delighted in.’
If he feels a painful feeling, he understands: ‘It is impermanent’; he understands: ‘It is not held to’; he understands: ‘It is not delighted in.’
If he feels a painful feeling, he understands: ‘It is impermanent’; he understands: ‘It is not held to’; he understands: ‘It is not delighted in.’
If he feels a painful feeling, he understands: ‘It is impermanent’; he understands: ‘It is not held to’; he understands: ‘It is not delighted in.’
If he has abandoned lust for the feeling element … for the perception element … for the volitional formations element … for the consciousness element, with the abandoning of lust the basis is cut off: there is no support for the establishing of consciousness.
If he has abandoned lust for the feeling element … for the perception element … for the volitional formations element … for the consciousness element, with the abandoning of lust the basis is cut off: there is no support for the establishing of consciousness.
If he has abandoned lust for the feeling element … for the perception element … for the volitional formations element … for the consciousness element, with the abandoning of lust the basis is cut off: there is no support for the establishing of consciousness.
If he lies down, he lies down close to those five aggregates subject to clinging.
If he quickly extinguishes it with his hands and feet, the creatures living in the grass and wood will not meet with calamity and disaster.
If he says: ‘I am,’ he should be told: ‘But, good sir, you are subject to death.
If he says: ‘I am,’ he should be told: ‘But, good sir, you are subject to death.
If he says: ‘I am,’ he should be told: ‘Celestial sensual pleasures, friend, are more excellent and sublime than human sensual pleasures.
If he should wish: “May I become a wheel-turning monarch in the future!”—as he is virtuous, this wish of his would succeed because of its purity.
If he sits down, he sits down close to those five aggregates subject to clinging.
If he so wished, the Tathagata could live on for the aeon or for the remainder of the aeon.”
If he so wished, the Tathagata could live on for the aeon or for the remainder of the aeon.” 
If he stands, he stands close to those five aggregates subject to clinging.
If he throws dry grass, dry cowdung, and dry timber into it, blows on it, and does not scatter soil over it, would he be able to extinguish that great bonfire?”
If he throws dry grass, dry cowdung, and dry timber into it, blows on it, and does not scatter soil over it, would he be able to make that small fire flare up?”
If he throws wet grass, wet cowdung, and wet timber into it, sprays it with water, and scatters soil over it, would he be able to extinguish that great bonfire?”
If he throws wet grass, wet cowdung, and wet timber into it, sprays it with water, and scatters soil over it, would he be able to make that small fire flare up?”
If he walks, he walks close to those five aggregates subject to clinging.
If he was questioned he would not be able to reply and, further, he would meet with vexation.
If he were questioned he would not be able to reply and, further, he would meet with vexation.
If he were to question me about this matter with various terms and with various methods for a whole night, for a day and night, for two days and nights, for three, four, five, six, or seven days and nights—for seven days and nights I would be able to answer him with various terms and with various methods.’”
If he wishes: ‘Avoiding both the unrepulsive and the repulsive, may I dwell equanimously, mindful and clearly comprehending,’ then he dwells therein equanimously, mindful and clearly comprehending.
If he wishes: ‘Avoiding both the unrepulsive and the repulsive, may I dwell equanimously, mindful and clearly comprehending,’ then he dwells therein equanimously, mindful and clearly comprehending.
If he wishes: ‘Avoiding both the unrepulsive and the repulsive, may I dwell equanimously, mindful and clearly comprehending,’ then he dwells therein equanimously, mindful and clearly comprehending.
If he wishes: ‘Avoiding both the unrepulsive and the repulsive, may I dwell equanimously, mindful and clearly comprehending,’ then he dwells therein equanimously, mindful and clearly comprehending.
If he wishes: ‘Avoiding both the unrepulsive and the repulsive, may I dwell equanimously, mindful and clearly comprehending,’ then he dwells therein equanimously, mindful and clearly comprehending.
If he wishes: ‘Avoiding both the unrepulsive and the repulsive, may I dwell equanimously, mindful and clearly comprehending,’ then he dwells therein equanimously, mindful and clearly comprehending.
If he wishes: ‘Avoiding both the unrepulsive and the repulsive, may I dwell equanimously, mindful and clearly comprehending,’ then he dwells therein equanimously, mindful and clearly comprehending.
If he wishes: ‘May I dwell perceiving the repulsive in the unrepulsive and in the repulsive,’ he dwells perceiving the repulsive therein.
If he wishes: ‘May I dwell perceiving the repulsive in the unrepulsive,’ he dwells perceiving the repulsive therein….
If he wishes: ‘May I dwell perceiving the repulsive in the unrepulsive,’ he dwells perceiving the repulsive therein….
If he wishes: ‘May I dwell perceiving the repulsive in the unrepulsive,’ he dwells perceiving the repulsive therein….
If he wishes: ‘May I dwell perceiving the unrepulsive in the repulsive and in the unrepulsive,’ he dwells perceiving the unrepulsive therein.
If he wishes: ‘May I dwell perceiving the unrepulsive in the repulsive,’ he dwells perceiving the unrepulsive therein.
If his mind has become dispassionate towards the feeling element … towards the perception element … towards the volitional formations element … towards the consciousness element, it is liberated from the taints by nonclinging.
If I should ever see the Fortunate One, it is the Blessed One himself that I would see.
If I should ever see the Perfectly Enlightened One, it is the Blessed One himself that I would see.’
If I should say, ‘One consumes,’ in that case this would be a valid question: ‘Venerable sir, who consumes?’
If I should say, ‘One craves,’ in that case this would be a valid question: ‘Venerable sir, who craves?’
If I should say, ‘One feels,’ in that case this would be a valid question: ‘Venerable sir, who feels?’
If I should say, ‘One makes contact,’ in that case this would be a valid question: ‘Venerable sir, who makes contact?’
If I stumble I still stand firm.” 
If I were to seek delight in future consciousness, then in the future too I shall be devoured by consciousness in the very same way that I am now being devoured by present consciousness.’
If I were to seek delight in future form, then in the future too I shall be devoured by form in the very same way that I am now being devoured by present form.’
If I were to teach the Dhamma and if others would not understand me, that would be wearisome for me, that would be troublesome.”
If it abates in me, I understand, ‘It has abated in me for a particular reason.’ …
If it lies down, it lies down close to that post or pillar.
If it sits down, it sits down close to that post or pillar.
If it stands, it stands close to that post or pillar.
If it walks, it walks close to that post or pillar.
If it was cut down at its foot, in what direction would it fall?”
If it were cut at its foot, in what direction would it fall?” 
If lack of faith does not persist, Fame and renown thereby come to him, And he goes to heaven on leaving the body.”
If Mara approaches him through the ear … through the mind, Mara fails to gain access to him, Mara fails to get a hold on him.
If Mara approaches him through the ear … through the mind, Mara gains access to him, Mara gets a hold on him.
If no one would keep them in check.
If no one would keep them in check.
If on either bank of the river kasa grass or kusa grass were to grow, it would overhang it; if rushes, reeds, or trees were to grow, they would overhang it.
If one does not attain final knowledge early in this very life, or at the time of death, then with the utter destruction of the five lower fetters one becomes an attainer of Nibbana in the interval … an attainer of Nibbana upon landing … an attainer of Nibbana without exertion … an attainer of Nibbana with exertion … one bound upstream, heading towards the Akaniṭṭha realm.
If one does not attain final knowledge early in this very life, or at the time of death, then with the utter destruction of the five lower fetters one becomes an attainer of Nibbana within the interval … an attainer of Nibbana upon landing … an attainer of Nibbana without exertion … an attainer of Nibbana with exertion … one bound upstream, heading towards the Akaniṭṭha realm.
If one does not attain final knowledge early in this very life, then one attains final knowledge at the time of death.
If one does not attain final knowledge early in this very life, then one attains final knowledge at the time of death.
If one does not have an underlying tendency towards feeling … towards perception … towards volitional formations … towards consciousness, then one is not measured in accordance with it; if one is not measured in accordance with it, then one is not reckoned in terms of it.
If one does not have an underlying tendency towards feeling … towards perception … towards volitional formations … towards consciousness, then one is not reckoned in terms of it.
If one does not have an underlying tendency towards something, then one is not measured in accordance with it; if one is not measured in accordance with something, then one is not reckoned in terms of it.”
If one does not have an underlying tendency towards something, then one is not reckoned in terms of it.”
If one does not rein in one’s mind?
If one dwells with restraint over the eye faculty, the mind is not soiled among forms cognizable by the eye.
If one dwells with restraint over the mind faculty, the mind is not soiled among mental phenomena cognizable by the mind….
If one dwells without restraint over the mind faculty, the mind is soiled among mental phenomena cognizable by the mind….
If one has an underlying tendency towards consciousness, then one is reckoned in terms of it.
If one has an underlying tendency towards feeling … towards perception … towards volitional formations … towards consciousness, then one is measured in accordance with it; if one is measured in accordance with it, then one is reckoned in terms of it.
If one has an underlying tendency towards feeling, then one is reckoned in terms of it.
If one has an underlying tendency towards perception, then one is reckoned in terms of it.
If one has an underlying tendency towards volitional formations, then one is reckoned in terms of them.
If one has taken up a domestic practice, One still has not become a bhikkhu.
If one is devoid of lust for feeling … for perception … for volitional formations … for consciousness, devoid of desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for it, then with the change and alteration of that consciousness, do sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair arise within?”
If one is devoid of lust for form, devoid of desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for it, then with the change and alteration of that form, do sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair arise within?”
If one is devoid of lust, desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving in regard to feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, then with the change and alteration of consciousness sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair do not arise in one.
If one is diligent and astute.
If one is not devoid of lust for feeling … for perception … for volitional formations … for consciousness, not devoid of desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for it, then with the change and alteration of that consciousness, do sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair arise within?”
If one is practising for the purpose of revulsion towards aging-and-death, for its fading away and cessation, one is fit to be called a bhikkhu who is practising in accordance with the Dhamma.
If one is practising for the purpose of revulsion towards consciousness, for its fading away and cessation, one can be called a bhikkhu who is practising in accordance with the Dhamma.
If one is practising for the purpose of revulsion towards form, for its fading away and cessation, one can be called a bhikkhu who is practising in accordance with the Dhamma.
If one is practising for the purpose of revulsion towards ignorance, for its fading away and cessation, one is fit to be called a bhikkhu who is practising in accordance with the Dhamma.
If one is practising for the purpose of revulsion towards the eye, for its fading away and cessation, one can be called a bhikkhu who is practising in accordance with the Dhamma.
If one is practising for the purpose of revulsion towards the mind, for its fading away and cessation, one can be called a bhikkhu who is practising in accordance with the Dhamma.
If one is rotten within and defiled, Supporting oneself by fraudulent means.
If one is rotten within and defiled, With followers gained by fraudulent means.
If one seeks delight even in this, One is still not released from suffering.
If one were to go along the north bank of the Ganges giving gifts and making others give gifts, making offerings and making others make offerings, because of this there would be merit and an outcome of merit.
If one were to go along the north bank of the Ganges giving gifts and making others give gifts, making offerings and making others make offerings, because of this there would be no merit and no outcome of merit.
If one were to go along the south bank of the Ganges killing and slaughtering, mutilating and making others mutilate, torturing and making others inflict torture, because of this there would be evil and an outcome of evil.
If one were to go along the south bank of the Ganges killing and slaughtering, mutilating and making others mutilate, torturing and making others inflict torture, because of this there would be no evil and no outcome of evil.
If one were to say of anything ‘a heap of the unwholesome,’ it is about these five hindrances that one could rightly say this.
If one were to say of anything ‘a heap of the wholesome,’ it is about these four establishments of mindfulness that one could rightly say this.
If one were to speak thus one would be stating what has been said by me and would not misrepresent me with what is contrary to fact; one would explain in accordance with the Dhamma, and no reasonable consequence of one’s assertion would give ground for criticism.
If one were to speak thus one would be stating what has been said by me and would not misrepresent me with what is contrary to fact; one would explain in accordance with the Dhamma, and no reasonable consequence of one’s assertion would give ground for criticism.
If one were to speak thus one would be stating what has been said by me and would not misrepresent me with what is contrary to fact; one would explain in accordance with the Dhamma, and no reasonable consequence of one’s assertion would give ground for criticism.
If one were to speak thus one would be stating what has been said by the Blessed One and would not misrepresent him with what is contrary to fact; one would explain in accordance with the Dhamma, and no reasonable consequence of one’s assertion would give ground for criticism.
If one were to speak thus one would be stating what has been said by the Blessed One and would not misrepresent him with what is contrary to fact; one would explain in accordance with the Dhamma, and no reasonable consequence of one’s assertion would give ground for criticism.
If one where to go along the north bank of the Ganges giving gifts and making others give gifts, making offerings and making others make offerings, because of this there would be no merit and no outcome of merit.
If one where to go along the south bank of the Ganges killing and slaughtering, mutilating and making others mutilate, torturing and making others inflict torture, because of this there would be no evil and no outcome of evil.
If one with faith gives even a little, He thereby becomes happy in the other world.” 
If others then slay him and finish him off while he is striving and exerting himself in battle, then with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the ‘Battle-Slain Hell.’
If she stands exposed to a tree, the creatures dwelling in the tree would nibble at her.
If she stands exposed to a wall, the creatures dwelling in the wall would nibble at her.
If she stands exposed to the open air, the creatures dwelling in the open air would nibble at her.
If she stands exposed to water, the creatures dwelling in the water would nibble at her.
If that farmer wishes to sow seed, where would he sow it first: in the excellent field, in the field of middling quality, or in the field that was inferior, the one that was rough, salty, with bad ground?”
If that man wants to store water, where would he store it first: in the waterpot that is without cracks, which does not let water seep through and escape; or in the waterpot that is without cracks, but which lets water seep through and escape; or in the waterpot that has cracks, which lets water seep through and escape?”
If that uninstructed worldling sets his mind upon future renewed existence, then that senseless man is struck even still more thoroughly, just like the sheaf of barley struck by the seventh flail.
If the ascetic Gotama addresses me, then I will address him in turn.
If the bhikkhu does not tolerate them, but abandons them, dispels them, puts an end to them, and obliterates them, he should understand this thus: ‘I am not declining away from wholesome states.
If the bhikkhu does not tolerate them, but abandons them, dispels them, puts on end to them, and obliterates them, he should understand this thus: ‘I am not declining away from wholesome states.
If the bhikkhu tolerates them and does not abandon them, dispel them, put an end to them, and obliterate them, he should understand this thus: ‘I am declining away from wholesome states.
If the bhikkhu tolerates them and does not abandon them, dispel them, put an end to them, and obliterate them, he should understand this thus: ‘I am declining away from wholesome states.
If the Blessed One had lived for a long time, that would have been for the welfare and happiness of the multitude, out of compassion for the world, for the good, welfare, and happiness of devas and humans.’” 
If the five cords of sensual pleasure are allowable for anyone, you can definitely consider him to be one who does not have the character of an ascetic or of a follower of the Sakyan son.
If the mind is not soiled, gladness is born.
If the mind were the fetter of mental phenomena or if mental phenomena were the fetter of the mind, this living of the holy life could not be discerned for the complete destruction of suffering.
If the Venerable Channa lacks suitable food, I will go in search of suitable food for him; if he lacks suitable medicine, I will go in search of suitable medicine for him; if he lacks a proper attendant, I will attend on him.
If the Venerable Khemaka does not regard anything among these five aggregates subject to clinging as self or as belonging to self, then he is an arahant, one whose taints are destroyed.’”
If the word of this good teacher is true, for me it yet counts as incontrovertible  that I do not oppress anyone whether frail or firm.
If the word of this good teacher is true, for me it yet counts as incontrovertible that I do not oppress anyone whether frail or firm.
If the word of this good teacher is true, for me it yet counts as incontrovertible that I do not oppress anyone whether frail or firm.
If the word of this good teacher is true, for me it yet counts as incontrovertible that I do not oppress anyone whether frail or firm.
If the word of this good teacher is true, for me it yet counts as incontrovertible that I do not oppress anyone whether frail or firm.
If there exists release from fear, Being asked, please declare it to me.” 
If there is any hot water, brahmin, Please give it for the Sage.
If there is the view, ‘The soul and the body are the same,’ there is no living of the holy life; and if there is the view, ‘The soul is one thing, the body is another,’ there is no living of the holy life.
If there is the view, ‘The soul and the body are the same,’ there is no living of the holy life; and if there is the view, ‘The soul is one thing, the body is another,’ there is no living of the holy life.
If there was this much consciousness … But because there is not even this much consciousness that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, this living of the holy life for the complete destruction of suffering is discerned.
If there was this much form that was permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, this living of the holy life for the complete destruction of suffering could not be discerned.
If there was this much individual existence that was permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, this living of the holy life for the complete destruction of suffering could not be discerned.
If there were no danger in form, beings would not experience revulsion towards it; but because there is danger in form, beings experience revulsion towards it.
If there were no danger in the earth element, beings would not experience revulsion towards it; but because there is danger in the earth element, beings experience revulsion towards it.
If there were no danger in the eye, beings would not experience revulsion towards it; but because there is danger in the eye, beings experience revulsion towards it.
If there were no escape from form, beings would not escape from it; but because there is an escape from form, beings escape from it.
If there were no escape from the earth element, beings would not escape from it; but because there is an escape from the earth element, beings escape from it.
If there were no escape from the eye, beings would not escape from it; but because there is an escape from the eye, beings escape from it.
If these five kinds of seeds are unbroken, unspoilt, undamaged by wind and sun, fertile, securely planted, but there is no earth or water, would these five kinds of seeds come to growth, increase, and expansion?”
If they abuse and revile you, what will you think about that?”
If they are weaker than that, one is a nonreturner; if still weaker, a once-returner; if still weaker, a stream-enterer; if still weaker, a Dhamma-follower; if still weaker, a faith-follower.” 
If they are weaker than that, one is a nonreturner… a once-returner… a stream-enterer… a Dhamma-follower … a faith-follower.
If they are weaker than that, one is an attainer of Nibbana in the interval … … if still weaker, a faith-follower.
If they are weaker than that, one is an attainer of Nibbana in the interval … … if still weaker, a faith-follower.
If they are weaker than that, one is an attainer of Nibbana in the interval; if still weaker, an attainer of Nibbana upon landing; if still weaker, an attainer of Nibbana without exertion; if still weaker, an attainer of Nibbana with exertion; if still weaker, one who is bound upstream, heading towards the Akaniṭṭha realm; if still weaker, a once-returner; if still weaker, a one-seeder; if still weaker, a clan-to-clanner; if still weaker, a seven-lives-at-moster; if still weaker, a Dhamma-follower; if still weaker, a faith-follower.” 
If they are weaker than that, one is an attainer of Nibbana in the interval; if still weaker, an attainer of Nibbana upon landing; if still weaker, an attainer of Nibbana without exertion; if still weaker, an attainer of Nibbana with exertion; if still weaker, one who is bound upstream, heading towards the Akaniṭṭha realm; if still weaker, a once-returner; if still weaker, a stream-enterer; if still weaker, a Dhamma-follower; if still weaker, a faith-follower.” 
If they are weaker than that, one is practising for the realization of the fruit of arahantship; if still weaker, one is a nonreturner; if still weaker, one is practising for the realization of the fruit of nonreturning; if still weaker, one is a once-returner; if still weaker, one is practising for the realization of the fruit of once-returning; if still weaker, one is a stream-enterer; if still weaker, one is practising for the realization of the fruit of stream-entry.
If they are weaker than that, one is… a faith-follower.
If they do not see me there may take place in them some alteration or change.
If they do not see me there may take place in them some alteration or change.
If they do not see me there may take place in them some alteration or change.
if they give casually rather than considerately, he does not thereby become hurt; he does not on that account experience pain and displeasure.
If they give little rather than much...
If they give shabby things rather than fine things...
If they give slowly rather than promptly … If they give casually rather than considerately, he thereby becomes hurt; on that account he experiences pain and displeasure.
If this verse seems narrowly monastic in focus, its counterpart Th - corrects the imbalance by mentioning all four classes of disciples: Indeed, for the good of many
If through revulsion towards aging-and-death, through its fading away and cessation, a bhikkhu is liberated by nonclinging, he can be called a bhikkhu who has attained Nibbana in this very life.
If through revulsion towards ignorance, through its fading away and cessation, a bhikkhu is liberated by nonclinging, he can be called a bhikkhu who has attained Nibbana in this very life.”
If today we practise good conduct of body, speech, and mind, then with the breakup of the body, after death, we shall be reborn in a happy destination, in a heavenly world.
If we accept this reading, then the first “it” can be taken to refer to the personal five aggregates, the second to the world apprehended through the aggregates.
If we do not get a robe we will not be agitated, and if we get one we will use it without being tied to it, uninfatuated with it, not blindly absorbed in it, seeing the danger in it, understanding the escape.
If we had stayed in our own resort today, in our own ancestral domain, this hawk wouldn’t have stood a chance against me in a fight.’ - ‘But what is your own resort, quail, what is your own ancestral domain?’ - ‘The freshly ploughed field covered with clods of soil.’ 
If you cannot look up at the crest of the deva-king Varuṇa’s standard, then you should look up at the crest of the deva-king Isana’s standard….
If you drink it, it will gratify you with its colour, aroma, and taste, but by drinking it you will meet death or deadly suffering.’
If you drink it, it will gratify you with its colour, aroma, and taste, but by drinking it you will meet death or deadly suffering.’
If you had asked me the meaning of this, I would have explained it to you in the same way that it has been explained by Ananda.
If you had asked me the meaning of this, I would have explained it to you in the same way that it has been explained by Ananda.
If you should do an evil deed, Or if you are doing one now, You won’t be free from suffering
If you were to obtain concentration of mind in that, then you might abandon that state of perplexity.”
If you were to obtain concentration of mind in that, you might abandon that state of perplexity.
If you were to obtain concentration of mind in that, you might abandon that state of perplexity.
If you were to obtain concentration of mind in that, you might abandon that state of perplexity.
If you were to obtain concentration of mind in that, you might abandon that state of perplexity.
If you were to obtain concentration of mind in that, you might abandon that state of perplexity.
If you were to obtain concentration of mind in that, you might abandon that state of perplexity.
If you were to obtain concentration of mind in that, you might abandon that state of perplexity.
If you were to obtain concentration of mind in that, you might abandon this state of perplexity.
If you won’t answer me, I’ll drive you insane or I’ll split your heart or I’ll grab you by the feet and hurl you across the Ganges.”
If you won’t answer me, I’ll drive you insane or I’ll split your heart or I’ll grab you by the feet and hurl you across the Ganges.” 
If you would approach him and ask him about this matter, we will come along too in order to hear the Dhamma.”
If your mind exists among these, You won’t escape me, ascetic.”
If your mind exists among these, You won’t escape me, ascetic.”
If you’re a ploughman, answer me:
If, bhikkhu, one has an underlying tendency towards form … … then one is not reckoned in terms of it.
If, bhikkhu, one has an underlying tendency towards form … … then one is not reckoned in terms of it.
If, bhikkhus, a wise, competent, intelligent person examines them by way of the eye, they appear to be void, hollow, empty.
If, bhikkhus, the brahmin Uṇṇabha were to die at this time, there is no fetter bound by which he might again come to this world.” 
If, friends, one is not devoid of lust, desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving in regard to feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, then with the change and alteration of consciousness there arise in one sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
If, great king, such a great peril should arise, such a terrible destruction of human life, the human state being so difficult to obtain, what should be done?”
If, through revulsion towards aging-and-death, through its fading away and cessation, one is liberated by nonclinging, one is fit to be called a bhikkhu who has attained Nibbana in this very life.
If, through revulsion towards consciousness, through its fading away and cessation, one is liberated by nonclinging, one can be called a bhikkhu who has attained Nibbana in this very life.”
If, through revulsion towards form, through its fading away and cessation, one is liberated by nonclinging, one can be called a bhikkhu who has attained Nibbana in this very life.
If, through revulsion towards ignorance, through its fading away and cessation, one is liberated by nonclinging, one is fit to be called a bhikkhu who has attained Nibbana in this very life.”
If, through revulsion towards the eye, through its fading away and cessation, one is liberated by nonclinging, one can be called a bhikkhu who has attained Nibbana in this very life.
If, through revulsion towards the mind, through its fading away and cessation, one is liberated by nonclinging, one can be called a bhikkhu who has attained Nibbana in this very life.” 
If, venerable sir, by means of the elephant-gem I could have redeemed her from death, I would have given away even the elephant-gem so that she would not have died.
If, when he is questioned by you thus, the ascetic Gotama answers, ‘Yes, headman, the Tathagata in many ways praises sympathy for families, the protection of families, compassion for families,’ then you should say to him: ‘Then why, venerable sir, is the Blessed One wandering on tour with a large Saṅgha of bhikkhus at a time of famine, a time of scarcity, when crops are blighted and have turned to straw?
If, with a razor-rimmed wheel, one were to make the living beings of this earth into one mass of flesh, into one heap of flesh, because of this there would be evil and an outcome of evil.
If, with a razor-rimmed wheel, one were to make the living beings of this earth into one mass of flesh, into one heap of flesh, because of this there would be no evil and no outcome of evil.
If, with a razor-rimmed wheel, one were to make the living beings of this earth into one mass of flesh, into one heap of flesh, because of this there would be no evil and no outcome of evil.
Ignorance and craving for existence.
Ignorance excels among things that fall down;
Ill will is an obstruction … Sloth and torpor are an obstruction … Restlessness and remorse are an obstruction … Doubt is an obstruction … a weakener of wisdom.
Ill will … Sloth and torpor...
Illuminating the northern quarter, Having seen form’s flaw, its chronic trembling, The wise one takes no delight in form.” 
Illuminating the northern quarter.” 
Illumines even the brahma world.”
Impermanent are all formations;
Impermanent are all formations;
Impose on him whatever punishment you wish.’
Impose on him whatever punishment you wish.’
In abandoning acquisition they abandoned suffering.
In abandoning craving they abandoned acquisition.
In abandoning craving...
In abandoning craving...
In abandoning craving...
In abandoning suffering they were freed from birth, aging, and death; they were freed from sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair; they were freed from suffering, I say.
In attraction and repulsion.” 
In body, speech, and mind, Do not come under Mara’s control
In both respects I have made a lucky throw: since I am restrained in body, speech, and mind, and since, with the breakup of the body, after death, I shall be reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.’ gladness is born.
In both respects I have made a lucky throw: since I am restrained in body, speech, and mind, and since, with the breakup of the body, after death, I shall be reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.’ gladness is born.
In both respects I have made a lucky throw: since I am restrained in body, speech, and mind, and since, with the breakup of the body, after death, I shall be reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.’ gladness is born.
In both respects I have made a lucky throw: since I am restrained in body, speech, and mind, and since, with the breakup of the body, after death, I shall be reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.’ gladness is born.
In both respects I have made a lucky throw: since I am restrained in body, speech, and mind, and since, with the breakup of the body, after death, I shall be reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.’ gladness is born.
In clinging to feeling … to perception … to volitional formations … to consciousness one is bound by Mara; by not clinging to it one is freed from the Evil One.
In clinging to form, bhikkhu, one is bound by Mara … … by not clinging to it one is freed from the Evil One.
In conceiving feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness one is bound by Mara; by not conceiving it one is freed from the Evil One.
In conceiving form, bhikkhu, one is bound by Mara … … by not conceiving it one is freed from the Evil One.
In conceiving, one is bound by Mara; by not conceiving, one is freed from the Evil One.
In defeat the devas withdrew towards the north while the asuras pursued them.
In dependence on a contact to be experienced as neither-painful-nor-pleasant, a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling arises.
In dependence on a contact to be experienced as painful, a painful feeling arises.
In dependence on an inferior element, Kaccayana, there arises an inferior perception, an inferior view, inferior thought, inferior volition, inferior longing, an inferior wish, an inferior person, inferior speech.
In dependence on the appropriate contacts the corresponding feelings arise; with the cessation of the appropriate contacts the corresponding feelings cease.” 
In dependence on the body and tactile objects...
In dependence on the body and tactile objects...
In dependence on the body element there arises body-contact; in dependence on body-contact there arises feeling born of body-contact.
in dependence on the diversity of passions that there arises the diversity of quests.
In dependence on the ear element there arises ear-contact; in dependence on ear-contact there arises feeling born of ear-contact.
In dependence on the eye and forms, eye-consciousness arises.
In dependence on the eye and forms, eye-consciousness arises.
In dependence on the eye and forms, eye-consciousness arises.
In dependence on the eye and forms, eye-consciousness arises.
In dependence on the eye and forms, eye-consciousness arises.
In dependence on the eye and forms, eye-consciousness arises….
In dependence on the eye element there arises eye-contact; in dependence on eye-contact there arises feeling born of eye-contact.
In dependence on the eye element there arises eye-contact; in dependence on the ear element there arises ear-contact; in dependence on the nose element there arises nose-contact; in dependence on the tongue element there arises tongue-contact; in dependence on the body element there arises body-contact; in dependence on the mind element there arises mind-contact.
in dependence on the mental-phenomena element there arises perception of mental phenomena … in dependence on the quest for mental phenomena there arises the gain of mental phenomena.
In dependence on the mind and mental phenomena, mind-consciousness arises.
In dependence on the mind and mental phenomena, mind-consciousness arises.
In dependence on the mind and mental phenomena, mind-consciousness arises.
In dependence on the mind and mental phenomena, mind-consciousness arises.
In dependence on the mind element there arises mind-contact; in dependence on mind-contact there arises feeling born of mind-contact.
In dependence on the mind element there arises mind-contact; in dependence on mind-contact there arises feeling born of mind-contact.
In dependence on the mind element there arises mind-contact; the mind element does not arise in dependence on mind-contact.
In dependence on the nose and odours … In dependence on the tongue and tastes...
In dependence on the nose and odours...
In dependence on the nose element there arises nose-contact; in dependence on nose-contact there arises feeling born of nose-contact.
In dependence on the tongue and tastes...
In dependence on the tongue element there arises tongue-contact; in dependence on tongue-contact there arises feeling born of tongue-contact.
In diligence.
In doing deeds of merit.
In doing deeds of merit.
In doing so, am I doing my duty?”
In general sutta usage yoniso manasikara is the forerunner of pañña, while pañña is the efficient cause of abhisamaya.
in hell.”
in hell.”
in hell.” 
In his reply the Buddha turns the devata’s expression “one without acquisitions” on its head by using the term as a designation for the arahant, who is free from all four kinds of upadhi and thus completely free from suffering.
In many ways he criticizes and censures the destruction of life, and he says: ‘Abstain from the destruction of life.’
In my case too, venerable sir, no matter what assembly of young devas I have approached, I have often heard this same report: ‘The Venerable Sariputta is wise … one who censures evil.
In my case too, when I enter my harem unguarded in body, speech, and mind, without setting up mindfulness, unrestrained in the sense faculties, on that occasion states of lust assail me forcefully.
In my understanding, sambhavaṁ here does not mean continued existence in saṁsara, the cause of which the Buddha had already ended with his attainment of enlightenment forty-five years earlier.
In nurturing acquisition they are nurturing suffering.
In nurturing acquisition they nurtured suffering.
In nurturing acquisition they will nurture suffering.
In nurturing craving they are nurturing acquisition.
In nurturing craving they nurtured acquisition.
In nurturing craving they will nurture acquisition.
In nurturing craving...
In nurturing suffering they are not freed from birth, aging, and death; they are not freed from sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair; they are not freed from suffering, I say.
In nurturing suffering they were not freed from birth, aging, and death; they were not freed from sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair; they were not freed from suffering, I say.
In nurturing suffering they will not be freed from birth, aging, and death; they will not be freed from sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair; they will not be freed from suffering, I say.
In one day ten bhikkhus used the knife, or in one day twenty or thirty bhikkhus used the knife.
In one day ten bhikkhus used the knife, or in one day twenty or thirty bhikkhus used the knife.
In order to say, ‘Nibbana.’” 
In order to say, ‘Nibbana’?”
In regard to the core of the holy life
In regard to the noble Dhamma, On discarding the human body, Will fill the host of devas.” 
In regard to the other world.”
In seeking delight in feeling … in perception … in volitional formations … in consciousness one is bound by Mara; by not seeking delight in it one is freed from the Evil One.
In seeking delight in form, bhikkhu, one is bound by Mara … … by not seeking delight in it one is freed from the Evil One.
In six it forms intimacy;
In such a case, great king, that water, being used properly, would go to utilization, not to waste.
In such a case, great king, that water, not being used properly, would go to waste, not to utilization.
In such a way the Blessed One was cured of his illness.
In such a way the Venerable Mahakassapa was cured of his illness.
In that battle King Ajatasattu defeated King Pasenadi, and King Pasenadi, defeated, retreated to his own capital of Savatthi.
In that battle King Pasenadi defeated King Ajatasattu and captured him alive.
In that battle the asuras won and the devas were defeated.
In that battle the devas won and the asuras were defeated.
In that Deathless declared by you.
In that enmity I do not delight, Thus I pardon your transgression.”
In that they praise the timid, not the brave, For out of fear the good do no evil.”
In that way a lay follower is accomplished in faith.”
In that way a lay follower is accomplished in generosity.”
In that way a lay follower is accomplished in wisdom.” 
In the Abhidhamma Piṭaka, the Bojjhaṅga-vibhaṅga first explains the enlightenment factors by the sutta method in three ways modelled on:,:, and the bare vivekanissita formula, respectively.
In the additional rider, “what exists, what has come to be” denotes the presently existent set of five aggregates, which are being abandoned through the abandonment of the cause for their continued re-manifestation, namely, craving or desire-and-lust.
in the air element does not seek delight in suffering.
in the air element, beings would not become enamoured with it … … but because there is an escape from the air element, beings escape from it.
In the Buddha, Dhamma, and Saṅgha.
In the case of a bhikkhu who has attained the cessation of perception and feeling, the bodily formation has ceased and subsided, the verbal formation has ceased and subsided, the mental formation has ceased and subsided; but his vitality is not extinguished, his physical heat has not been dissipated, and his faculties are serene.
In the case of a noble disciple who possesses wisdom, the faith that follows from it becomes stable; the energy that follows from it becomes stable; the mindfulness that follows from it becomes stable; the concentration that follows from it becomes stable.”
In the case of a person who destroys life, if one compares one occasion with another, whether by day or by night, which is more frequent: the occasions when he is destroying life or those when he is not doing so?”
In the case of a person who takes what is not given … who engages in sexual misconduct … who speaks falsehood, if one compares one occasion with another, whether by day or by night, which is more frequent: the occasions when he is speaking falsehood or those when he is not speaking falsehood?”
In the commentaries abhisamaya is synonymous with paṭivedha, penetration, both terms being used interchangeably to characterize the four functions of the supramundane path; see Vism -.
In the Dhamma proclaimed by the Buddha.
In the Dhamma proclaimed by the Noble One.
In the evening they strike him with a hundred spears.
In the evening, when I am entering Kapilavatthu after visiting the Blessed One or the bhikkhus worthy of esteem, I come across a stray elephant, a stray horse, a stray chariot, a stray cart, a stray man.
In the factors of enlightenment, Who through nonclinging find delight
In the first watch of the night, while walking back and forth and sitting, he purifies his mind of obstructive states.
In the first watch of the night, while walking back and forth and sitting, he purifies his mind of obstructive states.
In the future, too, by way of elements, beings will come together and unite….
in the future...
In the later literature the noun form ayūhana acquires the technical sense of “accumulation,” with specific reference to kamma; in the formula of dependent origination, volitional formations are said to have the function of ayūhana; see Paṭis I,,; Vism,,,-,.
In the Magadhan mountain range.
In the middle watch of the night he lies down on his right side in the lion’s posture with one foot overlapping the other, mindful and clearly comprehending, after noting in his mind the idea of rising.
In the middle watch of the night he lies down on the right side in the lion’s posture with one foot overlapping the other, mindful and clearly comprehending, after noting in his mind the idea of rising.
In the mind door the process is somewhat different: it begins with a mind-door adverting consciousness, followed immediately by the string of javanas.
In the morning they strike him with a hundred spears.
in the other world.’
In the past it was so; in the future it will be so; and now too at present it is so.
In the past it was so; in the future it will be so; and now too at present it is so.”
In the past it was so; in the future it will be so; and now too at present it is so.”
In the past it was so; in the future it will be so; and now too at present it is so.”
In the past it was so; in the future it will be so; and now too at present it is so.” 
In the past it was so; in the future it will be so; and now too at present it is so.”  those unafraid of wrongdoing, those afraid of wrongdoing; the unlearned, the learned;  the lazy, the energetic; the muddle-minded, the mindful.
In the past it was so; in the future it will be so; and now too at present it is so.” the lazy, the energetic; the muddle-minded, the mindful.
In the past they did so, in the future they will do so, and now at present they do so too.
In the past they did so, in the future they will do so, and now at present they do so too.
In the past they did so, in the future they will do so, and now at present they do so too.
In the past they did so, in the future they will do so, and now at present they do so too.”
In the past they did so, in the future they will do so, and now at present they do so too.”
In the past too I was devoured by consciousness in the very same way that I am now being devoured by present consciousness.
In the past too I was devoured by form in the very same way that I am now being devoured by present form.
In the past you were the potter, Ghaṭikara in Vehaḷiṅga.
In the past, bhikkhus, I too saw that being, but I did not speak about it.
In the past, bhikkhus, I too saw that novice nun, but I did not speak about it.
In the past, bhikkhus, this Mount Vepulla was called Pacı̄navaṁsa, and at that time these people were called Tivaras.
In the past, by way of elements, beings came together and united….
In the past, venerable sir, four teachers—holding different views, with different convictions, different preferences—came to dwell in that rest house.
In the present sutta, resolving on the formula is said to culminate in the destruction of the five lower fetters, that is, in the stage of nonreturning.
In the relinquishment of grasping:
In the Stable One of steady mind
In the theatre or arena, among beings who are not yet free from delusion, who are bound by the bondage of delusion, an actor entertains them with bewildering things that excite them even more strongly to delusion.
In the theatre or arena, among beings who are not yet free from hatred, who are bound by the bondage of hatred, an actor entertains them with infuriating things that excite them even more strongly to hatred.
In the theatre or arena, among beings who are not yet free from lust, who are bound by the bondage of lust, an actor entertains them with titillating things that excite them even more strongly to lust.
In the time of the Buddha Kassapa’s Dispensation, he invited the Bhikkhu Saṅgha to a meal.
In the various kinds of births.
In the village or a forest:
In the world anger is a rusty sword;
In the world this is a term of abuse: ‘You alms-gatherer; you roam about with a begging bowl in your hand!’ And yet, bhikkhus, clansmen intent on the good take up that way of life for a valid reason.
In their defeat, the asuras were frightened and entered the asura city through the lotus stalk, to the bewilderment of the devas.
In this Dhamma and Discipline, Having abandoned the wandering on in birth, Will make an end to suffering.’
In this manner both these great nagas rejoiced in what was well stated and well declared by the other.
In this royal court, venerable sir, there are counsellors who, when the enemies arrive, are capable of dividing them by subterfuge; but there is no place for those battles of subterfuge, no scope for them, when aging and death are rolling in.
In this royal court, venerable sir, there exists abundant bullion and gold stored in vaults and depositories, and with such wealth we are capable of mollifying the enemies when they come; but there is no place for those battles of wealth, no scope for them, when aging and death are rolling in.
In this statement, ‘This is the noble truth of suffering,’ there are innumerable nuances, innumerable details, innumerable implications.
In this statement, ‘This is the noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering,’ there are innumerable nuances, innumerable details, innumerable implications.
In this very life gains praise.”
In this way the mind should be reined in from these states regarding forms cognizable by the eye.
In this way, bhikkhu, remember the Four Noble Truths taught by me.
In this way, bhikkhus, Sakka, lord of the devas, won a victory by means of righteousness itself.”
In this way, bhikkhus, those discourses spoken by the Tathagata that are deep, deep in meaning, supramundane, dealing with emptiness, will disappear.
In this world with its devas, The Teacher of perfect name:
In this world, with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, in this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans, the Tathagata is the noble one.
In translating the names of the parts I follow Horner, at Milinda’s Questions,:, who bases her  renderings on A.K.
In what does it form intimacy?
In what dwelling does the Venerable Anuruddha now usually dwell?”
In what dwelling has the Venerable Sariputta spent the day?”
In what dwelling has the Venerable Sariputta spent the day?” 
In what one thing?
In what sense are they called factors of enlightenment?”
In what sense are they called factors of enlightenment?”
In what way has one attained Nibbana in this very life?”
In what way is one a trainee?”
In what way is one practising in accordance with the Dhamma?
In what way is this so, friend?”
In what way, friend, has one attained consolation?” 
In what way, friend, has one attained supreme consolation?”
In what way, friend, is one a trainee?”
In what way, friend, is one beyond training?”
In what way, Master Kaccana, is one ‘with sense doors guarded’?”
In what way, Master Kaccana, is one ‘with sense doors unguarded’?”
In what way, venerable sir, does one have energy aroused?’
In what way, venerable sir, has the diversity of elements been spoken of by the Blessed One?’” 
In what way, venerable sir, has the diversity of elements been spoken of by the Blessed One?”
In what way, venerable sir, has the diversity of elements been spoken of by the Blessed One?” 
In what way, venerable sir, is it said ‘the world’?”
In what way, venerable sir, is it said ‘the world’?”
In what way, venerable sir, is it said, ‘Empty is the world’?”
In what way, venerable sir, is one a great man?”
In what way, venerable sir, is one a speaker on the Dhamma?
In what way, venerable sir, is one a speaker on the Dhamma?”
In what way, venerable sir, is one a speaker on the Dhamma?” 
In what way, venerable sir, is one a speaker on the Dhamma?” 
In what way, venerable sir, is one called a being?”
In what way, venerable sir, is one called ‘an unwise dolt’?”
In what way, venerable sir, is one called ‘poor’?”
In what way, venerable sir, is one called ‘prosperous’?”
In what way, venerable sir, is one called ‘wise and alert’?”
In what way, venerable sir, is one equipped with faculties?”
In what way, venerable sir, is one equipped with faculties?” 
In what way, venerable sir, is the Dhamma directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise?”
In what way, venerable sir, is there right view?”
In what way, venerable sir, might Mara be?” 
In what way, venerable sir, might there be a being or the description of a being?”
In what way, venerable sir, might there be Mara or the description of Mara?” 
In what way, venerable sir, might there be suffering or the description of suffering?”…
In what way, venerable sir, might there be the world or the description of the world?”
In which the fool founders.”
In whom do the wise take delight
In whom dwell these four qualities—
In wisdom, virtue, and peace, So a bhikkhu who has gone beyond
In youth one is subject to aging; in health one is subject to illness; while alive one is subject to death.
Incapable of making an end, They fare on to birth and aging.
Indeed I see the radiance
Indeed, Ananda, who would not approve of Sariputta, unless he were foolish, full of hatred, deluded, or mentally deranged?
Indeed, bhikkhus, when that bhikkhu is conducting himself thus and dwelling thus, it is impossible that he will give up the training and return to the lower life.
Indeed, bhikkhus, when that bhikkhu is developing and cultivating the Noble Eightfold Path, it is impossible that he will give up the training and return to the lower life.
Indeed, dear sir, this is permanent, this is stable, this is eternal, this is complete, this is imperishable.
Indeed, friends, when that bhikkhu is developing and cultivating the four establishments of mindfulness, it is impossible that he will give up the training and return to the lower life.
Indeed, in the Central Asian Skt ms corresponding to DN III, ), it is conspicuously absent.
Indeed, sir, the ascetic Gotama is a magician!” 
Indeed, these mortals instruct rightly
Indeed, this is where one is not born, does not age, does not die, does not pass away, and is not reborn; and there is no other escape superior to this.”
Indeed, this is where one is not born, does not age, does not die, does not pass away, and is not reborn; and there is no other escape superior to this.” 
Indeed, Udayı̄, this is the path that you have obtained, and when you have developed and cultivated it, it will lead you on, while you are dwelling in the appropriate way, to such a state that you will understand: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’” 
Indeed, venerable sir, who would not approve of the Venerable Sariputta … … unless he were mentally deranged?
Indeed, venerable sir, who would not approve of the Venerable Sariputta, unless he were foolish, full of hatred, deluded, or mentally deranged?” 
Indeed, who would not approve of the Venerable Sariputta, unless he were foolish, full of hatred, deluded, or mentally deranged?’”
Indifferent towards sensual pleasures?”
Infatuated with the pathway of conceit, For a long time you’ve been remorseful.
Initially it seemed to me very unlikely that tulaṁ and atulaṁ should function in grammatically distinct ways, and I therefore inclined to the former interpretation, in principle if not in details.
Insight and the phenomena associated with it have Nibbana as object, Nibbana as support, because they are established on Nibbana as their support in the sense of slanting towards it by way of inclination.… Concentration is nondistraction distinguished into access and absorption, consisting in the one-pointedness of mind aroused by being established on Nibbana, with that as cause by taking as object release of the phenomena produced therein.
Insight: this is called the path leading to the unconditioned….”
Instead, agitation and clinging arise and the mind turns back, thinking: ‘But who is my self?’
Instead, headman, while I am sitting right here, and you are sitting right there, I will teach you about the origin and the passing away of suffering.
integrate niggayha into the long compound.
Intention of renunciation, intention of non-ill will, intention of harmlessness: this is called right intention.
Intimacy with anyone should arise, The wise man ought not to stir his mind
Inundated by rain from a rain cloud, the rigging would easily collapse and rot away.
Inundated by rain from a rain cloud, the rigging would easily collapse and rot away.
Involvement with conceit is a disease, involvement with conceit is a tumour, involvement with conceit is a dart.
Inwardly impure, outwardly beautiful.”
Iron is a corruption of gold, corrupted by which gold is neither malleable nor wieldy nor radiant but brittle and not properly fit for work.
Is a supreme man indeed:
Is anything included in feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness arisen with eye-contact as condition permanent or impermanent?”–“Impermanent, venerable sir.” 
Is anything included in feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness arisen with mind-contact as condition permanent or impermanent?”–“Impermanent, venerable sir.”–“Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?”–“Suffering, venerable sir.”–“Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?”–“No, venerable sir.”
Is best among devas and humans.
Is best among devas and humans.”
Is called a crosser of the flood.” 
Is existence...
Is eye-contact...
Is fit for Mara to address.” 
Is harassed in regard to six.”
Is he called a crosser of the flood?”
Is it possible to explain this consciousness in a similar way—to teach, proclaim, establish, disclose, analyse, and elucidate it thus: ‘For such a reason this consciousness is nonself’?”
Is it, Maghava, from fear or weakness
Is led away from its fodder, So the old father of those boys
Is not fit to be eaten by me.
Is one’s friend again and again.
Is released from all suffering.”
Is supreme among enjoyments.
Is supreme among enjoyments.
Is the ear the fetter of sounds or are sounds the fetter of the ear?… Is the mind the fetter of mental phenomena or are mental phenomena the fetter of the mind?”
Is the giver of all.
Is the giver of the Deathless.”
Is the one that is useful, Not the one left burnt inside.
Is the very danger that comes to the nongiver.
Is the way to check the fool:
Is the way to check the fool:
Is there any ear by way of which one describing the Buddhas of the past could describe them?… Is there any mind by way of which one describing the Buddhas of the past could describe them—those who have attained final Nibbana, cut  through proliferation, cut through the rut, exhausted the round, and transcended all suffering?”
Is there any feeling … any perception … any volitional formations … any consciousness that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, and that will remain the same just like eternity itself?”
Is there any other cause and reason why these young bhikkhus … lead the complete and pure holy life all their lives and maintain it continuously?”
Is there any other cause and reason why these young bhikkhus … lead the complete and pure holy life all their lives and maintain it continuously?”
Is there, venerable sir, any feeling … any perception … any volitional formations … any consciousness that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, and that will remain the same just like eternity itself?”
Is truly a delightful place.”
Is truly the foremost speech.” 
Is worth a thousand times its value.”
Is worth a thousand times its value.” 
Isn’t it true that one cannot become enlightened as long as ignorance and volitional formations are unseen?
It appears to be a divine vehicle indeed, sir!’ Is it possible, venerable sir, to point out a divine vehicle in this Dhamma and Discipline?”
It appears to be a divine vehicle indeed, sir!” 
It cannot be removed by any ascetic or brahmin or deva or Mara or Brahma or by anyone in the world.
It cognizes sour, it cognizes bitter, it cognizes pungent, it cognizes sweet, it cognizes sharp, it cognizes mild, it cognizes salty, it cognizes bland.
It does not amount to a hundredth part, or a thousandth part, or a hundred thousandth part of the great earth.”
It does not amount to a hundredth part, or a thousandth part, or a hundred thousandth part of the water in the pond.”
It feels pleasure, it feels pain, it feels neither-pain-nor-pleasure.
It goes ahead without stopping
It grows depending on a pair of factors:
It has been a long time, dear sir, since you took the opportunity of coming here.
It has come to be dependent on a cause;
It is a mishap for me indeed, it is not well gained by me, that because of my ingenuity I look down upon other well-behaved bhikkhus.”
It is a mishap for me indeed, it is not well gained by me, that dissatisfaction has arisen in me, that lust has infested my mind.
It is a mishap for me indeed, it is not well gained by me, that dissatisfaction has arisen in me, that lust has infested my mind.
It is amazing indeed, sir!
It is amazing indeed, sir!
It is amazing indeed, sir!
It is amazing indeed, sir!
It is amazing indeed, sir!
It is amazing indeed, sir!
It is amazing indeed, sir!
It is amazing indeed, sir!
It is amazing indeed, sir!
It is amazing indeed, sir!
It is amazing indeed, sir!
It is amazing, friend Sariputta!
It is amazing, indeed!
It is amazing, indeed!
It is amazing, Master Bharadvaja!
It is amazing, Master Gotama!
It is amazing, Master Gotama!
It is amazing, Master Kaccana!
It is amazing, Master Kaccana!
It is amazing, Master Moggallana!
It is amazing, Master Moggallana!
It is amazing, venerable sir!
It is amazing, venerable sir!
It is amazing, venerable sir!
It is amazing, venerable sir!
It is amazing, venerable sir!
It is amazing, venerable sir!
It is amazing, venerable sir!
It is amazing, venerable sir!
It is amazing, venerable sir!
It is amazing, venerable sir!
It is amazing, venerable sir!
It is amazing, venerable sir!
It is amazing, venerable sir!
It is amazing, venerable sir!
It is amazing, venerable sir, how helpful has been my devotion and reverence for the Blessed One, my sense of shame and fear of wrongdoing.
It is an intensification of ūhati; the simple verb occurs at MN I,-, where it might be rendered “to be strained.”
It is because he has developed and cultivated the four bases for spiritual power that the bhikkhu Moggallana has become so powerful and mighty.
It is because he has developed and cultivated these four bases for spiritual power that the Tathagata is called the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.” 
It is because he has developed and cultivated these three faculties that the bhikkhu Piṇḍola Bharadvaja has declared final knowledge thus.
It is because he has fully awakened to these Four Noble Truths as they really are that the Tathagata is called the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.
It is because I have seen and directly known cessation in the ear … … in the mind, in mind-consciousness, and in things cognizable with mind-consciousness, that I regard them thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’” 
It is because of not understanding and not penetrating the noble truth of the origin of suffering … the noble truth of the cessation of suffering … the noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering that you and I have roamed and wandered through this long course of saṁsara.
It is because of not understanding and not penetrating this Dhamma, Ananda, that this generation has become like a tangled skein, like a knotted ball of thread, like matted reeds and rushes, and does not pass beyond the plane of misery, the bad destinations, the nether world, saṁsara.
It is because of the power of virtue that a woman is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
It is because one has not developed and cultivated these seven factors of enlightenment that one is called ‘an unwise dolt.’”
It is because one has partly developed these four establishments of mindfulness that one is a trainee.”
It is better each day for the mindful one, And he is freed from enmity.” 
It is better each day for the mindful one, But he is not freed from enmity.
It is by clinging to feeling … to perception … to volitional formations … to consciousness that ‘I am’ occurs, not without clinging.
It is by clinging to feeling … to perception … to volitional formations … to consciousness that ‘I am’ occurs, not without clinging.
It is by clinging to form that ‘I am’ occurs, not without clinging.
It is conceivable that the Buddhist conversation is modelled after the Upaniṣad but with a different message.
It is desire that is accompanied by lassitude, associated with lassitude.
It is desire that is accompanied by restlessness, associated with restlessness.
It is desire that is accompanied by sloth and torpor, associated with sloth and torpor.
It is desire that is repeatedly distracted externally, repeatedly disturbed, on account of the five cords of sensual pleasure.
it is difficult for you to know...
It is disintegrating, bhikkhu, therefore it is called the world.”
It is energy that is accompanied by lassitude, associated with lassitude.
It is energy that is accompanied by restlessness, associated with restlessness.
It is energy that is accompanied by sloth and torpor, associated with sloth and torpor.
It is energy that is repeatedly distracted externally, repeatedly disturbed, on account of the five cords of sensual pleasure.
It is enough for you, chamberlains, to be diligent.
It is enough for you, chamberlains, to be diligent.”
It is enough to be liberated from them.
It is enough to be liberated from them.
It is enough to be liberated from them.”
It is enough to be liberated from them.”
It is enough to be liberated from them.”
It is enough to be liberated from them.”
It is enough to be liberated from them.”
It is enough to be liberated from them.”
It is enough to be liberated from them.”
It is enough to be liberated from them.”
It is enough to be liberated from them.”
It is enough to be liberated from them.”
It is enough to be liberated from them.”
It is enough to experience revulsion towards all formations, enough to become dispassionate towards them, enough to be liberated from them.”
It is enough to experience revulsion towards all formations, enough to become dispassionate towards them, enough to be liberated from them.”
It is enough to experience revulsion towards all formations, enough to become dispassionate towards them, enough to be liberated from them.” 
It is enough, bhikkhu, to feel revulsion towards all formations, enough to become dispassionate towards them, enough to be liberated from them.”
It is enough, bhikkhus, to experience revulsion towards all formations, enough to become dispassionate towards them, enough to be liberated from them.
It is enough, bhikkhus, to experience revulsion towards all formations, enough to become dispassionate towards them, enough to be liberated from them.”
It is enveloped by old age.”
It is enveloped by old age;
It is exactly so and not otherwise!
It is for one who knows thus, for one who sees thus, that the destruction of the taints comes about.
It is for these three reasons, Venerable Kassapa, that the Blessed One laid down this rule.”
It is from here that the streams turn back, Here that the round no longer revolves;
It is good indeed that I am freed from that useless gruelling asceticism!
It is good that you heard the verses that the bhikkhu Abhibhū recited while he was standing in the brahma world.’”
It is good that you remember the Four Noble Truths taught by me.
It is good that you remember the Four Noble Truths taught by me.
It is good that you thus instruct the bhikkhus with a Dhamma talk.”
It is good that you understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by me in brief.
It is good that you understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by me in brief.
It is good that you understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by me in brief.
It is good that you understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by me in brief.
It is good that you understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by me in brief.
It is good that you understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by me in brief.
It is good that you understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by me in brief.
It is good that you understand the Dhamma taught by me in such a way.
It is good that you understand the Dhamma taught by me in such a way.
It is good that you understand the Dhamma taught by me in such a way.
It is good that you understand the Dhamma to have been taught by me for the sake of final Nibbana without clinging.
It is good that you understand the Dhamma to have been taught by me for the sake of the fading away of lust.
It is good that, steady and mindful, I have attained enlightenment!” 
It is good to see such arahants.” 
It is here this tangle is cut.”
It is impossible for that displeasure faculty to arise without a basis, without a source, without a causal formation, without a condition.’
It is impossible for that equanimity faculty to arise without a basis, without a source, without a causal formation, without a condition.’
It is impossible for that joy faculty to arise without a basis, without a source, without a causal formation, without a condition.’
It is impossible for that pain faculty to arise without a basis, without a source, without a causal formation, without a condition.’
It is impossible for that pleasure faculty to arise without a basis, without a source, without a causal formation, without a condition.’
It is impossible that one can abandon desire by means of desire itself.”
It is in such a way that a bhikkhu exercises clear comprehension.
It is in such a way that a bhikkhu exercises clear comprehension.
It is in such a way that a bhikkhu is a triple investigator.
It is in such a way that a bhikkhu is mindful.
It is in such a way that by protecting oneself one protects others.
It is in such a way that by protecting others one protects oneself.
It is in such a way that I am a lone dweller and speak in praise of dwelling alone.”
It is in such a way that identity view comes to be.”
It is in such a way that identity view does not come to be.” 
It is in such a way that one engages people in dispute.
It is in such a way that one has comprehended the Dhamma.
It is in such a way that one is a trainee.
It is in such a way that one is intimate in the village.
It is in such a way that one is intimate with none in the village.
It is in such a way that one is not rid of sensual pleasures.
It is in such a way that one is rid of sensual pleasures.
It is in such a way that one roams about homeless.
It is in such a way that one roams about in a home.
It is in such a way that one roams about without abode.
It is in such a way that the meaning of what was stated by me in brief should be understood in detail.”
It is in such a way that the meaning of what was stated by me in brief should be understood in detail.”
It is in such a way that the meaning of what was stated by me in brief should be understood in detail.”
It is in such a way that the meaning of what was stated by me in brief should be understood in detail.”
It is in such a way that the meaning of what was stated by me in brief should be understood in detail.”
It is in such a way that the meaning of what was stated by me in brief should be understood in detail.” 
It is in such a way that there is nonrestraint.
It is in such a way that there is restraint.
It is in such a way that there is restraint.
It is in such a way that you should train yourself.
It is in such a way that you should train yourself.”
It is in such a way that you should train yourself.”
It is in such a way that you should train yourselves.”
It is in such a way that you should train yourselves.”
It is in such a way that you should train.”
It is in such a way, brahmin, that one is ‘with sense doors guarded.’”
It is in such a way, brahmin, that one is ‘with sense doors unguarded.’”
It is in such a way, Elder, that dwelling alone is fulfilled in detail.” 
It is in such a way, Moggallana, that one has aroused energy.’
It is in such a way, venerable sir, that Nigaṇṭha Nataputta teaches the Dhamma to his disciples.”
It is in this way that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the seven factors of enlightenment so that he slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.”
It is in this way that a bhikkhu who has a good friend develops and cultivates the seven factors of enlightenment.”
It is in this way that a bhikkhu … inclines towards Nibbana.” 
It is in this way that one is a trainee.”
It is in this way that the four establishments of mindfulness are developed and cultivated so that they fulfil the seven factors of enlightenment.
It is in this way that the perception of a skeleton is developed and cultivated so that it is of great fruit and benefit.”
It is in this way that the perception of a skeleton is developed and cultivated so that it leads to great good.”
It is in this way that the perception of a skeleton is developed and cultivated so that one of two fruits is to be expected: either final knowledge in this very life or, if there is a residue of clinging, the state of nonreturning.” 
It is in this way that the perception of cessation is developed and cultivated so that it is of great fruit and benefit.”
It is in this way that the perception of cessation is developed and cultivated so that it leads to great good … to great security from bondage … to a great sense of urgency … to dwelling in great comfort.”
It is in this way that the seven factors of enlightenment are developed and cultivated so that they fulfil true knowledge and liberation.”
It is in this way that the three kinds of good conduct are developed and cultivated so that they fulfil the four establishments of mindfulness.
It is in this way, Ananda, that a bhikkhu who has a good friend, a good companion, a good comrade, develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.
It is in this way, bhikkhu, that one is equipped with faculties.” 
It is in this way, bhikkhu, that the designation ‘aggregates’ applies to the aggregates.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the four establishments of mindfulness so that he slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path so that he fully understands by direct knowledge those things that are to be fully understood by direct knowledge … he develops by direct knowledge those things that are to be developed by direct knowledge.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path so that he gives up evil unwholesome states and does not take them back.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path so that he slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path so that he slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path so that his fetters easily collapse and rot away.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path so that whenever evil unwholesome states arise, he disperses them and quells them on the spot.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path so that whenever evil unwholesome states have arisen, he intercedes to disperse and quell them.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the seven factors of enlightenment so that he slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu dwells perceiving after and before: ‘As before, so after; as after, so before.’ 
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu dwells ‘as below, so above; as above, so below.’
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu dwells ‘as by day, so at night; as at night, so by day.’
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu exercises clear comprehension.
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu guards the doors of the sense faculties.
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu is devoted to wakefulness.
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu is mindful.
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu is mindful.
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu is mindful.
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu is moderate in eating.
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who has a good friend develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who has a good friend develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who has a good friend develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who has a good friend develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who has a good friend develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who has a good friend develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who has a good friend develops and cultivates the seven factors of enlightenment.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who is accomplished in careful attention develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who is accomplished in careful attention develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who is accomplished in careful attention develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who is accomplished in careful attention develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who is accomplished in careful attention develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who is accomplished in careful attention develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.” 
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who is accomplished in careful attention develops and cultivates the seven factors of enlightenment.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who is diligent develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who is diligent develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who is diligent develops and cultivates the seven factors of enlightenment.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu, based upon virtue, established upon virtue, develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path, and thereby achieves greatness and expansiveness in states.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu, based upon virtue, established upon virtue, develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path, and thereby attains to growth, increase, and expansion in states.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu, based upon virtue, established upon virtue, develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu, based upon virtue, established upon virtue, develops and cultivates the seven factors of enlightenment.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu, based upon virtue, established upon virtue, develops the seven factors of enlightenment, and thereby achieves greatness and expansiveness in states.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu, with a mind that is open and unenveloped, develops the mind imbued with luminosity.
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that in dependence on the diversity of elements there arises the diversity of contacts.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that in dependence on the diversity of elements there arises the diversity of contacts; that the diversity of elements does not arise in dependence on the diversity of contacts.”
It is in this way, bhikkhus, that when a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path, then for him the four establishments of mindfulness … the seven factors of enlightenment go to fulfilment by development.”
It is in this way, friend, that one guards the doors of the sense faculties.
It is in this way, friend, that one is devoted to wakefulness.
It is in this way, friend, that one is moderate in eating.
It is in this way, great king, that a person is one heading from darkness to darkness.
It is in this way, great king, that a person is one heading from darkness to light.
It is in this way, great king, that a person is one heading from light to darkness.
It is in this way, great king, that a person is one heading from light to light.
It is in this way, householder, that the diversity of elements has been spoken of by the Blessed One.”
It is in this way, Kaccana, that there is right view.
It is in this way, venerable sir, that I develop mindfulness of breathing.”
It is in this way, venerable sir, that I remember the Four Noble Truths taught by the Blessed One.”
It is indeed a gain for me, it is well gained by me, that I have gone forth in this well-expounded Dhamma and Discipline!
It is indeed a gain for me, it is well gained by me, that my companions in the holy life are virtuous, of good character!”
It is indeed better, never worse.
It is indeed to be expected, venerable sir, that a noble disciple who has faith will dwell with energy aroused for the abandoning of unwholesome states and the acquisition of wholesome states; that he will be strong, firm in exertion, not shirking the responsibility of cultivating wholesome states.
It is investigation that is accompanied by lassitude, associated with lassitude.
It is investigation that is accompanied by restlessness, associated with restlessness.
It is investigation that is accompanied by sloth and torpor, associated with sloth and torpor.
It is investigation that is repeatedly distracted externally, repeatedly disturbed, on account of the five cords of sensual pleasure.
It is just as if the largest branch would break off a great tree standing possessed of heartwood: so too, Ananda, in the great Bhikkhu Saṅgha standing possessed of heartwood, Sariputta has attained final Nibbana.
It is just as if the largest branches would break off a great tree standing possessed of heartwood: so too, bhikkhus, in the great Bhikkhu Saṅgha standing possessed of heartwood, Sariputta and Moggallana have attained final Nibbana.
It is just that your touch is evil.” 
It is just this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
It is mind that is accompanied by lassitude, associated with lassitude.
It is mind that is accompanied by restlessness, associated with restlessness.
It is mind that is accompanied by sloth and torpor, associated with sloth and torpor.
It is mind that is repeatedly distracted externally, repeatedly disturbed, on account of the five cords of sensual pleasure.
It is not because they have been driven to it by kings that they do so, nor because they have been driven to it by thieves, nor owing to debt, nor from fear, nor to earn a livelihood.
It is not easy for one living at home to lead the perfectly complete, perfectly purified holy life, which is like polished conch.
It is not easy to count it and say it is so many years, or so many hundreds of years, or so many thousands of years, or so many hundreds of thousands of years.”
It is not easy to count it and say it is so many years, or so many hundreds of years, or so many thousands of years, or so many hundreds of thousands of years.”
It is not easy to count it and say it is so many years, or so many hundreds of years, or so many thousands of years, or so many hundreds of thousands of years.”
It is not easy to count them and say that they are so many aeons, or so many hundreds of aeons, or so many thousands of aeons, or so many hundreds of thousands of aeons.
It is not easy to count them and say that they are so many aeons, or so many hundreds of aeons, or so many thousands of aeons, or so many hundreds of thousands of aeons.
It is not easy to count them and say they are so many aeons, or so many hundreds of aeons, or so many thousands of aeons, or so many hundreds of thousands of aeons.”
It is not easy to count them and say they are so many aeons, or so many hundreds of aeons, or so many thousands of aeons, or so many hundreds of thousands of aeons.” 
It is not easy to find an attainment that those bhikkhus have not already attained.
It is not easy to find an attainment which that bhikkhu has not already attained.
It is not easy to find an attainment which that bhikkhu has not already attained.
It is not easy, bhikkhus, to find a being who in this long course has not previously been your mother...
It is not good to misrepresent the Blessed One.
It is not that I lack proper attendants; I have proper attendants.
It is not that I lack suitable medicine; I have suitable medicine.
It is of these things, friends, that an arising is discerned, that a vanishing is discerned, that an alteration of that which stands is discerned.’
It is of these things, friends, that an arising was discerned, that a vanishing was discerned, that an alteration of that which stands was discerned.
It is of these things, friends, that an arising will be discerned, that a vanishing will be discerned, that an alteration of that which stands will be discerned.
It is old kamma, to be seen as generated and fashioned by volition, as something to be felt.
It is one who delights in clinging, who takes delight in clinging, who rejoices in clinging, and who does not know and see the cessation of clinging as it really is, that thinks: ‘The Tathagata exists after death’ … or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’
It is one who delights in craving, who takes delight in craving, who rejoices in craving, and who does not know and see the cessation of craving as it really is, that thinks: ‘The Tathagata exists after death’ … or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’
It is one who delights in existence, who takes delight in existence, who rejoices in existence, and who does not know and see the cessation of existence as it really is, that thinks: ‘The Tathagata exists after death’ … or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’ 
It is one who delights in feeling...
It is one who does not know and see feeling as it really is … who does not know and see perception as it really is … who does not know and see volitional formations as they really are...
It is one who is not devoid of lust for feeling … who is not devoid of lust for perception … who is not devoid of lust for volitional formations … who is not devoid of lust for consciousness, who is not devoid of desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for consciousness, that thinks: ‘The Tathagata exists after death’ … or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’
It is problematic how the optative clause in the annihilationist version should be interpreted; perhaps it can be read as an assertion that personal existence, along with its experienced world, is utterly fortuitous.
It is puzzling that here, when it was most necessary to do so, the Buddha makes no mention of the probationary period normally imposed on wanderers of other sects who wish to enter the Buddhist order; perhaps the Buddha had foreseen that Susima would have been discouraged by such a stipulation and would not have applied for admission, thus losing the chance to gain liberation.
It is such a one that they call virtuous, Such a one that they call wise, Such a one has passed beyond suffering, Such a one the devatas worship.”
It is taught to be a murderer;
It is the five cords of sensual pleasure.
It is the five cords of sensual pleasure….
It is the four establishments of mindfulness.
It is the four establishments of mindfulness.
It is the path and practice that leads to gaining spiritual power, to obtaining spiritual power.
It is the remainderless fading away and cessation of that same craving, the giving up and relinquishing of it, freedom from it, non-reliance on it.
It is the remainderless fading away and cessation of that same craving, the giving up and relinquishing of it, freedom from it, non-reliance on it.
It is the remainderless fading away and cessation of that same craving, the giving up and relinquishing of it, freedom from it, nonreliance on it.
It is the remainderless fading away and cessation of that same craving….
It is the senseless people who arise right here who cause the true Dhamma to disappear.
It is the seven factors of enlightenment.
It is this craving that leads to renewed existence, accompanied by delight and lust, seeking delight here and there; that is, craving for sensual pleasures, craving for existence, craving for extermination.
It is this craving that leads to renewed existence, accompanied by delight and lust, seeking delight here and there; that is, craving for sensual pleasures, craving for existence, craving for extermination.
It is this craving that leads to renewed existence….
It is this craving which leads to renewed existence, accompanied by delight and lust, seeking delight here and there; that is, craving for sensual pleasures, craving for existence, craving for extermination.
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view … right concentration.
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view … right concentration.
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view … right concentration.
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view … right concentration.
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view...
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view...
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view...
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view...
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view...
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view...
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view...
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view...
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view...
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view...
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view...
It is through the assemblage of states consisting in mindfulness … equanimity, arisen at the moment of the mundane and supramundane paths … that the noble disciple is enlightened; therefore is called enlightenment.
It is thus, friend, that I know for beings—
It is time for them to awaken.”
It is time for them to awaken.” 
It is to be expected that a bhikkhu with right view will understand as it really is: ‘This is suffering.’… ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
It is to him that I wish to take it.”
It is to remove anger, conceit, and scorn, That the holy life is lived, O Tissa.”
It is well gained by you, Dhammadinna!
It is well gained by you, Godha!
It is well gained by you, householder!
It is well gained by you, householder!
It is well gained by you, householder!
It is when one knows and sees thus that wrong view is abandoned.”
It is when the seven factors of enlightenment are developed and cultivated in this way that they lead to the abandoning of the things that fetter.
It is when the seven factors of enlightenment are developed and cultivated in this way that they lead to the cessation of craving.”
It is wonderful, bhikkhus, on the part of the Tathagata, it is amazing on the part of the Tathagata, that when such a pair of disciples has attained final Nibbana, there is no sorrow or lamentation in the Tathagata.
It is wonderful, Master Gotama!
It is wonderful, Master Moggallana!
It is wonderful, venerable sir!
It is wonderful, venerable sir!
It is, friend, because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that I directly know this thousandfold world.” 
It is: right view … right concentration.
It is: right view...
It is: right view...
It is: right view...
It is: right view...
It is: right view...
It is: right view...
It is: the seven factors of enlightenment.
It is: the seven factors of enlightenment.
It is: the seven factors of enlightenment.
It is: wrong view...
It is: wrong view...
It is: wrong view...
It is: wrong view....
It may attack and bite the fool, Whether a man or a woman.
It may be expected of anyone, Ananda—whether bhikkhu or bhikkhuni—who dwells with a mind well established in the four establishments of mindfulness, that such a one will perceive successively loftier stages of distinction.
It may be expected of anyone, sisters—whether bhikkhu or bhikkhuni—who dwells with a mind well established in the four establishments of mindfulness, that such a one will perceive successively loftier stages of distinction.”
It might be noted that jayetha, jiyetha, etc., are middle-voice optatives in the third person singular.
It occurred to me: ‘Here, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving … … that possesses concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving….
It occurred to me: ‘Here, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving, thinking: “Thus my desire will be neither too slack nor too tense; and it will be neither constricted internally nor distracted externally.”
It occurred to me: ‘I am a donor, a philanthropist, one who speaks in praise of giving.
It occurred to me: ‘I am a donor….’
It occurred to me: ‘It is wonderful, indeed!
It occurred to me: ‘It is wonderful, indeed!
It occurs to him: ‘My teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: “Anyone at all who destroys life is bound for a state of misery, bound for hell.”
It perceives blue, it perceives yellow, it perceives red, it perceives white.
It requires both the soil’s nutrients
It seems as though the earth is splitting open.”
It seems, sir, that we are impermanent, unstable, noneternal, included within identity.’
It seems, sir, we’re impermanent,’ having heard the utterance
It should be noted that this passage would hardly make sense if the commentaries were right in holding that Ananda was born on the same day as the Bodhisatta, for the Buddha would not need to insist on the frailties of old age if Ananda too was an old man.
It should be said: because of development.
It should be said: because of development.
It should be said: because of nondevelopment.
It should be said: because of nondevelopment.
It should be said: birth.
It should be said: clinging.
It should be said: concentration.
It should be said: craving.
It should be said: dispassion.
It should be said: existence.
It should be said: faith.
It should be said: feeling.
It should be said: gladness.
It should be said: happiness.
It should be said: ignorance.
It should be said: liberation.
It should be said: rapture.
It should be said: revulsion.
It should be said: suffering.
It should be said: the arahant, the venerable one of such a name and clan.
It should be said: the five aggregates subject to clinging.
It should be said: the five aggregates subject to clinging.
It should be said: the five aggregates subject to clinging.
It should be said: the five aggregates subject to clinging.
It should be said: the five aggregates subject to clinging; that is, the form aggregate subject to clinging … the consciousness aggregate subject to clinging.
It should be said: the knowledge and vision of things as they really are.
It should be said: the person, this venerable one of such a name and clan.
It should be said: the six internal sense bases.
It should be said: tranquillity.
It still belongs to you, brahmin!
It still belongs to you, brahmin!
